
<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61093 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr001___94024" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-001 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   5 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CENTRAL ASIA </F>
<F P=101> KAZAKHSTAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Kazakh Marriage Patterns Described </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0299A Almaty ANA TILI in Kazakh 21 Oct 93 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0299A </F>
<F P=104>  Almaty ANA TILI </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Kazakh </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Abdwali Qaraghululy: "Marriage and Weddings"] </F>
  [Text] It is well known that, since the past year of the 
monkey, there has been considerable discussion on the occasion 
of the marriage ceremonies taking place everywhere, about 
religious marriage, weddings, mixed marriage, and religious 
training. 
  Articles such as "Regular Religious Propaganda", "How Can We 
Be Muslims if We Neither Know nor Practice the 40 Duties of a 
Muslim?", and "Wedding Night" have been published in the press, 
and there has been news on television and radio on the 
construction of mosques, appearances before Muslim judges, and 
the like. A Kazakh translation of the teachings of the Koran has 
appeared in the national weekly SHALQAR, and materials have been 
provided about the Sharyat, fasting, and prayer. Last September 
SHALQAR familiarized its readers with teachings suggested by the 
ambassador of the Islamic Republic of Iran on the theme of "the 
Prophet Muhammad." 
  From what has been said, we see that we are carrying out the 
foundations of religious measures. However, it is clear that 
these things will not satisfy the masses of the people, which 
have had their ties with religion severed for 70 years, and 
which have remained uninformed. In this connection there are not 
a few suggestions and public needs. We hope that they will, in 
any case, gain the attention of the appropriate religious 
authorities and the information media. 
  We will touch, to the best of our abilities, on only one of 
these questions, the marriage question, and share our thoughts. 
  On Marriage and Setting Up a Household 
  Marriage is the custom whereby men and women, having become 
husband and wife, live jointly in one household. It is clear to 
all that marriage is no "art" created by the mind but something 
natural. If there were no marvelous manifestations of 
developments of this sort, the continuation of the generations 
would fail and human posterity would not have grown and 
prospered as it has at present. In simple words we can all 
understand, the vital meaning and valued characteristics of 
marriage for the life of society in general are an expression of 
this. However, this is not to say that marriage of men and women 
is an outstanding condition for life, one that is completely 
unequaled. 
  Long betrothals and the dispatching of girls for marriage 
and 
the marrying off of sons have enjoyed particular importance in 
the life of our people. Parents have been overjoyed that "my son 
has established a nest, my daughter has found a home," "the two 
of them have become a couple," "my family has expanded," and 
have thanked God. Thus a line has been forged to two young 
people, who have become man and wife and will be happy the rest 
of their lives. This day is one of the happiest days for them; 
one that they should never forget. According to the customs of a 
life that has been established by our ancestors and approved by 
religion, a mullah carries out the marriage ceremony at 
weddings. He provides the blessed marriage water for the bride 
and groom to drink. He reminds the couple of the fact that they 
are taking the first steps on the threshold of a greater life. 
He gives them advice on how to establish a proper life and makes 
known his good wishes. 
  On Mixed Marriage 
  Mixed marriage is a fact of life that has existed since 
ancient times and continues to exist. Even if there is no 
special written literature about this, we read about it in 
historical documents, in travel accounts, in histories, and 
stories. It takes place under various circumstances. It is a 
major topic in and of itself. 
  However, it is well known that our broad-minded and 
hospitable people experienced grief during the last three 
centuries while in the fetters of the white Tsarist and red 
imperialism, that Kazakhstan has changed from being a nation 
into a unique multiethnic republic. People of foreign 
nationalities with different languages and different religions 
have flowed in, spread out, taken over the administrative organs 
and the leading economic and cultural sectors, and strengthened 
the intermixing going on in daily life. Thus the necessary 
precondition for an increase in the number of mixed marriages 
arose. 
  All in all, in social life there are distinct forms of 
marriage and characteristics peculiar to each. To separate them 
out, it would be suitable to divide marriages into three groups. 
Let us do so. 
  Group One 
  In marriages whereby the sons and daughters of Turkic 
brothers such as Kazakhs, Uzbeks, Kyrgyz, Uighyr, Tatar, and 
Bashqurt, which have related languages and the same religion, 
join with one another, there are absolutely no conflicts from an 
ethnic or a religious standpoint. We must always approve and 
support this kind of marriage. 
  Group Two 
  Until the Soviet era only a few men were married to women of 
other nationalities, religion, and language among the Kazakhs. 
However, women who in this way went off to get married had to 
make known their willingness by special agreement to accept the 
Muslim religion, learn the Kazakh language, and utilize Kazakh 
customs and traditions in their daily life, and only when they 
had given consent would the mullah marry them and they would 
become man and wife legally. 
  Let me give several examples to prove what I am saying. The 
story of how a Russian girl Mariya Yegorovna Rykina (1887-1950) 
fell in love with a young Kazakh man named Duysen and went off 
to marry him is known to the entire Kazakh people. One out of 
every two knows the song "Dudaray" she produced and dedicated to 
Duysen. It is performed at feasts, on stage, and heard on 
television and radio. The famous aqyn Qalizhan Bekkhozhin has 
written a poem "Mariyam Zaghorqyzy" and there is an opera called 
"Dudaray." 
  Mariya, who accepted without hesitation the requests and 
suggestions of Duysen, even though she was, in her words, "by 
nature Russian," became a Muslim; wore a kimeshek just like a 
Kazakh woman; spoke Kazakh her whole life; and had to become 
Kazakh by choice. We take this as a suitable example for 
praising mixed marriages. 
  The wife of Akhmet Baytursynuly, the beloved figure of the 
Kazakh people, great scientist, famous aqyn and great social 
activist was from the Russian nationality and was even years 
younger than him. When she was married in the mosque, she called 
herself Badrisafa Mukhamed-Sadyqqyzy in the Muslim manner. 
According to what Akhmet's daughter Sholpan said, she knew 
Kazakh very well, wore a white embroidered scarf on her head, 
wore long fluttering skirts, and never mentioned the name of her 
husband, calling him "tore." The two lived a good life together, 
bore the difficulties together, and together reaped the fruits 
of their fate. 
  We should notice the following lines (author Gharifolla 
Qabdolqayyruly) of a picture called "Akhmet's [junior] Wife" 
published in the paper ANA TILI (No 26, 1991). One of the 
village elders accompanying Akhmet and Badrisafa on a trip to 
the Torghay is supposed to have said: "How can you be Kazakh? If 
you were Kazakh, how could you marry a heathen?" Without 
hesitation Akhmet argued: 
  I was pleased that Aleksandra Ivanova over there adapted her 
fate to mine. If one Kazakh converts one heathen to Islam, it 
resounds to the honor of 10. 
  If this image seems worthy of joking about, it expresses the 
very truth. Let us draw the conclusion from this that if people 
of two nationalities love each other completely and truly, and, 
if they know how to keep their marriage strong, it is altogether 
possible that mixed marriages may be a good thing. 
  Another example. On the eve of the 1917 October Revolution, 
a 
Kazakh village intellectual named Yermek Qulyshuly, who had 
learned in the old way in Aktobe Oblast, married a Russian woman 
named Mariya. She received the Islamic religion in a Tatar 
mosque, fulfilled the promises she gave there, learned the 
Kazakh language very well in only a year, and, dressing like a 
village woman, gave a Muslim blessing before eating and cooking 
food. During the next year at the beginning, middle, and end of 
the month of fasting, she kept her fast for three days, called 
herself "Kazakh" in the village council registry, and became a 
regular Kazakh woman, an honest, open-minded lady. 
  To summarize, such were the special characteristics of mixed 
marriages which took place before the Soviet era and which we 
have heard about from the mouths of the people and seen in 
detail with our own eyes. We must give such marriages the 
appropriate approval. Such marriages conform to our national 
goals and interests and cause no harm to our language, our 
religion, and our way of life. Today's young people should learn 
from them. 
  Group Three 
  The harmfulness of this came into being after the October 
Revolution, year of the snake. We do not think that everything 
about it was poison. We are against the continual droning to the 
effect that "the Kazakh people live on the broad steppe, that 
Kazakh women and men have equality." One may be a little 
disturbed by what I say, but we have obtained nothing good from 
this. Likewise, an ax has assaulted the roots of our religion. 
We have been deprived of our status as Muslims. Mosques have 
been closed. The Koran has been burned. Mullahs, qazhis, and 
ishans have been persecuted. Muslim rituals such as marriage and 
the circumcision of children have been prohibited. Use of our 
mother tongue has contracted and the Russian language, praised 
as "the language of joy," has taken the place of honor. In 
addition there is the scourge of drink. 
  As a result of such a policy of exhaustion and destruction, 
our spirits have begun to be destroyed, and ill-breeding, 
vulgarity, and anarchy have gained ground in our life. Among our 
stirred-up young people and empty-headed adults given to 
deception, meeting girls on the dance floor, at bars, and quick 
sex called "friendship" is becoming common. The "easily 
seducible," who have "forgotten" shame in the heat of the 
moment, have appeared. Since they know nothing about one 
another, and are not discriminating, they marry in a hurry. Such 
relations of husbands and wives cannot last. In most cases they 
can only end in divorce. 
  Hitherto mixed marriages were few and far between among 
Kazakhs, and, when they did take place, they were, as indicated 
above, carried out by special agreement. Today, on the other 
hand, the relations of husband and wife are regarded very 
easily, and those marrying without thinking of the past, the 
present, or the future number in the hundreds and thousands. 
  According to official information, 7.5 percent of all males 
marrying in our republic marry women of other nationalities and 
7.2 percent of women marry men of other nationalities. In fact, 
the Russian language is spoken in most of these mixed marriages. 
Such marriages are more common among Kazakhs than among our 
kinsmen such as Uzbeks, Kyrgyz, or Turkmen. We cannot say that 
this is a good sign. While their sons and daughters, 
grandchildren, and great-grandchildren remain "Kazakh" on paper, 
in most cases (especially when the mothers are Slavs) there is 
no disputing the fact that they have changed their ethnic nature 
and character. We cannot view this in an unconcerned manner. We 
must support those who have fallen, extend a hand and aid those 
who have become lost. 
  In conclusion, our independent Republic of Kazakhstan is a 
young country. While the most fundamental duty of our people 
today is to take the bridles of our republic in hand, strengthen 
the foundations, and, while developing the economy and culture 
as rapidly as possible, become rich and cultured, it is clear 
that those who will carry on are today's younger generation. For 
this reason, we must aim at making them citizens with lofty 
social sensitivities, citizens who are well founded and who will 
not reject the hallowed ways of their progenitors, citizens who 
are hardy with pure Kazakh souls, and strive to educate them in 
this spirit. The Islamic religion, with its humanitarian, 
beneficial teaching, will save them from criminal acts. However, 
we believe that the Islamic cultural centers, which have begun 
with the construction of houses of religion, mosques, will add 
their own contributions to this worthy goal and we hope that in 
this way God will provide for us all. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61094 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr001___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-001 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   5 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   RABOCHAYA TRIBUNA Item on Zhirinovskiy </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944E0328A Moscow RABOCHAYA TRIBUNA in Russian 24 Dec 93 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 944E0328A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow RABOCHAYA TRIBUNA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Excerpts from an unpublished book by Sergey Plekhanov: "The </F>
Man Who Stunned Everybody"] 
  [Text] Yes, of course, it is he--Vladimir Volfovich 
Zhirinovskiy. 
  For some, he is an obvious fascist, extremist, 
instigator.... Oh, my, how much more havoc will he wreck in 
politics? 
  For others, he is a dark horse, who with a sudden dash 
at the elections to the State Duma overtook the "overfed," 
self-confident trotters. 
  For still others, he is simply a favorite of fortune: 
He came, promised the sky--and the gullible people fell under 
the spell and voted for him.... 
  One way or the other, the name of Vladimir Volfovich is 
on everyone's lips these days. By publishing today an excerpt 
from Sergey Plekhanov's book (not yet published, by the way, due 
to a quite obvious attitude on the part of publishing houses 
toward the author), we will attempt to appraise a figure who is 
relatively new on the political scene. What is the Zhirinovskiy 
phenomenon? What forces have brought this formerly obscure, 
ordinary jurist to the crest of high power? Finally, does 
Vladimir Volfovich have a future, and what then can Russia 
expect from him? 
  Questions, questions.... This article--which, we want 
to emphasize, represents only one viewpoint--will not answer 
them all, of course. There may be other opinions. The editors 
will be presenting them to RABOCHAYA TRIBUNA readers in the new 
year. 
<H5>  He Had Already Been a Presidential Candidate </H5>
  I sit on a cheap, threadbare sofa next to an equally shabby 
desk and look at a tall, large man in a tuxedo and a brilliantly 
white shirt. He adjusts the knot of his tie in front of a mirror 
attached to the closet door. 
  This gorgeous outfit is in jarring contrast with the squalid 
surroundings, so painfully familiar from tens and hundreds of 
dwellings of our compatriots that I have seen over many 
years.... A man in a tuxedo, who looks like a messenger from 
another world brought to the sorry, orphaned Russian soil by 
some unknown force is nevertheless the owner of this sad 
two-room apartment on the 14th floor of a regular Soviet 
apartment house. 
  Vladimir Volfovich casts a last glance at himself in the 
mirror before we leave for a television debate of Russia's 
presidential candidates. 
  We all rise and file out of the apartment. The door opens, 
and we are accepted into the belly of a typical Soviet elevator, 
reeking of urine and covered with unprintable graffiti. 
  Downstairs, everything is also covered with drawings and 
scribbles, bearing witness to the irreversible regression of 
humanity since the times of the Neanderthals, who amused 
themselves in the same way, by drawing on the walls of their 
caves. Intermixed with them are announcements informing the 
tenants about the distribution of sugar coupons, and the repair 
and maintenance department's orders. Not a single indication 
anywhere, however, that a man who lives in this wing is a 
presidential candidate.... 
  The aluminum door, with its broken combination lock, opens, 
and we find ourselves in the street, facing a cortege of 
varicolored cars. The most luxurious among them is 
Zhirinovskiy's white Moskvich. Two old rustbuckets on worn-out 
wheels accept on board members of the team of a contender for 
the highest office in the country, and the cortege speeds up 
along the road cutting through Sokolniki Park. 
  We disembark from the cars at the entrance to the television 
center. The leadership of the information empire and television 
debate moderator Igor Fesunenko hurry towards the prehistoric 
autos. 
  Almost at the same time, black limousines with Ryzhkov's 
team 
pull up. The former prime minister with a firm step walks from 
his Volga toward Fesunenko. A mutual introduction follows. 
  Two presidential candidates stand next to each other. They 
are of about the same height, slender, dressed in black. But 
Zhirinovskiy produces a better effect--whether it is the silk 
lapels or his youth, but in comparison with yesterday's head of 
government he looks more striking.... And my mind, for some 
reason, flashes back incongruously to the small two-room 
apartment, a den filled with motley furnishings, and a half-ajar 
door bound with vinyl on the inside.... 
  The calendar shows 11 June 1991. Tomorrow are the 
presidential elections. I, however, think back to that August 
day in 1989, when I for the first time heard in the telephone 
receiver Zhirinovskiy's distinctive voice--a little raspy, 
sharp, abrupt.... 
  He called me after reading in the papers the appeal of 
the organizational committee for the march of solidarity with 
the Russian population of the Baltic countries. The idea of that 
march was mine, and it was also I who took upon myself the 
organizational side of it--arranged to pay for 10 buses, and 
with the help of a people's deputy secured a motorized GAI 
[state motor vehicle inspectorate] escort for the march. 
  Zhirinovskiy liked the idea of a demonstration against 
the Baltic nationalist forces, and he said that he himself and 
several of his confederates would participate. In the end, he 
was not able to take the trip, however, because he had to leave 
for Turkey during the time the march was held. 
  When at the beginning of May 1991 I heard on the radio 
an interview with Zhirinovskiy, who by then was in the 
presidential race, I immediately recognized his voice. So I 
called the Moscow Hotel, where his headquarters were located. 
  Having learned that I was working on a book about the 
right-wing movement in Russia, he immediately invited me to come 
over.... 
  The candidate's energy had a contagious effect on everyone 
around him; as if, having entered a powerful magnetic field, 
people sharply changed their routes. The same happened to 
me--Zhirinovskiy listened to me and said abruptly: "Come ride 
with me; we will talk on the way; you will see and write down 
everything you need." And for a week, taking a detour from my 
normal routine, I remained in his orbit. 
  A month later, when the presidential campaign was already 
behind us, I was on a train, traveling on business. My fellow 
traveler, a young female physician, chattered nonstop, telling 
me about her hospital, its chief physician, her colleagues. Her 
entire world was divided into Leos, Sagittarians, 
Cancers--apparently she never read anything except horoscopes. 
The chief physician, as one would expect, was the most prominent 
character in her tales: "You see, he is a classic Pisces-- 
nervous, edgy.... You know, I once saw on television an 
interview with Zhirinovskiy--I think he is a typical Pisces. Do 
you know by any chance his birth date?..." 
  Even an astrology enthusiast did not remain unaware of the 
political show organized in holy Russia in the first weeks of 
June 1991.... 
  Nevertheless, Zhirinovskiy is not a Pisces--he is an Aries. 
He was born on 25 April 1946 in Almaty. His loud voice was heard 
by the entire huge population of a three-room apartment, which 
his family had received three years before his birth. During the 
war, however, because of the influx of refugees, Vladimir's 
mother and her five children had to make room for more people. 
  An impression of something many-headed, yelling, constantly 
moving--this is Vladimir Zhirinovskiy's first recollection of 
the world surrounding him. And this perception of life as a 
bazaar, as endless hubbub, which came to him with the first 
glimpse of self-consciousness, remained with him almost until 
the age of 30: a childhood in a communal apartment; a child care 
facility (five days a week with overnight stay); school, pioneer 
camps, university dormitory, Army billets and dormitories. Only 
at the age of 28, having purchased a cooperative apartment on 
the outskirts of Moscow, did he gain peace and time for 
contemplation.... 
<H3>  Many of Those Around Him Believed That Zhirinovskiy Was a 
Loser </H3>
  Asking Vladimir Volfovich questions about the years of his 
childhood and youth, I was hoping to collect some vivid tidbits 
that would help to present the process of his spiritual coming 
of age. But my interlocutor kept emphasizing that he had lived 
for decades in the stagnant and stifling atmosphere of universal 
poverty, a human bazaar; not even a bazaar--a flea market. The 
latter definition of our society reflects its nature 
best--trading second-hand things, living off what had been 
earned by previous generations. 
  In school, he was not a bright star, but did rather well. 
Considering that this was the best school in Almaty, one would 
assume that Vladimir Volfovich's classmates would have reached 
prominent positions. Zhirinovskiy explained to me in an 
easy-to-understand way, however, that this logic applies in 
other geographic zones. The point is that the best school in 
Almaty was a Russian school, and there was only one Kazakh in 
Zhirinovskiy's class. Therefore, when old school friends 
gathered together for a 20-year reunion, it turned out that no 
one had achieved anything in this life: All the young talents 
became good, ordinary engineers, doctors, teachers, 
metalworkers, electricians, and drivers.... Had they been 
Kazakhs, with all other conditions being equal, the classmates' 
reunion would have looked different: ispolkom [executive 
committee] chairmen, raykom [rayon party committee] secretaries, 
high-ranking officials in the Council of Ministers or the 
Central Committee of the local communist party, distinguished 
figures in science, directors of trade warehouses and stores, 
members of creative unions.... 
  Over the decades of "reverse colonialism," the Russians 
in all national-state entities on the periphery of the former 
Russian Empire have become skilled servants of "indigenous 
nations," which concentrated in their hands the land and its 
output, the distributive functions and power. Suppression of 
national self-consciousness of the Russians was carried out in 
accordance with the Old Testament directives of the Bolshevik 
center going back to the 1920's, when "international" dictators 
were running the Kremlin. Swift and decisive confiscation of 
property from Russians and a forcible placement of "national 
cadres" in positions of power already by the end of 1930's had 
formed the social conditions for the emergence of 
national-communist regimes. 
  Today President of Kazakhstan Nazarbayev says: 
  "I openly admonish and warn adventure-seekers who are 
suffering from nostalgia for our evil past: We will not allow 
any changes in the borders between republics, which are 
recognized as inviolable in interrepublic treaties and 
declarations of state sovereignty. Neither will we allow to hold 
on the territory of Kazakhstan any celebrations of anniversaries 
of the Cossack service to the czarist regime, let alone 
formation of Cossack units." 
  It looks as if no talk of the dignity of national 
cultures and self-determination of nations reaches Kazakhstan. 
On the contrary, entire villages that had never had anything to 
do with this region are moving in from the territory of China 
and settling in the lands of the Semirechnyy Cossacks. They are 
Kazakhs, and in the logic of the local authorities, they possess 
the right of primogeniture. 
<H5>  National-Bureaucracy. What Is It? </H5>
  A majority of the Russian population of the former Soviet 
Union only now is haltingly learning of the existence of a 
national-bureaucracy and the oppression of their kin in 
"brotherly republics." Vladimir Zhirinovskiy belongs to that 
minority, which experienced this relatively mild oppression 
since childhood. For the first time the minority is gaining a 
voice. 
  For a Russian who grew up in Russia, the notion of land as a 
common good is automatically assumed; for a Russian living among 
the aborigines of Asia or Caucasus, such a perception of the 
world is impossible. A Russian who is by the fact of his birth 
separated from ownership of land may be blown off the settled 
place by the winds of enmity at any moment.... 
  Going to the countryside here, in Russia, we perceive the 
surrounding landscape as air, as native language--this is 
something that cannot be separated from our very being. A 
Russian going to a countryside over there sees the 
world with completely different eyes. This may explain why our 
compatriots living in those parts are strictly urban folks 
deprived of the life-nurturing connection 
"countryside--land--city," which one way or the other defines 
the being of a full-fledged nation. 
  The suffocating atmosphere in which Russian "guest workers" 
grow up and the impossibility of jumping outside of the social 
status preordained for you result for most in a loss of national 
dignity; people of this kind become patriots of the climate and 
material supply, ready to go on for hours bragging about prices 
at a farmer's market and describing what and how much they have 
stored for the winter. There is no worse a creeping Philistine 
than a Russian who has accepted his role of second-class 
citizen. The usual topics of his conversation do not transcend 
the canning--clothing--housing concerns. And only a small number 
among those millions of Russians who have been dispersed by the 
hurricanes of history over the Asian and Western outskirts of 
the former empire find themselves able to overcome their "white 
slavery...." 
  Vladimir Zhirinovskiy came to Moscow after graduating 
from high school, with a firmly established interest in 
international politics. The Moscow University's Institute of 
Oriental Languages [IOL] was one of the few institutions of 
higher learning that opened to its graduates a road into this 
sphere. These same institutions also traditionally had been the 
breeding ground for the elite. 
  The Turkish studies group, where Vladimir Zhirinovskiy 
was accepted, consisted of only six students: a general's son, a 
deputy minister of foreign affairs' son, the son of a 
high-ranking official in the CPSU Central Committee, and the son 
of the chief of a main administration of the State Committee for 
Foreign Economic Relations. A boy from a poor family, who made 
his home in a dormitory on Lenin Hills and who was barely able 
to make ends meet thanks to the modest amounts of money sent by 
his mother, could not, of course, count on becoming friends with 
young bon vivants. They had money and fashionable rags; they 
could use their parents' cars and dachas, where they could 
entertain girls. 
  In 1964, when Zhirinovskiy came from Almaty, flared 
pants had just become a fad in Moscow, and the future 
administrators of international policy spent much more time 
talking about them than about the fall of Khrushchev, which 
occurred on the second month after they began their studies. 
Over all the years in school, the everyday priorities of the 
"golden youths" have practically not changed, while Zhirinovskiy 
eagerly absorbed the new and gradually began to show himself as 
a personality. By the end of his studies, instead of a shy, 
unsure provincial boy, his classmates discovered an independent 
and even obstinate young man. 
  An internship trip to Turkey was the first peak in 
Zhirinovskiy's life. Having worked for several months as a 
translator at various objects of Soviet-Turkish economic 
cooperation, he saw both big cities and backwaters. In those 
times the Soviet Union was not yet in such neglect as it is 
today, while Turkey had not reached its current stage of 
Westernization; therefore, one may assume that a stay in that 
country would not have instilled in an IOL student a great 
reverence for Western civilization. But neither did he engage in 
communist propaganda here. Both mutually exclusive accusations, 
however, have been thrown at Zhirinovskiy: first by those who 
had secretly made the decision to bar a specialist in Turkey 
from any more foreign travel, and then by the knights of freedom 
from the emboldened Soviet press.... 
<H5>  Can You Believe This? He Engaged in Communist Propaganda </H5>
  The episode when the Turkish police arrested the 
student-intern for distributing Soviet pins was interpreted by 
such mass media in a manner worthy of Goebbels: He engaged in 
communist propaganda and was properly punished. 
  It appears that this old episode involving Zhirinovskiy made 
an indelible impression on the official Soviet authorities. When 
in 1988 I went to Turkey as a member of a writers group, at the 
then-compulsory briefing I heard the incantation: Under no 
circumstances are you to give away pins with Soviet symbols; 
better still, none at all, to avoid problems with the police. 
  I do not know whether this incident had any bearing on 
Zhirinovskiy's subsequent career, but the fact remains that 
despite excellent grades in his diploma, instead of exotic 
countries he was sent to the Transcaucasian Military District. 
Two years wearing a lieutenant's shoulder boards was not the 
destiny of those connoisseurs of fashion, wine, and female 
beauty riding in the parental limousines--they had their futures 
laid out for them regardless of the results of their exams. 
  Two more years of barracks and dormitories, and Vladimir 
Zhirinovskiy regained freedom of action. He came to the Soviet 
Peace Committee, where he would eventually deal with Western 
Europe. He was fed up with the East and gladly began studying 
German. In addition to foreign language courses, he also took on 
another burden, enrolling in the evening study at the MGU 
[Moscow State University] School of Law. Despite all his 
academic and linguistic successes, however, the road to the free 
world remained closed to him. 
  His peacekeeping activities did not last long--only two 
years. He had to surrender his job to a niece of the then 
secretary of the CPSU Central Committee. She immediately began 
hopscotching all over the world--nobody even asked her whether 
she were a member of her powerful uncle's party.... 
  Zhirinovskiy, meanwhile, had to take a job at the trade 
union 
movement higher school, where he worked for a short while in the 
bursar's office handling the affairs of foreign students. Then 
he moved to the Inyurkollegiya [the Foreign Legal Collegium 
under the Moscow City Bar]. All these jobs seemingly were 
associated with international affairs; nevertheless, 
Zhirinovskiy was still not permitted to travel abroad: perhaps 
because he was not a communist party member, or perhaps for some 
other reason.... 
<H5>  That Is What Is Amazing: He Was Never Ahead of His Time </H5>
  This dreary, grounded life went on for decades. For many 
years he made a living as legal counsel of the Mir publishing 
house. The 40-year watershed he approached without any 
particular achievements--no dacha; no decent car.... Had it not 
been for the changes that began after 1985, Zhirinovskiy, as 
millions of middle-rank intelligentsia like him, would be 
looking at an unenviable fate, with a 120-ruble pension and a 
six-hundredths of a hectare garden plot as the crowning 
achievement of his life. 
  When he said at rallies: I am one of you; I live in the 
same kind of two-room apartment, am paid the same 200-ruble 
salary--he told an absolute truth. That is why a study of the 
Zhirinovskiy phenomenon can contribute much more to the 
understanding of the political potential of an ordinary Soviet 
man than a figure reflecting a rating of some or other public 
figure. 
  When I asked Vladimir Volfovich from what age he began 
to feel himself a "political man," realized that his views were 
different, contrary to the officially imposed ideology, he said 
that he divides his spiritual evolution into three stages. At 
about the age of 21 he felt the need to formulate his views. 
Another 10 years passed before he could tell himself that he was 
not satisfied with the political situation in the country--this 
more or less coincides with the adoption of the 1977 
Constitution. 
  But the true awakening of his political temperament 
Zhirinovskiy dates to the beginning of perestroyka. His 
evolution at that time was again typical for the main masses of 
the intelligentsia. During the first years of liberalization he 
unquestionably supported Gorbachev, sympathized with Yeltsin as 
an underdog ("I was very upset when he was not elected to the 
Supreme Soviet at the first congress of people's deputies," says 
Vladimir Volfovich). It was only at the end of 1990 and the 
beginning of 1991 that Zhirinovskiy believes his divergence from 
the official reformers' political course began. 
  Thus, he was never ahead of his time--he did not serve time 
in prisons, did not participate in the dissident movement, did 
not write "for the drawer;" like huge numbers of people of his 
circle, he habitually grumbled about obviously stupid things 
committed by the Soviet system, told jokes, occasionally praised 
the "rotting" [capitalism]. He did not create the current 
situation--it created him as a politician. 
  And this is very important, since Zhirinovskiy has, 
figuratively speaking, the same blood type, the same arterial 
pressure, the same pulse as the middle class, with a middle-age 
population, who have reached the zenith of their life with empty 
pockets. 
  Unlike those dissidents who, like Sakharov, Gleb Yakunin, 
Sergey Kovalev, or Revolt Pimenov, found themselves sort of 
living relics at the get-togethers of communist conformists, who 
have created a number of illusory parties, Zhirinovskiy does not 
feel himself an honorary general at well-attended rallies. While 
for "democrats" the presence of such persons is a necessary 
condition to prove the legitimacy of their gatherings, 
Zhirinovskiy strives to earn this legitimacy from his own 
compatriots who, like him, have had collectively participated in 
both the good and the evil of their time. 
  It is indicative that he practically never turns to any 
authorities to reinforce his claim on power. None of the holy 
names of the democratic love-ins are dropped in his speeches. 
And those historic figures he does refer to as personification 
of his political ideal--Count P.D. Kiselev, P.D. Milyutin, S.Yu. 
Witte, P.A. Stolypin--signal to the audience: You have in front 
of you an intellectual, an expert on history, and a politician; 
he is a step above his competitors from the official camp. They 
started as tractor drivers or construction brigade foremen, and 
then for decades studied the science of meanness and servility 
in obkom [oblast party committee] corridors, while I, an 
ordinary intellectual pushed to the back seat of society, 
devoted decades of my outwardly ordinary life to the task of 
developing my mind: I studied the French, English, German, 
Turkish, and Arabic languages; I am a specialist on Eastern 
cultures and have a jurist's diploma; I have studied in depth 
the past of our country; I am knowledgeable in the most complex 
political issues, ethnic and social. I am familiar with modern 
economic theories. Hence, I am made from different ingredients 
than those who lay claim to power, although they had a lot of 
time to show their abilities. Refuse them your trust; give the 
mandate to run the country to a new politician--someone who 
understands problems big and small that each of us faces, who 
does not carry on his shoulders the burden of mistakes and vices 
of the old elite.... 
  If we analyze the makeup of Zhirinovskiy's supporters, 
it will turn out that the majority of those who voted for him 
are young people--those who look up not so much to authorities 
as to themselves. Language and terminology understandable to 
them make Zhirinovskiy sharply different from his competitors, 
who are used to talking to the audience either in the wooden 
language of bureaucracy or in the bird language of intellectual 
gatherings. 
  While the press was taking apart Zhirinovskiy's 
biography, relishing a few spicy episodes such as spending time 
in a Turkish prison, the ordinary voter was deciding for himself 
a simple question: "Do I or do I not like him?" In the final 
analysis, all components of the image--appearance, manner of 
speech, language--gradually form a personal attitude to a 
politician. Zhirinovskiy, who did not have the support of the 
press, enjoyed the highest "personal taste" rating: People 
either adored him or rejected him. 
<H5>  Still, Why Do People Listen to Him Attentively? </H5>
  Now the time has come, however, to give thought to that 
complex of ideas he drew on--after all, in a political struggle, 
the heat of emotions is in direct correlation with the 
radicalism of statements and their correspondence to the 
frequency to which the masses are tuned. In this respect, 
Zhirinovskiy has also turned out to be a phenomenon. 
  First, nobody expected of him the words that sounded in his 
speech at the Congress of People's Deputies of Russia and on 
television. Neither those who bet on Yeltsin nor communist 
dogmatists nor patriotic forces. For all of them Zhirinovskiy's 
statements were like a cold shower--all competing programs 
looked, when compared to the election manifestos of the totally 
unknown upstart, like a collection of platitudes. He was 
brighter, bolder, and easier to understand than all the regular 
actors on the perestroyka scene, and the solutions for political 
and economic problems offered by him looked actually 
implementable. 
  The LDP [Liberal-Democratic Party] leader made the main 
issue 
of his program the issue of national-state system. He traced all 
the country's troubles to 1922, when by Lenin's scenario the 
Bolshevik authorities conducted an administrative reform as a 
result of which Russia was dismembered into a score of large and 
small quasi-state entities according to ethnic principle. In 
those times, creation of such structures was not dictated by an 
outbreak of nationalism, as one would think projecting into the 
past today's situation. On the contrary, it was a very difficult 
task to carry out in illiterate precivilization areas, populated 
by nomads. The uninformed cattle-breeders had to be dragged by 
their ears into newly formed structures. Which means that 
Lenin's design was not aimed at pacifying local separatists 
thirsting for independence. 
  In order to rule over the enslaved people, the new masters 
needed the support of those who under no circumstances could 
claim the right to power under the normal course of 
events--lumpens and foreigners; they needed to create on a broad 
scale all-encompassing state structures, which were filled with 
those promoted from the lower strata and so-called national 
cadres. If the former could become at the initial stage the 
bulwark against a potential restoration of a Russian ethnic 
elite, the latter became a counterbalance against such a 
development on a more long-term basis. 
  The Bolshevik dictatorship could not last very long, 
because it did not have in its set of tools anything except 
violence and organized lowering of the culture. But if the new 
rulers managed to split the subjugated country by ethnic 
attribute, then the new bureaucracy, which would receive power 
from them, would become a reliable ally, because the Russian 
nation in this case became their common enemy. Its suppression 
was conducted in a hidden form--it was impossible to keep it 
from moving into positions of leadership, but a capitulation of 
nationality of sorts could be made a condition of it. 
  No strictly Russian institutions of power were created 
in the country--even the ruling party, which was built on the 
territorial-administrative principle, for some reason "did not 
notice" the largest republic; what was permitted for the big 
Ukraine and the small Estonia was not permitted for the enormous 
RSFSR. And any attempt to create a Russian Communist Party was 
an offense subject to capital punishment (the latest 
example--the "Leningrad affair" in the end of the 1940's). 
  The newly created system of quasi-republics begat multistage 
structures manned by "national cadres," and today, in the 
environment of disintegration of the totalitarian regime, these 
hierarchies lacking vitality should have, as many thought, 
disintegrated, together with the machine of power that had 
produced them. Strange as it may be, however, the latter-day 
"democrats" do not even consider breaking up the parasitic 
entities that feed numerous ranks of all sorts of "political 
statesmen," "scholars," and "cultural figures." This entire 
semifeudal guard could not be competitive within a framework of 
a modern pluralistic society and would have to inevitably give 
way to more capable and socially useful people in all spheres of 
activities. 
  In the northern areas of Kazakhstan, where the presence 
of the indigenous population measures in several percentage 
points, the "Leninist national policy" used to border on the 
ridiculous. A terrible commotion in a Karaganda construction 
trust--there is no suitable candidate for a trade union 
committee chairman: The director is a Ukrainian, the party 
committee secretary--a Russian, so the third member of the 
"triangle" cannot possibly be a non-Kazakh. It so happens, 
however, that in the entire trust there is not a single son of 
the steppes! Finally they find a semi-literate Kazakh woman who 
works as a timekeeper, and ceremonially present her to the 
bosses. A common sigh of relief is heaved: A national cadre is 
in place, and nobody will be able to find fault with 
them.... 
  Zhirinovskiy has said what the democrats, who at every 
convenient occasion branded the vices and crimes of the 
communist regime, has never dared to say; this politician said 
for all to hear that the fallacious system of promotion by 
ethnic criteria should be scuttled; that it is necessary to 
dismantle Lenin's construct of 1922. This is the root of all the 
problems of today's Russia. 
  Zhirinovskiy's recipe is simple: In order to overcome the 
permanent crisis, we need to get rid of the artificial division 
by the national-territorial criteria and restore the old 
principles: The province is the main unit of administrative 
division of the country; nations' rights to self-determination 
are realized in the sphere of culture; individual rights take 
priority over the rights of a nation. 
  The LDP chairman has not invented anything new--these 
sensible foundations already realized in democratic states 
ensure stability and individual freedoms. No other country has 
ever had as burdensome a bureaucratic apparatus and all sorts of 
national subunits in science, culture, and the political sphere 
as the Soviet Union did. Neither the multiethnic India nor 
Indonesia nor African countries populated by tribes speaking 
different languages--none have adopted the principle of 
national-territorial division, because it represents a ticking 
time bomb capable of destroying the state at the time of any 
crisis. Let alone the fact that none of the modern democratic 
constitutions contains a clause on the right of individual 
territories to secede from the state. 
<H3>  History Is the Best Teacher. But for Some Reason There Are 
Few Good Pupils </H3>
  By various estimates, there are between 1,500 and 3,000 
peoples and languages in the world, but only a little more than 
150 sovereign powers. This means that the self-determination 
principle is not universal at all; not every ethnic group is 
capable of creating a vital state. Besides, the prevalent trend 
in the most cultured regions of the planet is rapprochement of 
countries and people for the sake of solving economic, social, 
and ecological problems. And an increasing number of global 
crisis phenomena makes such a movement toward unification 
irreversible. 
  Naturally, no historic lessons and objective trends set an 
example for flaming patriots of minute "fatherlands"--especially 
keeping in mind that their personal destiny depends completely 
on the realization of separatist dreams. Still, it would be 
useful to look into the recent past, for then we would see that 
all of this already has happened and all turned out much ado 
about nothing.... 
  The Austro-Hungarian, as well as the Ottoman, Empire 
was perceived as a "sick man of Europe" in all the capitals of 
the world long before the advent of the twentieth century. The 
question of its disintegration had been massages in the press 
for decades. The first crack in the Habsburg empire formed in 
the course of revolutions of 1848. In order to assuage the 
nationalist aspirations of Hungarians, the German dynasty 
decided to change the state formula: The Eastern Empire 
(Osterreich) was replaced by a two-in-one monarchy. But this 
step did not stop the centrifugal tendencies: The Slavic 
population of the empire thirsted for independence. There was 
some talk about a three-in-one formula; even some names were 
tried on for size: "Austro-Slavo-Hungary" or something along 
these lines. But the "sick man" problem was resolved in a much 
easier way--as a result of a military defeat, the empire was 
pulled apart piece by piece with the benevolent consent of the 
victorious powers. 
  Former Austro-Hungarian provinces went over to Poland, 
Soviet Ukraine, Romania, Yugoslavia, and so on. A community of 
nations turned into a bevy of small states, which for two 
decades warred among themselves, and then were occupied by the 
Third Reich. The map of the world was recut once again, and the 
former Austro-Hungarian provinces again found themselves under 
the thumb of an empire--this time a communist one. And now we 
witness a new chapter in their history. 
  Yugoslavia has disintegrated; the former parts of the 
Austrian reich--Croatia and Slovenia--separated from it. And we 
hear increasingly loud voices in favor of restoring a long-dead 
superpower--at first perhaps in the form of a confederation. The 
first participants are identified: It is unlikely that Austria 
and Hungary, Croatia, and Slovenia can exist for long as 
autonomous entities.... 
  So the question is: Why was it necessary to spill seas of 
blood? For what gain did the political demagogues of the end of 
the past and the beginning of the current century push nations 
toward a disintegration of their common house? Anyway, it is an 
idle question--there is no one to be held responsible. 
  We are, however, able quite consciously to address our 
doubts 
to modern Masariks and Pilsudskiys: Are they certain that in 
seven or eight decades, having drunk the cup of suffering, the 
nations they lead will not condemn their names, and the wheel of 
history will not creakingly make a full turn and the buried 
empire will not rise again like a sunken continent? 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61095 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr001___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-001 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   5 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Status of Yeltsin's Presidency Assessed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944E0325A Moscow RABOCHAYA TRIBUNA in Russian 22 Dec 93 pp 
1-2 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0325A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow RABOCHAYA TRIBUNA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Arkadiy Chereshnya, candidate of historical </F>
sciences: "The President's Term"] 
  [Text] 
<H5>  Puzzle for the Quick-Witted </H5>
  We elected Boris Yeltsin president of the Russian 
Soviet Socialist Republic within the USSR. 
  But there are no longer either soviets or socialism or 
the Union. 
  Does B. Yeltsin remain a competent president? If so, 
will this be for long? 
  All things pass, all things change. Not even two months 
had elapsed before the president of Russia, without a moment's 
hesitation, was abandoning the promise to present himself for 
the verdict of the people and agree to early elections. Obliging 
people long since found a justification of this ostensibly 
surprise step, and more than one, of course. Let us see how 
convincing they are. 
  First, it is maintained that the president has already put 
himself up for election repeatedly and has on just as many 
occasions obtained the people's trust. Particularly enthusiastic 
admirers speak about a whole five rounds of elections 
successfully negotiated by Yeltsin (to the Union parliament, to 
the Russian parliament, for chairman of the Russian Parliament, 
for president and at the 25 April referendum). There is much 
dissembling and misrepresentation here. Elections to the supreme 
organ of legislative power have nothing in common with 
presidential elections. Different branches of power, rights, 
authority, and procedure of election. It is absurd even to speak 
about the fact that a positive outcome of parliamentary 
elections endows the highest officer of the state with some 
particular legal validity. Never has it! Yeltsin's victory at 
the referendum is indisputable. As a statesman, he obtained the 
trust of the people, but this has a very tangential bearing on 
presidential elections, that is, a particular political action 
on a competitive basis in accordance with legislatively 
specified rules. 
  It has to be recognized that Yeltsin has thus far been 
elected president only once. It remains to be elucidated in 
legally dispassionate fashion of what he was elected president. 
For me the answer is clear: president of the RSFSR, that is, not 
of an independent state, not a subject of international law, but 
of a component of an integral federal formation going by the 
name of the USSR. Strictly legally, Yeltsin acquired that same 
extent of authority which the president of the republics within 
the Russian Federation (of Kalmykia or Tatarstan, say) have 
currently. For the RSFSR was, I repeat, merely a Union republic 
within the USSR, no more. 
  By a wicked irony of political fate, Yeltsin, by furthering 
the demolition of the USSR, undermined the legal basis of his 
own authority. In the new independent state (according to the 
rules of international law) the competence of all the old state 
institutions of the RSFSR (the president, the Congress, the 
Supreme Soviet, the Constitutional Court) have been depreciated 
and become legally worthless. And there have been no new 
elections as yet, and, consequently, there is in the Russian 
Federation no legitimately elected president; there is merely an 
official invested with the trust of the people for the 
provisional discharge of his obligations. And from the legal 
viewpoint it can in no way be a question of new presidential 
elections but of the first elections of a president of Russia 
(as, equally, of the parliament, the local authorities, judges, 
and so forth). 
  Second, it is maintained that Yeltsin promised to put 
himself 
up for reelection as a concession to the now nonexistent Supreme 
Soviet. There is no one now, as it were, before whom the highly 
significant words are to be kept. But this is at least 
unconvincing. For they were not simply words but strict legal 
instruments--Yeltsin's Decree 1400 and others, still not 
rescinded, it would appear, which speak of new presidential 
elections within an established time frame. 
  But even were they only words, they were uttered repeatedly, 
publicly, openly, before the entire people. In a word, a given 
word, and whereas forswearing such is barely excusable even in 
everyday life, in political life it is absolutely intolerable. 
  Third, as our Palmerston or Talleyrand, Mr. Kozyrev, 
elegantly put it, Russia is in dire need of continuity of power, 
and for this reason "allow the president to complete his 
appointed term." It sounds impressive, does it not? But the 
president's laudatory desire to see the business through to a 
conclusion in no way cancels out the simple fact that he does 
not possess for this the requisite legal capacity! The mandate 
he obtained from the people in 1991 was appreciably different in 
terms of the extent of rights and authority, and, essentially, 
in terms of its nature also. 
  I also would like a president endeavoring, albeit none too 
successfully, to break with the communist past to remain at the 
helm of power until 1996. But, as distinct from Kozyrev, I am 
clearly aware that the president of a Union republic cannot have 
the full legal value that would make him a genuine guarantor of 
the constitutional system of a fully sovereign state. 
  Having adopted the deplorable decision, Yeltsin made, from 
all viewpoints, a mistake. Having broken his word, he is once 
again giving the opposition splendid opportunities for playing 
the card of the president's unscrupulousness and political 
hypocrisy. The slogan "Send Yeltsin Packing!" gains a second 
wind under these conditions. The political forces and the 
electorate who are the president's staunch supporters are put in 
an awkward position here. 
  Unpleasant legal repercussions are possible also. The 
president now, in the absence of parliament, has become the most 
important source of law. But even after the commencement of the 
activity of the Federal Assembly, Yeltsin will remain, with the 
scheduled arrangement of political power, a most important 
constitutional figure. And his incomplete legal sufficiency 
connected with the limited nature of the presidential mandate he 
obtained could in the near future compel a reconsideration of 
many decisions of the executive as being legally deficient. We 
would recall also that Yeltsin primordially entrusted his fate, 
as it were, to the Federal Assembly. Having emphatically changed 
his own opinion, the president--knowingly or otherwise--has 
humiliated the future parliament and the representative 
authority altogether. I do not believe that this will be that 
easily forgotten. 
  No less deplorable is another mistake of the president's 
also. He announced that he had altered his decision before the 
Constitution, with the idea of a far-advanced presidential 
republic, had been approved at a referendum. It transpires that 
Yeltsin was deciding for the people, as it were, the kind of 
reform of the constitutional arrangement that Russia needs. In 
declaring that he would remain in office until 1996, Yeltsin was 
making it clearly understood (to whom, to the people?) that 
there could be in Russia only a presidential republic. For 
heaven's sake, did not the republics in Spain and Cambodia 
become constitutional monarchies before our eyes? And have we 
not known in contemporary history instances of the conversion of 
presidential into parliamentary republics? 
  And, finally, the last point. Following the disbandment of 
the USSR, multiple voids have, as of January 1992, arisen in 
Russia in the legal respect. Neither the president nor 
parliament nor the judicial authorities have possessed full and 
exhaustive legal sufficiency. Since the April referendum the 
president undoubtedly became more legally sufficient than 
parliament, but still not to the extent necessary for a 
democratic state based on the rule of law. But circumstances 
could now change abruptly to his disadvantage. Parliament, 
elected for the first time in an independent Russia, even if in 
accordance with deficient rules, will inevitably be perceived in 
the world as an institution of fuller legal value than a 
president who was sworn in under other constitutional and legal 
conditions of an order of magnitude lower. Both the president's 
friends and enemies have known how at the right time to 
emphasize this impressive difference repeatedly. 
  Of course, the president and his circle had ostensibly 
reasonable motives for the refusal to put himself up for 
election again. It is possible that some people consider 
themselves to be the winners, who, as we all know, are not 
judged. Being the victor, you can, naturally, permit yourself to 
go back on your word and dictate new conditions of the political 
game. It cannot be ruled out that the president sincerely 
believes in his mission of transformer of Russia and wants to 
use these years to arrange in the country a better life as he 
sees it. 
  In addition, Yeltsin, who is not required to delve into 
legal 
niceties, may not sense the frailty of his legal position and 
because of this does not see the practical point of new 
elections. 
  The president's circle, however, is seriously afraid of the 
possibility of his not being reelected. This would mean for many 
of them the end of their political careers, for some, an 
unpleasant investigation of financial matters, and not just 
financial. Political persecution and revenge are possible also. 
No one wants to take such a risk under today's supercharged 
political conditions. These people may be understood at the 
human level, but in the highest interests of Russia it is, for 
all that, impossible to agree with them. The damage to the 
extremely imperfect Russian statehood and to the genuine, not 
selfishly misinterpreted, ideas of democracy and a state based 
on the rule of law would be all too palpable. 
  Strictly speaking, the damage to the president also would be 
inordinate. Politics is a dirty, immoral business, no question. 
But within certain bounds, which even the Chinese emperor could 
not transgress without loss of face. Nor could any ruler 
thinking if only to a negligible extent about his good name--no, 
not about his own even but that of his country and people. It is 
as necessary as the air he breathes (this is self-evident) to 
the person who considers himself the unifier and spokesman for 
the spirit of the nation, society, and the state. I believe that 
the president will damage himself greatly if he goes back on his 
promise to put himself up for election again. 
  Words under some conditions count for a very great deal, but 
only when they are not at variance with deeds. "Word and deed!" 
Russians exclaimed in the old days, wishing to call the 
attention of the highest authorities to important state 
interests. I believe that this should be an inner requirement of 
all statesmen declaring themselves genuine spokesmen for the 
people's needs. And the president should, undoubtedly, stand in 
the front row of these people. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61096 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr001___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-001 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   5 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Deputies Elected to State Duma: Part II </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944E0332A Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA in Russian 28 Dec 93 pp 
3-5 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0332A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [List of deputies of the Russian Federation Federal Assembly </F>
State Duma elected by single-seat electoral districts] 
  [Text] 
<H6>  Republic of Adygea (Adygea) </H6>
  Adygeyskiy No. 1 
  Lednev, Valentin Petrovich, b. 1941, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, deputy chairman of the 
Cabinet of Ministers-Government of the Republic of Adygea, 
minister of social protection of the population, Maykop 
<H6>  Republic of Bashkortostan </H6>
  Baymakskiy No. 2 
  Galiyev, Akhmetgali Mukhametgaliyevich, b. 1950, 
Bashkir, higher education, no party affiliation, director of the 
Matrayevskiy Sovkhoz, community of Ufimskiy, Khaybullinskiy 
Rayon, Republic of Bashkortostan, Ufa 
  Birskiy No. 3 
  Mirsayev, Ramil Nuryyevich, b. 1950, Bashkir, 
higher education, no party affiliation, deputy minister of 
agriculture and food of the Republic of Bashkortostan, Ufa 
  Kalininskiy No. 4 
  Arinin, Aleksandr Nikolayevich, b. 1955, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Party of Russian Unity and 
Accord election association, head of the Department of History 
of the Fatherland and Culture of the Ufa branch of the State 
Academy of Social Life and Services, Ufa 
  Kirovskiy No. 5 
  Asayev, Rais Badygutdinovich, b. 1931, Tatar, 
higher education, member of the Agrarian Party of Russia, 
chairman of the Luch Kolkhoz, community of Chishmy, Chishminskiy 
Rayon, Republic of Bashkortostan 
  Sterlitamakskiy No. 6 
  Utkin, Yuriy Vasilyevich, b. 1939, Russian, higher 
education, no party affiliation, chief of the administration of 
the city of Ishimbay, Republic of Bashkortostan 
  Tuymazinskiy No. 7 
  Sayetgaliyev, Zifkat Islamovich, b. 1947, Bashkir, 
higher education, no party affiliation, director of the Bashkir 
Animal Husbandry and Feed Production Research and 
Planning-Technological Institute, Ufa 
<H6>  Republic of Buryatia </H6>
  Buryatskiy No. 8 
  Kondakov, Nikolay Yakovlevich, b. 1949, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Social Justice bloc-association, 
Republic of Buryatia, general director of the 
Buryatvodmelioratsiya Planning-Construction-Maintenance 
Association, Ulan-Ude 
<H6>  Republic of Altay </H6>
  Gorno-Altayskiy No. 9 
  Gnezdilov, Mikhail Zakharovich, b. 1946, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, first deputy chairman of 
the Government of the Republic of Altay, Gorno-Altaysk 
<H6>  Republic of Dagestan </H6>
  Buynakskiy No. 10 
  Gamidov, Gamid Mustafayevich, b. 1954, Dargan, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the Republic 
of Dagestan Savings Bank, Makhachkala 
  Makhachkalinskiy No. 11 
  Tolboyev, Magomed Omarovich, b. 1951, Avar, higher 
education, no party affiliation, test pilot of the Flight 
Research Institute, Zhukovskiy, Moscow Oblast 
<H6>  Ingush Republic </H6>
  Ingushskiy No. 12 
  Momdzhyan, Aleksandra Vasilyevna, b. 1949, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, vice president 
of the Creative Arts Academy, president of the International 
Women's Center, Moscow 
<H6>  Kabardino-Balkar Republic </H6>
  Kabardino-Balkarskiy No. 13 
  Karmokov, Khachim Mukhamedovich, b. 1941, 
Kabardin, higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of 
the Kabardino-Balkar Republic Supreme Soviet, Nalchik 
<H6>  Republic of Kalmykia-Khalmg Tangch </H6>
  Kalmytskiy No. 14 
  Khulkhachiyev, Bembya Viktorovich, b. 1957, 
Kalmyk, higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the 
municipal people's court, Elista 
<H6>  Karachayevo-Cherkesskaya Republic </H6>
  Karachayevo-Cherkesskiy No. 15 
  Akbayev, Azret Aliyevich, b. 1939, Karachay, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the board of 
the Karachayevo-Cherkesskaya Republic Culture Foundation, 
Cherkessk 
<H6>  Republic of Karelia </H6>
  Karelskiy No. 16 
  Chukhin, Ivan Ivanovich, b. 1948, Russian, higher 
education, member of the Democratic Russia movement, lieutenant 
colonel of the militia, correspondent of the newspaper SHCHIT I 
MECH of the Ministry of Internal Affairs of the Russian 
Federation, Petrozavodsk 
<H6>  Republic of Komi </H6>
  Pechorskiy No. 17 
  Maksimov, Valeriy Nikolayevich, b. 1947, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, assistant director of 
the Severnaya Mine, Vorkuta, Republic of Komi 
  Syktyvkarskiy No. 18 
  Gen, Nikolay Leonidovich, b. 1958, Komi, higher 
education, no party affiliation, senior assistant prosecutor of 
the Republic of Komi for special assignments, Syktyvkar 
<H6>  Republic of Mariy El </H6>
  Mariyskiy No. 19 
  Popov, Anatoliy Gennadyevich, b. 1948, Mari, 
higher education, member of the board of the Mariy Ushem 
democratic movement, director of the Yoshkar-Ola Footwear 
Factory Stock Company, Yoshkar-Ola 
<H6>  Republic of Mordvinia </H6>
  Mordovskiy No. 20 
  Kartashov, Vladimir Petrovich, b. 1941, Russian, 
secondary technical education, member of the Communist Party of 
the Russian Federation, chief of the Electric Bulb Plant of the 
Lisma Association, Saransk 
<H6>  Republic of Sakha (Yakutia) </H6>
  Yakutskiy No. 21 
  Zhirkov, Yegor Petrovich, b. 1954, Yakut, higher 
education, no party affiliation, minister of education of the 
Republic of Sakha (Yakutia), Yakutsk 
<H6>  Republic of North Ossetia </H6>
  Severo-Osetinskiy No. 22 
  Dzasokhov, Aleksandr Sergeyevich, b. 1934, 
Ossetian, higher education, no party affiliation, cochairman of 
the For Dialogue and Cooperation in the Asia-Pacific Region 
international association, Moscow 
<H6>  Republic of Tyva </H6>
  Tuvinskiy No. 28 [district Nos. as published] 
  Arakchaa, Kara-Kys Dongakovna, b. 1950, Tuvinka, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of a laboratory of 
the Tuva Comprehensive Branch of the Russian Academy of Sciences 
Siberian Department, Kyzyl 
<H6>  Udmurt Republic </H6>
  Izhevskiy No. 29 
  Krasnykh, Aleksey Ivanovich, b. 1943, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chief designer of the 
Izhevsk Radio Plant Automated Production Control System, Izhevsk 
  Udmurtskiy No. 30 
  Vasilyev, Mikhail Arkadyevich, b. 1950, Udmurt, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the 
Sharkanskiy Rayon Soviet of People's Deputies, Sharkan, Udmurt 
Republic 
<H6>  Republic of Khakasia </H6>
  Khakasskiy No. 31 
  Mityukov, Mikhail Alekseyevich, b. 1942, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Russia's Choice election 
association, chairman of the president of the Russian 
Federation's Legislative Proposals Commission, first deputy 
minister of justice of the Russian Federation, Abakan 
<H6>  Chuvash Republic </H6>
  Kanashskiy No. 33 
  Agafonov, Valentin Alekseyevich, b. 1935, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, temporarily not working 
  Cheboksarskiy No. 34 
  Bikalova, Nadezhda Aleksandrovna, b. 1960, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, chief of the 
Sales Department of the Chuvash Republic State Property 
Committee, Cheboksary 
<H6>  Altay Kray </H6>
  Barnaulskiy No. 35 
  Sarychev, Aleksey Nikolayevich, b. 1956, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Russian Democratic Reform 
Movement, deputy chief of the Altay Kray Justice Administration, 
Barnaul 
  Biyskiy No. 36 
  Yefremov, Pavel Vasilyevich, b. 1947, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chief of the Altay Kray 
Administration Main Agricultural Department, deputy chief of 
kray administration, Barnaul 
  Rubtsovskiy No. 37 
  Bessarabov, Vladimir Grigoryevich, b. 1954, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, chief of the 
Department of Supervision of Legality in the Social Sphere of 
the Altay Kray Public Prosecutor's Office, Barnaul 
  Slavgorodskiy No. 38 
  Openyshev, Sergey Pavlovich, b. 1949, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Agrarian Party of Russia, 
chairman of the Rodinskiy Rayon Soviet of People's Deputies, 
Rodino, Altay Kray 
<H6>  Krasnodar Kray </H6>
  Armavirskiy No. 39 
  Dolgopolov, Anatoliy Aleksandrovich, b. 1952, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, pensioner of 
the Armed Forces of the Russian Federation, Labinsk, Krasnodar 
Kray 
  Kanevskiy No. 40 
  Kochegura, Anatoliy Timofeyevich, b. 1941, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the 
Privolnoye Stock Company, stanitsa Privolnaya, Krasnodar Kray 
  Krasnodarskiy No. 41 
  Glotov, Sergey Aleksandrovich, b. 1959, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, assistant professor at 
the Krasnodar Higher Military Command-Engineering School of 
Missile Forces, Krasnodar 
  Novorossiyskiy No. 42 
  Zatsepina, Nina Andreyevna, b. 1948, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, director of the Anapa 
Educational Center for the Training and Improvement of the 
Personnel of Trade Union Resorts, Anapa, Krasnodar Kray 
  Prikubanskiy No. 43 
  Kiriy, Petr Yakovlevich, b. 1940, Russian, higher 
education, member of the Agrarian Party of Russia, chairman of 
the Cheburgolskoye Collective Agricultural Enterprise, village 
of Cheburgol, Krasnodar Kray 
  Tikhoretskiy No. 44 
  Verveyko, Nadezhda Alekseyevna, b. 1953, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of the district 
Legal Advice Bureau, Stanitsa Novopokrovskaya, Krasnodar Kray 
  Tuapsinskiy No. 45 
  Boyko, Vadim Anatolyevich, b. 1965, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, journalist of the 
newspaper SOCHI, director of the V. Boyko Yug-Inform 
Information-Advertising Agency, Sochi, Krasnodar Kray 
<H6>  Krasnoyarsk Kray </H6>
  Achinskiy No. 46 
  Zhurko, Vasiliy Vasilyevich, b. 1963, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Liberal Democratic Party of 
Russia, bus driver of the Achinsk Alumina Works Transstroyservis 
Firm, Achinsk, Krasnoyarsk Kray 
  Yeniseyskiy No. 47 
  Kolmakov, Valeriy Agafonovich, b. 1946, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chief of the Norilsk 
Administration Internal Affairs Department 
  Kanskiy No. 48 
  Yaroshenko, Anatoliy Ivanovich, b. 1937, 
Ukrainian, higher education, member of the Agrarian Party of 
Russia, director of the Bolsheurinskoye Stock Company, village 
of Bolshaya Urya, Krasnoyarsk Kray 
  Krasnoyarskiy No. 49 
  Tikhonov, Vladimir Ageyevich, b. 1938, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, temporarily not working 
<H6>  Maritime Kray </H6>
  Arsenyevskiy No. 50 
  Nesterenko, Valeriy Ivanovich, b. 1945, Ukrainian, 
higher education, member of the Democratic Party of Russia, 
director of the Khankayskiy State Nature Reserve, Spassk-Dalniy, 
Maritime Kray 
  Vladivostokskiy No. 51 
  Glubokovskiy, Mikhail Konstantinovich, b. 1948, 
Russian, higher education, member of the 
Yavlinskiy-Boldyrev-Lukin Bloc election association, head of a 
laboratory of the Institute of Marine Biology of the Russian 
Academy of Sciences Far East Department, Vladivostok 
  Ussuriyskiy No. 52 
  Ustinov, Igor Gavrilovich, b. 1935, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the Nakhodka 
Free Economic Zone Administrative Committee 
<H6>  Stavropol Kray </H6>
  Georgiyevskiy No. 53 
  Borodin, Viktor Ivanovich, b. 1950, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chief of administration 
of the city of Georgiyevsk and Georgiyevskiy Rayon, Georgiyevsk, 
Stavropol Kray 
  Kavminvodskiy No. 54 
  Katrenko, Vladimir Semenovich, b. 1956, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, general director of the 
Sovtransavto Stock Company, Mineralnyye Vody, Stavropol Kray 
  Petrovskiy No. 55 
  Moroz, Vasiliy Andreyevich, b. 1937, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Agrarian Party of Russia, 
director of the All-Russia Sheep- and Goat-Breeding Research 
Institute, Stavropol 
  Stavropolskiy No. 56 
  Traspov, Aleksandr Mikhaylovich, b. 1956, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, member of the 
Interrepublic Bar Association, lawyer of Legal Advice Bureau 19, 
Stavropol 
<H6>  Khabarovsk Kray </H6>
  Komsomolskiy-na-Amure No. 57 
  Baryshev, Vladimir Ivanovich, b. 1959, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Russia's Choice election 
association, private detective, Komsomolsk-na-Amure, Khabarovsk 
Kray 
  Khabarovskiy No. 58 
  Podmasko, Valeriy Borisovich, b. 1958, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, deputy chairman of the 
Khabarovsk Kray Property Fund, Khabarovsk 
<H6>  Amur Oblast </H6>
  Blagoveshchenskiy No. 59 
  Zakharov, Andrey Aleksandrovich, b. 1951, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, lecturer at the 
polytechnical institute, Blagoveshchensk 
<H6>  Arkhangelsk Oblast </H6>
  Arkhangelskiy No. 60 
  Shulgin, Sergey Nikolayevich, b. 1956, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, president of the 
Gandvikbank economic development bank, Arkhangelsk 
  Kotlasskiy No. 61 
  Piskunov, Aleksandr Aleksandrovich, b. 1951, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, serviceman 
adviser to the first deputy minister of defense of the Russian 
Federation, Mirnyy, Arkhangelsk Oblast 
<H6>  Astrakhan Oblast </H6>
  Astrakhanskiy No. 62 
  Vinogradov, Vladislav Vladimirovich, b. 1961, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, acting 
assistant professor of the Department of History and Political 
Science of the Kirov Astrakhan Pedagogical Institute, Astrakhan 
<H6>  Belgorod Oblast </H6>
  Belgorodskiy No. 63 
  Berestovoy, Viktor Ivanovich, b. 1948, higher 
education, no party affiliation, temporarily not working 
  Novooskolskiy No. 64 
  Zamay, Boris Ivanovich, b. 1948, Russian, higher 
education, no party affiliation, justice of the Belgorod Oblast 
People's Court, Belgorod 
<H6>  Bryansk Oblast </H6>
  Bryanskiy No. 65 
  Vorontsov, Anatoliy Yevgenyevich, b. 1933, 
Russian, higher education, member of the Agrarian Party of 
Russia, chairman of the Leninets Kolkhoz, village of 
Glinishchevo, Bryansk Oblast 
  Pochepskiy No. 66 
  Shenkarev, Oleg Aleksandrovich, b. 1947, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Communist Party of the Russian 
Federation, senior lecturer at the Bryansk Transport Engineering 
Institute, Bryansk 
<H6>  Vladimir Oblast </H6>
  Vladimirskiy No. 67 
  Churkin, Gennadiy Ivanovich, b. 1937, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Agrarian Party of Russia, 
director of the Vladimiro-Suzdalskoye Stock Company, Vladimir 
  Sudogodskiy No. 68 
  Buchenkov, Yevgeniy Viktorovich, b. 1938, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Communist Party of the Russian 
Federation, director of the Zimenki State Pedigree-Breeding 
Factory, village of Mezhishche, Vladimir Oblast 
<H6>  Volgograd Oblast </H6>
  Volzhskiy No. 69 
  Nikitin, Valeriy Aleksandrovich, b. 1944, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chief of the city 
Education Administration, Volzhskiy, Volgograd Oblast 
  Krasnoarmeyskiy No. 70 
  Kosykh, Vladimir Ivanovich, b. 1950, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chief of the Volgograd 
Internal Affairs Administration Criminal-Investigation Militia 
Office 
  Mikhaylovskiy No. 71 
  Plotnikov, Vladimir Nikolayevich, b. 1961, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, chief 
agronomist of the Gusevskoye Collective Farm, village of 
Gusevka, Volgograd Oblast 
  Tsentralnyy No. 72 
  Lukashev, Igor Lvovich, b. 1955, Russian, higher 
education, member of the Social Democratic Party of the Russian 
Federation, member of the Volgograd Oblast Soviet of People's 
Deputies Inner Council, Volgograd 
<H6>  Vologda Oblast </H6>
  Vologodskiy No. 73 
  Leta, Tamara Ilinichna, b. 1939, Ukrainian, higher 
education, no party affiliation, deputy chief physician of the 
Vologda Oblast Hospital 
  Cherepovetskiy No. 74 
  Kovalev, Vasiliy Nikolayevich, b. 1960, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, first deputy chief of 
the administration of Vologda Oblast, Cherepovets, Vologda Oblast 
<H6>  Voronezh Oblast </H6>
  Anninskiy No. 75 
  Parinov, Nikolay Vasilyevich, b. 1947, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, general director of the 
Sad Agrofirm, community of Novonadezhdinskiy, Voronezh Oblast 
  Levoberezhnyy No. 76 
  Davydkin, Viktor Alekseyevich, b. 1945, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Russia's Choice election 
association, representative of the president of the Russian 
Federation for Voronezh Oblast, Voronezh 
  Pavlovskiy No. 77 
  Matyashov, Petr Ivanovich, b. 1942, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, first deputy chief of 
the administration of the rayon, chief of the Pavlovskiy Rayon 
Agriculture Department, Pavlovsk, Voronezh Oblast 
  Pravoberezhnyy No. 78 
  Muravyev, Igor Vladislavovich, b. 1960, Russian, 
higher education, member of the All-Russia Renewal Union party, 
political adviser at the All-Russia Smena Foundation grassroots 
organization, Voronezh 
<H6>  Ivanovo Oblast </H6>
  Ivanovskiy No. 79 
  Zelenkin, Viktor Vasilyevich, b. 1947, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Russia's Choice election 
association, chairman of the Ivanovo City Soviet of People's 
Deputies, Ivanovo 
  Kineshemskiy No. 80 
  Zenkin, Sergey Anatolyevich, b. 1960, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, lecturer at the Ivanovo 
State University, Ivanovo 
<H6>  Irkutsk Oblast </H6>
  Angarskiy No. 81 
  Mashinskiy, Viktor Leonidovich, b. 1949, higher 
education, no party affiliation, general director of the 
Baykalit Stock Company, Angarsk, Irkutsk Oblast 
  Bratskiy No. 82 
  Shuba, Vitaliy Borisovich, b. 1951, Russian, 
higher education, chairman of the Bratsk City Soviet of People's 
Deputies, Irkutsk Oblast 
  Irkutskiy No. 83 
  Ten, Yuriy Mikhaylovich, b. 1951, Korean, higher 
education, member of the Civic Union in the Name of Stability, 
Justice, and Progress election association. President of the 
Trud Stock Company, Irkutsk 
  Tulunskiy No. 84 
  Turusun, Anatoliy Afanasyevich, b. 1934, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chief of the 
administration of Nizhneudinskiy Rayon, Nizhneudinsk, Irkutsk 
Oblast 
<H6>  Kaliningrad Oblast </H6>
  Kaliningradskiy No. 85 
  Voyevoda, Yuriy Yevgenyevich, b. 1951, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Russian Democratic Reform 
Movement, senior assistant prosecutor of the Baltic Fleet, chief 
of the General Supervision Department, Kaliningrad 
<H6>  Kaluga Oblast </H6>
  Dzerzhinskiy No. 86 
  Burdukov, Pavel Timofeyevich, b. 1947, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, director of the Kalinin 
Sovkhoz, Kuybyshevskiy Rayon, Kaluga Oblast 
  Kaluzhskiy No. 87 
  Pamfilova, Ella Aleksandrovna, b. 1953, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, minister of social 
protection of the population of the Russian Federation, Moscow 
<H6>  Kamchatka Oblast </H6>
  Kamchatskiy No. 88 
  Lezdinsh, Ayvars Yanovich, b. 1952, Lett, higher 
education, no party affiliation, director of the small-scale 
enterprise Munitsipalnyy kanal, Petropavlovsk-Kamchatskiy 
<H6>  Kemerovo Oblast </H6>
  Anzhero-Sudzhenskiy No. 89 
  Parshentseva, Galina Vasilyevna, b. 1951, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, deputy chief of the 
Department of Social Protection of the Population of the 
Kemerovo Oblast Administration, Kemerovo 
  Kemerovskiy No. 90 
  Burkov, Sergey Vasilyevich, b. 1956, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, adviser for economic 
matters to the Kemerovo Oblast Soviet of People's Deputies, 
Kemerovo 
  Novokuznetskiy No. 91 
  Medikov, Viktor Yakovlevich, b. 1950, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, professor of the 
Department of the Economics and Organization of Metallurgical 
Production of the Siberian Metallurgical Institute, 
Novokuznetsk, Kemerovo Oblast 
  Prokopyevskiy No. 92 
  Volkova, Nina Veniaminovna, b. 1941, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, director of the stock 
company Prokopyevskiy torgovyy dom, Prokopyevsk, Kemerovo Oblast 
<H6>  Kirov Oblast </H6>
  Kirovskiy No. 93 
  Vakulenko, Mikhail Yuryevich, b. 1964, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Liberal Democratic Party of 
Russia, teacher at High School No. 16 of the city of Kirov 
  Sovetskiy No. 94 
  Agafonov, Yegor Andreyevich, b. 1941, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of the Department 
of Agriculture of the administration of Kirov Oblast, Kirov 
<H6>  Kostroma Oblast </H6>
  Kostromskoy No. 95 
  Puzanovskiy, Adrian Georgiyevich, b. 1942, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, head of the 
Department of Management, Marketing and Law of the Kostroma 
Agricultural Institute, Kostroma 
<H6>  Kurgan Oblast </H6>
  Vostochnyy No. 96 
  Bezborodov, Nikolay Maksimovich, b. 1944, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, serviceman of the air 
force, Kurgan 
  Zapadnyy No. 97 
  Kalistratov, Gennadiy Stepanovich, b. 1940, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, deputy leader 
of a department of the Energeticheskiye seti Rossii stock 
company, Moscow 
<H6>  Kursk Oblast </H6>
  Kurskiy No. 98 
  Mikhaylov, Aleksandr Nikolayevich, b. 1951, 
Russian, higher education, member of the Communist Party of the 
Russian Federation, temporarily not working 
  Lgovskiy No. 99 
  Potapenko, Aleksandr Fedorovich, b. 1958, 
Belarusian, higher education, member of the Communist Party of 
the Russian Federation, chief of the Railroad-Car Depot, Lgov, 
Kursk Oblast 
<H6>  Leningrad Oblast </H6>
  Volkhovskiy No. 100 
  Sokolov, Yuriy Vasilyevich, b. 1938, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the 
Tosnenskiy City Soviet of People's Deputies, Tosno, Leningrad 
Oblast 
  Vsevolozhskiy No. 101 
  Fedorov, Yevgeniy Alekseyevich, b. 1963, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Russian Democratic Reform 
Movement, serviceman, Vyborgskiy Rayon, Leningrad Oblast 
<H6>  Lipetsk Oblast </H6>
  Yeletskiy No. 102 
  Repkin, Viktor Pavlovich, b. 1938, no party 
affiliation, chief of the Department of Agriculture of the 
administration of Lipetsk Oblast, Lipetsk 
  Lipetskiy No. 103 
  Chepasova, Tamara Eduardovna, b. 1950, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chief of the Lipetsk 
Territorial Administration of the State Committee of the Russian 
Federation for Antitrust Policy and Support for New Economic 
Structures 
<H6>  Magadan Oblast </H6>
  Magadanskiy No. 104 
  Kokorev, Yevgeniy Mikhaylovich, b. 1940, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, president of the 
International Pedagogical University, Magadan 
<H6>  Moscow Oblast </H6>
  Dmitrovskiy No. 105 
  Muravyev, Artur Alekseyevich, b. 1965, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, lawyer of the Klin Legal 
Advice Bureau, Klin, Moscow Oblast 
  Istrinskiy No. 106 
  Gaboyev, Vladimir Nikolayevich, b. 1943, Ossetian, 
higher education, member of the Moscow Oblast regional 
organization of the Democratic Russia Movement, psychiatrist at 
the Krasnogorsk District Hospital, Krasnogorsk, Moscow Oblast 
  Kolomenskiy No. 107 
  Skorochkin, Sergey Grigoryevich, b. 1961, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, general director of the 
Raduga Limited-Liability Partnership, Zaraysk, Moscow Oblast 
  Lyuberetskiy No. 108 
  Guskov, Anatoliy Vladimirovich, b. 1948, Russian, 
incomplete higher education, member of the Russian Free Labor 
Party, president of the Ramenskoye Maintenance-Construction 
Association, Ramenskoye, Moscow Oblast 
  Mytishchinskiy No. 109 
  Ayzderdzis, Andrey Daynisovich, b. 1958, Russian, 
secondary specialized education, no party affiliation, chairman 
of the MDK-Bank Board, chairman of the board of directors of the 
International Business Corporation, Khimki, Moscow Oblast 
  Noginskiy No. 110 
  Stolyarov, Nikolay Sergeyevich, b. 1947, 
Belarusian, higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of 
the Accord Public Council for Economic and Moral Support for 
Servicemen, dean of the International University Higher School, 
Moscow 
  Odintsovskiy No. 111 
  Lukin, Vladimir Petrovich, b. 1937, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, ambassador extraordinary 
and plenipotentiary of the Russian Federation to the United 
States 
  Orekhovo-Zuyevskiy No. 112 
  Kvasov, Vladimir Petrovich, b. 1936, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chief of staff of the 
Council of Ministers-Government of the Russian Federation, Moscow 
  Podolskiy No. 113 
  Bondarev, Grigoriy Semenovich, b. 1946, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Republican Party of the Russian 
Federation, member of the Yavlinskiy-Boldyrev-Lukin Bloc 
association, secretary of the president of the Russian 
Federation's Legislative Proposals Commission, Podolsk 
  Shchelkovskiy No. 114 
  Zhirinovskiy, Vladimir Volfovich, b. 1946, 
Russian, higher education, chairman of the Liberal Democratic 
Party of Russia, Moscow 
<H6>  Murmansk Oblast </H6>
  Monchegurskiy No. 115 
  Mannanikov, Vladimir Nikolayevich, b. 1947, 
Russian, secondary education, member of the Russia's Choice 
election association, member of the president of the Russian 
Federation's Legislative Proposals Commission, Moscow 
  Murmanskiy No. 116 
  Kozyrev, Andrey Vladimirovich, b. 1951, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Russia's Choice election 
association, minister of foreign affairs of the Russian 
Federation, Moscow 
<H6>  Nizhegorodskaya Oblast </H6>
  Avtozavodskiy No. 117 
  Tsapin, Aleksandr Ivanovich, b. 1943, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, deputy general director 
for personnel of the GAZ Stock Company, Nizhniy Novgorod 
  Arzamasskiy No. 118 
  Voronov, Sergey Vasilyevich, b. 1967, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, authorized 
representative of Nizhegorod Oblast under the Government of the 
Russian Federation, Nizhniy Novgorod 
  Dzerzhinskiy No. 119 
  Seslavinskiy, Mikhail Vadimovich, b. 1964, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the 
Russian Artistic Union of Employees of Culture, Dzerzhinsk, 
Nizhegorod Oblast 
  Kanavinskiy No. 120 
  Bulavinov, Vadim Yevgenyevich, b. 1963, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, member of the Nizhegorod 
Oblast Bar Association, Nizhniy Novgorod 
  Semenovskiy No. 121 
  Chertoritskaya, Tatyana Vladimirovna, b. 1948, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, director of the 
Institute of Hand-Written Books and Those Written Before the 
18th Century of the Russian Volga Region, Nizhniy Novgorod 
  Sergachskiy No. 122 
  Bushmin, Yevgeniy Vitkorovich, b. 1958, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the 
Trusteeship Council of the Nizhegorodskaya yarmaka check 
investment fund, Nizhniy Novgorod 
<H6>  Novgorod Oblast </H6>
  Novgorodskiy No. 123 
  Ochin, Oleg Fedorovich, b. 1950, Russian, higher 
education, no party affiliation, general director of the 
Interservis Program Management Center, Novgorod 
<H6>  Novosibirsk Oblast </H6>
  Barabinskiy No. 124 
  Kharitonov, Nikolay Mikhaylovich, b. 1948, 
Russian, higher education, member of the Agrarian Party of 
Russia, director of the Galinskoye Stock Company, Moshkovskiy 
Rayon, Novosibirsk Oblast 
  Zavodskoy No. 125 
  Anichkin, Ivan Stepanovich, b. 1938, Ukrainian, 
higher education, member of the Dignity and Mercy movement, 
general director of the Oksid Novosibirsk Production 
Association, Novosibirsk 
  Zayeltsovskiy No. 126 
  Lipitskiy, Vasiliy Semenovich, b. 1947, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Free Russia People's Party, 
deputy director of the Russian Academy of Sciences 
Sociopolitical Research Institute, Moscow 
  Iskitimskiy No. 127 
  Starikov, Ivan Valentinovich, b. 1960, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, director of the 
Nayvinskoye Agricultural Joint-Stock Enterprise, Novosibirsk 
Oblast 
<H6>  Omsk Oblast </H6>
  Bolsherechenskiy No. 128 
  Zharov, Oleg Yuryevich, b. 1954, Russian, higher 
education, no party affiliation, director of the Russkoye Stock 
Company, Omsk 
  Omskiy No. 129 
  Lotkov, Viktor Nikolayevich, b. 1946, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chief of the Omsk Oblast 
Administration Internal Affairs Department, Omsk 
  Tsentralnyy No. 130 
  Baburin, Sergey Nikolayevich, b. 1959, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Russian National Union social 
and political movement, dean of the Omsk State University Law 
Faculty, Omsk 
<H6>  Orenburg Oblast </H6>
  Buzulukskiy No. 131 
  Chernyshev, Aleksey Andreyevich, b. 1939, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, first deputy minister of 
agriculture of the Russian Federation, Moscow 
  Orenburgskiy No. 132 
  Zlotnikova, Tamara Vladimirovna, b. 1951, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Russian Ecological Union, 
chairman of the Orenburg Oblast Soviet of People's Deputies' 
Standing Commission for Ecology and the Use of Natural 
Resources, Orenburg 
  Orskiy No. 133 
  Volkov, Vladimir Nikolayevich, b. 1948, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Communist Party of the Russian 
Federation, history teacher at School No. 15 of the city of 
Orsk, Orenburg Oblast 
<H6>  Orel Oblast </H6>
  Orlovskiy No. 134 
  Voropayev, Aleksandr Ivanovich, b. 1949, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, general director of the 
Orel Oblast Agrarian-Industrial Complex Production-Commercial 
Center, Orel 
<H6>  Penza Oblast </H6>
  Zheleznodorozhnyy No. 135 
  Goryachev, Valeriy Sergeyevich, b. 1952, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Republican Party of the Russian 
Federation, member of the Penza Oblast Bar Association, Penza 
  Pervomayskiy No. 136 
  Ilyukhin, Viktor Ivanovich, b. 1949, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Communist Party of the Russian 
Federation, observer of the newspaper PRAVDA, Moscow 
<H6>  Perm Oblast </H6>
  Bereznikovskiy No. 137 
  Kravtsov, Vladimir Ivanovich, b. 1948, Ukrainian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, director of the 
Uralkaliy Stock Company First Mine Administration, Berezniki, 
Perm Oblast 
  Kungurskiy No. 138 
  Putilov, Mikhail Alekseyevich, b. 1935, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of Rossiya 
Kolkhoz, Perm Oblast 
  Leninskiy No. 139 
  Zelenin, Vladimir Mikhaylovich, b. 1936, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Communist Party of the Russian 
Federation, head of a department of the Perm Agricultural 
Institute, Perm 
  Sverdlovskiy No. 140 
  Pokhmelkin, Viktor Valeryevich, b. 1960, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Russia's Choice election 
association, scientific leader of the Legal Policy Private 
Research Institute, Perm 
<H6>  Pskov Oblast </H6>
  Pskovskiy No. 141 
  Mikhaylov, Yevgeniy Eduardovich, b. 1963, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Liberal Democratic Party of 
Russia, deputy chief editor of the newspaper PRAVDA 
ZHIRINOVSKOGO, Moscow 
<H6>  Rostov Oblast </H6>
  Volgodonskiy No. 142 
  Ponomarev, Sergey Aleksandrovich, b. 1956, 
Russian, higher education, member of the Socialist Workers 
Party, chairman of the board of the Khleborob Collective 
Agricultural Enterprise, Rostov Oblast 
  Kamenskiy No. 143 
  Danchenko, Boris Ivanovich, b. 1947, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chief of the Department 
of Agriculture of the Kasharskiy Rayon Administration, Rostov 
Oblast 
  Rostovskiy Pervomayskiy No. 144 
  Amelina, Alla Leonidovna, b. 1952, Russian, higher 
education, no party affiliation, deputy chief editor of the 
newspaper VECHERNIY ROSTOV, Rostov-on-Don 
  Rostovskiy Sovetskiy No. 145 
  Bratishchev, Igor Mikhaylovich, b. 1938, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Communist Party of the Russian 
Federation, head of a department of the Rostov Railways 
University, Rostov-on-Don 
  Taganrogskiy No. 146 
  Rodionov, Yuriy Nikolayevich, b. 1938, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, deputy chief military 
inspector of the Russian Federation, colonel general, Moscow 
  Shakhtinskiy No. 147 
  Bespalov, Ivan Mikhaylovich, b. 1938, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Communist Party of the Russian 
Federation, chief of a bay of the Mirnoye Mine Administration of 
the Rostovugol Stock Company, Shakhty, Rostov Oblast 
<H6>  Ryazan Oblast </H6>
  Ryazanskiy No. 148 
  Laykam, Konstantin Emilyevich, b. 1957, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, director of the Agro-R 
Limited-Liability Partnership, Ryazan 
  Shilovskiy No. 149 
  Yenkov, Sergey Alekseyevich, b. 1949, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Agrarian Party of Russia, deputy 
chairman of the oblast committee of the Agro-Industrial Complex 
Workers Union, Ryazan 
<H6>  Samara Oblast </H6>
  Novokuybyshevskiy No. 150 
  Gusarova, Galina Ivanovna, b. 1947, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Women of Russia political 
movement, chairman of the Samara Oblast Administration Family, 
Mother and Child Committee, Samara 
  Promyshlennyy No. 151 
  Chukanov, Nikolay Aleksandrovich, b. 1940, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, leader of the 
Samara New Economic Research Foundation, Samara 
  Samarskiy No. 152 
  Rozhkova, Lyubov Petrovna, b. 1947, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of a department of 
the Samara State University, Samara 
  Syzranskiy No. 153 
  Gusarov, Yevgeniy Aleksandrovich, b. 1951, higher 
education, no party affiliation, president of the Poisk Stock 
Company, Syzran, Samara Oblast 
  Tolyattinskiy No. 154 
  Smirnov, Vyacheslav Mikhaylovich, b. 1953, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the 
board of the Lada-Bank Social Development Joint-Stock Commercial 
Bank, Togliatti, Samara Oblast 
<H6>  Saratov Oblast </H6>
  Balakovskiy No. 155 
  Sergeyenkov, Aleksandr Nikolayevich, b. 1955, 
Russian, higher education, member of the Democratic Russia 
movement, deputy chairman of the Balakovo Administration 
Provisional Committee for Reform of the Organs of Representative 
Power and the Organization of Local Government, Saratov Oblast 
  Balashovskiy No. 156 
  Dorovskikh, Andrey Mikhaylovich, b. 1965, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Liberal Democratic Party of 
Russia, director of the Resheniye Law Enterprise, Balashov, 
Saratov Oblast 
  Saratovskiy No. 157 
  Gordeyev, Anatoliy Nikolayevich, b. 1954, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Communist Party of the Russian 
Federation, first vice president and executive director of the 
Saratov Hermes Regional Trade and Industry Association, Saratov 
  Engelsskiy No. 158 
  Lysenko, Nikolay Nikolayevich, b. 1961, Russian, 
higher education, chairman of the National Republican Party of 
Russia Central Council, St. Petersburg 
<H6>  Sakhalin Oblast </H6>
  Sakhalinskiy No. 159 
  Tretyak, Boris Nikitovich, b. 1938, Ukrainian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, manager of the 
Sakhalingeofizrazvedka Trust, Okha, Sakhalin Oblast 
<H6>  Sverdlovsk Oblast </H6>
  Artemovskiy No. 160 
  Tokareva, Tamara Petrovna, b. 1940, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Peasant Party of Russia, 
chairman of the Sverdlovsk Oblast Soviet of People's Deputies 
Land Commission, Yekaterinburg 
  Verkh-Isetskiy No. 161 
  Mishustina, Larisa Pavlovna, b. 1949, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Russia's Choice election 
association, chairman of the Sverdlovsk Oblast Soviet of 
People's Deputies Glasnost Commission, Yekaterinburg 
  Kamensk-Uralskiy No. 162 
  Mikheyev, Sergey Vladimirovich, b. 1955, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, director of High School 
No. 7 of the city of Sukhoy Log, Sverdlovsk Oblast 
  Nizhne-Tagilskiy No. 163 
  Veyer, Artur Pavlovich, b. 1947, German, higher 
education, no party affiliation, deputy chief of the 
administration of the city of Nizhniy Tagil 
  Ordzhonikidzevskiy No. 164 
  Brusnitsyn, Yuriy Aleksandrovich, b. 1946, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, chief of the 
administration of Kirovskiy Rayon, Yekaterinburg 
  Pervouralskiy No. 165 
  Nekrasov, Leonid Vasilyevich, b. 1958, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Economic Freedom Party, manager 
of Ester-Bank, Yekaterinburg 
  Serovskiy No. 166 
  Selivanov, Andrey Vladimirovich, b. 1967, Russian, 
incomplete higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of 
the Youth Affairs Committee of the administration of the city of 
Krasnoturinsk, Sverdlovsk Oblast 
<H6>  Smolensk Oblast </H6>
  Vyazemskiy No. 167 
  Balalayev, Vyacheslav Yefimovich, b. 1950, 
Russian, higher education, member of the Agrarian Party of 
Russia, general director of the Safonovskoye Stock Company, 
Safonovo, Smolensk Oblast 
  Smolenskiy No. 168 
  Lukyanov, Anatoliy Ivanovich, b. 1930, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Communist Party of the Russian 
Federation, retiree, Moscow 
<H6>  Tambov Oblast </H6>
  Michurinskiy No. 169 
  Ponomarev, Aleksey Alekseyevich, b. 1942, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Communist Party of the Russian 
Federation, temporarily not working 
  Tambovskiy No. 170 
  Pletneva, Tamara Vasilyevna, b. 1947, German, 
higher education, member of the Communist Party of the Russian 
Federation, director of the Inzhavino Auxiliary Boarding School, 
Inzhavino community, Tambov Oblast 
<H6>  Tver Oblast </H6>
  Bezhetskiy No. 171 
  Bayunov, Vladimir Aleksandrovich, b. 1952, 
Russian, higher education, member of the Communist Party of the 
Russian Federation, director of the Druzhba Peasant Farm 
Association, Bezhetsk, Tver Oblast 
  Tverskoy No. 172 
  Astrakhankina, Tatyana Aleksandrovna, b. 1960, 
Russian, higher education, member of the Communist Party of the 
Russian Federation, journalist of the newspaper RZHEVSKAYA 
PRAVDA, Rzhev, Tver Oblast 
<H6>  Tomsk Oblast </H6>
  Tomskiy gorodskiy No. 173 
  Bauer, Vladimir Anatolyevich, b. 1946, German, 
higher education, member of the Russia's Choice election 
association, deputy chief of the administration of Tomsk Oblast, 
Tomsk 
  Tomskiy Selskiy No. 174 
  Sulakshin, Stepan Stepanovich, b. 1954, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Republican Party of the Russian 
Federation, member of the Democratic Russia movement, 
representative of the president of the Russian Federation for 
Tomsk Oblast, Tomsk 
<H6>  Tula Oblast </H6>
  Novomoskovskiy No. 175 
  Vasilyev, Vladimir Aleksandrovich, b. 1936, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, director of the 
Novomoskovsk branch of the Medveyev Russian Chemical Engineering 
University, Novomoskovsk, Tula Oblast 
  Tulskiy No. 176 
  Pashchenko, Eduard Aleksandrovich, b. 1939, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, manager of the 
Tula General Regional Exchange, adviser to the chief of the 
administration of Tula Oblast, Tula 
  Shchekinskiy No. 177 
  Bogdanova, Yelena Mikhaylovna, b. 1955, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Agrarian Party of Russia, chief 
forestry inspector of the Tula Experimental Forestry Station, 
Tula 
<H6>  Tyumen Oblast </H6>
  Ishimskiy No. 178 
  Shkuro, Stanislav Ivanovich, b. 1948, Ukrainian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, director of the 
state-owned enterprise Zavodoukovskoye Experimental-Production 
Facility, Zavodoukovsk, Tyumen Oblast 
  Tyumenskiy No. 179 
  Trushnikov, Aleksandr Khristoforovich, b. 1948, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, journalist of 
the Region-Tyumen Television and Radio Company, Tyumen 
<H6>  Ulyanovsk Oblast </H6>
  Leninskiy No. 180 
  Sychev, Valeriy Aleksandrovich, b. 1960, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, deputy chief of the 
administration of Ulyanovsk Oblast, chairman of the Public-State 
Committee for Youth Affairs, Ulyanovsk 
  Zasviyazhskiy No. 181 
  Zhadanova, Lyudmila Aleksandrovna, b. 1950, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, chief physician 
of Children's City Hospital No. 1, Ulyanovsk 
<H6>  Chelyabinsk Oblast </H6>
  Zlatoustovskiy No. 182 
  Grigoriadi, Vladimir Stillianovich, b. 1949, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, temporarily not 
working 
  Kalininskiy No. 183 
  Golovlev, Vladimir Ivanovich, b. 1957, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Russia's Choice election 
association, chairman of the Chelyabinsk Oblast Property 
Administration Committee, Chelyabinsk 
  Kyshtymskiy No. 184 
  Kushnar, Aleksandr Leonidovich, b. 1954, 
Ukrainian, higher education, member of the Russia's Choice 
election association, president of the Union of Leaseholders and 
Entrepreneurs of the Urals, Chelyabinsk 
  Magnitogorskiy No. 185 
  Pochinok, Aleksandr Petrovich, b. 1958, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Russia's Choice election 
association, deputy minister of finance of the Russian 
Federation, Moscow 
  Sovetskiy No. 186 
  Utkin, Vladimir Petrovich, b. 1950, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, temporarily not working 
<H6>  Chita Oblast </H6>
  Borzinskiy No. 187 
  Surenkov, Vladimir Sidorovich, b. 1948, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, executive director of 
the Zabaykalzoloto Association, Chita 
  Chitinskiy No. 188 
  Markidonov, Sergey Aleksandrovich, b. 1961, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the 
Chita Oblast Property Fund, Chita 
<H6>  Yarovslavl Oblast </H6>
  Kirovskiy No. 189 
  Tishkovskaya, Yevgeniya Leonidovna, b. 1948, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, design engineer 
of the Yaroslavlnefteorgsintez Stock Company, Yaroslavl 
  Rybinskiy No. 190 
  Greshnevikov, Anatoliy Nikolayevich, b. 1956, 
Russian, higher education, member of the Russian Artistic Union 
of Employees of Culture, writer, Borisoglebskiy community, 
Yaroslavl Oblast 
<H6>  City of Moscow </H6>
  Babushkinskiy No. 191 
  Nisnevich, Yuliy Anatolyevich, b. 1951, Jewish, 
higher education, member of the Democratic Russia movement, 
deputy general director of the Litsom k Litsu joint venture, 
Moscow 
  Varshavskiy No. 192 
  Kovalev, Sergey Adamovich, b. 1930, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Russia's Choice election 
association, chairman of the president of the Russian 
Federation's Human Rights Commission, Moscow 
  Zapadnyy No. 193 
  Zadonskiy, Georgiy Ivanovich, b. 1940, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Democratic Russia movement, 
chief of a department of the Ministry of Labor of the Russian 
Federation, Moscow 
  Kashirskiy No. 194 
  Khakamada, Irina Mutsuovna, b. 1955, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Economic Freedom Party, expert 
of the Russian Commodity-Raw Material Exchange, Moscow 
  Medvedkovskiy No. 195 
  Mironov, Viktor Pimenovich, b. 1948, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, leader of the Moscow 
City Hall Main Municipal Control Administration 
  Nagatinskiy No. 196 
  Volkov, Andrey Romanovich, b. 1961, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, consultant of the 
Servoinvest Firm, Moscow 
  Perovskiy No. 197 
  Osovtsov, Aleksandr Avraamovich, b. 1957, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Russia's Choice election 
association, member of the Democratic Russia movement, college 
dean, professor at the International University, Moscow 
  Preobrazhenskiy No. 198 
  Zhukov, Aleksandr Dmitriyevich, b. 1956, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Dignity and Mercy election 
association, vice president of the Avtotraktoroeksport Foreign 
Economic Stock Company, Moscow 
  Severnyy No. 199 
  Gerber, Alla Yefremovna, b. 1932, Jewish, higher 
education, member of the Russia's Choice election association, 
writer, journalist, Moscow 
  Severo-Zapadnyy No. 200 
  Vlasov, Yuriy Petrovich, b. 1935, Russian, higher 
education, no party affiliation, president of the Pushkin 
Academy, writer, Moscow 
  Universitetskiy No. 201 
  Braginskiy, Aleksandr Pavlovich, b. 1948, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Russian Democratic Reform 
Movement, deputy premier of the Government of Moscow, Moscow 
  Tsentralnyy No. 202 
  Tarasov, Artem Mikhaylovich, b. 1950, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, entrepreneur of the 
Kenmore Service LTD firm, Moscow 
  Sheremetyevskiy No. 203 
  Makarov, Andrey Mikhaylovich, b. 1954, higher 
education, member of the Russia's Choice election association, 
member of the executive committee of the Russia's Choice social 
and political movement, Moscow 
  Yugo-Zapadnyy No. 204 
  Medvedev, Pavel Alekseyevich, b. 1940, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, specialist-expert of the 
Group of Experts of the president of the Russian Federation, 
Moscow 
  Yugo-Vostochnyy No. 205 
  Fedorov, Boris Grigoryevich, b. 1958, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, deputy chairman of the 
Government of the Russian Federation, minister of finance of the 
Russian Federation, Moscow 
<H6>  St. Petersburg </H6>
  Zapadnyy No. 206 
  Savitskiy, Vitaliy Viktorovich, b. 1955, Russian, 
higher education, member of the party Russian Christian 
Democratic Union-New Democracy, scientific associate of the St. 
Petersburg State University, St. Petersburg 
  Severnyy No. 207 
  Kiselev, Mikhail Mikhaylovich, b. 1964, Russian, 
incomplete higher education, no party affiliation, scientific 
associate of the National Model of the Economy Institute, St. 
Petersburg 
  Severo-Vostochnyy No. 208 
  Rybakov, Yuliy Andreyevich, b. 1946, Russian, 
secondary education, member of the Free Democratic Party of 
Russia, member of the St. Petersburg Soviet of People's 
Deputies, chairman of the Human Rights Commission, St. Petersburg 
  Severo-Zapadnyy No. 209 
  Aleksandrov, Aleksey Ivanovich, b. 1952, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Russia's Choice election 
association, member of the St. Petersburg Bar Association, St. 
Petersburg 
  Tsentralnyy No. 210 
  Nevzorov, Aleksandr Glebovich, b. 1958, Russian, 
secondary specialized education, member of the Russian National 
Assembly social and political association, television 
journalist, chief editor of NTK-600, St. Petersburg 
  Yuzhnyy No. 211 
  Yegorov, Aleksandr Kiryanovich, b. 1954, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the St. 
Petersburg Soviet of People's Deputies' Standing Planning and 
Financial-Budget Commission, St. Petersburg 
  Yugo-Vostochnyy No. 212 
  Popov, Sergey Anatolyevich, b. 1960, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, president of the 
Association of Commercial Banks, St. Petersburg 
  Yugo-Zapadnyy No. 213 
  Goryachev, Mark Leonidovich, b. 1954, Russian, 
secondary specialized education, no party affiliation, president 
of the Goryachev Concern, St. Petersburg 
<H6>  Jewish Autonomous Oblast </H6>
  Birobidzhanskiy No. 214 
  Biryukov, Anatoliy Mikhaylovich, b. 1947, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Agrarian Party of Russia, deputy 
chairman of the Agro-Industrial Complex of the Russian 
Federation Workers Union Central Committee, Moscow 
<H6>  Aginskiy Buryatskiy Autonomous Okrug </H6>
  Aginskiy Buryatskiy No. 215 
  Zhamsuyev, Bair Bayaskhalanovich, b. 1959, Buryat, 
higher education, no party affiliation, permanent representative 
of the Aginskiy Buryatskiy Autonomous Okrug at the Government of 
the Russian Federation, Moscow 
<H6>  Komi-Permyatskiy Autonomous Okrug </H6>
  Komi-Permyatskiy No. 216 
  Vlasova, Anna Petrovna, b. 1941, Perm Komi, higher 
education, member of the Women of Russia political movement, 
chairman of the Komi-Permyatskiy Autonomous Okrug Administration 
Committee for the Economy, Kudymkar 
<H6>  Koryakskiy Autonomous Okrug </H6>
  Koryakskiy No. 217 
  Popov, Mikhail Ivanovich, b. 1942, Koryak, higher 
education, no party affiliation, head of the Koryak Laboratory 
of the Ministry of Education of the Russian Federation National 
Problems of Education Institute, community of Palana 
<H6>  Nenetskiy Autonomous Okrug </H6>
  Nenetskiy No. 218 
  Chilingarov, Artur Nikolayevich, b. 1939, 
Armenian, higher education, member of the All-Russia Renewal 
Union party, president of the Polar Explorers' Association, 
Moscow 
<H6>  Taymyrskiy (Dolgano-Nenetskiy) Autonomous Okrug </H6>
  Taymirskiy (Dolgano-Nenetskiy) No. 219 
  Vasilyev, Aleksandr Gennadyevich, b. 1948, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, first deputy 
chief of the administration of the city of Dudinka 
<H6>  Ust-Ordynskiy Buryatskiy Autonomous Okrug </H6>
  Ust-Ordynskiy No. 220 
  Boskholov, Sergey Semenovich, b. 1950, Buryat, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chief consultant-adviser 
of a division of the Constitutional Court of the Russian 
Federation, Moscow 
<H6>  Khanty-Mansiyskiy Autonomous Okrug </H6>
  Nizhnevartovskiy No. 221 
  Medvedev, Vladimir Sergeyevich, b. 1943, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, president of the Union 
of Oil Workers of Russia, Tyumen 
  Khanty-Mansiyskiy No. 222 
  Aypin, Yeremey Danilovich, b. 1948, Khanty, higher 
education, member of the Russia's Choice election association, 
representative of the president of the Russian Federation for 
the Khanty-Mansiyskiy Autonomous Okrug, Khanty-Mansiysk 
<H6>  Chukotskiy Autonomous Okrug </H6>
  Chukotskiy No. 223 
  Nesterenko, Tatyana Gennadyevna, b. 1959, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, deputy chief of the 
administration of the Chukotskiy Autonomous Okrug, chief of the 
Finance Administration, Anadyr 
<H6>  Evenkiyskiy Autonomous Okrug </H6>
  Evenkiyskiy No. 224 
  Gayulskiy, Viktor Ivanovich, b. 1957, Evenk, 
higher education, no party affiliation, director of the Surinda 
Pedigree Deer-Breeding Stock Company, Evenkiyskiy Autonomous 
Okrug 
<H6>  Yamalo-Nenetskiy Autonomous Okrug </H6>
  Yamalo-Nenetskiy No. 225 
  Goman, Vladimir Vladimirovich, b. 1952, Ukrainian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, mayor of the city of 
Nadym and Nadymskiy Rayon, Yamalo-Nenetskiy Autonomous Okrug 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61097 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr001___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-001 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   5 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Listing of Deputies To Federation Council </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944E0333A Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA in Russian 28 Dec 93 pp 
5-6 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0333A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [List of the deputies to the Federation Council of the </F>
Federal Assembly of the Russian Federation elected from two-seat 
electoral districts; numbers as published] 
  [Text] 
<H6>  The Republic of Adygea (Adygea) </H6>
  Adygeyskiy No. 1 
  Aslan Aliyevich Dzharimov, b. 1939, Adygey, higher 
education, no party affiliation, president, chairman of the 
Cabinet of Ministers--the Government of the Republic of Adygea, 
city of Maykop 
  Mikhail Nikolayevich Chernichenko, b. 1944, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, head of the 
administration of the city of Maykop 
<H6>  Republic of Bashkortostan </H6>
  Bashkirskiy No. 2 
  Anatoliy Yakovlevich Kopsov, b. 1942, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the Council 
of Ministers of the Republic of Bashkortostan, city of Ufa 
  Murtyaza Gubaydullovich Rakhimov, b. 1934, 
Bashkir, higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the 
Supreme Soviet of the Republic of Bashkortostan, city of Ufa 
<H6>  Republic of Buryatia </H6>
  Buryatskiy No. 3 
  Lidiya Chimitovna Nimayeva, b. 1948, Buryat, 
higher education, member of the Communist Party of the Russian 
Federation, acting chairman of the Science and Education 
Committee of the Supreme Soviet of the Republic of Buryatia, 
city of Ulan-Ude 
  Leonid Vasilyevich Potapov, b. 1935, Russian, no 
party affiliation, chairman of the Supreme Soviet of the 
Republic of Buryatia, city of Ulan-Ude 
<H6>  Republic of Altay </H6>
  Gorno-Altayskiy No. 4 
  Valeriy Ivanovich Chaptynov, b. 1945, Altayan, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the Supreme 
Soviet of the Republic of Altay, city of Gorno-Altaysk 
  Vladimir Ivanovich Petrov, b. 1942, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the 
Government of the Republic of Altay, city of Gorno-Altaysk 
<H6>  Republic of Dagestan </H6>
  Dagestanskiy No. 5 
  Ramazan Gadzhimuratovich Abdulatipov, b. 1946, 
Avar, higher education, member of the Collective Creativity of 
the People in the Name of Life (the Senega Forum) movement, 
first deputy chairman of the Russian Federation State Committee 
on Federation and Nationality Affairs, city of Moscow 
  Magomedali Magomedovich Magomedov, b. 1930, 
Dargin, higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the 
Supreme Soviet of the Republic of Dagestan, city of Makhachkala 
<H6>  Ingush Republic </H6>
  Ingushskiy No. 6 
  Ruslan Sultanovich Aushev, b. 1954, Ingush, higher 
education, no party affiliation, president of Ingush Republic, 
city of Nazran 
  Issa Magometovich Kostoyev, b. 1942, Ingush, 
higher education, no party affiliation, department chief, Office 
of the Procurator General of the Russian Federation, city of 
Moscow 
<H6>  Kabardino-Balkar Republic </H6>
  Kabardino-Balkarskiy No. 7 
  Valeriy Mukhamedovich Kokov, b. 1941, Kabardin, 
higher education, no party affiliation, president of the 
Kabardino-Balkar Republic, city of Nalchik 
  Georgiy Mashtayevich Cherkesov,, b. 1938, Balkar, 
higher education, no party affiliation, prime minister of 
Kabardino-Balkar Republic, city of Nalchik 
<H6>  Republic of Kalmykia-Khalmg Tangch </H6>
  Kalmytskiy No. 8 
  Aleksandr Vasilyevich Golovatov, b. 1952, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the Republic 
of Kalmykia-Khalmg Tangch State Committee for Administration of 
State Property, city of Elista 
  Kirsan Nikolayevich Ilyumzhinov, b. 1962, Kalmyk, 
higher education, no party affiliation, president of the 
Republic of Kalmykia-Khalmg Tangch, city of Elista 
<H6>  Karachay-Cherkess Republic </H6>
  Karachayevo-Cherkesskiy No. 9 
  Vladimir Pavlovich Strigin, b. 1955, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the 
Zelenchukskiy Rayon People's Court, village Zelechukskaya, 
Karachay-Cherkess Republic 
  Vladimir Islamovich Khubiyev, b. 1932, Karachay, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the Council 
of Ministers of the Karachay-Cherkess Republic, city of Cherkessk 
<H6>  Republic of Karelia </H6>
  Karelskiy No. 10 
  Viktor Nikolayevich Stepanov, b. 1947, Karelian, 
higher education, member of the Union of Communists of Karelia, 
chairman of the Supreme Soviet of the Republic of Karelia, city 
of Petrozavodsk 
  Sergey Petrovich Blinnikov, b. 1945, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the Council 
of Ministers of the Republic of Karelia, city of Petrozavodsk 
<H6>  Republic of Komi </H6>
  Syktyvkarskiy No. 11 
  Yuriy Alekseyevich Spiridonov, b. 1938, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the Supreme 
Soviet of the Republic of Komi, city of Syktyvkar 
  Vyacheslav Ivanovich Khudyayev, b. 1946, Komi, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the Council 
of Ministers of the Republic of Komi, city of Syktyvkar 
<H6>  Republic of Mari El </H6>
  Mariyskiy No. 12 
  Anatoliy Aleksandrovich Zenkin, b. 1939, Mari, 
higher education, no party affiliation, first deputy chairman of 
the Supreme Soviet of the Republic of Mari El, city of 
Yoshkar-Ola 
  Vyacheslav Aleksandrovich Kislitsin, b. 1948, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, head of the 
administration of Medvedevskiy Rayon, Republic of Mari El 
<H6>  Republic of Mordvinia </H6>
  Mordovskiy No. 13 Valeriy Nikolayevich 
Shvetsov, b. 1939, Mordvinian, higher education, no 
party affiliation, chairman of the Council of Ministers--the 
Government of the Republic of Mordvinia, city of Saransk 
  Lyudmila Aleksandrovna Ivanova, b. 1953, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Communist Party of the Russian 
Federation, chief specialist of the Ministry of Labor and 
Employment of the Republic of Mordvinia, city of Saransk 
<H6>  Republic of Sakha (Yakutia) </H6>
  Yakutskiy No. 14 
  Mikhail Yefimovich Nikolayev, b. 1937, Yakut, 
higher education, no party affiliation, president of the 
Republic of Sakha (Yakutia), city of Yakutsk 
  Eduard Yakovlevich Esterley, b. 1935, German, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of the 
administration of the city of Neryungri, Republic of Sakha 
(Yakutia) 
<H6>  Republic of North Ossetia </H6>
  Severo-Osetinskiy No. 15 
  Sergey Valentinovich Khetagurov, b. 1942, 
Ossetian, higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of 
the Council of Ministers of the Republic of North Ossetia, city 
of Vladikavkaz 
  Akhsarbek Khadzhimurayevich Galazov, b. 1929, 
Ossetian, higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of 
the Supreme Soviet of the Republic of North Ossetia, city of 
Vladikavkaz 
<H6>  Republic of Tyva </H6>
  Tuvinskiy No. 17 
  Vladimir Borayevich Kara-Sal, b. 1938, Tuvinian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, minister of internal 
affairs of the Republic of Tyva, city of Kyzyl 
  Sherit-ool Dizizhikovich Oorzhak, b. 1942, 
Tuvinian, higher education, no party affiliation, president of 
the Republic of Tyva, city of Kyzyl 
<H6>  Udmurt Republic </H6>
  Udmurtskiy No. 18 
  Vladimir Nikolayevich Podoprigora, b. 1954, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, chief of staff 
of the Federal Assembly of the Russian Federation, city of Mozhga 
  Aleksandr Aleksandrovich Volkov, b. 1951, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the Council 
of Ministers of the Udmurt Republic, city of Izhevsk 
<H6>  Republic of Khakassia </H6>
  Khakasskiy No. 19 
  Andrey Serafimovich Asochakov, b. 1955, Khakass, 
higher education, no party affiliation, permanent representative 
of the Republic of Khakassia under the president of the Russian 
Federation, city of Moscow 
  Yuriy Stepanovich Shchapov, b. 1935, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, general director of the 
Kompaniya Khakasugol joint-stock company, city of Abakan 
<H6>  Chuvash Republic--Chavash respubliki </H6>
  Chuvashskiy No. 21 
  Valeryan Nikolayevich Viktorov, b. 1951, Chuvash, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the Council 
of Ministers of Chuvash Republic, city of Cheboksary 
  Lev Panteleymonovich Kurakov, b. 1943, Chuvash, 
higher education, no party affiliation, rector of the imeni I.N. 
Ulyanova Chuvash State University, city of Cheboksary 
<H6>  Altay Kray </H6>
  Altayskiy No. 22 
  Aleksandr Aleksandrovich Surikov, b. 1940, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the 
Altay Kray Soviet of People's Deputies, city of Barnaul 
  Yakov Nakhmanovich Shoykhet, b. 1940, Jewish, 
higher education, no party affiliation, deputy chairman of the 
Altay Kray administration committee for the elimination of the 
consequences of the long-term impact of nuclear testing at 
Semipalatinsk test site; deputy rector for science and head of 
the surgery department of the Altay State Medical Institute, 
city of Barnaul 
<H6>  Krasnodar Kray </H6>
  Krasnodarskiy No. 23 
  Nikolay Dmitriyevich Yegorov, b. 1951, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of the 
administration of Krasnodar Kray, city of Krasnodar 
  Nikolay Ignatovich Kondratenko, b. 1940, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, deputy general director 
of Rezerv-Tabak enterprise, city of Krasnodar 
<H6>  Krasnoyarsk Kray </H6>
  Yeniseyskiy No. 24 
  Valeriy Mikhaylovich Zubov, b. 1953, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of the Krasnoyarsk 
Kray administration, city of Krasnoyarsk 
  Petr Vasilyevich Romanov, b. 1943, Russian, higher 
education, no party affiliation, general director of the 
Krasnoyarskiy Kombinat Yenisey production association, city of 
Krasnoyarsk 
<H6>  Maritime Kray </H6>
  Primorskiy No. 25 
  Yevdokiya Aleksandrovna Gayer, b. 1934, Nanay, 
higher education, member of the Russia's Choice electoral 
coalition, deputy chairman of the Russian Federation State 
Committee for Socioeconomic Development of the North, city of 
Moscow 
  Yevgeniy Ivanovich Nazdratenko, b. 1949, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of the Maritime 
Kray administration, city of Vladivostok 
<H6>  Stavropol Kray </H6>
  Stavropolskiy No. 26 
  Yevgeniy Semenovich Kuznetsov, b. 1938, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Russia's Choice electoral 
coalition, head of the Stavropol Kray administration, city of 
Stavropol 
  Aleksey Viktorovich Kulakovskiy, b. 1954, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, president of the Russian 
Federation's representative in Stavropol Kray, city of Stavropol 
<H6>  Khabarovsk Kray </H6>
  Khabarovskiy No. 27 
  Viktor Kirsanovich Bulgakov, b. 1949, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, rector of the Khabarovsk 
State Technical University, city of Khabarovsk 
  Viktor Ivanovich Ishayev, b. 1948, Russian, higher 
education, no party affiliation, head of the Khabarovsk Kray 
administration, city of Khabarovsk 
<H6>  Amur Oblast </H6>
  Amurskiy No. 28 
  Leonid Viktorovich Korotkov, b. 1955, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Communist Party of the Russian 
Federation, department chief of the AMURSKAYA PRAVDA newspaper, 
city of Blagoveshchensk 
  Pavel Semenovich Shtein, b. 1951, Russian, higher 
education, member of the Communist Party of the Russian 
Federation, temporarily unemployed 
<H6>  Arkhangelsk Oblast </H6>
  Arkhangelskiy No. 29 
  Pavel Nikolayevich Balakshin, b. 1936, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of the Arkhangelsk 
Oblast administration, city of Arkhangelsk 
  Yevgeniy Fedorovich Yeroshkin, b. 1950, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the Kotlass 
Silicate Brick Plant limited liability partnership, city of 
Kotlass in Arkhangelsk Oblast 
<H6>  Astrakhan Oblast </H6>
  Astrakhanskiy No. 30 
  Vyacheslav Petrovich Zvolinskiy, b. 1947, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, general director of the 
Nizhnyaya Volga scientific-production association, city of 
Astrakhan 
  Valeriy Mikhaylovich Adrov, b. 1937, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, president of the Russian 
Federation representative in Astrakhan Oblast, city of Astrakhan 
<H6>  Belgorod Oblast </H6>
  Belgorodskiy No. 31 
  Mikhail Ivanovich Beskhmelnikov, b. 1956, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the Belgorod 
Oblast Soviet of People's Deputies, city of Belgorod 
  Aleksey Filippovich Ponomarev, b. 1930, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, deputy rector of the 
Belgorod Agricultural Institute, city of Belgorod 
<H6>  Bryansk Oblast </H6>
  Bryanskiy No. 32 
  Yuriy Yevgenyevich Lodkin, b. 1938, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Communist Party of the Russian 
Federation, temporarily unemployed 
  Petr Petrovich Shirshov, b. 1945, Russian, higher 
education, no party affiliation, military serviceman, city of 
Bryansk 
<H6>  Vladimir Oblast </H6>
  Vladimirskiy No. 33 
  Nikolay Sergeyevich Yegorov, b. 1941, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, president of the Russian 
Federation representative in Vladimir Oblast, city of Vladimir 
  Yuriy Vasilyevich Vlasov, b. 1961, Russian, higher 
education, no party affiliation, head of the Vladimir Oblast 
administration, city of Vladimir 
<H6>  Volgograd Oblast </H6>
  Volgogradskiy No. 34 
  Yuriy Viktorovich Chekhov, b. 1947, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of the city of 
Volgograd administration 
  Ivan Petrovich Shabunin, b. 1935, Russian, higher 
education, no party affiliation, head of the Volgograd Oblast 
administration, city of Volgograd 
<H6>  Vologda Oblast </H6>
  Vologodskiy No. 35 
  Nikolay Mikhaylovich Podgornov, b. 1949, Russian, 
incomplete higher education, no party affiliation, head of the 
Vologda Oblast administration, city of Vologda 
  Vyacheslav Yevgenyevich Pozgalev, b. 1946, 
Russian, higher education, member of the Russia's Choice 
electoral coalition, mayor of the city of Cherepovets in Vologda 
Oblast 
<H6>  Voronezh Oblast </H6>
  Voronezhskiy No. 36 
  Aleksandr Yakovlevich Kovalev, b. 1942, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of the Voronezh 
Oblast administration, city of Voronezh 
  Aleksandr Vasilyevich Vorobyev, b. 1942, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chief of the audit 
administration of the Voronezh Oblast administration, city of 
Voronezh 
<H6>  Ivanovo Oblast </H6>
  Ivanovskiy No. 37 
  Vladislav Nikolayevich Tikhomirov, b. 1939, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the 
Ivanovo Oblast Soviet of People's Deputies, city of Ivanovo 
  Igor Yevgenyevich Gladkov, b. 1954, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, deputy general director 
of Ivanovoiskozh joint-stock company, city of Ivanovo 
<H6>  Irkutsk Oblast </H6>
  Irkutskiy No. 38 
  Yuriy Abramovich Nozhikov, b. 1934, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of the Irkutsk 
Oblast administration, city of Irkutsk 
  Pavel Aleksandrovich Golyshev, b. 1952, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, president of the 
Agrodorspetsstroy company, city of Irkutsk 
<H6>  Kaliningrad Oblast </H6>
  Kaliningradskiy No. 39 
  Yuriy Semenovich Matochkin, b. 1931, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of the Kaliningrad 
Oblast administration, city of Kaliningrad 
  Vladimir Filippovich Shumeyko, b. 1945, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, first deputy chairman of 
the chairman of the Council of Ministers--the Government of the 
Russian Federation, city of Moscow 
<H6>  Kaluga Oblast </H6>
  Kaluzhskiy No. 40 
  Aleksey Petrovich Demichev, b. 1943, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, general director of the 
Yerdenevskoye joint-stock company, Kaluga Oblast 
  Valeriy Vasilyevich Sudarenkov, b. 1940, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the Kaluga 
Oblast Soviet of People's Deputies 
<H6>  Kamchatka Oblast </H6>
  Kamchatskiy No. 41 
  Petr Grigoryevich Premyan, b. 1945, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the 
Kamchatka Oblast Soviet of People's Deputies, city of 
Petropavlovsk-Kamchatskiy 
  Lyudmila Alekseyevna Grigoryeva, b. 1940, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, deputy chief of the 
Kamchatka Oblast main administration of the Central Bank of the 
Russian Federation, city of Petropavlovsk-Kamchatskiy 
<H6>  Kemerovo Oblast </H6>
  Kemerovskiy No. 42 
  Aman-geldy Moldagazyyevich Tuleyev, b. 1944, 
Kazakh, higher education, no party affiliation, temporarily 
unemployed 
  Aleksandr Valentinovich Aslanidi, b. 1947, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, executive 
director of Nasha Gazeta limited liability partnership, NASHA 
GAZETA deputy editor in chief, city of Osinniki in Kemerovo 
Oblast 
<H6>  Kirov Oblast </H6>
  Kirovskiy No. 43 
  Vladimir Nikolayevich Sergeyenkov, b. 1938, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, rector of the 
Socioeconomic Problems Institute, city of Kirov 
  Vasiliy Alekseyevich Desyatnikov, b. 1942, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, head of the 
Kirov Oblast administration, city of Kirov 
<H6>  Kostroma Oblast </H6>
  Kostromskoy No. 44 
  Valeriy Petrovich Arbuzov, b. 1939, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of the Kostroma 
Oblast administration, city of Kostroma 
  Boris Konstantinovich Korobov, b. 1946, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of the city of 
Kostroma administration 
<H6>  Kurgan Oblast </H6>
  Kurganskiy No. 45 
  Valeriy Ivanovich Ovsyannikov, b. 1938, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, director of Baturinskoye 
experimental-production enterprise, Kurgan Oblast 
  Oleg Aleksandrovich Bogomolov, b. 1950, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the Kurgan 
Oblast Soviet of People's Deputies, city of Kurgan 
<H6>  Kursk Oblast </H6>
  Kurskiy No. 46 
  Vladimir Nikolayevich Likhachev, b. 1946, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the Kursk 
Oblast Soviet of People's Deputies, city of Kursk 
  Vasiliy Ivanovich Shuteyev, b. 1942, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of the Kursk Oblast 
administration, city of Kursk 
<H6>  Leningrad Oblast </H6>
  Leningradskiy No. 47 
  Aleksandr Semenovich Belyakov, b. 1945, Karelian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of the Leningrad 
Oblast administration, city of St. Petersburg 
  Vadim Anatolyevich Gustov, b. 1948, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the 
Leningrad Oblast Soviet of People's Deputies, city of St. 
Petersburg 
<H6>  Lipetsk Oblast </H6>
  Lipetskiy No. 48 
  Mikhail Tikhonovich Narolin, b. 1933, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of the Lipetsk 
Oblast administration, city of Lipetsk 
  Oleg Petrovich Korolev, b. 1952, Russian, higher 
education, no party affiliation, chairman of the chairman of the 
Lipetsk Oblast Soviet of People's Deputies, city of Lipetsk 
<H6>  Magadan Oblast </H6>
  Magadanskiy No. 49 
  Mikhail Aleksandrovich Shlyapin, b. 1944, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chief of the 
Magadanagropromstroy cooperative-state design-industrial 
construction-production association, city of Magadan 
  Valentin Ivanovich Tsvetkov, b. 1948, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, general director of the 
Magadannerud joint-stock company, city of Magadan 
<H6>  Moscow Oblast </H6>
  Moskovskiy Oblastnoy No. 50 
  Anatoliy Stepanovich Tyazhlov, b. 1942, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of the Moscow 
Oblast administration, city of Moscow 
  Anatoliy Vasilyevich Dolgolaptev, b. 1949, 
Russian, higher education, cochairman of the All-Russia 
"Renewal" Union party, first deputy head of the Moscow Oblast 
administration, city of Moscow 
<H6>  Murmansk Oblast </H6>
  Murmanskiy No. 51 
  Lyudmila Vasilyevna Pobedinskaya, b. 1949, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, administrator 
of affairs of the Murmansk Oblast administration, city of Kola 
in Murmansk Oblast 
  Sergey Viktorovich Iyevlev, b. 1965, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, president of the 
Arktikservis company, city of Murmansk 
<H6>  Nizhniy Novgorod Oblast </H6>
  Nizhegorodskiy No. 52 
  Yevgeniy Vladimirovich Krestyaninov, b. 1948, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the 
Nizhniy Novgorod Oblast Soviet of People's Deputies, city of 
Nizhniy Novgorod 
  Boris Efimovich Nemtsov, b. 1959, Russian, higher 
education, no party affiliation, governor of Nizhniy Novgorod 
Oblast, city of Nizhniy Novgorod 
<H6>  Novgorod Oblast </H6>
  Novgorodskiy No. 53 
  Mikhail Mikhaylovich Prusak, b. 1960, Ukrainian, 
higher education, member of the Party of Russian Unity and 
Accord electoral coalition, head of the Novgorod Oblast 
administration, city of Novgorod 
  Aleksandr Sergeyevich Tsvetkov, b. 1938, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, general director of the 
Kvant production association, city of Novgorod 
<H6>  Novosibirsk Oblast </H6>
  Novosibirskiy No. 54 
  Aleksey Petrovich Manannikov, b. 1956, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Russia's Choice electoral 
coalition, member of the Democratic Russia movement, temporarily 
unemployed 
  Ivan Ivanovich Indinok, b. 1938, Russian, higher 
education, no party affiliation, acting head of the Novosibirsk 
Oblast administration, city of Novosibirsk 
<H6>  Omsk Oblast </H6>
  Omskiy No. 55 
  Leonid Konstantinovich Polezhayev, b. 1940, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, head of the 
Omsk Oblast administration, city of Omsk 
  Oleg Nikolayevich Smolin, b. 1952, Russian, higher 
education, chairman of the board of the Labor Party, associate 
professor at a department of the imeni A.M. Gorkogo Omsk State 
Pedagogical Institute, city of Omsk 
<H6>  Orenburg Oblast </H6>
  Orenburgskiy No. 56 
  Vladimir Vasilyevich Yelagin, b. 1955, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of the Orenburg 
Oblast administration, city of Orenburg 
  Pavel Ivanovich Gurkalov, b. 1939, Russian, higher 
education, no party affiliation, general director of the Nosta 
joint-stock company, city of Novotroitsk in Orenburg Oblast 
<H6>  Orel Oblast </H6>
  Orlovskiy No. 57 
  Aleksandr Leonidovich Yepimakhov, b. 1961, 
Russian, higher education, member of the Communist Party of the 
Russian Federation, instructor at the Mtsensk Metallurgical 
Technical School, city of Mtsensk in Orel Oblast 
  Yegor Semenovich Stroyev, b. 1937, Russian, higher 
education, no party affiliation, head of the Orel Oblast 
administration, city of Orel 
<H6>  Penza Oblast </H6>
  Penzenskiy No. 58 
  Aleksandr Serafimovich Kalashnikov, b. 1949, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, head of the 
city of Penza administration 
  Anatoliy Fedorovich Kovlyagin, b. 1938, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of the Penza Oblast 
administration, city of Penza 
<H6>  Perm Oblast </H6>
  Permskiy No. 59 
  Sergey Vladimirovich Levitan, b. 1963, Ukrainian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, president of the 
Nostromo concern, city of Perm 
  Vitaliy Afanasyevich Zelenkin, b. 1944, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, director of the regional 
branch of the International Foundation for Facilitating 
Privatization and Foreign Investment, city of Perm 
<H6>  Pskov Oblast </H6>
  Pskovskiy No. 60 
  Vladimir Romanovich Sidorenko, b. 1948, Ukrainian, 
higher education, member of the Agrarian Party of Russia, 
president of the Cherskaya agrarian firm, Pankinskiy Rayon in 
Pskov Oblast 
  Vladislav Nikolayevich Tumanov, b. 1958, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of the Pskov Oblast 
administration, city of Pskov 
<H6>  Rostov Oblast </H6>
  Rostovskiy No. 61 
  Leonid Andreyevich Ivanchenko, b. 1942, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Communist Party of the Russian 
Federation, general director of the Svetlana joint-stock 
company, city of Rostov-na-Donu 
  Vladimir Fedorovich Chub, b. 1948, Russian, higher 
education, no party affiliation, head of the Rostov Oblast 
administration, city of Rostov-na-Donu 
<H6>  Ryazan Oblast </H6>
  Ryazanskiy No. 62 
  Vyacheslav Nikolayevich Lyubimov, b. 1947, 
Russian, higher education, member of the Communist Party of the 
Russian Federation, temporarily unemployed 
  Yevgeniy Alekseyevich Stroyev, b. 1942, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, rector of the imeni 
Akademika I.P. Pavlova Ryazan Medical Institute, city of Ryazan 
<H6>  Samara Oblast </H6>
  Samarskiy No. 63 
  Vasiliy Georgiyevich Tarasenko, b. 1950, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of legal services 
office, city of Samara 
  Konstantin Alekseyevich Titov, b. 1944, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Russian Movement for Democratic 
Reforms, head of the Samara Oblast administration, city of Samara 
<H6>  Saratov Oblast </H6>
  Saratovskiy No. 64 
  Dmitriy Fedorovich Ayatskov, b. 1950, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, first deputy head of the 
Saratov Oblast administration 
  Yuriy Vasilyevich Belykh, b. 1941, Russian, higher 
education, no party affiliation, head of the Saratov Oblast 
administration 
<H6>  Sakhalin Oblast </H6>
  Sakhalinskiy No. 65 
  Mikhail Aleksandrovich Romanovskiy, b. 1947, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, general 
director of Sakhalin Maritime Steaming limited liability 
joint-stock company, city of Kholmsk in Sakhalin Oblast 
  Yevgeniy Aleksandrovich Krasnoyarov, b. 1939, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, head of the 
Sakhalin Oblast administration, city of Yuzhno-Sakhalinsk 
<H6>  Sverdlovsk Oblast </H6>
  Sverdlovskiy No. 66 
  Galina Nikolayevna Karelova, b. 1950, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, deputy chairman of the 
Sverdlovsk Oblast Soviet of People's Deputies, city of 
Yekaterinburg 
  Eduard Ergartovich Rossel, b. 1937, German, higher 
education, no party affiliation, president of Association for 
Economic Interaction of the Urals Region Republics and Oblasts, 
city of Yekaterinburg 
<H6>  Smolensk Oblast </H6>
  Smolenskiy No. 67 
  Anatoliy Yegorovich Glushenkov, b. 1942, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of the Smolensk 
Oblast administration, city of Smolensk 
  Valeriy Petrovich Fateyev, b. 1946, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Russia's Choice electoral 
coalition, deputy minister of the economy of the Russian 
Federation, city of Moscow 
<H6>  Tambov Oblast </H6>
  Tambovskiy No. 68 
  Nikolay Ivanovich Ryabov, b. 1936. Russian, higher 
education, no party affiliation, chairman of the Tambov Oblast 
Soviet of People's Deputies, city of Tambov 
  Pavel Ivanovich Gorbunov, b. 1946, Russian, higher 
education, member of the Communist Party of the Russian 
Federation, general director of the Housing Initiative--Tambov 
company, city of Tambov 
<H6>  Tver Oblast </H6>
  Tverskoy No. 69 
  Valeriy Nikolayevich Rastorguyev, b. 1949, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, head of the 
philosophy department of the Tver State University, city of Tver 
  Vladimir Antonovich Suslov, b. 1939, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of the Tver Oblast 
administration, city of Tver 
<H6>  Tomsk Oblast </H6>
  Tomskiy No. 70 
  Viktor Melkhiorovich Kress, b. 1948, German, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of the Tomsk Oblast 
administration, city of Tomsk 
  Leonid Ivanovich Filimonov, b. 1935, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, general director of the 
Tomskneft publicly held joint-stock company, city of Tomsk 
<H6>  Tula Oblast </H6>
  Tulskiy No. 71 
  Vasiliy Aleksandrovich Starodubtsev, b. 1931, 
Russian, higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of 
imeni V.I. Lenina kolkhoz and stock-breeding farm, Tula Oblast 
  Aleksandr Alekseyevich Titkin, b. 1948, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, president of the Russian 
Technologies and Investments finance and investment company, 
city of Moscow 
<H6>  Tyumen Oblast </H6>
  Tyumenskiy No. 72 
  Leonid Yulianovich Ronetskiy, b. 1942, Ukrainian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of the Tyumen 
Oblast administration, city of Tyumen 
  Yevgeniy Aleksandrovich Pavlov, b. 1947, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of the press center 
of the Tyumen Oblast Soviet of People's Deputies, city of Tyumen 
<H6>  Ulyanovsk Oblast </H6>
  Ulyanovskiy No. 73 
  Sergey Nikolayevich Yermakov, b. 1937, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, mayor of the city of 
Ulyanovsk 
  Yuriy Frolovich Goryachev, b. 1938, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of the Ulyanovsk 
Oblast administration, city of Ulyanovsk 
<H6>  Chita Oblast </H6>
  Chitinskiy No. 75 
  Aleksandr Ivanovich Dovgyallo, b. 1938, 
Belarusian, higher education, no party affiliation, chief of the 
Transbaykal Railroad, city of Chita 
  Viktor Vasilyevich Kurochkin, b. 1954, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Chita branch of the Democratic 
Russia movement, editor in chief of NARODNAYA GAZETA, city of 
Chita 
<H6>  Yaroslavl Oblast </H6>
  Yaroslavskiy No. 76 
  Anatoliy Ivanovich Lisitsin, b. 1947, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of the Yaroslavl 
Oblast administration, city of Yaroslavl 
  Yelena Borisovna Mizulina, b. 1954, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, professor at the 
criminal law and process department of the Yaroslavl State 
University, city of Yaroslavl 
<H6>  City of Moscow </H6>
  Moskovskiy Gorodskoy No. 77 
  Yuriy Dmitriyevich Chernichenko, b. 1929, Russian, 
higher education, chairman of the Peasant Party of Russia, 
writer, city of Moscow 
  Nikolay Nikolayevich Gonchar, b. 1946, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, temporarily unemployed 
<H6>  City of St. Petersburg </H6>
  Sankt-Peterburgskiy No. 78 
  Yuriy Yuryevich Boldyrev, b. 1960, Russian, higher 
education, no party affiliation, senior research associate of 
the EPIcenter center for economic and political research, city 
of Moscow 
  Aleksandr Nikolayevich Belyayev, b. 1953, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chairman of the St. 
Petersburg City Soviet of People's Deputies, city of St. 
Petersburg 
<H6>  Yevreyskaya Autonomous Oblast </H6>
  Birobidzhanskiy No. 79 
  Gennadiy Alekseyevich Antonov, b. 1949, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Socialist Party of Workers, 
deputy chairman of the oblast soviet of people's deputies of the 
Yevreyskaya Autonomous Oblast, city of Birobijan 
  Nikolay Mikhaylovich Volkov, b. 1951, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of the Yevreyskaya 
Autonomous Oblast administration, city of Birobijan 
<H6>  Aginsk Buryat Autonomous Okrug </H6>
  Aginskiy Buryatskiy No. 80 
  Bolot Vandanovich Ayushiyev, b. 1949, Buryat, 
higher education, no party affiliation, temporarily unemployed 
  Namdak Zhambalov, b. 1950, Buryat, higher 
education, no party affiliation, chief physician of the Mogoytuy 
Territorial Medical Association, the Mogoytuy settlement in the 
Aginsk Buryat Autonomous Okrug 
<H6>  Komi-Permyak Autonomous Okrug </H6>
  Komi-Permyatskiy No. 81 
  Anatoliy Mikhaylovich Fedoseyev, b. 1947, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Party of Constitutional 
Democrats (People's Freedom party), member of the Perm Oblast 
bar, attorney at the Kudymkar legal services office, city of 
Kudymkar, the Komi-Permyak Autonomous Okrug 
  Mikhail Yuryevich Vodyanov, b. 1957, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chief physician of the 
okrug drug addiction treatment facility, city of Kudymkar, 
Komi-Permyak Autonomous Okrug 
<H6>  Koryak Autonomous Okrug </H6>
  Koryakskiy No. 82 
  Sergey Gennadyevich Leushkin, b. 1950, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of the Koryak 
Autonomous Okrug administration, settlement Palana in Koryak 
Autonomous Okrug 
  Grigoriy Mikhaylovich Oynvid, b. 1960, Koryak, 
higher education, no party affiliation, president of the Russian 
Federation representative in the Koryak Autonomous Okrug, the 
Palana settlement in the Koryak Autonomous Okrug 
<H6>  Nenets Autonomous Okrug </H6>
  Nenetskiy No. 83 
  Yuriy Vladimirovich Komarovskiy, b. 1952, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of the Nenets 
Autonomous Okrug administration, city of Naryan-Mar 
  Leonid Ivanovich Sablin, b. 1949, Russian, higher 
education, member of the Communist Party of the Russian 
Federation, chief of the Nenets regional branch of the Russian 
Federation State Committee for the Socioeconomic Development of 
the North, city of Naryan-Mar 
<H6>  Taymyr (Dolgan-Nenets) Autonomous Okrug </H6>
  Taymyrskiy (Dolgano-Nenetskiy) No. 84 
  Anatoliy Vasilyevich Filatov, b. 1935, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, general director of the 
Norilsk metallurgical combine, city of Norilsk in Taymyr 
(Dolgan-Nenets) Autonomous Okrug 
  Gennadiy Pavlovich Nedelin, b. 1938, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of the 
administration of the Taymyr (Dolgan-Nenets) Autonomous Okrug, 
city of Dudinka 
<H6>  Ust-Ordyn Buryat Autonomous Okrug </H6>
  Ust-Ordynskiy No. 85 
  Aleksey Nikolayevich Batagayev, b. 1950, Buryat, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of the 
administration of the Ust-Ordyn Buryat Autonomous Okrug, the 
Ust-Ordynskiy settlement in the Ust-Ordyn Buryat Autonomous Okrug 
  Viktor Nikolayevich Khlystun, b. 1946, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, minister of agriculture 
of the Russian Federation, city of Moscow 
<H6>  Khanty-Mansi Autonomous Okrug </H6>
  Khanty-Mansiyskiy No. 86 
  Aleksandr Vasilyevich Filipenko, b. 1950, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of the 
administration of the Khanty-Mansi Autonomous Okrug, city of 
Khanty-Mansiysk 
  Yuriy Konstantinovich Shafranik, b. 1952, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, minister of fuel and 
power generation of the Russian Federation, city of Moscow 
<H6>  Chukotka Autonomous Okrug </H6>
  Chukotskiy No. 87 
  Maya Ivanovna Ettyryntyna, b. 1940, Chukchi, 
higher education, no party affiliation, temporarily unemployed 
  Lyudmila Stepanovna Kotesova, b. 1947, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Russia's Choice electoral 
coalition, chief of the legal department of the Chukotka 
Autonomous Okrug administration, city of Anadyr 
<H6>  Evenk Autonomous Okrug </H6>
  Evenkiyskiy No. 88 
  Vladimir Konstantinovich Sturov, b. 1948, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, head of the Baykitskiy 
Rayon administration, the Baykit settlement in the Evenk 
Autonomous Okrug 
  Aleksandr Viktorovich Uss, b. 1954, Russian, 
higher education, no party affiliation, chief of the legal 
department of the Krasnoyarsk Kray administration, city of 
Krasnoyarsk 
<H6>  Yamalo-Nenets Autonomous Okrug </H6>
  Yamalo-Nenetskiy No. 89 
  Sergey Yevgenyevich Korepanov, b. 1948, Russian, 
higher education, member of the Communist Party of the Russian 
Federation, director of the all-Russia joint-stock company 
Gazprom's representation, city of Salekhard, Yamalo-Nenets 
Autonomous Okrug 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61098 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr001___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-001 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   5 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Edict on Karelia, Arctic Zone </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944F0236A Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA in Russian 23 Dec 93 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0236A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> ["Edict of the Russian Federation President: On Categorizing </F>
Certain Territories of the Republic of Karelia With Regions of 
the Far North and Equivalent Localities"] 
  [Text] Proceeding from the particularities of natural, 
climatic, socioeconomic, and other conditions of the Republic of 
Karelia, and in accordance with Points 2 and 3 of Edict No. 1598 
of the Russian Federation President, dated 7 October 1993, "On 
Legal Regulation During the Period of Phased Constitutional 
Reform in the Russian Federation," I decree: 
  1. To categorize with regions of the Far North the 
territories of Belomorskiy, Kalevalskiy, Kemskiy, and Loukhskiy 
Rayons of the Republic of Karelia. 
  2. To categorize with localities equivalent to regions of 
the 
Far North the territories of Kondopozhskiy, Lakhdenpokhskiy, 
Medvezhyegorskiy, Muyezerskiy, Olonetskiy, Pitkyarantskiy, 
Prionezhskiy, Pryazhinskiy, Pudozhskiy, Segezhskiy, and 
Suoyarvskiy Rayons, and the cities of Kostomuksha, Petrozavodsk, 
and Sortavala of the Republic of Karelia. 
  3. That the Council of Ministers-Government of the Russian 
Federation will, within one month: 
  bring resolutions of the Council of Ministers-Government of 
the Russian Federation into conformance with this edict; 
  ensure that ministries, state committees, and departments of 
the Russian Federation review their legal enactments and repeal 
those that contradict this edict. 
  4. To present this edict for examination by the Federal 
Assembly of the Russian Federation. 
  5. This edict enters into force as of the instant of its 
signing. 
  [Signed] President of the Russian Federation B. YELTSIN 
  Moscow, the Kremlin 
  20 December 1993 
  No. 2226 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61099 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr001___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-001 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   5 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Decree on Military Procuracy Service </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944F0236B Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA in Russian 23 Dec 93 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0236B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> ["Decree No. 1302 of the Council of Ministers-Government of </F>
the Russian Federation, dated 17 December 1993: On the Provision 
of Resources to Organs of the Military Procuracy"] 
  [Text] With the aim of ensuring necessary conditions for 
the activity of organs of the military procuracy, and in 
execution of Edict No. 1685 of the Russian Federation president, 
dated 20 October 1993, "On the Activity of the Procuracy During 
the Period of Phased Constitutional Reform in the Russian 
Federation," the Council of Ministers-Government of the Russian 
Federation decrees: 
  1. To preserve over the course of 1994 the existing 
procedure 
for financing, supplying, and providing material-technical and 
other support to the organs of the military procuracy. 
  2. That the Russian Federation Ministry of Finance will 
stipulate allocations to the Russian Federation Ministry of 
Defense which are necessary to accomplish the aforementioned aim. 
  [Signed] Chairman of the Council of Ministers-Government of 
the Russian Federation V. CHERNOMYRDIN 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61100 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Commodity Producers Discuss Plight of Russian Industry </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944E0339A Moscow RABOCHAYA TRIBUNA in Russian 29 Dec 93 pp 
1-2 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0339A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow RABOCHAYA TRIBUNA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Vitaliy Pyrkh, RABOCHAYA TRIBUNA staff </F>
correspondent in Krasnoyarsk: "On the Very Brink"] 
  [Text] On the very brink--this is where the economy 
of Russia has ended up in the year now ending. However, the 
second congress of commodity producers of the country, which was 
held in Krasnoyarsk, did more than just confirm it. Read the 
article on page 2. 
  It appeared that it would be difficult for delegates to the 
congress to avoid the temptation of getting embroiled in 
political battles there. The situation in the country has become 
too complicated, too "hot." However, the following appeal came 
in the very first words spoken by Yu. Skokov, chairman of the 
organizational committee for conducting the congress, which was 
attended by representatives from 41 regions of Russia and eight 
federation-wide delegations: Enough of finding out who is "Red" 
in the audience and in the country, and who is not quite "Red," 
and of finding out what should be demanded first of all from the 
powers that be. Russia has come to the point beyond which there 
may only lie a national catastrophe. The domestic production of 
commodities is the last stronghold, the last bastion of the 
state. 
  Before the congress, documents were handed out to the 
delegates, of which one deserves the closest attention. It is 
"The State of the Economy of Russia (Analysis and Projection)" 
prepared by the analysts of the Federation of Public 
Associations of Commodity Producers of the country. It differed 
greatly from government assessments which have been voiced 
recently. For example, the decline in production in the year now 
ending has exceeded the planned level by more than a factor of 
two, and has been only slightly smaller than that of last year. 
Investment in the production assets, which had been weakened to 
begin with, continued to decline. Millions of people live below 
the poverty line. Specialist-analysts estimate that this year 
alone, $12 billion-$15 billion have been taken out of the 
country both legally and illegally. A paradoxical situation 
occurs: on the one hand, the stabilization of exports has been 
registered, with imports falling by a factor of two; the 
positive balance of foreign trade may reach $23 billion. On the 
other hand, the foreign debt of Russia continues to grow: Russia 
is not in a position to discharge even the reduced debt payments 
(reduced by agreement with Western creditors). 
  Yu. Skokov built on this analysis in his report at the 
congress: "Against the background of steady cutbacks in 
production in virtually all sectors, zones have emerged in which 
the slump has become particularly threatening. For example, the 
reduction comes to about 50 percent in electrical engineering, 
instrument making, machine-tool production, and light industry. 
It is not reforms in the economy that are under way, but rather 
the destruction of national commodity production. However, the 
state and society must understand that by destroying the 
domestic commodity producer, they are destroying themselves." 
  Similar assessments, even more sharply worded than Skokov's, 
were voiced in presentations "from the field" made by the 
largest industrialists of the country: managers of the 
standard-bearing enterprises of the domestic machine building, 
metallurgy, and the mining industry.... 
  "I have rubbed shoulders with all reformers in Russia, up to 
the president of the country. I queried everywhere: Are we 
moving on the course that we want? However, all I heard in 
response was: There is no alternative to the program of reforms 
being implemented. To what program, who has seen it? Chubays 
came to us in Omsk, and also said: Is this not 
stabilization--credit is not being taken out at banks, there are 
no lines in stores, the exchange rate of the dollar is not 
changing.... However, the best stabilization is when everything 
is at the zero mark--both consumption and production. This only 
happens at a cemetery." (This is from a presentation by a 
representative of the Omsk delegation). 
  This is an excerpt from another presentation, that by a 
representative of commodity producers from Yekaterinburg, the 
native city of the Russian president: "We are being deliberately 
and very expertly destroyed. I recently met Gaydar in 
Cheboksary. He was surprised: How come, are you still in 
operation? I thought that you had shut down already.... They, 
the present-day reformers, indeed miscalculated: they did not 
take into account the survivability of the director community, 
its ability to resist the deindustrialization of the country. 
Could it be that the time has really come for us to `help' the 
government? For example, if the volume of production at an 
enterprise falls 50 percent, half the people are thrown out into 
the street. Let them appeal to the reformers then rather than to 
us, and complain about a drop in the standard of living and 
delays in the payment of wages...." 
  A. Volskiy, president of the Russian Union of Industrialists 
and Entrepreneurs, stressed in his presentation to the congress 
in particular: "The fact of fragmentation of the industrialists 
of the country, their splintering based on narrow corporate 
interests, deserves to be condemned. Here is Gaydar creating his 
association of private business which, for example, such 
domestic giants as the Uralmash also joined. Why? Who would not 
sell out for easy credit, for weighty sops from the boss? There 
is the notorious Shumeyko, organizing his so-called 
confederation of entrepreneurs of Russia, which nobody in the 
Russian `backwaters' has got the foggiest notion about. 
Apparently, it was also organized so that the branch of this 
confederation in the United States could be headed by people who 
are not strangers to Shumeyko--his daughter and son-in-law. 
Gentlemen reformers, are you not something else? Meanwhile, here 
we are wondering and wracking our brains over this issue: How 
come the confused Russian people voted for Zhirinovskiy? As 
always, we are looking for `scapegoats'--the press, television, 
the absence of funds.... Who were the people to vote for? One 
may have his hopes dashed, one may engage in wishful thinking, 
finally, one may believe in yet another vain dream. Nobody has 
ever succeeded in deceiving 100 million people all at 
once--ever!" 
  I sat in the overcrowded auditorium of the Palace of Culture 
of the metallurgical plant, in which the congress was held, and 
could not help thinking: Who needed this--the destruction and 
the virtual bringing to its knees of the domestic economy? Just 
the way it was seven and a half decades ago. At that time, 
Russia was also getting on its feet and growing stronger every 
year--there were Putilov's enterprises, Morozov's textile mills, 
and Tereshchenko's plants.... The Russian people have built all 
kinds of things, having received the desired sip of freedom! Was 
this not the foundation upon which it was possible to move ahead 
quickly, turning the country into a truly prosperous region? 
  I would be less than truthful if I maintained that the 
entire 
two days of the proceedings of the congress in Krasnoyarsk were 
devoted solely to the assessment and analysis of the situation 
that has emerged in domestic commodity production. A proposal 
was made in virtually each presentation at the congress: What 
should be done in order to save the economy from ultimate 
destruction, in order to save Russia? 
  Speaking at the congress, Arkadiy Volskiy responded to a 
question with another question: "What did Roosevelt begin with 
when he came to power? He immediately closed down all banks that 
existed in the country. Only one-third of them were reopened as 
long as two weeks later after auditing. Incidentally, they 
operate in the United States to this day." 
  In Volskiy's opinion, the industrialists of the country need 
their own political organization; the last election proved this. 
Russia should be led by people who have a vested interest in its 
prosperity. 
  However, there were other "points of view": For example, in 
the opinion of A. Stepanov, chief of the Teplovodokanal 
administration of the Vorkutaugol production association, the 
creation of such a party is an issue for the remote future. 
Right now they should immediately embark on utilizing the 
potential of deputies elected to the State Duma. To be sure, 
this will not be easy to do. 
  There were other opinions, which on certain points even 
mutually refuted one another. However, the delegates were 
unanimous on one point: a force capable of uniting all who are 
interested in the genuine rather than illusory rebirth of the 
Motherland should finally appear in Russia. The Federation of 
Public Associations of Commodity Producers of Russia, which was 
finally legally constituted in Krasnoyarsk, should become such a 
force. Yu. Skokov was elected its first chairman. Commodity 
producers have gotten the long-awaited opportunity, just as in 
all states of the world, not just to assess the processes under 
way in the country, but to influence the development of an 
economic policy and the determination of strategy and tactics of 
domestic commodity production. This will be facilitated by the 
revised statute of the federation and the Declaration of Rights 
of Russia's Commodity Producers, adopted at the congress, as 
well as the mood in which the delegates went home. A telegram 
addressed to the president and prime minister of the country, in 
which the delegates demanded the suspension of the effect of the 
Edict on the Taxation of Legal Entities on 1 January, became the 
first "harbinger" of collective actions. Otherwise, it will only 
be possible to refer to industrial production in Russia in the 
past tense. 
  After the congress, I asked the first chairman of the 
federation: Is he satisfied with membership in the federation 
being for now structured on an utterly voluntary basis? If one 
wants to, one belongs to the federation, and if not, there is no 
helping it.... For example, in Japan or Germany nobody will 
engage in business unless he joins the league of entrepreneurs. 
The law would not let them.... 
  Yuriy Vladimirovich responded: "We are already moving in 
this 
direction. We have invited the Chamber of Commerce and Industry 
of the Russian Federation to become one of the founders. In the 
already mentioned Germany, it is precisely a similar chamber 
that issues entrepreneur licenses. If we fail to revive the 
production of goods in the immediate future, nobody from abroad 
will help us. Who needs us over there? In our country people 
became rich not at all because they benefited Russia somehow, 
but rather as a result of redistributing the national, people's 
wealth in their favor. This is a typical Bolshevik technique: To 
take everything away and....appropriate it right away. Of 
course, it is easier to steal than to do something yourself. 
However, can something significant be created if you keep 
stealing from someone else shamelessly all the time?" 
  I agreed--of course, it cannot. And I thought that Russia 
did 
not get just the Federation of Public Associations of Commodity 
Producers during the two days of the congress in Krasnoyarsk, 
but possibly also a new national leader. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61101 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Zaveryukha Interviewed on Agriculture Problems, Reform 
Prospects </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0444A Moscow EKONOMIKA I ZHIZN in Russian No 49, Dec 93 
p 24 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0444A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow EKONOMIKA I ZHIZN </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with A. Kh. Zaveryukha, deputy chairman of the </F>
Government of the Russian Federation, by EKONOMIKA I ZHIZN 
correspondent N. Dudorov; place and date not given: "The 
Agrarian Reform in Russia"] 
  [Text] Our agriculture has never been in such a 
dismal state. Why is the acreage sown and the livestock herd 
being reduced, and the productivity of fields and farms going 
down? How did it happen that plant-growing and especially animal 
husbandry have become unprofitable for our countryside? What is 
the explanation as to why not only collective, but also peasant 
(private) farms have found themselves in such a difficult 
economic situation, and some of them have gone bankrupt? Our 
correspondent posed these and other questions to A.Kh. 
Zaveryukha, deputy chairman of the Government of the Russian 
Federation. 
  Aleksandr Kharlampievich Zaveryukha was born in 1940 in 
Novosergiyevskiy Rayon in Orenburg Oblast. His first job was 
that of a tractor driver. He graduated from the Orenburg 
Institute of Agriculture and is a candidate of economic science. 
He knows agricultural production inside out. Worked as a chief 
economist and a kolkhoz chairman. For many years held management 
positions in the Orenburg Oblast Party Committee and the 
agro-industrial committee. Was the head of the 
scientific-production association of the All-Russia Scientific 
Research Institute for Meat Cattle-Breeding. Was elected a 
people's deputy of the Russian Federation. He was appointed a 
deputy chairman of the Government of the Russian Federation in 
February of this year. 
  [Dudorov] Aleksandr Kharlampiyevich, in your opinion, what 
should be the main principles of the state economic policy with 
respect to the APK [agro-industrial complex]? How are they being 
implemented in practice? 
  [Zaveryukha] It is my firm conviction that the reform in the 
agro-industrial complex and its transition to the market must be 
based on fundamentally changing the totality of socioeconomic 
relations in this sector of production. Why is a market 
preferable to an administrative-distributive system? First and 
foremost because it gives the peasant an incentive constantly to 
strive to work more productively. He will show this concern 
about "his own" not only on an independent farm but also when 
participating on a voluntary basis in cooperative production. 
  That rural residents will be joining in various entities is 
also beyond any doubt, because one person or even a large family 
cannot compete with a cooperative, where responsibilities are 
clearly assigned among its members. That is, it uses all the 
advantages of division of labor among producers joined together. 
Hard-working people will not tolerate among them a sluggard or a 
drunkard and will simply "squeeze" him out, like a foreign body. 
  A question comes up: Why do we produce four or five times 
less output per rural worker as compared with a similar peasant 
or farmer in Europe--what is the problem? One of the main 
reasons for this situation, in my opinion, is the deviation from 
a normal correlation of prices for agricultural and industrial 
products for the countryside. This and other reasons have led to 
an impoverishment of the countryside; producing agricultural 
output has become unprofitable. The state has begun to support 
rural workers with money from time to time, but these were 
considerably lesser amounts than what was being withdrawn. That 
is why the sector has been deteriorating. 
  As a result, the only sovkhozes and kolkhozes that have 
survived have been those managed by the most capable and 
energetic administrators, who were able to create highly 
profitable production through comprehensive mechanization, 
introduction of modern crop-growing and cattle-breeding 
techniques, and rational organization of production processes. 
However, it has come to the point that even they are in need of 
state support lately. Because even the 200-300-percent profit on 
grain production will be eaten up by inflation if it runs at 400 
percent a year or more. Because agriculture is a seasonal 
sector; expenditures here run year round, while the output is 
produced once a year or at even greater intervals. Over this 
time much changes in the economy, and farms are left in the red. 
  The proof of that is the current financial situation of 
grain 
producers, to whom Roskhlebproduct owes almost 1 trillion rubles 
[R] for the grain it has procured from them. One of the most 
important conditions of forming a market in grain and products 
of its processing is for the state to give up its monopoly on 
sales of bread and bakery products, granting the right to sell 
them at market prices and compensating in a variety of ways the 
low-income part of the population, thus providing protection 
from rising prices. 
  The government has appraised the situation correctly and has 
issued to agriculture before the end of 1993 R1 trillion to pay 
its own debts; this step should contain somewhat the process of 
the impoverishment of the countryside. In order to stop this 
negative process, however, many times more infusion will be 
needed. 
  [Dudorov] What is the role of the public sector and other 
economic forms in solving the food problem? 
  [Zaveryukha] If we keep in mind the rather sad experience of 
the hasty decisions in the economic sphere, it will become clear 
that the current fundamental change of production relations in 
the countryside is something that will require not one and not 
five years. The recent fashionable slogan on paying the debt to 
the countryside simply did not work out because the government 
did not have the necessary means. And the result of a complete 
disintegration of the system of payments was that agriculture 
began literally to visibly collapse. 
  The first victims were weak kolkhozes and sovkhozes, which 
after their reorganization either merged with enterprises that 
were better off financially or separated into private farms. 
Betting on them, however--as many demand that we do--may pay off 
no earlier than in five to 10 years, since most kolkhoz members 
are not capable of engaging in independent production and are 
not knowledgeable about things that a farmer should know. 
Neither can we dismiss the fact that new farms now--the same as 
collective farms--are experiencing extreme economic hardship. To 
set things up, a farmer now needs to spend many millions, while 
the government is unable to allocate these means. 
  Therefore, the public sector practically retains a dominant 
role in agriculture. And collective farms, too--including 
kolkhozes and sovkhozes reorganized into different forms--need 
reliable protection from dishonest partners, both domestic (in 
terms of payment for products) and foreign. 
  [Dudorov] The land reform is currently being implemented on 
a 
broad scale in Russia. What do you personally think of the 
introduction of private ownership in land? 
  [Zaveryukha] The president of the Russian Federation's edict 
"On Regulating Land Relations and Development of Economic Reform 
in Russia" has caused a range of reactions in the countryside. 
It is revolutionary in substance, and many people have not yet 
appraised its subsequent effect on the entire process of 
transition to a market. Its opponents are concerned over point 4 
regarding private ownership in land; they maintain that people 
with money obtained in a dishonest manner will begin buying it 
up for speculative purposes or in order to create large land 
holdings. 
  Their concerns are not groundless; at the same time, 
however, 
the edict has only set the general direction, while the 
mechanism is being detailed in a package of legislative acts on 
the land reform, which is to be prepared by the government, 
after which these documents are to be adopted by the future 
Federal Assembly. The same kind of acts are being prepared with 
respect to economic activities on the purchased land. In the 
event that it is used not in accordance with the intended 
purpose, first the owner will be fined, and then the land may be 
confiscated. Documents are currently being developed on 
procedures of land plot buyouts, mortgages, taxation, and other 
operations involving land, as well as using agricultural land as 
a collateral. 
  [Dudorov] To what extent does the current infrastructure 
meet 
the needs of the APK market? 
  [Zaveryukha] The infrastructure needed to begin market 
relations in this economic sector is already in place. Its 
weakest link is the lack of a sufficient number of specialists 
who have knowledge of the methods of managing an enterprise in 
the new environment and the basics of marketing. Another 
difficulty is that many APK sectors are overly monopolized. Take 
for instance the aforementioned Roskhlebproduct corporation. We 
need to demonopolize such entities. 
  Private sector organizations also intensively build a market 
infrastructure. For instance, exchanges began to specialize in 
individual commodities, moving away from universality, and join 
into associations and unions. For instance, in the APK sphere 
there is an association of exchanges that already has been 
functioning for two years; it has prepared a program for the 
development of a market of grain futures in Russia. I think that 
the state should support such a constructive approach and 
influence grain price regulation in a certain way through 
commodity and financial interventions. Creating a market 
infrastructure on the existing basis is more promising, since 
reconstruction and modernization of it will cost less than 
starting from scratch. I recommend that all businessmen who wish 
to work with the APK in this direction contact the 
Agro-Industrial Chamber for Reconstruction and Development of 
the Russian Ministry of Agriculture, whose task is to coordinate 
the actions of all forces, regardless of form of ownership, in 
the direction of program implementation. 
  [Dudorov] What should be the economic relations in the 
future, and what should be the infrastructure of the APK market? 
  [Zaveryukha] Having studied the experience of market 
operations in the agrarian sector of the economy of many 
countries in the world, we found out that the system that is 
most suitable for Russia is the one used in the European Union, 
which regulates the agrarian market through state institutions. 
Their influence on the domestic agrarian market is exerted in 
the form of direct commodity or financial intervention. We, too, 
should find optimal transitional market mechanisms, which would 
allow the market to take off without leveling to the ground 
already functioning structures, to offer them better economic 
conditions. They should be as follows: 
  --selling agricultural products at market prices; 
  --price regulation should not interfere with the market 
nature of relations; 
  --state procurement prices (fixed) must be set after taking 
exchange mechanisms into account; 
  --the state builds up a reserve supply of agricultural 
products and foodstuffs in order to conduct a commodity 
intervention in the event of sharp increases in product prices. 
  It is also proposed to conduct state regulation in the 
market 
environment through a system of collaterals, which includes 
accepting the product as a collateral for a certain period of 
time with payment at guaranteed prices, and also works through 
preferential credits for commodity producers in certain sectors 
by compensating part of the expenditures on the production of 
grain products, and so on. 
  We also need to think about creating such financial 
institutions as mortgage and land banks, payment and clearing 
institutions, trust companies, and leasing firms. Their 
development is held back only by the lack of a legislative and 
normative base. We need to create organizational-economic forms 
for certain APK sectors. This approach is built into state 
programs "Soybean," "Grain," "Oil," and others. One of the 
possibilities in this direction is organizing 
industrial-financial holding companies with the participation of 
state institutions and ministries. But this is a separate large 
topic. 
  [Dudorov] How do you see the role of the mass media in the 
successful conduct of the agrarian reform, raising the level of 
the population's knowledge and literacy in matters of a market 
economy? 
  [Zaveryukha] The role of the press and other mass media in 
covering the APK problems is enormous. Unfortunately, quite 
often the press, radio, and television are not objective in 
their appraisal of a score of processes taking place in the 
countryside. Some authors maintain that we need to speed up the 
liquidation of large collective farms and create instead 5 
million peasant (private) farms, which will immediately feed the 
country. 
  Others, on the contrary, proclaim a lack of future for the 
latter, since they allegedly are less efficient than large 
enterprises. Such a diametrically opposite approach is 
groundless and only harms the reform in the APK. Sometimes we 
also see an incorrect appraisal of the current situation in the 
countryside. 
  The mass media must reflect the real picture in the agrarian 
sector, cover the experience accumulated in the regions and on 
farms, reveal shortcomings, and publish the professional advice 
of specialists and scientists on different aspects of the 
economics of the national agro-industrial complex. 
  I believe that the EKONOMIKA I ZHIZN newspaper, which, in my 
opinion, comprehensibly and quite objectively covers the course 
of economic reform in our country, could be of substantial help 
to the Russian agro-industrial complex in overcoming the 
difficulties that it is currently experiencing. And I think that 
top managers of the APK, farms, enterprises, and organizations, 
as well as new commercial structures, will gladly share on the 
pages of EKONOMIKA I ZHIZN their experiences, providing tips on 
the best approaches to the solution of some or other problems. 
Both sides will benefit. 
  [Box, p 24] 
<H5>  In the Mirror of Statistics </H5>
  Reregistration of kolkhozes and sovkhozes is 
practically complete. It has been implemented at 24,000 farms 
(93 percent). The collectives of 8,100 farms made a decision to 
retain the existing status of their enterprise. Joint-stock 
companies and partnerships of various kinds have become the 
prevalent form of economic activity in the countryside. As of 1 
October 1993, there were 11,300 such entities. 
  According to the data of the State Committee on 
Statistics, as of 1 November of this year there were 268,000 
private farms operating in Russia, covering a total area of 11.2 
million hectares (42 hectares per farm, on average). Over the 
past few months, the process of their creation has slowed down 
perceptibly. Over January-October, more than 9,000 farms ceased 
operations because of increased difficulties with material and 
technical supply, the worsened financial situation, and other 
reasons. 
  It should be noted particularly that the people's 
interest in having their own personal auxiliary plots has 
increased. The 18 million personal auxiliary plots, as well as 
those belonging to enterprises, organizations, and institutions, 
which are currently in operation in Russia, now produce 30 
percent of the gross agricultural product. Over the period under 
review, the herd of livestock and poultry on these farms has 
increased by 5-12 percent. 
  As compared to 1991, in 1992 agricultural output fell 
by 9 percent, while the national gross domestic product declined 
by 20 percent. It is expected that the gross agricultural 
product will decline by 5 percent in 1993. 
  The total yield of grain after processing is expected 
to be 100-102 million tonnes (over the past two years the 
average yield was 92 million tonnes). There has been more sugar 
beet produced (by 23.4 million tonnes) than in 1992. Production 
of sunflower seed, potatoes, and vegetables--counting the 
production of these crops on personal auxiliary plots, is 
expected to remain at the 1992 level (2.3 million, 38 million, 
and 10 million tonnes, respectively). 
  A certain trend toward stabilization may be seen in 
animal husbandry. Beginning with the second quarter of this 
year, the rate of decline in the production of most varieties of 
farm products has gone down. However, because of a continuous 
drop in the number of livestock and poultry over 10 months as a 
whole, selling livestock for slaughter has declined on farms by 
14 percent; the gross yield of milk has declined by 4 percent, 
and production of eggs by 7 percent. 
  The herd of livestock kept on the population's personal 
plots continues to increase. This only partially compensates, 
however, for the perceptible decline in the size of the herd at 
agricultural enterprises. The share of horned cattle in the 
hands of the population has increased from 23 percent to 26 
percent; of cows--from 30 percent to 34 percent; pigs--from 29 
percent to 33 percent; and of goats and sheep--from 32 percent 
to 38 percent. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61102 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Agriculture's Financial Problems Viewed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  PM3112152193 Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA in Russian 30 Dec 93 
First Edition p 2 </F>

<F P=103> PM3112152193 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Article by Candidate of Economic Sciences I. Kononov, </F>
leading scientific staffer at the All-Russia Scientific Research 
Institute of Agricultural Economics, and comment by Aleksandr 
Gavrilyuk: "Is the Bank No Comrade for the Peasant?"] 
  [Text] Our statistics are always late. That is why today 
we have not the year's balance for 1993 but only the 
agricultural enterprises' balance for the first half of the year. 
  The consolidated half-year balance of Russia's agricultural 
enterprises is a unique document making it possible to assess 
objectively the financial position of the country's agriculture. 
Over the first six months of work this year, agricultural farms 
and producers (not counting private farmers) earned over 567 
billion rubles [R] in profit, which is a little over eight times 
more than for the corresponding period last year. The profit 
obtained ensured a 48-percent profitability in agriculture. Is 
that enough? 
  According to the criteria of the "stagnation times," the 
optimum level of profitability was considered to be 40-45 
percent of the prime cost of the output sold. And that level 
was indeed close to the optimum since it ensured a quite rapid 
rate of expanded reproduction of the sector's material and 
technical base and ensured wages entirely comparable with wages 
in industry (on state farms it was 86-88 percent of industrial 
wages). When assessing the present profitability situation in 
agriculture we must bear in mind that it took shape largely 
under the influence of the extremely reduced remuneration of the 
labor of rural commodity producers. 
  In the first half of this year, as last year, the monthly 
wage in agriculture did not exceed 56 percent of the average 
wage of workers and employees in the Russian national economy. 
If wages in agriculture were the average for the national 
economy, then the sector's profitability would decline many 
times over for this reason alone. According to the figures for 
last year, this decline would have been only threefold. The low 
return has also affected effective demand. 
  Because of the reduction in agriculture's effective demand 
for 1992 alone compared with 1991, deliveries of mineral 
fertilizers to Russia's agro-industrial complex were nearly 
halved, deliveries of tractors and trucks fell by over one 
third, deliveries of grain combines fell 28 percent, and volumes 
of capital investments were cut back more in the agro-industrial 
complex than in other sectors. 
  Unfortunately, agriculture remains an unattractive sphere 
for 
private investors. And that is entirely natural. After all, 
the general rule has it that there is some point in investing in 
production only if you can obtain a bigger clear profit (after 
the deduction of tax) than by keeping the money in the bank. 
But even the Savings Ban of Russia, which pays the smallest 
rate of interest among other banks on short-term investments, 
pays 120 percent a year. 
  Many banks have paid shareholders dividends for 1993 which 
amount to 200-250 percent a year and even more. For that reason 
banks keep as far away as possible from agriculture, calling it 
a "black hole." 
  Russia's commercial structures mainly finance those projects 
whose profitability will in any circumstances be at least 
150-200 percent a year. Targets for investment as a rule are 
trade and large industrial enterprises which have completed 
privatization and possess a substantial export potential. 
  Consequently, for agriculture to be able, under stagflation 
conditions, to make capital investments in more or less 
tolerable volumes and to offer normal wages and finally become a 
sector of interest to private capital, its profitability should 
not lag substantially behind profitability in other spheres of 
the economy. For instance, in the United States the average 
return over many years from investment in farming for 1954-1992 
was considerably higher than from investment in state bonds and 
treasury promissory notes. 
  The half-year figures are also alarming in connection with 
the intensifying differentiation of farms. According to the 
results of work in the first six months, over 4,000 farms, or 
15.4 percent of their total number, became loss-making, and the 
average loss from one loss-making farm was about R10 million, 
while the profit from one profit-making farm was R27 million. 
  Last year 7.6 percent of the total number of farms completed 
the first six months with a loss. Of course, if you assess the 
situation from liberal market positions, there is nothing 
dangerous in agriculture's financial position. After all, the 
well-known "500 Days" program already made full allowance for 
the possible bankruptcy of up to 25 percent of farms possessing 
one third of agricultural land. Even now representatives of 
this concept view the possible mass bankruptcy of producers of 
agricultural output as an entirely acceptable market feature. 
  In this connection it is appropriate to recall the U.S. 
Administration's approach toward problems of its own 
agriculture. When in the mid-eighties U.S. farmers were gripped 
by a debts crisis and about 7 percent of farms were threatened 
with imminent bankruptcy, the federal government took steps to 
ease the farmers' debt burden. [Kononov ends] 
<H5>  In Place of Postscript </H5>
  Russia's agrarian sector has been unable to "achieve a 
breakthrough" and overcome the production slump in the outgoing 
agricultural year. In addition, losses when harvesting this 
year's harvest were in excess of 30 percent for many 
agricultural crops. The reasons? Primarily "because of the 
clumsiness of the country's banking system" and the imperfection 
of the taxation of rural commodity producers, specialists 
believe. 
  Debts to the peasants for the grain and oilseed delivered to 
state resources were R600 billion as of early December and were 
the same amount for stockraising output sold. In addition the 
agro-industrial complex has not received about R800 billion 
earmarked for it from the federal budget. 
  Existing taxation, in the opinion of agricultural leaders, 
does not encourage their work and is often a curbing factor. 
Thus, processing in the agricultural production sphere is 
subject to a 32-percent tax. 
  To all appearances the premise of recent years that the 
emergency formation of private farms would resolve all the 
countryside's problems, has not been justified. The 270,000 
private farms have provided only 8 percent of the total volume 
of agricultural production. And how could it be otherwise if 
the private farmers have been sent only 34 percent of the funds 
earmarked by the state to support this form of farming. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61103 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Academician Miloserdov Criticizes Government Agrarian Policy </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0494A Moscow SELSKAYA ZHIZN in Russian 21 Dec 93 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0494A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow SELSKAYA ZHIZN </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Vladimir Miloserdov, academician of the Russian </F>
Academy of Agricultural Sciences, director of the All-Russian 
Scientific Research Institute of Economics, Labor Organization, 
and Administration in Agriculture: "Who Will Stop the Rackets? 
The Agrarian Crisis Will Continue Unless the Government Attitude 
Toward Rural Areas Changes"] 
  [Text] Agrarian reforms have been under way for three years 
in Russia. It is now possible to sum up certain results and look 
to the future. But first--about their initial base. 
  It is known that the Russian Federation had exaggerated 
specialization of the national economy. By 1989 the branches of 
group A here (the military-industrial, fuel-energy, 
metallurgical, machine building, and chemical-timber complexes) 
accounted for more than 70 percent of the gross national 
product. Immense quantities of their output went to other 
republics and CEMA countries, and also to the West. The share of 
the agro-industrial complex was only 15.2 percent. For 
comparison: in the Baltic countries it exceeded 50 percent. And 
about two-thirds of what was produced was consumed locally. 
  The center did not devote the proper attention to Russian 
agriculture. Farms of Russia received less in capital 
investments, fertilizers, technical equipment, manufactured 
concentrated feeds, construction materials, and energy resources 
per 100 hectares of arable land. The capital availability for 
agriculture in Russia, for example, was 12 times less than in 
the Baltic region. The disparity was just as great in the levels 
of land reclamation (88.5 percent in Lithuania and 6.2 percent 
in the RSFSR), the provision of natural gas, and social 
structuring of the rural areas. For this reason there were more 
and more ghost towns that had lost their able-bodied population. 
The demographic crisis became irreversible in a number of 
regions. And the demand for food products in Russia was covered 
through three sources: its own production, deliveries from Union 
republics, and imports. The last two items provided for more 
than a third of all the consumption. 
  Such were the starting conditions for the agrarian reforms. 
It seems that because of these, the collapse of the Union and 
previous ties dealt an especially painful blow to the food 
supply for Russians. Well, one learns from one's mistakes. Of 
course it would be better to learn from others'. But since this 
is the way it has turned out.... 
  In other words, it is necessary to restructure the entire 
economy, assigning a larger role in it to the agro-industrial 
complex. But it seems that once again life has not taught us a 
thing. The share of the agro-industrial complex in the national 
economy not only is not growing, but is rapidly decreasing. And 
it is not difficult to guess the result: a rapid collapse of 
production. In terms of per capita consumption of meat and milk, 
we have dropped back to the 1965 level. The number of Russians 
is decreasing. In 1992 the natural attrition amounted to only 
200,000 people, while the preliminary estimate for this year was 
about 600,000. 
  And still today there is not even the smallest significant 
social group of the population that would be against the 
reforms. Debates about how to conduct them are another matter. 
Throughout the year, over 500 days, or according to the Stolypin 
method: "Leave me alone for 20 years and I will make Russia 
prosperous"? 
  During three years of reforms, about 170 million hectares of 
arable land have been turned over to the ownership of 
agricultural commodity producers. A multiple-system economy is 
being created. Hundreds of thousands of peasant farms have been 
registered. Millions of city dwellers have received garden plots 
and orchards, and land is being allotted for residential 
buildings. The system of administration is changing. There is no 
longer the previous dictatorship from the center. What to plant, 
what production structure to have, how to use profit--these 
things are being decided by the people themselves. This is good. 
  The only problem is that the rural areas are continuing to 
decline from day to day. And one cannot agree with those who 
justify this rapid collapse. They say that it is necessary to 
pay for the reforms. The experience of other countries does not 
confirm this. In China during 12 years of reforms, the gross 
agricultural output increased 2.2-fold, meat 
production--3.7-fold, fish production--2.8-fold, and sugar 
production--3.5-fold. These reforms were based not on 
ideological but on economic principles. The Chinese say: "The 
color of the cat makes no difference as long as it catches mice." 
  Instead of having a clear-cut concept of our own, we are 
inclined to borrow others' models. Hastiness in the development 
of legislative and normative documents and standard formulas for 
reform of all of the immense area of Russia without preliminary 
checking in various regions has led to mistakes and pro forma 
actions. 
  One of them was the attempt to solve the food problem solely 
through deep reformation and change in the forms of ownership 
and management. We must be realistic. This alone will not 
stabilize production or increase its effectiveness. Especially 
when deliveries of technical equipment, fertilizers, and 
construction materials to agriculture are being catastrophically 
reduced. When procurement prices for agricultural products are 
growing much more slowly than the prices of industrial products 
for rural areas. Because of the lack of equivalence in exchange, 
rural areas are failing to receive hundreds of billions of 
rubles. 
  With the destruction of the state procurement system, 
numerous middlemen and speculators attach themselves to rural 
commodity producers like barnacles on an old ship. Rural 
residents sell their goods for three to five times less than we 
buy them for in the stores. As we can see, it is by no means the 
agricultural workers who are to blame for the high retail prices. 
  Because of the impoverishment of the masses, even the 
significantly curtailed production remains largely unconsumed. 
In many regions of Russia, an immense quantity of butter, meat, 
grain, and potatoes has accumulated in the warehouses. At the 
same time, the state continues to buy them abroad at higher 
prices. 
  The government is ripping off the rural residents, forcing 
them to sell grain at prices set from above without paying for 
it. At the same time, peasants today have to pay in advance for 
every nail, while for products that are produced the prime 
minister is promising that by the new year a maximum of 80 
percent of the debt of more than 2 trillion will be paid. By 
that time the ruble will be worth even less. 
  In the past the peasantry took on the job of accelerated 
industrialization and restoration of the national economy 
destroyed by the war. Today an attempt is being made to make it 
responsible for emerging from the financial crisis. But even 
Adam Smith said that the country gives the city exactly the same 
amount as the city gives the country. High prices of industrial 
goods and high taxes have sharply reduced investment activity 
and have blocked structural changes in the agro-industrial 
complex which are necessary for the formation of a market. And 
this predetermines the long-term tendencies toward decline of 
production. 
  The already weak social sphere of the rural areas is being 
destroyed. But perhaps the most terrible thing is the 
degradation of the production and scientific-technical potential 
and the fertility of the soil. The gene pool of the animals, 
breeding work, and seed growing are being destroyed, and 
production construction has been reduced many times over. Fixed 
capital is aging, and the load per tractor and combine is 
increasing. Capacities and work force are engaged in repair of 
machines and equipment just as they are in agricultural machine 
building. A process of physical disintegration of productive 
forces has begun, and the demand for scientific and technical 
products is decreasing. 
  Nonetheless, the state refuses to grant subsidies to 
agriculture. Although in the West, even with a surplus of 
foodstuffs, the governments grant immense subsidies to the 
farmers. Incidentally, in developed countries, approximately 
half of the increase in production of food products comes 
through technical progress. 
  Government leaders justify their policy with respect to 
agriculture by saying that the state has no funds. Although it 
is known that the enterprises and citizens pay immense taxes. 
Prices, apartment rents, and the costs of other services have 
increased many times over. Energy resources, timber, and metal 
are being exported in considerable quantities to nearby and 
distant foreign countries. 
  There are many holes. They include the bloated state 
apparatus, which has occupied not only all republic buildings, 
but also the buildings of the former Union ministries and 
departments. Numerous bureaucrats of the state apparatus are 
receiving wages that are several times higher than those of 
world-renowned scientists. 
  Today a large proportion of the members of government, 
especially deputy prime ministers, are bending over 
backwards--they travel through foreign countries trying to scare 
up a billion and a half or two billion dollars in credit. At the 
same time, with the help of their own government, funds of 
Russian entrepreneurs amounting to more than $20 billion a year 
are sitting in Western banks. Creating an economic mechanism 
that would make it possible to motivate our entrepreneurs to 
invest this money in Russia's economy--this is what our 
government should be working on. 
  And another large financial source would be to demand 
repayment of debts from republics of the former Union. After the 
proclamation of sovereignty by the parliament of Russia in 1990, 
there was the hope that we would become the masters of our own 
wealth, that we would develop the economy on the basis of our 
own advantage and determine an efficient specialization. Then 
the peoples of the former Union would know who is who. Because 
relations among independent states should be arranged on an 
equivalent basis and their well-being should be made directly 
dependent on labor productivity and the generation of capital as 
the basis of social justice. After all, it is known that of all 
the republics of the former USSR, only Russia previously had a 
positive balance in interrepublic exchange, and in 1989 it was 
more than $50 billion. 
  Alas, Russia is continuing to supply its neighbors with 
energy sources, raw materials, and processed materials at 
extremely low prices. Because of the differences in prices 
(world and transfer) it annually loses $17 billion. 
  With this kind of state foreign economic policy, where are 
we 
supposed to get the money to repay our debts to rural workers? 
Here it is necessary to resort to deception or, rather, get 
involved in the state rackets with respect to our peasants. 
Because we are not used to paying them their due. At the end of 
the 1920's, Stalin spoke about tribute from the rural areas as a 
temporary measure. Today this is considered to be an ordinary 
phenomenon: the peasant can be patient a little longer for the 
sake of the reforms. He has already been patient for 75 years! 
  The agrarian crisis will continue unless the attitude toward 
it changes. 
  Do not neglect the disease, esteemed state leaders! 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61104 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Warnings of Land Degradation, Erosion </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0456A Moscow ZEMLYA I LYUDI in Russian No 46, 19 Nov 93 
p 5 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0456A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ZEMLYA I LYUDI </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by G. Vasilyev: "Agricultural Fields Under Threat </F>
of Depletion"] 
  [Text] One of the main objectives of conducting land 
reform in Russia is to stop the processes of land degradation. 
However, today these processes have even become accelerated. 
This is convincingly corroborated by data prepared by a 
Roskomzem [Russian Committee on Land] state (national) report 
concerning the condition and use of land in the Russian 
Federation. 
  It will be recalled that there are 222.3 million hectares of 
agricultural fields in Russia, including 132 million hectares of 
arable land, 62.5 million hectares of pastures, and 26.8 million 
hectares of hayfields. A substantial part is subject to various 
types of erosion, and tens of thousands of hectares are being 
destroyed by gullies. Almost all of the plowed land of the North 
Caucasus and the Volga region are eroded or threatened with 
erosion. This same situation has developed in the Chernozem area 
in Ukraine. Every fourth hectare of arable land in Western 
Siberia is eroded. 
  Because of water erosion alone about one-tenth of arable 
land 
has lost 30-60 percent of its fertility, and about one-fourth of 
the arable land--from 10 to 30 percent. Meanwhile, the volume of 
antierosion measures in 1991 compared with 1988 fell by a third. 
In 1992, 11,000 hectares of windbreaks were established on 
arable land, in 1985, 24,000 hectares. The volume of work on 
laying antierosion plantings in narrow gorges, gullies, sands, 
and other land unsuitable for cultivation decreased by one-third. 
  Annual humus losses on each hectare of arable land 
throughout 
Russia amounts to an average of 0.62 tonnes. They are especially 
high in regions situated in the steppe zone. Thus, in Samara, 
Chelyabinsk, and Orenburg Oblasts, Bashkortostan, and the 
Kabardino-Balkar Republic these losses amount to 0.8-1 tonne. It 
is calculated that to create a positive balance of humus in 
arable land it is necessary to introduce 1-1.2 billion tonnes of 
organic fertilizer annually. At the present time, only one-third 
of this amount is covered. 
  A reduction in work on soil liming also has a negative 
effect 
on soil fertility. While in 1986 42 million tonnes of lime was 
applied, only 26 million tonnes were applied in 1991. 
  More than one-fourth of the hayfields and 9 percent of the 
pastures are in a waterlogged condition. Also in this state are 
5.7 million hectares of arable land. 
  There has been a noticeable deterioration in recent years in 
the state of affairs in land reclamation. Operational repair 
work on functioning water management systems is far from being 
fully carried out. And this has a negative effect on their 
technical level and the output of improved sectors. More than 
half of the irrigated lands (about 3,500 hectares) need 
additional work on improving their qualitative condition. There 
is a need to redesign the drainage network over an area of more 
than 240,000 hectares. 
  The figures cited in the state report once again indicate 
that major capital investments on the part of the state are 
necessary to make up for the diminishing fertility of the land. 
Agricultural enterprises and peasant farms are not now able to 
cope with this difficult task under conditions of inflation and 
acute shortage of resources. Only substantial state support in 
combination with improvements in land and economic relations in 
the village will help them to increase crop harvests and 
strengthen the fodder base for livestock raising. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61105 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Criminal `Privatization' of Moscow Apartments on Rise </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944E0330A Moscow VEK in Russian No 49, 17-23 Dec 93 p 8 </F>
<F P=103> 944E0330A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow VEK </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Natalya Nikulina: "He Left Moscow. For His Own </F>
Funeral: Privatized Housing Has Become a Victim of Criminal 
Business"] 
  [Text] Since the beginning of the year, 1,299 persons have 
disappeared without a trace in Moscow--almost twice as many as 
last year. A considerable number of them were legal residents of 
Moscow, had privatized their housing, and were single. Putting 
their signature on the document formalizing a swap or sale of 
their apartment, these people effectively signed their own death 
sentence. 
  An unrealized tragedy was unfolding in front of my very 
eyes. 
Close to one another, in a row, some men and women sat across 
the desk from Viktor Kasyanenko, chief of the operational 
investigations department of the city of Moscow GUVD 
[Administration of Internal Affairs], and his staff. They were 
discussing some tangled routine story: a fictitious marriage, 
apartment privatization, official replacement of a primary 
tenant, a female hostage, the OMON [Special Purpose Militia 
Detachment], a complex three-step (or more) housing swap through 
a single broker, one of the "swappers" convicted three times for 
apartment burglary... Frankly, I understood little of what I 
heard. One thing was clear: as a result of this "swap," two 
families had been left without a place to live. As to the 
broker, having made profit on the deal and having sold other 
people's apartments at a premium, he had disappeared in the huge 
city. 
  "All right, that is it!" Kasyanenko summarized the hour-long 
conversation with the victims. "Leave a written explanation and 
go in peace. You have claims against one another--handle it 
through the court." 
  In truth, however, until recently people's courts did not 
even accept claims from victims in these matters, and they are 
only now shifting into gear. The city procuracy keeps a watchful 
eye on swindling associated with the housing privatization. 
Rayon procurators, on the other hand, try to avoid dealing with 
such matters. So it appears that apparently nobody is interested 
in this except for Kasyanenko and his colleagues, who are 
shoveling through the criminal consequences of the ill-conceived 
privatization of housing in Moscow. 
  This incident from the life of 38 Petrovka Street 
unfortunately is typical of the work of operational 
investigations department detectives and the 2d Criminal 
Investigations Administration of the GUVD; it is, however, far 
less dramatic than those they encounter on a daily basis. A hunt 
by criminals for owners of privatized housing in Moscow is in 
full swing. You can judge for yourself the "fat" in this new 
trade: a one-room apartment costs 20-30 million rubles [R]; a 
two-room one--R40-60 million; and a three-room one--about R100 
million. The crazy money blows the mind of those who had just 
recently made a "modest" living by theft, racketeering, and car 
theft. Selling other people's apartments turns out to be much 
more profitable, and criminals involved in this are willing to 
go to any length: swindling, extortion, and then, as a rule, 
criminal disappearance of the dwelling's owners. Apartment 
owners are threatened verbally; they are tortured and subjected 
to physical violence; they are force-fed alcohol (sometimes even 
technical grade) in enormous quantities. The criminals also use 
psychotropic substances that cause death. Most often the victims 
are single and elderly people, whom Moscow detectives already 
have included in a "high-risk group." There are currently almost 
9,000 of them in the capital, and almost all of them have 
privatized their apartments. Although, judging by all signs, any 
one of us may get caught in the privatization meat grinder. 
According to the department staff, not only the elderly but 
entire families that decide to swap or sell their housing 
disappear without a trace. We can also count among potential 
victims those who have surrendered residence permits for their 
privatized apartments and then disappeared without a trace. 
  Really, who would believe the "tale" that Vera Nikolayevna 
T-va, an orphan who has no family and in all her 72 years had 
never (!) left Moscow, suddenly decided to settle in a Tver area 
village, having first privatized her three-room apartment in the 
center of Moscow?! This "tale" was told to the department staff 
by new black-mustached owners of the spacious dwelling, against 
whom a criminal case has now been initiated. So far, however, 
grandma Vera has not been found either in Moscow or in the 
remote village. 
  Among the persons missing since 5 November was 50-year-old 
Muscovite M-ein. Her body was recently discovered in the woods 
in suburban Moscow. In the course of preliminary investigation 
it has been established that M-ein made the acquaintance of two 
men, who offered to buy her apartment. As soon as the woman 
signed the sale contract and handed over all the documents to 
the buyers, they got her into a car under some plausible pretext 
and while driving forcibly injected her with a psychotropic 
medication, from which the poor woman died. 
  Criminal proceedings have been initiated again V-a, an 
apartment swindler who bought up apartments in Moscow using fake 
documents. In addition, two persons have disappeared through the 
actions of the swindler. 
  Among the disappeared is a woman who used the services of 
the 
Stolitsa joint-stock society in swapping her apartment. There 
are hundreds, if not thousands, of such firms in Moscow. Their 
"will buy-sell-rent-swap" ads fill newspaper pages and cover all 
the poles and glass enclosures at bus stops around Moscow. They 
offer bait--one sweeter than the next--to irresponsible naive 
owners of super-expensive Moscow housing. One firm offers free 
privatization and expedited processing. Take note, absolutely 
"free"! And why such generosity all of a sudden? Another 
corporation quite seriously promises "comfort at the time of the 
deal and for the rest of your life." How long will that life be, 
however, for those who take advantage of such questionable 
offers? For instance, MUR [Moscow Criminal Investigations 
Department] officers detained the head and staff members of the 
Help Center. They killed, strangled, shot to death, and then 
burned people who entrusted them with their privatization 
documents. Over a short period of time these criminals 
dispatched to the other world many gullible Muscovites. 
  According to expert estimates, the entire territory of 
Moscow 
is divided into spheres of influence among criminal groups 
specializing in the apartment "business." Each such group has 
reconnaissance agents, paid informers, and shock-troopers--those 
who carry out "death sentences" and those who work only with 
documents (counterfeiting, fabrication of signatures, seals, 
texts, etc.). Drawn into the orbit of this horrible bloody 
"business" are employees of housing management offices, passport 
desks of housing offices and rayon departments of internal 
affairs, prefecture, civil registration office, and military 
draft office clerks, doctors issuing fake medical certificates, 
notaries who formalize privatization and issue power-of-attorney 
for apartment buying and selling, and militia personnel in 
territorial departments of internal affairs. In short, the 
stratum of middle-level office personnel, whose members we 
encounter on a regular basis. And from whom, by the way, one 
rarely gets on the first try "certification of a certificate." 
This should not be surprising: for a bribe, some office 
employees (and a considerable number of them, by the way) 
without properly checking privatization documents will register 
people in and out of the city without having them to appear in 
person. 
  So the rumors that circulated in Moscow in the summer--about 
alleged militia-housing office gangs killing single apartment 
owners--are being partially confirmed. Of course, the criminals 
do not walk around buildings carrying guns and axes. They do not 
need to do so. It is quite enough that these clerks have 
information about the tenants of their territorial unit, that 
is, each of us. As you may well see, such information costs a 
lot these days. More than someone's life even. In my presence, 
two passport clerks from a Moscow militia precinct and three 
employees of a housing office in the same territory were brought 
to 38 Petrovka. Criminal proceedings have been initiated against 
all of them on charges of falsifying privatization documents and 
"selling" information about owners of privatized housing. A 
militia major--a passport desk officer--has apparently been 
detained on the same charges. What do these people--and people 
like them overcome with greed--care that on the basis of this 
information a Kuntsevo-Solntsevo criminal group has tortured to 
death several people, having first obtained under torture their 
signatures attesting to selling their housing. Gypsy gangs also 
rage. They kidnap unfortunate apartment owners and take them to 
their encampments. Through torment and torture they extract 
signatures attesting to the sale of their housing. A notary 
present during this horror immediately certifies the document. 
After which the former owner disappears forever, while a new 
owner of the square footage moves into his apartment. 
  An out-of-town woman recently came to the operational 
investigations department; she said that she had not heard from 
her distant Moscow relative for quite a while. She finally came 
to Moscow herself, and discovered that completely different 
people lived in the apartment. The old man had allegedly moved, 
first having sold his dwelling. But where would the poor guy go, 
considering that he does not have any kin closer than the woman? 
The detectives sorted the situation out quite quickly. The old 
man fell for the bait in a newspaper ad: such and such company 
will rent an apartment for its employees; payment in hard 
currency guaranteed. They struck a deal; fed the old man some 
foreign food and even showered him with "greenbacks" at first. 
Then they talked him into signing a contract that he, the old 
man, would receive life-time maintenance in exchange for the 
apartment. Why do you need all this space, they said? Sell it to 
us, and in return we promise to keep you supplied with good food 
and when the time comes, will bury you with a ceremony. The old 
man happily agreed and signed all the papers in the presence of 
a notary. Now other people live in his apartment. And quite 
legally, as supported by the documents shown to the detectives. 
From these documents it follows that the apartment was sold to 
them by some brokerage firm which at this point has "liquidated 
itself." As to the old man, they heard that he had left Moscow. 
Where did he go, one wonders? To his own funeral perhaps? 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61106 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   MVD Said Suspicious of Moscow Police Support `Program' </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  PM2212145793 Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA in Russian 22 Dec 93 
First Edition p 3 </F>

<F P=103> PM2212145793 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Stanislav Yuryev article: "`Program' Against Racket, MVD </F>
Against `Program'?"] 
  [Text] Everyone fears a racket. Pragmatists submit to it 
and pay up the set tribute, realists draw up their defenses, and 
romantics wait for help from the state. Which of them are best 
protected? Moscow today is like a postwar Moscow: people blow 
up vehicles and apartments and cut down traffic inspectors and 
detectives with bursts of rifle fire. But the militia is worse 
equipped than the organized criminals, the engines of its 
vehicles are less powerful, and everything is painfully 
reminiscent of scenes in Govorukhin's unforgettable movie "The 
Meeting Place Cannot Be Changed," in which brave officers of the 
Moscow Criminal Investigation Department in a low-powered 
militia bus chase after the bandits' powerful truck. 
  Moscow's modern militia does not appear heroic against the 
background of this combat panorama. They know that they are 
backed by a sickly city budget and that the future holds for 
them the grim fate of being invalids if they are unlucky. You 
cannot speak of strength of spirit. 
  But some obstinate people have come along who are prepared 
to 
change the situation. They have organized a public organization 
-- "The Program of Social Protection for Professional Groups at 
Increased Risk" -- with the task of giving social and technical 
assistance to the Moscow Internal Affairs Main Administration 
Regional Administration for Organized Crime [RAOC]. "Program" 
was registered in May of this year and has already done some 
things: the lives and health of all the personnel of the 
service and its district departments have been insured for a sum 
equivalent to $10,000 per employee; payments of 20,000 rubles 
[R] are made for every underage child and R5,000 for medical 
supplies for family members; office equipment and an imported 
minibus have been handed over; and a two-room apartment has been 
purchased for measures to be taken to protect witnesses and 
victims. In addition, "Program" holds competitions in subunits 
for the best in the profession and pays the winners R200,000 
each. "Program" leader A.M. Kachur (a candidate of juridical 
sciences and a former militia colonel) maintains that it is 
capable of creating technical backup for the RAOC up to the 
standards of the German police, if not better. 
  In the social and historical aspects "Program" is based on 
the traditional Russian idea of self-management, whereby 
society's efforts are directed toward resolving a particular 
very important task. Kachur has persuaded a number of prominent 
financiers and entrepreneurs to participate in "Program." His 
reasoning was founded on a simple argument: They must have an 
interest in winning the fight against organized crime, and it is 
possible to achieve success by joining forces. 
  With "Program's" help the outflow of cadres from the RAOC 
has 
been entirely stopped in the space of six months. Kachur claims 
that the RAOC is today in a position to protect anyone who asks 
it for assistance. 
  Everything is splendid, you might think. Particularly as 
Moscow Mayor Yu. Luzhkov approved and supported "Program's" 
activity in his directive of 19 October this year, seeing that 
it had provided an opportunity to improve the situation in the 
capital. 
  But it has rightly been noted that Moscow is still not 
Russia. As though confirming the tenacity of the Russian 
tradition of officials' rejecting manifestations of 
self-management, the MVD [Ministry of Internal Affairs] Main 
Administration for Organized Crime unexpectedly regards 
"Program's" activity with great suspicion. Why? Many people 
see this as professional envy, but they also do not rule out 
more serious interests, which are now being attacked by the 
Moscow regional administration. 
  There really is some mystery concealed in the Ministry's 
rejection of "Program." We will not undertake to fathom it at 
once, but maybe we will be able to unfold this MVD secret before 
our readers in the very near future. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61107 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   DELOVOY MIR Economic Statistics, 8 December </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944E0319A Moscow DELOVOY MIR in Russian 8 Dec 93 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 944E0319A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow DELOVOY MIR </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Economic statistics report by Valeriy Galitskiy, Aris </F>
Zakharov, and Aleksandr Frenkel, Russian State Committee on 
Statistics: "....While Life Gets Increasingly Expensive"] 
  [Text] 
<H5>  Prices of Consumer Goods and Services </H5>
  The increase in prices of consumer goods and services the 
last week of November of this year amounted to 2.2 percent, 
including 2.0 percent for food products and 2.5 percent for 
nonfood products and paid services for the populace. 
  Weekly price change indices for consumer goods and services 
in November of this year are characterized by the following data: 


                2 Nov        9 Nov        16 Nov       23 Nov       30 Nov 

Rate of price   103.2        103.1        103.4        102.9        102.2 
growth for 
basic goods 
and services 

including: 

food products   103.0        102.8        103.4        103.1        102.0 


nonfood         102.2        103.7        103.3        102.5        102.5 
products 

paid services   108.9        102.7        103.7        103.6        102.5 
for the 
populace 


  Price increases over the month for 70 main food products 
amounted to 15.1 percent. By the end of the month, prices for 
meat and meat products, sugar, flour, bread, and bakery products 
had stabilized. At the same time, price increases during the 
last week of the month for eggs, cereals, macaroni products, and 
vegetables were maintained at the 4-6 percent level. 
  Potatoes, vegetables, and fruits increased in price by 5-8 
percent in city markets the final week of November. Prices for 
meat output remained virtually unchanged. 
  The increase in prices of nonfood products in November 
amounted to 15 percent. The cost of fuel for the populace and 
knitted wear increased by 2.5-2.8 percent, of footwear and 
cultural and domestic commodities--by 1.5-1.8 percent. Most 
noticeable at the end of the month was the increase in garment 
prices--by 3.3 percent. 
  The increase in prices of paid services for the populace 
this 
past month significantly surpassed the overall dynamics of 
consumer prices, amounting to 23.2 percent. Rates for dry 
cleaning and bathhouse services increased by 6-8 percent over 
the week. Rates for the remainder of services subject to regular 
monitoring remained virtually unchanged the past week. 
<H5>  Consumer Market Conditions </H5>
  According to selective sampling data in the stores of 
capitals of republics within the Russian Federation and okrug, 
kray, and oblast centers, the saturation observed in stores in 
November with respect to beef, sugar, butter, and sunflower oil 
increased by 3-11 percent. With respect to milk, this index 
decreased by 3 percent, eggs--by 10 percent. 
  As compared with the end of October of this year, the 
saturation level at food stores increased in 39 cities (of 83 
under observation), including by 3-17 percent in 36 cities and 
25-30 percent in four (Vologda, Ryazan, Yaroslavl). The level 
decreased in 32 cities, including by 3-8 percent in 20 cities, 
and by 12-31 percent in 12. Stores in 12 cities remained at 
their previous level of saturation with respect to food products. 
  Data (in percentages) characterizing the market situation 
with respect to basic food items as of 29 November of this year 
are as follows: 


               Proportion of the total number of cities under observation 
               where the product 

               could be       could be          was not        was not 
               purchased      purchased after   available      available for 
               freely         standing in       for sale       sale as of 1 
               without        line or upon                     November (for 
               standing in    presentation of                  reference) 
               line           coupons 

Beef           30             5                 65             67 

Cooked         83             -                 17             13 
sausage 

Milk           66             5                 29             26 

Butter         78             3                 19             8 

Eggs           65             2                 33             25 

Sunflower      43             5                 52             63 
oil 

Sugar          71             5                 24             31 


  The situation in the market of nonfood products in everyday 
demand is as follows: washing machine detergent was unavailable 
in the stores of 57 percent of cities, toilet soap in 47 
percent, toothpaste in 40 percent. Sales of toilet soap and 
toothpaste over the past week diminished by 5 and 15 percent, 
respectively. Sales of washing machine detergent rose by 17 
percent. In Bryansk, Kaluga, Elista, Groznyy, Novosibirsk, 
Tyumen, Abakan, and Yuzhno-Sakhalinsk, the saturation 
coefficient with respect to these items was 1.3-1.7, as opposed 
to 2.4 across Russia on the average. In Kyzyl, Magadan, Aginsk 
(Aginsk Autonomous Oblast), and Ust-Ordynsk (Ust-Ordynsk 
Autonomous Oblast), these products were entirely unavailable for 
sale. 
<H5>  Agriculture </H5>
  Formation of seed stocks is under way at agricultural 
enterprises. By the beginning of November, 10.0 million tonnes 
of spring grains and leguminous crops were on hand (96 percent 
of requirement). As was the case last year, the great shortage 
of soy seeds (63,000 tonnes, 50 percent) is making itself felt. 
Some 2.2 million tonnes of seed potatoes were laid in store--82 
percent of the necessary quantity. 


                   Seed on hand as of 1 November 1993    Reference data 

                   tonnes           percentage of the    seed on hand as of 
                                    requirement of       1 November 1992, 
                                    farms                percentage of 
                                                         requirement 

spring grains      10 million       96                   97 
(not including 
corn) 

including: 

wheat              2.95 million     98                   100.4 

buckwheat          111,000          81                   94 

millet             48,000           92                   90 

rice               52,000           77                   81 

legumes            825,000          84                   80 

Soy                63,000           50                   75 

potatoes           2.2 million      82                   91 


  A grouping of agricultural enterprises by degree of 
provision 
with seed shows that the proportion of farms experiencing 
shortages of seed for spring grains and leguminous crops 
increased from 26 percent last year to 33 percent this year, for 
seed potatoes--from 55 to 60 percent. One out of eight farms was 
supplied with spring grain seed at the level of 60 percent of 
requirement or less. Almost half the agricultural enterprises of 
the Russian Federation were at this level with respect to 
potatoes. 


Degree of      Seeds of spring grains and leguminous     Seed potatoes 
provision,     crops 
percentage 
of 
requirement 

               As of 1 November 1993      As of 1        As of 1 November 1993      As of 1 
                                          November                                  November 
                                          1992                                      1992 
                                          (reference)                               (reference) 

               Percentage    Seed         Percentage     Percentage    Seed         Percentage 
               of total      shortage,    of total       of total      shortage,    of total 
               number of     tonnes       number of      number of     tonnes       number of 
               farms                      farms          farms                      farms 

up to 20       5.8           214,000      5.7            33.7          271,000      30.2 

20.1-40        2.6           149,000      2.0            6.1           134,000      4.1 

40.1-60        4.5           228,000      3.2            7.2           128,000      6.1 

60.1-80        7.5           259,000      5.2            7.5           99,000       7.5 

80.1-99.9      12.4          147,000      9.5            5.7           33,000       7.0 

100 and        67.2          -            74.4           39.8          -            45.1 
greater 

Total          100           997,000      100            100           665,000      100 


  Only 37 percent of farms have the necessary quantity of seed 
for spring grain crops in Chita Oblast; approximately half in 
Penza, Samara, Saratov, Kurgan, Orenburg, and Novosibirsk 
Oblasts; 63-71 percent in Chelyabinsk and Omsk Oblasts, 
Stavropol and Altay Krays, and Bashkortostan. 
  A significant shortage of seed potatoes is being felt at 
farms of Russia's non-Chernozem Zone, where the level is 407,000 
tonnes (16 percent) short of the full requirement. Only 
one-fourth of the farms are fully provided with seed potatoes in 
Smolensk and Sverdlovsk Oblasts and in Bashkortostan; one-third 
in Pskov, Vladimir, and Moscow Oblasts, and in the republics of 
Mordvinia and Udmurtia; about 40 percent in Kaluga, Tula, and 
Nizhniy Novgorod Oblasts; 20 percent in Vologda and Perm Oblasts. 
<H3>  Preparedness of the National Economy for Operation Over the 
Winter Period </H3>
  This year the preparedness of the Russian Federation economy 
for operating under winter conditions, as has been the case the 
past two or three years, is observed against the background of 
diminished fuel production, reduced volumes of fuel deliveries, 
and a lag in the commissioning of energy facilities and housing 
and municipal services facilities. 
  At storehouses of mines and coalfields, 18.4 million tonnes 
of coal (8.1 million tonnes more than the norm) were stored as 
of 1 November. This is 36 percent greater than was the case 1 
November of last year. Some 433,000 tonnes of furnace fuel oil 
were on hand (48 percent less). Coal supplies on hand with 
consumers amounted to 44 million tonnes, furnace fuel oil--9.6 
million tonnes. These levels are 14 and 7 percent less, 
respectively, than as of 1 November 1992. Judging from the 
experience of prior years, these fuel levels are sufficient to 
operate enterprises and organizations for one and a half months. 
  Coal reserves at enterprises of the energy sector, 
metallurgy 
enterprises, storehouses of rayon (city) fuel sales centers, and 
housing and municipal services boiler facilities as of 22 
November this year are characterized by the following data: 


               Coal                                       Furnace fuel oil 

               tonnes        consumption    percentage    tonnes       consumption    percentage 
                             days           of 15 Nov                  days           of 15 Nov 
                                            93 level                                  93 level 

Total          26,727,000    34             94            3,481,000    29             84 
reserves 

including: 

at energy      21,850,000    42             93            2,849,000    25             82 
sector 
enterprises 

at             1,804,000     15             105           414,000      32             92 
metallurgy 
enterprises 

including      813,000       9              104 
for coking 

at housing     678,000       58             94            218,000      31             99.2 
and 
municipal 
services 
boiler 
facilities 

at             2,395,000     22             93 
storehouses 
of rayon 
(city) fuel 
sales 
centers 


  At the same time, coal at energy sector enterprises of the 
republics of Khakassia and Sakha (Yakutia) remained at the 
two-day operational level. Less than the one-week operational 
level was in store at housing and municipal services boiler 
facilities of Volgograd Oblast and the republics of 
Bashkortostan and Altay. About 40 percent of Russian Federation 
territories had sufficient coal to supply the populace and the 
social sphere for a period of less than 15 days, including a 
two-seven day level in Orel, Tula, Astrakhan, and Chelyabinsk 
Oblasts, the Republic of Mordvinia, and Altay Kray. 
<H5>  Wages </H5>
  The average wage of workers in October of this year amounted 
to R93,000 [rubles], a 10.5-fold increase over October of last 
year and a 15-percent increase over the level of September of 
this year. Consumer prices for goods and services increased 
12-fold and by 20 percent, respectively. 


                  January-October    October    January-October    October 
                  1993               1993       1993 increase as   1993 as 
                                     alone      compared with      compared 
                                                January-October    with 
                                                1992               September 
                                                                   1993, 
                                                                   percent 

Average wage of   46,900             93,000     10.2-fold          115 
workers, rubles 


including: 

industry          51,300             101,200    9.5-fold           116 

agriculture       27,600             52,700     10.1-fold          104 

construction      65,700             131,800    10.6-fold          113 

transportation    69,500             138,800    10.5-fold          114 

public health,    35,300             65,500     11.4-fold          104 
physical 
training, and 
social security 


public            32,500             59,200     11.5-fold          104 
education 

art and culture   27,800             50,700     11.4-fold          109 


science and       29,900             57,700     10.9-fold          115 
scientific 
services 

credit and        96,900             201,600    12.6-fold          126 
insurance 

apparatus of      55,500             105,400    12.4-fold          122 
governmental 
organs 


  The wages of workers in the gas industry came to R291,400 in 
October of this year, oil production workers--R264,200, coal 
industry workers--R213,100, and machine-building 
workers--R74,800. 
  For most regions in October, the increase in prices over 
September levels outpaced the increase in wages. A significant 
gap (10-19 percentage points) was observed in Arkhangelsk, 
Vladimir, Ryazan, Lipetsk, Volgograd, Penza, Saratov, Ulyanovsk, 
Orenburg, Kemerovo, Omsk, Tyumen, Irkutsk, Chita, Amur, and 
Kamchatka Oblasts, in the republics of Mordvinia, Kalmykia, 
Dagestan, Udmurtia, and Chuvashia, and in Altay Kray. 
  Preliminary estimates indicate that the average wage in the 
Russian Federation economy in November of this year will have 
constituted R105,000, an increase of 13 percent over October of 
this year, while prices for consumer goods and services rose 15 
percent. 
<H5>  Enterprise Indebtedness </H5>
  Credit indebtedness on the part of industrial and 
agricultural enterprises and construction and transportation 
organizations under observation as of 1 October amounted to R32 
trillion. Of this amount, R8.7 trillion, or 27 percent, 
constitutes delinquent indebtedness. The greatest proportion of 
delinquent indebtedness was seen in enterprises of the forestry, 
woodworking, and pulp and paper production industry (39 
percent), chemical and petrochemical industry (41 percent), 
microbiology (43 percent), coal (44 percent), and gas (52 
percent) industries. 
  The greatest portion (72 percent) of delinquent credit 
indebtedness comprises indebtedness to suppliers. The volume 
dynamics of delinquent indebtedness to suppliers by sector of 
industry and construction are characterized as follows (in 
rubles): 


                 As of 1 Aug 93              As of 1 Sep 93              As of 1 Oct 93 

                 Total       Including       Total       Including       Total       Including 
                             delinquent                  delinquent                  delinquent 
                             indebtedness                indebtedness                indebtedness 

Total in         8.527       3.368           10.184      4.066           14.092      5.209 
industry         trillion    trillion        trillion    trillion        trillion    trillion 

Including: 

electric power   519         152 billion     612         201 billion     1.092       264 billion 
                 billion                     billion                     trillion 

fuel industry    2.380       943 billion     2.966       1.293           4.028       1.587 
                 trillion                    trillion    trillion        trillion    trillion 

ferrous          789         334 billion     1.014       439 billion     1.447       657 billion 
metallurgy       billion                     trillion                    trillion 

nonferrous       679         255 billion     770         270 billion     955         297 billion 
metallurgy       billion                     billion                     billion 

chemical and     890         442 billion     1.098       569 billion     1.370       686 billion 
petrochemical    billion                     trillion                    trillion 
industry 

machine          1.298       504 billion     1.594       601 billion     2.150       805 billion 
building and     trillion                    trillion                    trillion 
metalworking 

forestry,        419         242 billion     356         165 billion     479         222 billion 
woodworking,     billion                     billion                     billion 
and pulp and 
paper industry 


building         185         90 billion      245         115 billion     338         130 billion 
materials        billion                     billion                     billion 
industry 

light industry   195         69 billion      225         84 billion      305         90 billion 
                 billion                     billion                     billion 

food industry    706         207 billion     739         175 billion     1.086       249 billion 
                 billion                     billion                     trillion 

construction     987         334 billion     1.125       429 billion     1.680       509 billion 
                 billion                     trillion                    trillion 


  The greatest increase in delinquent indebtedness to 
suppliers 
in October of this year was observed at enterprises of the 
glass, porcelain, ceramics, and pottery industry--by a factor of 
2.1; in ferrous metallurgy, the flour-grinding, cereals, and 
mixed fodders industry--by a factor of 1.5; in the food 
industry--by a factor of 1.4. At the same time, the growth rate 
did not exceed 12 percent for ferrous metallurgy, the building 
materials industry, and light industry. The proportion of 
industrial enterprises with delinquent indebtedness to suppliers 
as of 1 October of this year comprised 40.5 percent, as opposed 
to 45.9 percent as of 1 September of this year. 
  The significant volumes of delinquent credit indebtedness 
are 
related to the presence of debit indebtedness. 
  As of 1 October of this year, the entire amount of debit 
indebtedness amounted to R28.0 trillion, of which R10.1 
trillion, or 36 percent, was delinquent indebtedness. The 
greatest share of delinquent indebtedness is attributable to the 
indebtedness of purchasers--R8.9 trillion, or 88 percent. 
  The greatest proportion of delinquent debit indebtedness was 
observed in the oil refining, microbiology, forestry, 
woodworking, and pulp and paper industries (47 percent), in 
ferrous metallurgy (48 percent), and in the gas (52 percent) and 
coal (55 percent) industries. 
  Due to a lack of their own financial resources, enterprises 
are resorting to credits. The total volume of indebtedness with 
respect to bank credits for sectors under observation as of 1 
October of this year amounted to R6.5 trillion, including R3.0 
trillion, or 47 percent, attributable to nonstate enterprises. 
  The absence of regulation with respect to mutual accounts 
settlements between enterprises and with the budget exerts an 
influence on their financial stability. 
  The solvency of observed enterprises and organizations of 
industry and construction is characterized by the following data: 


                 Monetary assets, percentage of delinquent indebtedness 
                 to suppliers 

                 As of 1     As of 1   As of 1    As of 1       As of 1 
                 January     April     August     September     October 
                 1993        1993      1993       1993          1993 

Total            78.2        102.1     91.5       79.8          79.3 

including: 

industry         79.3        107.1     95.5       83.9          81.7 

construction     67.2        52.9      50.6       40.9          55.4 


  Credit investments in the Russian economy (not including 
credits of the Russian Federation Savings Bank) as of 1 November 
of this year, according to current operating data of the Central 
Bank of Russia, amounted to R19.6 trillion, an increase of 17 
percent over October (15 percent over September). Of the total 
volume of credit deposits, short-term loans comprise 96 percent. 
This represents a one-point percentage increase in their share 
as compared with the beginning of the year. The average term of 
offered credits is two to three months. Trading in 
"super-short-term" credits (from a few days to one month) in the 
credit and stock markets is becoming more prevalent. 
  The main source of resources for commercial banks has 
traditionally been attracted resources (over 90 percent), of 
which more than one-fourth are attributable to funds of 
enterprises and organizations (in settlement accounts, current 
accounts, other accounts), deposits, and investments; one-fifth 
are attributable to interbank credits. Centralized credits of 
the Bank of Russia comprise 84 percent of the latter. 
  The remainder of the indebtedness of commercial banks to the 
Central Bank of Russia with respect to centralized credits 
extended to enterprises and organizations in accordance with 
federal programs comprised R7.9 trillion as of 1 November of 
this year, an increase of 6 percent over October (2 percent over 
September). Their share of the total volume of credit deposits 
decreased from 44 percent as of 1 October of this year to 40 
percent as of 1 November. 
  Since 15 October of this year, the interest rate of the Bank 
of Russia for centralized loans was raised from 180 percent to 
210 percent. With an increase in the prime rate, interest rates 
for loans afforded by commercial banks to their clients have 
also increased. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61108 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Statistics on General Indebtedness for 1992-1993 </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944E0335A Moscow DELOVOY MIR in Russian No 241, 29 Nov-5 Dec 
93 pp 8, 9 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0335A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow DELOVOY MIR </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Andrey Illarionov, director of the Analysis and </F>
Planning Group of the Chairman of the Russian Federation Council 
of Ministers: "The Closer to the Market -- the Less the 
Suffering"] 
  [Text] According to the most recent data -- on 1 
October -- the volume of total indebtedness for products shipped 
is 16.5 trillion rubles [R]. There is no sense in talking about 
the entire amount of indebtedness, though, since it also 
includes the part of it which is related to the passage of 
payments. The problem worrying everyone is the outstanding debt 
in industry -- the main object of the non-payments. On 1 October 
it was R6.9 trillion. 
<H5>  Indebtedness in the Mirror of Statistics </H5>
  If we recall the "peak" of the non-payment crisis -- last 
summer -- it turns out that in absolute figures, the amount of 
the outstanding debt doubled: on 1 July 1992 it was R3.2 
trillion. During this 18-month period, however, prices rose over 
10-fold. Consequently, the outstanding debt, on a relative 
scale, not only did not increase, but even dropped. The 
indicators characterizing the relative proportion of 
non-payments in the national economy also indicate this trend. 
  The relative proportion of outstanding debt in the entire 
amount of indebtedness during last-year's non-payment crisis was 
61-62 percent, but after the introduction of pre-payments and 
carrying out reciprocal setoffs, it dropped to 49-46 percent, 
and in January 1993 it was 42 percent. It remained at this level 
until October of this year. 
  The next indicator makes understandable the way in which 
outstanding indebtedness relates to the entire industrial 
output. In August of last year the indebtedness exceeded the 
amount of goods produced by a factor of 2.6. In December of last 
year this indicator was 135-140 percent. It held at this level 
for the last 10-11 months: the figure for 1 October is 137.5 
percent. 
  A characteristic indicator is the relative proportion of 
outstanding debt to the gross domestic product. At the "peak" of 
non-payments it was 1.7 percent of the VVP [GDP]. In the autumn, 
after carrying out the reciprocal setoff, it was 86 percent of 
the GDP, in December -- 70 percent, in February 1993 -- 48 
percent and in March -- 32 percent. It stayed at this level for 
the entire remainder of the year: on 1 October the relative 
proportion of outstanding debt was 34 percent of the gross 
domestic product. 
  A year ago, the outstanding indebtedness exceeded the 
monetary funds in the enterprises' accounts by a factor of 2.6. 
In June of this year, the relative proportion of outstanding 
debt exceeded the enterprises' funds by a factor of 1.3. In 
October it rose slightly -- to a factor of 1.6. 
  In the meantime, when examining the dynamics of the growth 
of 
outstanding indebtedness, allowance should be made for the fact 
that the data on 1 October of this year is not totally 
comparable with the entire preceding series. Up until 1 October, 
the outstanding indebtedness was calculated in production cost 
prices. Beginning on 1 October, a new type of accountability was 
introduced, and non-payments were calculated in sale prices. 
Even a non-specialist knows that the sale price is higher than 
the production cost price, and specialists refine this to a 
difference of 20-30 percent. The latter indicators, therefore, 
overstated the relatively comparable series by at least 20 
percent. 
  We can therefore say precisely that no rise took place in 
the 
relative proportion of outstanding indebtedness in the national 
economy. Moreover, it was reduced in the relative indicators. 
This is demonstrated visually by the graphs: after the summer 
"peak" of 1992, the volumes of outstanding indebtedness emerged 
on an even plateau somewhere toward October and were at a stable 
level for a year, and for certain sectors even fell. 
  Let us sum up everything that has been said. There are 
non-payments in the economy. The problem, however, remained at 
approximately the same level of urgency throughout the year. 
There is therefore no objective basis for talking about the 
exacerbation of the problem of non-payments, and there is no 
payment crisis right now. 
<H5>  The Reasons for Non-Payments </H5>
  Since the beginning of the reform, in January of last year, 
the enterprises have been relieved of the obligatory ties, 
"designated" by the government, with each other, and with buyers 
and suppliers. On the one hand, this relieved them of 
"obligations" and disadvantageous partners, and made it possible 
for them to seek more advantageous ties. It is obvious, however, 
that such things cannot be done overnight, and the enterprises 
continued "from force of habit" to supply their output for the 
traditional buyers, without waiting for payment. The recipients 
of the goods either had no money in their accounts, or had 
money, but had lost interest in the goods supplied them. As a 
result, the gross heap of non-payments increased quite quickly. 
  The compulsory pre-payment for goods supplied, introduced by 
government resolution, should theoretically eliminate the 
payment problem as a phenomenon. In practice, however, 
pre-payment has only partially eased the urgency of the 
situation. What is happening now? The idea is that the 
enterprises should wait until the money arrives before they ship 
their products. In reality, however, they are, as before, not 
waiting for the pre-payment. Why? The certainty, to quite an 
extent encouraged by last year's reciprocal setoff, continues to 
exist among enterprise directors that sooner or later the 
government, the Central Bank of the Russian Federation, whoever 
you like, will pay them. This illusory hope is also fed by the 
fear of facing the truth: if they do not pay, this means that 
the shipment must be stopped, and consequently, production cut 
back or completely curtailed. In principle, in a normal economy, 
the normal producer will do just that. If he is not paid for the 
goods, why produce them? Our shipping of goods in exchange for 
"air" stems from the residues of the former mentality. 
<H5>  What Reciprocal Setoffs Are Leading To </H5>
  If we look at the experience of other countries with a 
transitional economy -- Poland, Hungary, the Czech Republic -- 
we observe a considerable amount of non-payment in them. It has 
been fluctuating at a level of 20-30 percent of the gross 
domestic product for many years. This problem is being gradually 
solved by privatization and by enterprises adopting true market 
behavior. The owner or boss is appearing who is beginning to 
follow a more efficient policy. This is, of course, possible 
only after a wave of bankruptcies, unemployment and changes in 
production structure. 
  In the last few years we have emerged at a non-payment level 
at which we will stay for several years. In no case should this 
phenomenon be combated by methods of reciprocal setoff, although 
this possibility is constantly discussed, and the Central Bank 
of the Russian Federation is coming forth as a zealous advocate 
of following it. 
  Just what did carrying out reciprocal setoff lead to last 
year. Immediately upon the payment of a credit balance, the 
Central Bank issued a relatively small number of loans, a fact 
of which it loves to remind us. Apart from the R150 billion of 
credit emission, however, a little over R1 trillion was issued 
to the accounts of the commercial banks, which was then 
transferred to the accounts of the enterprises. In the course of 
time, the loans were converted into a cash monetary mass, which 
rained down on our market in a month or two, and gave a colossal 
splash of inflation. 
  After all, after the January 1992 price shock, the 
correcting 
inflation was quite quickly reduced to 10 percent a month. The 
growth rates of foodstuffs in August of last year were the 
lowest in the entire history of the reform -- 6 percent a month. 
The restrictive monetary credit policy followed by the 
government gave every chance of reducing inflation to 2-3 
percent a month by the end of last year. In August the 
non-payment knot was untied, but at the price of 25-30-percent 
inflation last autumn. 
  There were, of course, other reasons -- the technical loans 
to the neighboring countries, the cash ruble banknotes, which 
were transferred in innumerable amounts to the states of the 
ruble zone. Carrying out reciprocal setoff, however, was one of 
the most powerful creditogenic and emissionogenic factors. We 
carried out one reciprocal setoff. Ukraine carried out four of 
them. Did they solve any non-payment problem? No. It is as 
urgent as it was, remains and, apparently, will remain. The 
enterprise directors, considering the last four reciprocal 
setoffs, naturally hope that they will not be dropped in the 
abyss for a fifth time. Reciprocal setoffs are not the least of 
the reasons that the growth rates of inflation in Ukraine 
exceeded 40 percent a month in 1993. In September they had 
65-percent inflation, and early October estimates fluctuate 
within a range of 70-80 percent. That is, Ukraine has entered a 
stage of hyperinflation, in which it is not the solution of the 
non-payment problem which is regarded as of paramount 
importance, but the survival of the nation. 
  If we follow this path, we will repeat Ukraine's experience. 
After all, we now have a real possibility of achieving a 
reduction in the inflation growth rates. We began the year with 
30-percent inflation, in which in some weeks the price growth 
rate reached 12 percent. The technical mark of hyperinflation 
was close at hand. From this dangerous level, thanks to the 
government's consistent and basically restrictive monetary 
policy (which did not please the overwhelming majority of the 
people who were getting money), we emerged, in the second week 
of November, at a level of 2.3 percent. (The results would have 
been even more impressive if it had not been for the monetary 
reform, which caused an inflation splash.) 
  If the reciprocal setoff between enterprises is carried out 
all the same, then all the government's efforts to "beat down" 
inflation and all the sacrifices that society has made in the 
last two years will again come to naught. 
  In addition, engaging in reciprocal setoffs for non-payment 
between enterprises is destroying the producers' adaptation to 
the changing market structure, and is depriving them of 
objective criteria. Credit emission is changing their 
guidelines, and is inclining them toward the paternalistic 
support of the state. 
<H5>  The Problem of Payments with the Neighboring Countries </H5>
  The nature of non-payment among producers who are now 
foreigners to each other is analogous to that of the domestic, 
the Russian. Why do the enterprises of the CIS countries 
continue to supply goods to Russia without waiting for payment 
from their partners? Because they hope that sooner or later 
their expenses will be paid. Why do Russian enterprises not 
introduce pre-payment for their goods and in general do not 
count on it? Apparently, because they do not need these goods. 
It is also obvious that the enterprises themselves should solve 
the problems between them. The states, having established the 
general rules, do not have the right to interfere in their 
affairs. The main thing is that the payments pass through the 
RKTs [accounting-clearing center] on time. Here, the Central 
Bank must be given its due -- it has made great efforts to 
accelerate the passage of the payments. 
  Making settlements among the enterprises of the neighboring 
countries is intensifying, but the Central Bank has not solved 
another problem -- the lack of a mechanism to determine the 
exchange rates of national currencies in relation to the Russian 
ruble. 
  The Central Bank quotes the Lithuanian, Latvian and Estonian 
national currencies through the dollar. The exchange rate of the 
Ukrainian karbovanets is established at stock exchange marts. 
For a number of currencies of the neighboring states, however, 
the quotations are either not introduced at all (they include 
the Georgian kupon, the Azerbaijan manat), or are introduced at 
an artificially fixed level -- these are the Belorussian, Uzbek 
and Kazakh currencies. 
  "Floating" quotations, and market determination of the 
exchange rate of the currencies of our neighboring countries are 
vitally necessary. Otherwise, we will continue to subsidize 
these states due to an overstated currency rate of exchange. 
<H5>  Non-Payments and Structural Reorganization </H5>
  If an enterprise director is absolutely certain that no 
reciprocal setoff for non-payments is in the offing, and that he 
will receive no help or indulgence from either the government or 
from the Central Bank, he will stop supplying his goods "for 
air." Then he will be obliged to change the enterprise's policy: 
to cut back or completely curtail the output of goods for which 
he is not paid, and begin to produce things which will be sure 
to be paid for with real money. The producer will adapt to the 
market normally, and this will above all be manifested in 
structural changes in the economy. It is in this that the real 
sense of all reforms lies. 
  Let us face the truth: structural reorganization is, of 
course, accompanied by a rise in unemployment. You must pay for 
everything. Including with unemployment, for this sort of 
employment structure -- a copy of the production structure -- 
does not answer the market needs. Even if we have a 20-percent 
unemployment level in our country, we must remember that this is 
only one-fifth of the population. When, however, we support 
industry which does not meet the demands of the market through 
credit emission, reciprocal setoffs and subsidies, we have 
inflation, and 100 percent of the population suffers from it. 
  Paradoxically, it is also reassuring that, under the 
conditions of an economic recession, the production of a number 
of goods, mainly durable goods -- irons, microwave ovens, 
freezers and television sets -- is increasing, and for some 
items -- by 20-30 percent. This is a colossal increase by any 
measuring standards. At the same time, the production of 
combines and tractors is being cut back. This means that 
structural changes are taking place in a sector such as machine 
building, which has been sluggish all these years. 
  Do you know which sector is feeling the burden of 
non-payments least of all? The food sector. This is 
understandable: food products are paid for immediately. The 
growth rates of this sector in the course of this year have been 
2-3 percent. This is the first sector to emerge from the 
recession. 
  A whole sector and sub-sector (production of household 
electrical appliances, which is "seated" in machine building) 
emerged from the crisis, after carrying out structural 
reorganization. Why them, precisely? Because they stand nearest 
of all to the consumer market and detect all the demand 
fluctuations more quickly. Other sectors, however, representing 
the demand for raw material and completing items, will also 
gradually emerge from the crisis. 
  Structural reorganization of the economy is a process which 
will last for more than just a year and even for more than just 
a decade. It is a real art to sense the demands of the market 
and attune to it. Products that have not been paid for are among 
the visible signs of production non-competitiveness. Carrying 
out reciprocal setoff for non-payments will therefore only 
distort the pulse of the market and deprive the producer of a 
market guideline, which is not all that easy to find. 

<FIG ID=FBIS-USR-002C-34A>           Graph of Outstanding Indebtedness </FIG>


<FIG ID=FBIS-USR-002C-35A>           Graph of Outstanding Indebtedness </FIG>


<FIG ID=FBIS-USR-002C-35B>           Graph of Relative Proportion of Outstanding Indebtedness </FIG>


<FIG ID=FBIS-USR-002C-36A>           Graph of Relative Proportion of Outstanding Indebtedness </FIG>


<FIG ID=FBIS-USR-002C-36B>           Graph of Relative Proportion of Outstanding Indebtedness </FIG>


<FIG ID=FBIS-USR-002C-37A>           Graph of Outstanding Indebtedness </FIG>

&lt;/graphic&gt; 

&lt;/graphic&gt; 

&lt;/graphic&gt; 

&lt;/graphic&gt; 

&lt;/graphic&gt; 

&lt;/graphic&gt; 


</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61109 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> UKRAINE </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Chornovil Evaluates Place of Rukh </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0455A Ivano-Frankovsk HALYCHYNA in Ukrainian 7 Dec 93 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0455A </F>
<F P=104>  Ivano-Frankovsk HALYCHYNA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Ukrainian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Vyacheslav Chornovil, chairman of the </F>
People's Rukh of Ukraine, by Taras Zakharuk, under the rubric 
"Interview of Current Interest"; place and date not given: 
"Vyacheslav Chornovil: `The Main Point is To Ensure the Victory 
of National-Democratic Forces'"] 
  [Text] A lot, a whole lot, may be said and written 
about him--the acknowledged leader of, first, the 
national-liberation, and, later, the national-democratic 
movement; a politician who has ranked near the top of the list 
of most popular Ukrainian politicians in recent years according 
to the results of sociological surveys. However, today we are 
offering our readers an interview with the chairman of the 
People's Rukh of Ukraine rather than a narration about him--an 
interview that touches on all aspects of our extremely 
complicated life without skirting the most acute, most painful 
topics. 
  [Zakharuk] Vyacheslav Maksymovych, what are the 
peculiarities 
of the national-liberation movement at present, now that we 
allegedly have an independent state? 
  [Chornovil] First of all, we need to debunk the myth about 
the independent state. Ukraine is still not fully independent. 
We should refute the myth that the democrats are in power, that 
the Rukh is an extremist organization, and quite a number of the 
most varied fabrications. All of this should be done in a calm 
and balanced manner without pushing the people into some kind of 
social frustration, approximately the same way in which we 
avoided strikes. We supported the idea of a general strike for a 
single time when it was necessary to ensure a repeat election of 
the Supreme Council. At present, it is necessary to bring 
pressure to bear on the existing authorities through the most 
peaceful measures--first of all, in order not to ultimately pull 
Ukraine down because March, and the elections, are still far 
away. Second, to use all of our propaganda resources in order to 
debunk all these myths and ensure victory in the elections; 
third, to ensure the greatest possible unity of democratic 
forces after all. 
  [Zakharuk] On the point of unity: The national-liberation 
movement split once various parties were created on the basis of 
Rukh. Who can unite it again, how, and in what manner? After 
all, is it all that necessary to artificially unite if this 
process does not get underway by itself? 
  [Chornovil] Only very superficial politicians get nostalgic 
for the erstwhile Rukh and believe that it could have been 
preserved at the third or fourth congresses in the form in which 
it existed at that time. We managed to do what appeared 
impossible--we generally preserved Rukh, but in a somewhat 
different form. Please note that in no postcommunist country has 
a political organization in the form of Rukh circa 1990 lasted. 
Recently I received an invitation to the final congress of the 
People's Front of Estonia, which actually has already ceased to 
exist. However, parties that have evolved on the basis of the 
People's Front of Estonia gathered for the last meeting in order 
to pay due homage to the historical task it has accomplished. 
The situation in Latvia is the same. The Lithuanian Sajudis fell 
apart completely. Landsbergis has created a small party on its 
basis. Polish Solidarity also ceased to exist as a political 
association. 
  Nostalgia for the possibility of keeping together liberal 
communists and ultrarightists is a ludicrous illusion.... 
  [Zakharuk] And even a dangerous one. 
  [Chornovil] Yes, and dangerous. Contradictions would still 
poke out like an awl out of a sack. Finally, there was no unity. 
When Rukh was created, unity was to a certain degree maintained 
artificially. I now reread a stenographic record of the first 
congress and see what contradictions already existed 
then--contradictions between the presidium, which followed a 
sort of liberal, somewhat national-communist direction deferring 
to Kravchuk, and the auditorium, where anticommunist sentiment 
was already mounting and the issue of independence was being 
raised clearly. Therefore, this was an organization for a short 
period of time which--we do understand this--played a 
destructive role to a certain degree. It was destructive in the 
positive sense of the word--the breakup of the empire, the 
destruction of the communist system. Other organizations are 
needed to construct and create. Cooperation among them is a 
different matter. This is why Rukh was preserved in a completely 
different form. In general, this is a unique phenomenon. We have 
kept the structures, after all, we have kept mass membership and 
succeeded in making this into a centrist organization of a 
Christian-democratic, liberal-economic persuasion. So far, we 
have succeeded in doing something that no one else has succeeded 
at. If we succeed in holding on at this level for even a period 
of time, we will make Rukh into a regular party--not the kind of 
party that everyone here is accustomed to see, but an open-type 
party. We would like to create a political organization on the 
European or even American model. This is why our statute says 
"sociopolitical organization" and contains no mention of a 
party. This was foisted on us, foisted by a bad, imperfect law. 
  We have kept associate memberships and the status of 
supporters. Therefore, Rukh is something very different from the 
parties that exist here at present. However, we are no longer 
the Rukh we were in 1990, nor can we be. At present, people are 
saying: "Chornovil broke up Rukh, but unity could have been 
maintained." It could not have. 
  There already was a Republican Party in Rukh, there was a 
Democratic Party, and there was the right-to-left tug of war. 
This problem had to be resolved. 
  Is unity in general necessary? It depends which kind. A 
measure of agreement is needed, the ethics of a political 
struggle are needed, and definitely the notion of a common 
enemy, the notion of time and agreement on work, as well as 
coordination of actions. However, it is unrealistic to once 
again create some kind of organization with some kind of unified 
programmatic and statutory principles. Only people with poor 
knowledge of politics do that. 
  [Zakharuk] At a rally in Ivano-Frankovsk, Ukraine People's 
Deputy Dmytro Zakharuk brought forth the slogan: "If you left 
Rukh--go back to Rukh! If you were not in Rukh--go to Rukh!" 
This gained him a very malevolent character in the mind of local 
ultrapatriots. What do you think about this? 
  [Chornovil] Let them return to Rukh. To be sure, there are 
people who now belong to other, very different, ideological and 
political organizations. Having quit Rukh, they subscribe to 
other views and have a different vision of the methods of 
political struggle; in view of that, how can they return to 
Rukh? If their departure from Rukh was caused by 
misunderstandings on account of this ill-fated Supreme Council 
of Ukraine and the ambitions of some politicians, whom some 
people, failing to figure this out, followed, then our doors are 
always open. Please, let them come back. Why on earth is Rukh to 
be undone on the pretext that it is a public organization and 
those are not? What does a "public organization" do? It does 
more politicking than we do. 
  [Zakharuk] To what degree are you aware of information on 
the 
situation in our oblast? What is your evaluation of the actions 
of the former chief of the city Rukh organization, Borys 
Holodyuk? 
  [Chornovil] These are elements of ambition. They engage in 
some kind of commercial operations there. Since we were forced 
by legal requirements to register as a party--although I stress 
that we did not want to--the People's Rukh of Ukraine has no 
right to engage in commerce. This clearly did not satisfy the 
chairman of your city Rukh. Second, the element of ambition. A 
struggle for domination went on there, a struggle over who will 
be the top person. This is our terrible misfortune. At first, 
Holodyuk rushed there (to the Supreme Council of Ukraine--note 
by Taras Zakharuk). He was not particularly welcomed; he was not 
chosen to Larisa Skoryk's "cabinet"; so, giving up, he began to 
look for something else for himself. These "vagrant leaders" are 
our misfortune. You can see that he does not have any 
ideological platform, he is a "vagrant leader." 
  [Zakharuk] With whom from the upper echelons of power, both 
government and political power (in the parties, movements, and 
political organizations), have agreements been achieved on 
cooperation and unity during the forthcoming election? Who will 
the People's Rukh of Ukraine support and at what level? 
  [Chornovil] Cooperation and unity are somewhat different 
notions. You may have read our statement--we have come to an 
agreement with virtually everyone, of course, except for the 
extreme left and the extreme right. They have simply not 
responded to our appeals. I mean the UNA-UNSO [Ukrainian 
National Assembly-Ukrainian People's Self-Defense Forces] and 
the DSU [Ukrainian State Independence], which in each issue of 
their newspaper (NESKORENA NATSIYA--note by Taras Zakharuk) 
sling mud at Rukh and at me in particular. However, had they 
come too, we would have certainly not rejected them, at any 
rate, we would have given it some thought. We are not ambitious, 
and this, so to say, criticism does not annoy us much. The main 
point is to ensure the victory of national-democratic forces, to 
tear Ukraine out of the imperial noose, and to prevent its 
transformation into a communist Vendee. As far as offenses 
go.... My God, there are much more important things. 
  However, all of these are cooperation methods rather than, 
if 
we may say so, methods of complete unity. Full, complete unity 
is not possible, say, between New Ukraine and Rukh. It would be 
easier for us to find a common language with the KNDS [Congress 
of National-Democratic Forces], with the national democrats. 
However, they have other leanings. 
  Interestingly, it appears to me that if they were now given 
an opportunity they would likewise fail to introduce a market 
economy and would follow the course of firm regulation by the 
state. This is already being seen a little, although they 
maintain that they also support the middle class. However, these 
administrative elements are strongly displayed by some people. 
  For example, one KNDS person, whose name I do not want to 
give, said that these hearings ("Communism as a Dead End of 
Civilization"--note by Taras Zakharuk) are unnecessary. We 
should consolidate everyone, he said, and build the Ukrainian 
state together with the communists. We are looking for the enemy 
within, he said, whereas we have just one enemy--Russia. Nobody 
is saying that there are not certain anti-Ukrainian tendencies 
in Russia, and quite strong tendencies at that. I have recently 
been to Russia, talked to Stankevich (adviser to Boris 
Yeltsin--note by Taras Zakharuk), and I know that he is a man 
with imperial leanings. However, pardon me! Failing to see with 
whose hands these imperial tendencies may be carried out, and 
that for all of that this will be done from within rather than 
from without, that there may be attempts to tear Ukraine away 
from within by the same communist or neocommunist forces.... 
  They do not accept the notion "party of power," whereas we 
vigorously explain it. It does not matter whether one has signed 
up with the Communist Party again or not--this is the very same 
nomenklatura. 
  [Zakharuk] Recently, Leonid Kravchuk said on the program 
"The 
Echo of Russia's Choice" on Ostankino that left-wing forces will 
win elections in Ukraine and that he is not afraid of them, of 
these left-wing forces. [Chornovil] Why should a person who 
himself belongs to the left-wing forces be afraid of them? Why 
would the secretary of the Central Committee for ideology be 
afraid of left-wing forces? They say that Kravchuk said, as he 
spoke before kolkhoz chairmen not so long ago, that the "Group 
of 239" brought him to power, so what do you expect of him. This 
is a man with an absolutely communist view of the world; 
everything else amounted to the democracy game. That he 
allegedly wanted to draw on Rukh was a game--a game aimed at 
breaking up Rukh. 
  [Zakharuk] At present, we hear continuous whining almost 
everywhere: "It is bad, it is poor here. All of this is due to 
the disintegration of the Union, independence, and the fact that 
Rukh and the democrats are in power...." 
  [Chornovil] Perhaps only the blind fail to see that the 
democrats are not in power, to say nothing of Rukh. Certain 
people who until recently called themselves democrats are indeed 
trying to get somewhere; there also are our people at a certain 
level. However, this is not power. All of this is done 
deliberately. Nevertheless, those who are in power will always 
lose in an environment of terrible economic recession and 
impoverishment of the population. They want to ascribe to us 
being in power in order to win elections, for the same people 
who currently have power to win the elections and to remain in 
power.... 
  [Zakharuk] In this manner, certain political forces 
vigorously propagate the thought that totalitarianism and a 
dictatorship are needed for us to overcome the crisis.... 
  [Chornovil] Yes, although it will not accomplish anything. 
  [Zakharuk] Recently, Sergey Grigoryants, editor in chief of 
the GLASNOST magazine in Moscow, voiced the thought that the 
extreme left and the extreme right are on one side, and European 
liberalism and European democracy are on the other. 
  [Chornovil] You know, in Russia the extreme left has merged 
with the extreme right. They cannot merge here because our 
extreme rightists are advocates of statehood and patriots, after 
all, although perhaps there are "excesses" sometimes.... 
  [Zakharuk] However, Mr. Khmara very often votes the same as 
Comrade Moroz.... 
  [Chornovil] Yes. They cannot agree on the main point--on 
these imperial leanings. However, communists vote against 
concessions, and Khmara votes against concessions. This would 
amount to plundering Ukraine, he says. They do not understand 
that there is a large proportion of foreign capital in each 
civilized country. In America foreign investment amounts to 40 
percent; Japanese investments are particularly common. This 
boosts the economy of the state, enriches the budget, provides 
jobs, regular wages, and so on. 
  The thing that a concession is given for will not get away 
from us. It is located on our land. Someone will invest funds 
for us instead of us looking for them here. Certainly, not all 
of the returns will be ours. However, what is unusual about it? 
As a person gives, he should have something in return because 
nobody will give something for nothing. 
  So, they agree on some social points sometimes. However, 
there is one feature that will never allow to occur here that 
which occurred in Russia, when fascists and communists manned 
the barricades together. It is the independence of our Ukraine. 
  [Zakharuk] My final question. A response to it may be either 
very short or very long. The current Supreme Council is 
finishing its proceedings. How would you evaluate the activities 
of deputies-members of the People's Council during this period? 
  [Chornovil] In general, favorably. We sometimes have 
terrible 
arguments in the People's Council. However, when something 
decisive comes about, all of us, we might say, bristle. Recall 
January, recall some other points.... For example, the way we 
adopted the Declaration. After all, a group of patriotically 
minded people has come. They part ways on certain things. 
However, when it comes to business, Khmara is together with us, 
all of us are together. We even go and storm the rostrum. 
  In general, our minority has accomplished something that 
only 
a majority could do in a civilized society--it has laid the 
foundation of an independent Ukrainian state. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61110 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> UKRAINE </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Zhirinovskiy Win Not Cause for Concern </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0500A Lvov POST-POSTUP in Ukrainian No 46, 16-21 Dec 93 
p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0500A </F>
<F P=104>  Lvov POST-POSTUP </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Ukrainian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Oles Danylyuk: "Zhirinovskiy's Party Offers </F>
Ukraine One More Chance"] 
  [Text] The victory of the Liberal Democratic Party, 
led by admitted nationalist Zhirinovskiy, in the parliamentary 
election in Russia should have cooled the heads of those who 
rely not on force but on the 'good will' of our northern 
neighbor. 
  All major political forces in Ukraine, even Moscow-oriented 
ones, expressed their concern over Zhirinovskiy's victory. But 
this does not mean that no one in this country any longer looks 
to our Russian brethren. Probably both Kuchma and Grynyov are 
still counting on the Russian president, who was given enormous 
powers by the constitution which was approved on 12 December. It 
is even more probable, however, that Yeltsin will deliberately 
change his course in line with the results of the election: 
already, dissatisfaction with the Russia Choice presidential 
bloc has been heard from members of his inner circle. It is yet 
unclear how this change will affect the course toward the 
Interregional Reform Bloc set by the Kuchma-Grynyov duo, but it 
can be predicted with considerable certainty that the election 
in Russia took away Yeltsin's trump card: Russia's reformist 
image. 
  The extreme right-wing forces in Ukraine, on the contrary, 
welcomed the news of Zhirinovskiy's victory. They projected the 
Liberal Democrats' victory onto the situation in Ukraine and 
decided that they would have a very good chance of winning the 
parliamentary election here. True, they do not take into account 
that in one-seat districts the Liberal Democrats did not win a 
large number of seats. This brings one to the conclusion that in 
Russia, it was not the Liberal Democrats but Zhirinovskiy's gift 
as a public speaker that won the day. In Ukraine, the extreme 
right has not yet produced demagogues of Zhirinovskiy's caliber. 
Moreover, the core part of Vladimir Volfovich's program, the 
Russian national idea, is accepted by an absolute majority of 
Russians, whereas the basic Ukrainian national idea--Ukraine for 
Ukrainians from the San to the Don--does not have a mass 
following here. 
  Ukraine as a country will only gain from Zhirinovskiy's 
victory. Or, more precisely, it would win if it became more 
actively involved in Russia's domestic policy. First of all, 
Russia's autonomous entities are unhappy with both the new 
parliament, headed by Zhirinovskiy the unitarianist, and the new 
constitution, which lacks a clause on federalism. Their rights 
have been left up in the air, and it is easy to predict that the 
central government will try to curb them. It is doubtful that 
the republics will easily give back their powers to Moscow. On 
12 December, three republics refused to take part in the 
election. The friction between regions and the center are 
growing, and Vladimir Volfovich could become bogged down in 
endless actions to restore order within Russia itself. Hard work 
in this field will force him to limit his demands for Ukrainian 
territory to oral statements. 
  Second, despite Zhirinovskiy's victory, no one party won a 
majority in both chambers of parliament. A stable bloc of 
parties, which would have ensured a solid majority, would be 
very difficult to construct, given the ambitions of the Liberal 
Democrats' leader. A patchwork parliament would lose its way in 
squabbles and rivalries and would not be able to lead a 
well-functioning state. Lack of stable power in Russia would 
once again force it to spend more time on domestic troubles than 
on external expansion. 
  Third, the artificial dependence on Russia of the Ukrainian 
economy (in energy, components, etc.) would have weakened 
regardless of the results of Russia's election. It had been 
known long before that since the start of the new year Russia 
would be selling us energy at world prices, so that it would 
make no difference for Ukraine where to buy it. And, the rise of 
prices for Russian output has already effectively made it more 
profitable to buy components from major foreign companies, where 
they are not much more expensive but of much better quality. 
This approach would only benefit Ukrainian producers who, in 
order to save a penny, are now willing to sacrifice the quality 
of output. 
  Other arguments can be used to prove that there is nothing 
harmful for Ukraine in Zhirinovskiy's victory in the Russian 
election--if we have confidence in ourselves, of course. It now 
depends on ourselves what the victory of the Liberal Democrats 
will mean to us: victory or defeat. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61111 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> UKRAINE </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Presidential Service Evaluates Political Groups </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0501A Kiev NEZAVISIMOST in Ukrainian 22 Dec 93 p 5 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0501A </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NEZAVISIMOST </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Ukrainian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article, unsigned: "Divide and Rule: Are You for the </F>
President?"] 
  [Text] In recent past, we used to be asked: "Who is 
marching out of line?" Dissent, if it existed at all, was not 
welcome and was cut at the root. Thus, we should not blame 
universal conformity and unanimity on the lingering collectivist 
mentality. There used to be a well-oiled machine to ensure that 
the cogs served the system reliably. Remember those endless 
party staff meetings, party and economic leadership meetings, 
directives circularly and instructional seminars? 
  Apparently, the Presidential Service misses those 
unforgettable days of democratic centralism of the Communist 
Party, the time when those who carried out party and government 
policy diligently gathered in former Ordzhonikidze Street to 
hear the usual pep talk from the head of the department of 
propaganda and agitation. How else can you explain the 
appearance of this interesting document which fell into the 
hands of the NEZAVISIMOST? Here is the slightly abridged text of 
a directives circular sent out to local presidential 
representatives. We hope that the readers will draw their own 
conclusions. 
  In light of the Ukrainian Supreme Council decision to 
hold early Ukrainian Supreme Council and presidential elections 
in Ukraine, it has become necessary to analyze the current 
disposition of forces among the participants of the political 
process in Ukraine and to identify areas of possible cooperation 
with them during the election campaign. 
  The following citizens' organizations are the subject 
of study of this letter, drafted by the Presidential Service on 
Domestic Policy Issues: 
  political parties; 
  trade union organizations; 
  veterans' organizations; and 
  religious organizations. 
  The stated positions are not final and may change under 
the influence of circumstances. 
<H5>  Political Parties Before the Elections. </H5>
  At October 1993, the Ukrainian Ministry of Justice 
registered 
29 political parties. 
  Based on territorial division of political influence, 
political parties can be generally divided into three groups; 
  The first group consists of right-wing parties, 
the parties of the so-called national, nationalist and 
ultra-nationalist orientation, together with their satellite 
organizations; their influence extends to the western region 
(Ivano-Frankovsk, Ternopol, Lvov, Volyn and Rovno oblasts). 
  They are the Ukrainian Republican Party (URP), the Ukrainian 
Peasants Democratic Party, the Democratic Party of Ukraine, the 
Ukrainian Christian-Democratic Party, the Ukrainian National 
Conservative Party, the Popular Movement (Rukh) of Ukraine 
(V.Chornovol, leader), the civic and political organization 
National Movement (Rukh) of Ukraine (L.Skoryk, leader), the 
Christian Democratic Party of Ukraine, the Congress of Ukrainian 
Nationalists and the Ukraine National Independence. 
  In addition to the western region, the above-mentioned 
associations of citizens have smaller affiliates in central 
Ukrainian oblasts, whereas in eastern and northern regions their 
political potential barely rises above zero. 
  The other group is comprised of center and 
left-of-center parties whose activity and political influence 
cover the central region of Ukraine, as well as some eastern and 
northern oblasts. 
  They are the Green Party of Ukraine, the Party of Democratic 
Renewal of Ukraine, the Social Democratic Party of Ukraine, the 
Ukrainian Beer Lovers' Party, the Liberal Democratic Party of 
Ukraine, the Ukrainian Justice Party, the Ukrainian Solidarity 
and Social Justice Party, the Constitutional Democratic Party 
and the Labor Congress of Ukraine. 
  The remaining political parties have a left and 
radical left orientation. They include the Socialist Party of 
Ukraine, the Peasant Party of Ukraine, the Citizens' Congress of 
Ukraine and the Communist Party of Ukraine. They mainly dominate 
the eastern and northern regions, or share their influence there 
with local parties such as the People's Party of Ukraine 
(L.Taburyanskyy, leader), the Liberal Party of Ukraine (Donetsk; 
I.Markulov, leader), the Labor Party (Donetsk; A.Azarov, 
leader), the Party of Economic Renewal of the Crimea and the 
Party of Ukraine National Salvation (Dnepropetrovsk Oblast). 
  The main characteristic traits of the political 
parties' activity today are: 
  the dominant position and role of party leaders in defining 
the political course of each party and in the decision making 
process; 
  the dominant confrontational mentality resulting from the 
tough ideological and political struggle which is sustained by 
the parties themselves; and 
  the activity of the the political parties is concentrated 
exclusively around power structures and is not directed toward 
bolstering their popular support. It is limited to congresses, 
conferences, discussions of their own programs to overcome the 
crisis and reactions by means of statements and declarations to 
various events in the political process. 
  There are two main forms of party activity in the country: 
  a. rallies and demonstrations; and 
  b. opposition to local authorities, demands and attempts to 
replace them. 
  The relative strength of different political parties, their 
political behavior, their attitude toward main events of the 
political process in Ukraine and their attitude to the political 
course of the president provide the basis for 
differentiating among political parties from the point of 
view of the prospects for their cooperation with the 
president. Potentially open to such cooperation are parties 
of a moderate center-left orientation (the Green Party of 
Ukraine, the Social Democratic Party of Ukraine, the Labor 
Congress of Ukraine, the Ukrainian Justice Party and the Labor 
Party), as well as center parties (the Liberal Party of Ukraine, 
the Ukrainian Beer Lovers' Party, the Constitutional Democratic 
Party and the Ukrainian Solidarity and Social Justice Party). 
Excluded from this group are the Liberal Democratic Party of 
Ukraine and the Party of Democratic Renewal of Ukraine, whose 
leaders, having joined forced under V.Chornovol, have recently 
displayed a slant against the president. 
  Great difficulties are presented by the task of finding 
common ground with candidates and leaders of left-wing parties, 
such as the Communist Party of Ukraine, the Citizens' Congress, 
the Union of Ukraine Communists, the Socialist Party and the 
Peasant Party. At the same time, it should be noted that the 
political initiative of the president on the Economic Union of 
the CIS, as well as his position on the Masandra agreements, 
were welcomed by them and their affiliated organizations as a 
sign of the ability and willingness on the part of the president 
to display political will and assume the initiative and 
responsibility for resolving very difficult political problems. 
This also reduced the likelihood of attacks on the president 
from the left. Given the responsible change of political course 
by the president, certain goodwill on the part of left-wing 
political forces, in particular from the Socialist and Peasant 
parties, can be expected during the pre-election period. 
  The Rukh, the Ukrainian Peasant Democratic Party, the 
Christian Democratic Party of Ukraine and Memorial base their 
election platforms on opposition to the president; they should 
be considered as the core of a possible unified 
anti-presidential bloc on the right. 
  Ultra-radical nationalist groups, the Ukrainian Conservative 
Republican Party, the National Independence of Ukraine, the 
Ukrainian National Conservative Party and the Congress of 
Ukrainian Nationalists are moving toward opposition to the 
president. 
  The election campaign, which has in effect already begun, 
will cause changes in the structure of political blocs. It 
should be noted that the form and makeup of possible electoral 
blocs among parties at the regional level and at local centers 
may not always follow accords and agreements at the leadership 
level of those political parties. 
  Existing political parties have real influence on a 
relatively small portion of the electorate. For this reason, the 
election campaign will be informed by the actions of other 
political and economic groups: trade union organizations, 
associations of entrepreneurs and producers, economic managers 
and managers of the agricultural sector. 
<H5>  Trade Union Organizations </H5>
  Thirteen national trade union organizations exist in 
Ukraine. 
The largest of them is the Federation of Trade Unions of Ukraine 
(FPU), headed by O.M.Stoyan; it is comprised of 40 all-Ukrainian 
industry trade unions and 26 organizations from oblasts, the 
Crimean Republic, and the city of Kiev, as well as 
inter-industry (regional) associations. 
  Considering that the FPU has some 20 million members and 
possesses an extensive organizational network and considerable 
material and financial resources, it can be predicted that that 
trade union organization will have a considerable impact on the 
electoral campaign. Overall, the position of the FPU on the 
current government and political issues is moderate. 
  Unlike some other trade union associations and strike 
committees, the FPU in its activities does not go outside the 
law. Under pressure from grass-root organizations who want the 
FPU leadership to act more decisively in providing social 
protection to workers, the position of the FPU has become more 
radical in recent months. The second FPU congress, which took 
place at the end of August 1993. severely criticized the Supreme 
Council, the Cabinet of Ministers of Ukraine and the president 
for the policy of "robbery of the population." A resolution was 
approved demanding an early dissolution of the Supreme Council 
and a referendum (in September 1993) on the socio-economic and 
political structure of the state, on the form of state 
government and on the confidence (or no confidence) for the 
president of Ukraine. 
  The FPU welcomed the decision of the Supreme Council to hold 
early Supreme Council and presidential elections and considered 
them "to some degree satisfactory." 
  In the new Supreme Council, the FPU intends to create its 
own 
trade union faction. 
  The FPU pursues the policy of constructive cooperation with 
the structures of presidential authority both in the central 
government and locally. 
  However, leaders of some trade unions in the FPU have a 
determined, non-constructive attitude toward the president. 
  This primarily refers to trade union leaders in Odessa and 
Kharkov oblasts, the trade union leadership in the coal industry 
and some others. 
  The leaders of those trade union organizations are opposed 
to 
the current policy of the FPU and its leadership. 
  The FPU maintains contacts with political parties of 
different orientations, but as of now it has not yet concluded 
any agreements of cooperation in the election campaign with any 
of them. 
  It can be predicted that an active part in the election 
campaign will be played by the All-Ukrainian Association of 
Labor Solidarity (VOST), which has often supported political 
forces of the right. There are signs that that association, 
together with the Independent Trade Union of Ukraine Miners 
(NPG) and some other small trade unions, may join the coalition 
of political forces behind V.M.Chornovol and his supporters. 
  However, the latter trade unions have small membership and 
lack a broadly based organizational network, so that their 
influence in the regions in insignificant. 
  Leaders of the strike committees in the Donbass maintain 
their opposition to the president. At the same time, strike 
committee leaders have criticized the position of O.R.Mril, the 
head of the NPG, for his intent to ally himself with 
V.M.Chornovol. In the election campaign, the strike committees 
may support such political parties as the Liberals and Labor. 
Strike committee leaders intend to run for the Supreme Council 
themselves. 
  The position of the strike committees, due to their 
influence 
in the miners' collectives in Donetsk and Lugansk oblasts, will 
probably be reflected in the results of the elections in the 
Donbass. 
  The analysis of the situation in Ukraine trade union circles 
ahead of the election campaign suggests that the position of the 
trade union organizations will largely determine the results of 
both the Supreme Council and presidential elections. A strategy 
for the pre-election period should be developed with this in 
mind. 
<H5>  Veterans' Organizations </H5>
  Despite the lack of organizational unity among veterans' 
organizations in Ukraine, all those different groups and 
associations of veterans have absolutely identical political 
sympathies, with the exception of those who rally around the 
radical interpretation of the national idea. This similarity in 
evaluating socio-political processes in Ukraine reflects several 
factors; principal among them are common life history, tied to 
the building of "socialism" in the USSR and extreme financial 
difficulties experienced by older people. 
  However, when discussing the pre-election mood of older 
people, we should not overestimate their conscious 
adherence to various political forces. A highly defined 
political orientation is typical mainly to those veterans who 
are actively cooperating with the nationalist forces or who had 
been actively involved in the implementation of the "communist" 
idea. As a whole, the masses of veterans are open to a widest 
variety of political influences. 
<H5>  Religious Organizations </H5>
  The post-totalitarian period of development in Ukraine has 
been characterized by an extremely high level of politicization 
of the church. The existence of conflict situations between some 
religious organizations is being used by a variety of political 
forces and their leaders to further their own ends, which in 
effect informs the participation of the church in the election 
campaign. 
  In particular, the Congress of National Democratic Forces 
counts on the strong support from the Ukrainian Orthodox Church, 
Kiev Patriarchate; plus the Congress continues to rely on the 
Ukrainian Greek Catholic Church in Galicia, although with less 
certainty. Thus, attempts by some Congress leaders to establish 
the Ukrainian Orthodox Church, Kiev Patriarchate, as the 
national church, in fact a state church, make it doubtful that 
believers belonging to the Ukrainian Greek Catholic Church would 
continue to support that political movement. 
  The Ukrainian Orthodox Church, Kiev Patriarchate; the 
Ukrainian Autocephalian Orthodox Church and the Ukrainian Greek 
Catholic Church are the most politicized among religious 
organizations and they generally adhere to the ideas of radical 
nationalism. However, those religious organizations have only 
regional influence and make up only one third of all religious 
organizations, and even less than that in terms of the number of 
adherents. 
  The least politicized are such churches as the Ukrainian 
Orthodox Church (the largest in Ukraine in number of parishes 
and followers), the Protestant Church and the Roman Catholic 
Church. Religious organizations of ethnic minorities will most 
likely look to the left and center-left forces, which do not 
share the idea of establishing a single national church. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61112 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> UKRAINE </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Democrats Seen Minority in Next Parliament </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0454A Kiev NEZAVISIMOST in Russian 17 Dec 93 pp 1-2 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0454A </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NEZAVISIMOST </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Taras Stetskiv by Viktoriya Andreyeva; place </F>
and date not given: "Quo Vadis?..."] 
  [Text] It is this question that I would like to put to 
sober-minded politicians endeavoring to run for a new parliament 
to be elected in accordance with an inept, regressive law. 
  Romanticism is played out. And small joys have sped off 
together with it to some warm parts of recollections of the 
"dawn of democracy." Remember? There really is a choice (that 
is, choosing from several), and there they are, in the highest 
legislative body--our people (whoever is against "them" is a 
priori one of ours)--they are speaking, and no one is sending 
them down for doing so.... 
  The delights of the barbarian who has seen a telephone are 
fewish today. I call at the election headquarters of New 
Wave--an interparty independent association of professionals, as 
this group calls itself--that has just opened in Lvov. I see the 
faces of people whom I have reason to consider intelligent and 
decent, and I estimate that many of them have a chance of 
negotiating the election marathon successfully. 
  And then? After two years of what is considered de jure 
independence, merely obtaining a platform for the declaration of 
one's views in order subsequently to lose round after round, 
bearing part of the responsibility for senseless decisions, 
murderous for the state, is negligibly little. It is precisely 
this, however, that is before one's eyes and in one's 
recollections. And here once again, people are arguing until 
they are hoarse about programs, rejoicing in the grains of 
rationality in them. Grains doomed to fall on a land scorched by 
"Sovietness"? Or perhaps I am wrong, and it is simply the dark, 
cold December with prices inducing the temperatures of galloping 
tuberculosis that has bestowed the pessimism? 
  We are talking with Taras Stetskiv, a deputy at this time, 
one of those prepared to set out on the coming election voyage 
from New Wave. 
  [Andreyeva] A somewhat naive question, perhaps, but how many 
"head," how many persons, with whom reform steps could be 
defended were there in this Supreme Council? 
  [Stetskiv] No more than 60. I refer to those who not only 
employed slogans of independence and market reforms, but also 
knew how to do so. 
  [Andreyeva] Once again it is ridiculous, most likely, to 
speak about an arithmetical quantity, but how many bills that 
may be considered reform, progressive bills, were adopted by the 
Supreme Council? 
  [Stetskiv] Of the more than 120 bills that were adopted 
altogether, 25-30 may be deemed to afford scope for market 
reforms. And, despite their incomplete nature, it should be 
acknowledged that under Ukraine's conditions they afforded an 
opportunity for something to be done. The laws on privatization 
and securities and the stock exchange, concerning credit unions 
and stock companies and the amendments to the land code that 
legalized private property. All this, given the good will of 
parliament and, most important, given the good political will of 
the government, afforded an opportunity (not the best, but 
normal conditions) for the development of market reforms. 
  [Andreyeva] Something as ephemeral and nonmaterial as this 
good will itself was lacking, it has to be thought.... 
  [Stetskiv] The trouble is that this, in principle, very 
small 
legal foundation was not realized in the least. The government 
sought in the laws not what opens the way to reforms, but what 
affords an opportunity to block them. 
  [Andreyeva] So the blame for our situation today lies with 
the government (more precisely, the governments). And the 
Supreme Council? 
  [Stetskiv] To blame, without any doubt. Another example of 
such a quantity of inconsistent steps is hardly to be found in 
contemporary history among the European revolutions that ousted 
communism. One market law would be adopted, the next, 
antimarket. One declares privatization by way of auction, a 
second determines the path of privatization via leasing. This is 
an indicator of the lack of professionalism of the Supreme 
Council and the absence of a conceptually defined path. Thus, 
not a single consistent reform action has been implemented in 
the two years of independence in Ukraine. 
  [Andreyeva] Consequently, the real use factor of the group 
of 
reformers within parliament is about zero. We will not today, if 
you do not mind, speak about the propaganda effect. We will 
recall the bitter pictures of defeats: All arguments are 
exhausted, and the majority--the reliable "voting machine"--has 
once again ridden roughshod over the shoots of what is new. Nor 
do we have far to go--I recall the face of Sergey Holovatyy as 
he came into the corridor following the adoption of the latest 
retrograde article of the Election Act.... 
  [Stetskiv] Yes, this was a defeat. It showed once again that 
there can be no accords or preliminary gentlemen's agreements 
with the communist majority: It has broken them all. 
  [Andreyeva] When cursing this act and harvesting its fruit, 
people will say: "Parliament adopted this." Consequently, part 
of the responsibility is borne by everyone. 
  [Stetskiv] No. As far as the Election Act is concerned, the 
democratic part of parliament, the People's Council, ceased 
taking part in the voting after the adoption of the notorious 
Article 24. 
  [Andreyeva] But the act has been adopted.... 
  [Stetskiv] Yes, the act has been adopted, and, as in any 
state based on the rule of law, we will submit to it and run in 
accordance with it. 
  [Andreyeva] And on what part of the progressively thinking, 
reform-minded members of the new parliament can we count? 
  [Stetskiv] This might seem somewhat romantic, but on 
one-third, about 130-150 persons, I believe. 
  [Andreyeva] Your forecast is quite optimistic; on what do 
you 
base this optimism? 
  [Stetskiv] On a particular analysis. First, I can in 
descending order of chances, so to speak, name the three main 
forces that will play a part at these elections: the "power 
party," the corps of directors, and the interests of private 
business. Second, even at the most critical moments of its 
existence, society does not elect a large percentage of 
marginals of both a communist and nationalist persuasion. 
Marginals are of no benefit to any of the above-mentioned three 
forces, and they will all try to promote those of a more or less 
centrist frame of mind. Only the corps of directors and the 
power party will rely on people whose thinking tilts in the 
direction of the preservation of state property, and private 
property will support those who are more explicitly oriented 
toward capitalism. Thus the center, constituting the main part, 
will be divided into two groups. 
  [Andreyeva] We have already had something similar. If it is 
considered that private business is weaker than the other forces 
mentioned, the groups will be unequal. The difference in 
interests has already produced an inconsistency, which we spoke 
of earlier, which has jerked society around. Are you, who put 
yourself among the reformers, not afraid of once again being in 
the obscure minority? 
  [Stetskiv] This cannot be ruled out. But it seems to me that 
the new parliament will be, if not by much, better. It is worth 
going to the polls, worth voting, even for this. If we elect no 
one, we will get dictatorship. As regards obscure opposition. It 
seems to me that the confrontation in the new parliament will 
differ from the confrontation in the previous one: In the 
present one the contradictions of the opposition and the 
majority have been of an ideological nature; in the next one, 
they will assume an economic nature. 
  [Andreyeva] It is hard to believe that things will get 
easier 
thanks to a change in the nature of the confrontation, and in 
such a vital direction, what is more. 
  [Stetskiv] The point is that the contradictions will not be 
implacable. The struggle will be conducted over the pace and 
direction of the reforms. After all, even the body of state 
directors understands that it is no longer possible to preserve 
everything as it is. The contradiction will be between the 
supporters of a quiet drift in the direction of capitalism, into 
which it is desirable for them to ride, high up on their 
sluggish camel, and the supporters of this form or the other of 
shock therapy capable of producing a visible result. 
  [Andreyeva] Nonetheless, the last question from a pessimist, 
of whose role today, judging by my frame of mind, I will not 
manage to rid myself. What if there is once again a blank 
confrontation? The nerves of the members of the opposition at 
the microphones, the withdrawals and arrivals, sundry demarches 
(there is nothing left, after all), and the next day we read the 
text of the latest law, pushing the country toward ruin? What, 
in your view, should be the actions of people today heading for 
parliament with the best of intentions? 
  [Stetskiv] If it is like this, the sole opportunity for the 
market opposition is to put the emphasis on the presidential 
elections. To try to realize the alternative of a decisive 
reformer president. If this is unsuccessful, there will be 
distressing times for Ukraine. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61113 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> UKRAINE </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Journalists Charge TV Censorship </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0502A Kiev NEZAVISIMOST in Russian 22 Dec 93 pp 1-2 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0502A </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NEZAVISIMOST </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Vasiliy Anisimov and Oleg Markevich: "Toughening </F>
Political Censorship on Ukrainian Television.... The Year of 
Censorship"] 
  [Text] It must be confessed that this kind of action 
from the television journalists was expected. Like Kim Il-song 
in spirit and form, national television has long since become 
just as exotic in our country as the picturesque canvases of the 
socialist realists. Who just in recent years has not "collided" 
with Ukrainian television, starting with Prime Minister L. 
Kuchma and ending with rank and file television viewers. But in 
vain! The reigning nomenklatura is guarding the stronghold of 
information supremacy and influence on the popular masses like 
the apple of its eye. But now, on the eve of the elections, the 
party in power, in the words of A. Lavrinovych, is trying to 
take the entire information space under its control, which is 
why political censorship is being toughened, but where its 
opportunities are limited--an economic noose is used. 
  Patience ran out at the Gart youth studio. Incidentally, the 
same one to which we are obligated for the rare and really 
talented programs that appear on UT-1 [Ukrainian Television-1]. 
As a sign of protest, the collective of the editorial office 
last Friday came out with this announcement right on the air: 
  "1. Censorship has been introduced on Ukrainian television. 
  "2. In particular, the "Gart Youth Studio," which has always 
tried to speak to you honestly and frankly, became an object of 
pressure today on the part of the leadership of the State 
Television and Radio Broadcasting Company. 
  "3. At first, your right to receive full television 
information was taken away from you, and now our right to speak 
honestly from the screen is being withdrawn. 
  "4. Recently, critical materials concerning the situation in 
the state were removed in the programs of our editorial 
offices--'Business Report' and 'Gart Youth Studio.' The program 
'Fanton' has disappeared from the air. 
  "5. `In a society in which the freedom of speech does not 
exist, it makes no sense to talk about any kind of other 
freedoms.' This is not our quote. 
  "6. We are warning that everything is being prepared in 
state 
television and radio broadcasting so that the reform forces do 
not receive access to the air during the coming election 
campaign. The sad experience of our Gart is evidence of this. 
  "7. Aware of what awaits us after going on the air (possible 
dismissal from state television), we are deliberately taking 
this step (going on the air with the announcement) as 
journalists who want to preserve the honor of their profession. 
  "8. Therefore, the 'Gart Youth Studio' demands that the 
leadership of the State Television and Radiobroadcasting Company 
create conditions of work for the journalists that are generally 
accepted in a democratic society. 
  "9. Everyone who watches and knows us--if you are with 
us--we 
are relying on your support." 
  After this, materials came out on the air that were 
prohibited by the leadership of UT-1 from being shown. The 
journalists who were invited to the studio became witnesses to 
numerous telephone calls in which viewers expressed warm support 
for the courageous act of the journalists. They were joined by 
the employees of other editorial offices and services at 26 
Kreshchatik Street. 
  On the next day at a conference of the Independence 
journalists trade union, Viktor Pavlyuk, the editor in chief of 
the program for youth, said: "It is senseless to talk about 
freedom of speech on state television. The leadership is being 
arbitrary, taking refuge in the fact that Ukrainian Television 
is a governmental and presidential structure. We are deprived of 
the right to speak honestly and frankly from the screen. And we 
really envy our colleagues from the independent newspapers for 
whom the time of censorship is in the past. We have 
censorship--this is not only the removal of materials and 
episodes, it is contained in all of the organizational activity 
of the television company. If, for example, out of a dozen 
editorial offices of our television, each had had an opportunity 
to express its point of view on the GKChP [State Committee for 
the State of the Emergency], then the people of Ukraine would 
have heard at least several different opinions, but not 
disgraceful silence. Freedom for the editorial office and 
freedom for the journalists is all that we are trying to get." 
  "We wanted our own hour on the air," said Dmitriy Tuzov, a 
Gart journalist, "to make it so that it would not be like UT-1. 
It is not for me to tell you what kind of television channel 
that is. You yourselves see: It is done in such an impotent way 
that, in principle, it is impossible to watch it without tears. 
However, this hour also stuck in the craw of the leadership." 
  Yelena Prygova, the studio editor, was even more 
categorical: 
"We are not cattle, which the former party workers and the 
current leaders of the television company are trying to make us 
out to be. We created this television and are proud of our work. 
We are citizens, we are journalists, and we will stand to the 
end." 
  There is no need to guess what the reaction has been of 
Messrs. Okhmakevych and Kulik, the leaders of the teleGULAG, to 
the demarche of those desiring freedom for the journalists. It 
has already been recommended to Viktor Pavlyuk that he write a 
resignation statement. There has been criticism of other Gart 
employees. However, it will hardly be possible on the sly to 
give short shrift to the "rebels" (the statement was signed by 
18 persons; that is, almost the entire editorial staff). 
Speaking in support of the Gart protest against the violation of 
the freedom of speech in Ukraine were leaders of the executive 
committee of the Free Trade Unions of Ukraine, well-known 
political and public figures--V. Yavorivskyy, V. Chornovil, A. 
Lavrinovych, L. Lukyanenko, O. Omelchenko--and the Fund for the 
Independent Press of Ukraine. Deputy Vorobyev spoke in 
parliament regarding Gart, and N. Spis, the chairman of the 
commission on questions of openness and the mass media, advised 
N. Okhmakevich not to adopt repressive measures. But the 
question is, what is left for the latter to do? After all, give 
journalists freedom, and it is hardly likely that any will 
voluntarily want to sing prayers of praise to the president.... 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61114 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> UKRAINE </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   New Business-Oriented Party Formed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0459A Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA in Russian 11 Dec 93 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0459A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Report by Vladimir Skachko: "Culmination of Stratification </F>
of the Nomenklatura: Gromada--New Political Party of Business 
Managers"] 
  [Text] The constituent congress of a new political party 
called the All-Ukraine Gromada Association (VOG), which marked, 
it may be said, the culmination of the process of stratification 
of the Ukrainian nomenklatura, has been held. The reason for 
this was the varying degree of recognition of new economic 
interests, and the coming parliamentary and presidential 
elections have been the motive for the structuring of 
nomenklatura groupings. The former middle tier of the Soviet 
nomenklatura which has something to lose in Ukraine and which 
concentrated its capital locally, having invested it in the 
industry of the regions, has, according to the delegates to the 
congress, united in the VOG. They described themselves as 
industrial workers who have "preserved property" and authority, 
know how to work, and wish to openly avail themselves of the 
results of their labor and afford the rest of their fellow 
citizens an opportunity to make an honest living. The VOG's 
newly elected leaders explain the desire to unite in an 
independent political party for participation in the elections 
by the fact that political parties that could satisfy their 
interests are lacking in the republic at this time. The VOG 
declared at the final news conference of the congress that it 
intended to nominate its candidates for people's deputy and also 
intended to support people with similar views, if there are 
such. An adviser to the present Ukrainian Government, Aleksandr 
Turchinov, who, confirming the opposition nature of his 
organization, declared that he had resigned from the Cabinet of 
Ministers of Ukraine, was elected leader of the VOG. He declared 
also that the VOG "was created not on the strength of leaders 
but in adaptation to a program" and that, consequently, it had 
nothing in common with the recently organized bloc of Vladimir 
Grinev and Leonid Kuchma. 
  The VOG program, which consists of two sections--Salvation 
and Development--may unequivocally be characterized as liberal 
in the strictest pragmatic version. The summary statement of the 
VOG on the program's main task says: "To introduce in practice a 
program for the salvation and development of Ukraine, which 
means: the lowest taxes on the territory of the CIS, the best 
investment climate and the biggest privileges for exporters in 
the CIS, civilized privatization, the structural reorganization 
of the economy, the surmounting of inflation, and the effective 
social protection of the population." Aleksandr Turchinov added 
at the news conference one further program point of considerable 
importance--the legalization of all sums of capital, other than 
criminal capital obtained from the sale of narcotics and 
weapons, racketeering, robbery, and so forth. Only shadow 
capital that is not legalized within a strictly established 
timeframe would, according to the VOG program, be subject to 
confiscation. 
  Among other measures, the VOG proposes, in particular, the 
establishment of a single value-added tax at a rate of 10 
percent and a profits tax of 25 percent, the establishment of 
the maximum rate of a differentiated personal income tax at 30 
percent, and the abolition of all restrictions and fines for 
wage increments. The VOG supports the customs-free, 
license-free, and quota-free exports of Ukrainian finished 
products in the pursuit of a strict protectionist policy, the 
creation of free economic zones, the priority privatization of 
insolvent enterprises, and so forth. 
  The strict introduction of the rule of law and observance of 
legality and the creation of efficient professional armed forces 
and law enforcement authorities is one of the points of the VOG 
program. But Sergey Lylyk, chief political scientist of the 
organization, rejected the possibility of the imposition of a 
state of emergency in Ukraine and declared that such a step 
would be a national catastrophe for Ukraine since "the country 
has neither a program of activity under state of emergency 
conditions nor a team to realize it." At the same time Sergey 
Lylyk declared that his organization would fight the imposition 
of a state of emergency by any means. One of his associates 
added: "By any constitutional methods." It should be mentioned 
also that the possibility of the imposition of a state of 
emergency in Ukraine was also rejected the same day at a news 
conference by Vyacheslav Chornovil, the leader of Rukh 
[Ukrainian People's Movement for Perestroyka] and a member of 
parliament, and it would seem that the rumors of a state of 
emergency in Ukraine have thus far been exaggerated. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61115 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> UKRAINE </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Yevtukhov Discusses Development of Entrepreneurship </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0506A Moscow DELOVOY MIR in Russian 23 Dec 93 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0506A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow DELOVOY MIR </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Vasylyy Ivanovych Yevtukhov, deputy prime </F>
minister, Ukrainian Cabinet of Ministers, by Valentin Khalin, 
special correspondent: "Our Entrepreneurs Must Be Free To Handle 
Both Money and Business on Their Own"] 
  [Text] Valentin Khalin, our special correspondent in 
Ukraine, interviews Vasylyy Ivanovych Yevtukhov, deputy prime 
minister, Ukrainian Cabinet of Ministers, on the development of 
entrepreneurship in Ukraine. 
  [Yevtukhov] The overall picture in our country is as 
follows. 
Last year we observed a precipitous growth of entrepreneurial 
structures; it amounted to a factor of 2.6 as compared with the 
preceding year. This includes the following growth factors: in 
industry--2.3, construction--1.9, trade, public dining and food 
services, as well as wholesale and middleman-type operations, 
or--to put in more succinctly--in the trade group--4.9, and in 
the finance-credit and insurance sphere--4.6. As a rule, these 
are medium- and small-sized enterprises; despite such a 
precipitous growth, the number of employees in them increased by 
a factor of only 1.4. 
  This year there has been a decline in the growth rate of 
small enterprises. There are several reasons for this. One of 
them is the fact that many private entrepreneurs overestimated 
their own powers and possibilities. At first everything 
proceeded quite easily: They registered their own businesses, 
obtained licenses, current enterprise accounts, seals or stamps, 
and other requisites--all without any red tape. But then, in the 
words of the old proverb: "It was smooth going on paper, but 
they forgot about the ravines." Because, of course, even the 
most capable and bold-spirited businessmen bear upon themselves 
the brand of that leveling-mandatory distribution system which 
all of us have been striving--with very great difficulty--to 
break away from. I do not mean to say that such "owls" are 
talentless people. On the contrary, among our businessmen there 
are many, many imaginative and clever persons who can "spot" 
their Western partners a hundred points. And it's a well-known 
fact that when one of our fellow-countrymen was in the United 
States, he noticed a price differential of only half a cent per 
gallon on gasoline between two neighboring states; and he was 
able to make some good money by using this knowledge. His 
American colleagues could only spread their hands wide in 
amazement; here was a profit which had slipped right through 
their fingers. Most of our home-grown entrepreneurs, however, 
are taking just their first steps in business. They are still 
basically used to a kind of tutelage or guardianship: Give them 
this and provide for that. And take, for example, the 
psychological pressure from the people around them--people who 
have created an aura of criminality around the entrepreneurs. It 
must be admitted that one does occasionally encounter 
money-grubbing self-seekers and tricksters among them, 
but--taken en masse--they are persons with initiative, persons 
who every day take the risk of losing everything which they have 
earned so far. 
  However, I have digressed from the main point. On the whole, 
the situation is really not too gloomy. During the present year 
[1993] production at the state-owned enterprises declined, 
whereas in the nonstate sector of the economy it has doubled. 
Labor productivity is growing at small enterprises, marking time 
at collective enterprises, and sharply declining at state-owned 
enterprises. In my opinion, these indicators speak for 
themselves: We must open up a wide expanse for private 
initiative. 
  [Khalin] Do you mean, Vasylyy Ivanovych, that the decisive 
word lies with privatization, and that it needs to be given a 
helpful push, as is now being done in Russia? 
  [Yevtukhov] Privatization is not a panacea for all our ills, 
but rather only one of the means for enhancing the efficiency of 
our fixed capital. Yes, the Ukrainian government is in favor of 
privatization, but not for one and all--not in any blanket 
sense. Take, light industry, for example; It gives a quick 
payback to the service sphere, and this proceeds less painfully. 
But in heavy industry--for example, in the metallurgical and 
chemical industries--we must approach this matter more 
carefully: Here we should begin with the subdivisions and 
individual units. One would not privatize a blast-furnace shop, 
but you could do so in the case of a transportation shop 
connected to it. The same thing pertains to management 
structures. Take the West, for example. There the steel-foundry 
branch is a state-run sector, whereas management is private. 
What I mean to say is the following: In each case it is 
necessary to seek out the optimum forms of combining interests. 
On the one hand, to develop private entrepreneurship, while--on 
the other hand, to demonopolize production, to make it 
competitive, flexible, and easily manageable. 
  In short, I am for a selective, smooth, gradual process. To 
my opponents, who zealously insist on "speeding things up," on 
transferring Western models to our soil, I cite the following 
argument: If Western models were mechanically transposed to our 
realities, things would turn out as they did in the case of 
Disneyland in France. Remember how many delighted exclamations 
there were: The American "Land of Dreams" right near Paris! But 
what happened? It was almost an embarrassingly awkward 
situation. The public did not exactly flock to Disneyland in 
droves. For the skeptical, rationally minded Frenchman a 
"dream"--as the saying goes--is something fit for lightbulb; he 
has another way of life, another set of values. 
  This example, of course, is somewhat abstract or even 
farfetched. I simply want to point out that privatization will 
work better if it conforms to our customs, habits, and--in the 
final analysis--to our predilections. 
  [Khalin] How is this to be achieved in practice? What is 
being done by the Ukrainian government in order to develop 
entrepreneurship? 
  [Yevtukhov] A long-term State Program has been approved for 
supporting entrepreneurship. It provides financial, legal, 
informational, and educational-methodological assistance 
primarily to those who are capable of breathing life into the 
priority spheres of economic activity: processing and storing 
agricultural products, construction and the construction 
industry, as well as innovations. This work is being coordinated 
by the Ukrainian State Committee for Assisting Small Enterprises 
and Entrepreneurship (Goskompredprnimatelstvo). Within this 
committee a National Fund for Supporting Entrepreneurship and 
Developing Competition has been created. It is being financed 
both from the budget as well as by funds from the entrepreneurs 
themselves. 
  We are paying a great deal of attention to forming a 
normative base, along with a financial and tax policy for the 
nonstate sector of our economy. Draft laws on small business, 
licensing, commercial secrets, and a number of other matters 
have been submitted to the parliament for examination and 
consideration. 
  The goal of this program is to give a new impulse to 
unleashing business initiative so that it may become a 
noteworthy force in the economy. As of today, 50,000 small 
enterprises, 10,500 cooperatives, and 15,000 private farms are 
producing 10-12 percent of our national product. By the year 
1995 the number of entrepreneurial structures will reach 
300,000, that is to say, it will more than triple. There will 
also be a corresponding increase in their proportionate share of 
the national product. 
  [Khalin] Would you kindly tell us, Vasylyy Ivanovych, how 
economic ties with Russia are being built up on the level of 
small enterprises, and what kind of a line is being maintained 
here by the Ukrainian government. 
  [Yevtukhov] We are in favor of openness and mutually 
profitable cooperation. It is not important where capital is 
invested just so long as it operates in the interests of the 
entrepreneur and the state. The main thing is not to interfere 
in how people handle money and business. By increasing his own 
income and wealth, a businessman also enriches his own country, 
provided that he pays the correct amount of taxes. Therefore, we 
are in favor of minimal regulations with regard to economic 
ties: Let the entrepreneur himself seek out profitable direct 
ties. Naturally, no barbed wire along our border with Russia is 
needed just so long as the existing customs agreements are lived 
up to. They allow us to fix and calculate goods turnover, tax 
revenues, distribute and pay back credits, and so forth. 
  By my education and previous work experience I am a 
technical 
person. Therefore, I know the following: When a complex 
electronic system gets out of order (and this may be extended by 
analogy to the former Soviet Union), its adjustment and 
fine-tuning proceed unit by unit. This is also the case with 
regard to the bilateral ties between Ukraine and Russia. We must 
meet each other halfway, including in the development of 
entrepreneurship, set up and fine-tune mutually advantageous 
"units" of ties, strengthen them, and the main thing--let me 
repeat--is not to interfere in the unleashing of business people 
themselves, not to surround them with a petty kind of tutelage. 
A narrow-minded business attitude is not tantamount to an 
efficient, businesslike approach. 
  [Khalin] One last question, Vasylyy Ivanovych. The Ukrainian 
press, as well as numerous forums of business circles, have been 
sharply critical of the government for the disintegration of the 
economy, the unbridled inflation, and so on. Do you have a 
specific program for getting us out of this crisis? 
  [Yevtukhov] Yes, I do. And as to the criticism, can you name 
me even one state in the world where there are no dissatisfied 
people? We place great hopes on the coming year. We will have 
elections to the parliament, and--to my way of thinking--in our 
contacts with the legislative branch we will give a new impulse 
to the reforms and start to enter into a market economy at a 
more rapid pace. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61116 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94020" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> UKRAINE </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Finance Ministry, National Bank `Manipulate' Budget Figures </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0511A Kiev VECHERNIY KYYIV in Ukrainian 22 Dec 93 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0511A </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev VECHERNIY KYYIV </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Ukrainian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Stanislav Babkin: "Economics: Either the Finance </F>
Minister Cooks the Figures, Or the Budget Is Very Flighty"] 
  [Text] The official figures of the Ministry of 
Finance claim that after 10 months of this year the revenue 
portion of the consolidated budget (in constant prices) rose by 
321 percent while expenditures rose by 317 percent. The 
consolidated budget deficit equalled K2 trillion, or 11 percent 
of revenues. 
  Similar reports used to be prepared before party congresses, 
to account before the people. The Ukraine budget already 
resembles a whore supported by officials of the Ministry of 
Finance and the National Bank, who share her among themselves as 
entities invested with government status. But facts are stubborn 
things: it is well-known that the budget deficit no longer 
includes the shortfalls of the local budgets which hide a system 
of direct subsidies, of many trillions in loans to loss-making 
industries which are provided without any guarantees of being 
repaid during the given time period and of refinanced credits 
from the National Bank which are not counted as government debt. 
This alone allows them to manipulate the figures as they wish. 
For example, here are the results for the unconsolidated 
(government) budget for the first 10 months: revenues rose by 
303 percent, while expenditures by 352 percent. The budget 
deficit of K5.713 trillion was covered by National Bank credits 
amounting to K8.465 trillion. The result: revenues surpassed 
expenditures by K2.752 billion. 
  In the West, similar falsifications of facts would have 
served as the basis of a new Watergate, but in Ukraine budget 
deficits are written off year after year, while trust for the 
minister of finance has not diminished. 
  Today, the Ministry of Finance is the second, after the 
National Bank, inflationary center. The latter, however, does 
not react in any way, since it still gets the seigneurage 
revenues which accrue to it from printing money. (This year, it 
is 240 percent.) Thus, by distorting the free-market principles 
of monetary policy, these two naturally antagonistic entities, 
with the help of the budget, are playing their game. By the way, 
the attack by the people's deputies on managers of commercial 
banks, who supposedly receive tens of millions of karbovanets in 
salaries, would fully apply to the management of the National 
Bank, who get just as much. But to count other people's money is 
an ungrateful task. The Ministry of Finance proved this, having 
declared at the start of December that the consolidated deficit 
is headed for K20 trillion. For this reason, it was decided to 
bolster the budget by raising prices by 70 percent in a month, 
banning banking entities from providing credits, etc. But will 
it be enough? Independent economists calculate that this year 
inflation will reach 6,400 percent. It seems that the National 
Bank will keep printing money for a long time to come. By the 
way, this is how the current budget started. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61117 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94021" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> UKRAINE </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Progress in Privatization of Lvov Viewed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0457A Lvov POST-POSTUP in Ukrainian 9-15 Dec 93 p b4 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0457A </F>
<F P=104>  Lvov POST-POSTUP </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Ukrainian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Dzvinka Novakivska and Petro Zemlyanyy, </F>
Professional League advertising and information agency: "Taras 
Pakholyuk: 'Minor Privatization in Lvov Will Be Completed in the 
Middle of 1995'"] 
  [Text] Thanks to Taras Pakholyuk, chairman of the FKM 
[Communal Property Fund] of the city of Lvov, it was resolved in 
Kiev, at a conference of chairmen of the FKM's of Ukraine, to 
establish the Association of Chairmen of Privatization Organs of 
Ukraine. The privatization organs of local councils are seeking 
in this manner to neutralize the pressure brought to bear on 
them by the FDMU [Fund of State Property of Ukraine]--a 
structure of the Cabinet of Ministers, i.e. of executive power. 
In an exclusive to Business P-P, Taras Pakholyuk commented on 
the situation personally. 
  In the words of Taras Pakholyuk, the main task of the 
conference in Kiev was to develop joint proposals concerning 
more intensive conduct of minor privatization for the supreme 
echelons of power--the president, Cabinet of Ministers of 
Ukraine, Supreme Council of Ukraine, and the FDMU. At the 
seminar quite a number of obstacles were revealed which 
interfere with the regular course of minor privatization as a 
result of ill-constructed regulatory documents which were 
confirmed at the level of the FDMU and the Cabinet of Ministers 
of Ukraine. FKM chairmen set up a working group which drew up a 
package of proposals concerning privatization for confirmation 
by the supreme echelon. 
  Taras Pakholyuk proposed to create a coordinating organ to 
"push" these proposals in Kiev because a paper "without the 
footwork" will clearly not work effectively enough. Everyone was 
prompted to do so by the experience of the previous seminar at 
which, all the efforts of the chairmen of local funds 
notwithstanding, neither Volodymyr Pylypchuk, chairman of the 
commission of the Supreme Council of Ukraine, nor the FDMU 
leadership responded to the joint decisions of FKM chairmen in 
any way. For this reason, some of the proposals were included in 
the new package (nothing changed in half a year). The idea to 
establish the Association of the Privatization Organs of Ukraine 
was supported, and a resolution in this regard was passed. 
Statutory documents will be presented on 8-9 December in Odessa, 
at an international conference on privatization in Ukraine, 
where the resolution of all organizational issues will be 
completed, and, in particular, regulations on the association 
will be confirmed and the association will be registered. Taras 
Pakholyuk expects that a support group will be created in the 
Supreme Council with help from the association as early as this 
term. This, in a way, will be a lobby which will operate on the 
principle of the Union of Ukrainian Lessees. 
  Responding to a question from the correspondent of Business 
P-P on whether this organ will turn into a self-contained 
structure, Taras Pakholyuk answered that it will not, because 
financing will be provided directly by the FKM's. That is to 
say, they will directly control the actions of the association 
and pay only if the work of the association is beneficial for 
the FKM's. 
  At the same time, Taras Pakholyuk rejected accusations 
against the local FKM's to the effect that the desire of the 
funds to maintain independence from the center was the main goal 
of the creation of the association. He is convinced that the 
independence of the FKM's, and the local organs of 
self-government in general, is guaranteed by Ukrainian 
legislation. "That is to say, we are sufficiently independent to 
begin with; for this reason, we are not afraid that someone will 
be able to subordinate us. It is just that at the seminar 
itself, after getting acquainted with the chairmen of the FKM's, 
one could conclude that their interest in conducting 
privatization exceeds that of the FDMU considerably; at least if 
we analyze approaches to privatization by the FDMU and the local 
organs, a substantial difference leaps out at us. The FDMU 
defends mainly the buyout of enterprises by labor collectives 
and the establishment of privately held joint-stock companies, 
that is, privatization strictly for labor collectives. At the 
same time, the FKM's of Ukraine hold both auctions and 
commercial competitions; accordingly, more funds are taken in, 
and the effectiveness of privatization is high. Through 
competition, property ends up with an effective potential owner 
who is interested in the greatest possible returns from 
production." 
  According to Taras Pakholyuk, the FDMU is directly 
interested 
in maintaining or even enhancing control over privatization in 
Ukraine. It is precisely its efforts to create a vertical 
hierarchical system of the organs of privatization, subordinated 
to the FDMU, that accelerated the process of creating the 
organization. Everybody understood that this was yet another 
attempt at linking the channels of management through Kiev. 
However, varied approaches are necessary at the local level, 
where it is necessary to act flexibly. Thus, Taras Pakholyuk 
maintains that auctions run into practically no resistance in, 
for example, rayon seats such as Stryy, Drogobych, and 
Chervonograd. It is primarily local companies that privatize 
property, and the threat of an invasion of foreign capital, 
which some ultrapatriots are so afraid of, is nowhere in 
evidence. 
  Evaluating the progress of privatization in Lvov, Taras 
Pakholyuk indicated that a list of 67 facilities to be 
privatized had been confirmed at the last session of the city 
council, and seven winners of an economic competition in October 
had been designated (the labor collectives of the latter are 
entitled to buy out their enterprises; however, Business P-P has 
already written repeatedly about the system of privatization in 
Lvov along the lines of commercial competitions). The chairman 
of the Lvov FKM said that this was being hindered somewhat; 
therefore, it was resolved to extend the deadline for the filing 
of privatization petitions by the labor collectives of the 
facilities. As far as the current winners in the commercial 
competitions are concerned, at present their property is being 
inventoried and the price at which it will be proposed to 
enterprises to buy it out is being determined. Then it will 
remain for them to confirm their desire to be bought out within 
15 days. If the decision is favorable, an economic unit based on 
the labor collective--a joint-stock company or an association of 
buyers--will become the owner of the property. They will be 
granted the right to lease for a five-year term. 
  Taras Pakholyuk maintained that in principle privatization 
deadlines set by the government for Lvov are realistic. However, 
there are problems, too. "Privatization definitely will not be 
completed before the end of the next year. There are many 
enterprises that need to be privatized. Even if we privatize 70 
percent of the enterprises in Lvov, about 1,700 facilities will 
remain, and it is difficult to privatize them within one year. 
The process will most likely be completed before mid-1995. 
However, there is another snag. Certainly, less than one-half of 
the enterprises will be sold through competitive privatization 
techniques (auctions, economic competitions). Since to date we 
have witnessed the desire to block them, no changes for the 
better are expected. The results will be apparent at the end of 
this year or the beginning of next year, when we finish 
accepting petitions for 67 facilities, of which there should be 
no fewer than three per enterprise. Auctions will then begin." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61118 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94022" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> UKRAINE </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Decree on Republic's Economic, Social Condition </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0489A Kiev GOLOS UKRAINY in Russian 21 Dec 93 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0489A </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev GOLOS UKRAINY </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Decree of the Supreme Council of Ukraine on Economic and </F>
Social Conditions in Ukraine] 
  [Text] After hearing and discussing reports on issues 
pertaining to socioeconomic conditions in Ukraine and the urgent 
measures needed to eliminate hyperinflation that were delivered 
by Ye. L. Zvyagylskyy, prime minster of Ukraine, V. A. 
Yushchenko, chairman of the board of the National Bank of 
Ukraine, and R. V. Shpek, Minister of Economics, the Supreme 
Council of Ukraine decrees as follows: 
  1. Take note that the Cabinet of Ministers of Ukraine, the 
National Bank of Ukraine, and local organs of power failed to 
implement the decision of the Supreme Council of Ukraine 
regarding priority measures for the social protection of the 
population, as a result of nonobservance of the legislation of 
Ukraine, which led to a further decline in the living standards 
of the people and aggravation of social tension in society, 
following a routine rise in prices. 
  2. Take note of the urgent measures elaborated by the 
government for normalization of the socioeconomic situation and 
elimination of hyperinflation in Ukraine placing responsibility 
for the consequences of their realization on the Cabinet of 
Ministers of Ukraine within limits of its authority. 
  3. Prior to 1 January 1994 the Cabinet of Ministers of 
Ukraine, National Bank of Ukraine, the Fund of Ukrainian State 
Property, power organs of the Republic of Crimea, local state 
administrations and organs of local and regional self-government 
are to bring enforceable enactments created by them into 
compliance with the legislation of Ukraine. 
  4. Appeal to the president of Ukraine, as guarantor of the 
observance of the Constitution of Ukraine and the laws of 
Ukraine, with the following proposals: 
  Bring the edicts and directives of the president of Ukraine 
into accord with existing legislation of Ukraine while 
intensifying his personal responsibility for adoption of the 
decisions of the government, organs of power of the Republic of 
Crimea, and local state administrations which may lead to a 
decline in the living standards of the citizens of Ukraine, 
deterioration in the conditions of production and 
entrepreneurial activity, inefficient utilization of financial 
and material resources of the state, conduct of privatization 
with violation of legislation and a decrease in the operational 
efficiency of privatized enterprises, destruction of market 
structures, and a decrease in the economic potential or 
intensification of the economic dependence of Ukraine on 
individual states. 
  The Cabinet of Ministers of Ukraine is to submit proposals 
on 
the introduction of changes and amendments in legislation for 
study by the Supreme Council of Ukraine for the purpose of 
eliminating obstacles hindering the conduct of market reforms 
and stabilization of the economic and social situation in 
Ukraine. 
  5. By way of supervision in January 1994 the procurator 
general of Ukraine is to check on progress achieved in bringing 
enforceable enactments issued by the government, the National 
Bank of Ukraine, the Fund of Ukrainian State Property, organs of 
power of the Republic of Crimea, local state administrations and 
by organs of local and regional self-government into compliance 
with the legislation of Ukraine. 
  6. Before 21 December 1993 permanent commissions of the 
Supreme Council of Ukraine on legislation and legality and on 
questions of law and order and the struggle against crime, are 
to submit the draft of a law on intensification of the 
responsibility of officials for actions violating the existing 
legislation of Ukraine for consideration by the Supreme Council 
of Ukraine. 
  7. Void Point 2 of the decree of the Supreme Council of 
Ukraine of 17 June 1993 on the placement into circulation of 
first emission payment means and regulation of cash flow in the 
second quarter of 1993. 
  Establish that decisions concerning issue of money and 
crediting of current expenditures, including the deficit of the 
state budget, are to be made exclusively by the Supreme Council 
of Ukraine. 
  8. Note that up to the present time the government has not 
fulfilled the decree of the Supreme Council of Ukraine of 19 
November 1993 on settlement of accounts for agricultural 
products delivered to state resources in 1993 and demand its 
unconditional fulfillment by the Cabinet of Ministers of 
Ukraine, which is to be reported to the Supreme Council of 
Ukraine prior to 15 January 1994. 
  9. The Cabinet of Ministers of Ukraine, National Bank of 
Ukraine, the Fund of Ukrainian State Property, and the Office of 
the Procurator General of Ukraine are to submit information to 
the Supreme Council of Ukraine prior to 30 January 1994 on the 
fulfillment of Point 3 and Point 5 of this decree. 
  10. Instruct the Cabinet of Ministers of Ukraine to study 
proposals expressed by people's deputies of Ukraine in the 
discussion of that question within a three-day period, and 
report measures concerning their resolution to the Supreme 
Council of Ukraine (Supplement attached). 
  [Signed] I. Plyushch, chairman of the Supreme Council of 
Ukraine 
  Kiev, 17 December 1993 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61119 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94023" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> UKRAINE </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Proposal on Additional Measures to Stabilize Republic's 
Socioeconomic Situation </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0489B Kiev GOLOS UKRAINY in Russian 21 Dec 93 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0489B </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev GOLOS UKRAINY </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Proposals on Additional Measures for Stabilization of the </F>
Socioeconomic Situation in Ukraine Voiced by People's Deputies 
of Ukraine] 
  [Text] 
  1. As of 1 January 1994 cancel the regulation of the 
consumption fund of enterprises, eliminating the need for them 
to pay fines for exceeding the consumption fund in the fourth 
quarter of 1993. 
  2. Establish a four-day term for completion of transactions 
by banks in response to demands for payment and payment orders 
of clients. For delays exceeding the four-day term the bank 
shall pay a fine for each day of delay in the amount of 2 
percent of the delayed amount to the client of the bank and 2 
percent into the budget. The previously adopted seven-day term 
and the fine to be eliminated. 
  3. Veto the edict of the president of Ukraine of 11 December 
1993 on measures for completion of the 1993 budget. 
  4. Revoke provisions of the telegram of the Cabinet of 
Ministers of Ukraine on re-evaluation of the balances of 
commodity stocks and supplies No. 07-104 of 5 December 1993. 
  5. Eliminate the issuance of credit on easy terms at the 
expense of state funds. 
  6. As of 1 January 1994 eliminate the order in which 
additional evaluation of balances of commodity stocks and 
supplies is made as established by a letter of the Ministry of 
the Economy of Ukraine No 37-20/248 of 31 May 1993 and of the 
Ministry of Finance of Ukraine No 07-104 of 31 May 1993. 
  7. As of 1 January 1994 revoke Articles 1 through 10 of the 
decree of the Cabinet of Ministers of Ukraine No 14-92 of 26 
December 1992 on the value added tax. As of 1 January 1994 
implement the decree of the Cabinet of Ministers of Ukraine No 
12-92 of 26 December 1992 on profits tax of enterprises and 
organizations. 
  8. Through 1994 exempt all enterprises with all forms of 
ownership in retail trade, public catering, domestic services, 
and those trading exclusively in Ukrainian currency, from tax on 
profits of enterprises and organizations. Exempt from the 
profits tax enterprises and organizations part of whose profits 
is used to supplement working capital. 
  9. Supplement Point 2 of the decree of the Cabinet of 
Ministers of Ukraine No 21-92 of 29 December 1992 on the order 
followed in imposing customs duty on articles exported (shipped) 
by citizens outside of the customs borders of Ukraine with 
Subpoint D as follows: 
  D. Produce grown by citizens in vegetable gardens and on 
private plots (potatoes, fruit, vegetables, berries, grapes, 
melons, and products out of them), if certified by local organs 
of executive power as the property of a citizen and grown by him. 
  10. As of 1 January 1994 revoke the Decree of the Cabinet of 
Ministers of Ukraine No 19-92 of 15 December 1992 on the 
supplementary regulation of lease relations. 
  11. The Cabinet of Ministers of Ukraine: 
  Prior to 1 January 1994 is to complete the elaboration of 
the 
energy balance of Ukraine for 1994; 
  Prior to 1 January 1994 establish tariff and nontariff 
restrictions on noncritical import commodities; 
  Prior to 1 January 1994 submit a list of goods subject to 
excise tax and the exise tax rates on these goods for adoption 
by the Supreme Council of Ukraine; 
  Complete its elaboration and as of 1 January 1994 start 
specifically designated assistance for low-income citizens; 
  Study the question concerning introduction of a ration card 
system for distribution of essential food items for the duration 
of the crisis period; 
  Work out the draft of a law on remuneration of labor before 
30 January 1994 submitting it for study by the Supreme Council 
of Ukraine; 
  Prior to 1 January 1994 review the list of benefits and 
nonspecific subsidies being granted for the purpose of either 
their total revocation or replacement with specifically 
designated ones; 
  Prior to 1 January 1994 work out the draft of a law 
regarding 
the poverty level submitting it for adoption by the Supreme 
Council of Ukraine; 
  Prior to 1 January 1994 prepare a consumer's basket and 
submit it for adoption by the Supreme Council of Ukraine as the 
standard for a minimum wage; 
  Prior to 1 January 1994 submit the draft of a law concerning 
resumption of indexation of the income of the population for 
study by the Supreme Council of Ukraine; 
  Prior to 1 January 1994 submit to the Supreme Council of 
Ukraine for study a draft of the law on reimbursement of losses 
of the citizens resulting from devaluation of savings in 
branches of the Savings Bank; 
  Prior to 21 December 1993 submit an estimate of the 
anticipated increase in prices for study by the Supreme Council 
of Ukraine with an indication of the causes of the anticipated 
increase; 
  Prior to 21 December 1993 submit an analysis of the 
composition of expenditures on production as well as other 
expenditures in the prices for various groups of commodities for 
study by the Permanent Commission of the Supreme Council of 
Ukraine on Issues of Planning, Budget, Finances, and Prices; 
  As of 1 January 1994 introduce regulation of prices for 
goods 
and services with a limited standard profit level and payment of 
taxes in cases when the standard price level is exceeded by any 
subject of economic activity; 
  As of 1 January 1994 introduce limits on expenditures for 
goods and services connected with brokerage or trading activity 
amounting to 35 percent of the price of the producer of the 
goods or provider of services; 
  Prior to 1 January 1994 establish the order of conducting 
additional evaluation of balances of commodity stocks and 
supplies for inclusion in the expenditures on production on the 
basis of the price growth index for branches as published by the 
Ministry of the Economy of Ukraine in the press; 
  Prior to 21 December 1993 submit to the Supreme Council of 
Ukraine the selection of critical imports by assortment and by 
suppliers as an element of the foreign currency section of the 
draft law on the state budget of Ukraine for 1994; 
  Prior to 21 December 1993 submit data to the Supreme Council 
of Ukraine on the volume of exports in a selection to cover 
critical imports included in the state order and state contracts 
as an element of the foreign currency section of the draft law 
on the state budget of Ukraine for 1994; 
  Prior to 1 January 1994 submit to the Supreme Council of 
Ukraine a program for structural reorganization of industry with 
special emphasis on critical import goods the organization of 
whose production is possible in Ukraine, while offering a 
mechanism to stimulate the structural reorganization; 
  Prior to 1 January 1994 submit measures to the Supreme 
Council of Ukraine ensuring the transfer of all subjects of 
entrepreneurial activity to a profit and loss basis, including 
currency self-accounting, at the same time devoting special 
attention to enterprises in the energy complex; 
  Prior to 1 January 1994 submit measures to the Supreme 
Council of Ukraine ensuring price parity of industry and 
agriculture; 
  Prior to 30 January 1994 submit the draft law on currency 
regulation for study by the Supreme Council of Ukraine; 
  Prior to 30 January 1944 submit the draft law on 
remuneration 
of labor for study by the Supreme Council of Ukraine with 
assurance of parity of prices for labor and for consumer goods 
and agricultural products; 
  Prior to 30 January 1994 submit the draft law on the state 
enterprise for study by the Supreme Council of Ukraine; 
  Prior to 30 January 1994 submit the draft law on enterprises 
with nonstate form of ownership for study by the Supreme Council 
of Ukraine; 
  Prior to 30 January 1994 report to the Supreme Council of 
Ukraine on the application of the law on bankruptcy and measures 
used to sanction enterprises; 
  Provide for a decrease in the size of the state apparatus in 
the draft law on the state budget of Ukraine for 1994 to the 
level existing on 1 January 1992; 
  Prior to 21 December 1993 submit the draft law on 
replacement 
of mandatory sale of foreign currency with a tax on foreign 
currency profits for study by the Supreme Council of Ukraine; 
  Prior to 21 December 1993 submit tax measures stimulating 
rational land use for study by the Supreme Council of Ukraine; 
  Prior to 1 January 1994 submit for study by the Supreme 
Council of Ukraine the draft law on transfer of municipal motor 
transport pools to local soviets with introduction of 
appropriate changes in the budget; 
  Prior to 1 January 1994 study the question concerning 
breakup 
of the Ministry of Transport of Ukraine; 
  Prior to 30 January 1994 submit measures aimed at refining 
legislative and enforceable enactments on privatization for 
study by the Supreme Council of Ukraine; 
  12. Prior to 1 January 1994 the Commission on Mandates and 
Deputy Ethics of the Supreme Council of Ukraine is to analyze 
fulfillment of decrees and protocol instructions of the Supreme 
Council of Ukraine and those which were not fulfilled as of 15 
December 1993 and whose fulfillment deadline has passed, are to 
be presented for familiarization by the people's deputies of 
Ukraine. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61120 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94024" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> UKRAINE </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Experts Caution Against Introducing Hryvnya Under Current 
Circumstances </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0450A Kiev NEZAVISIMOST in Russian 15 Dec 93 pp 1, 3 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0450A </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NEZAVISIMOST </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Yanina Sokolovskaya: "The Hryvnya Will Kick In </F>
on Thursday--When Pigs Fly?"] 
  [Text] As if a magician, the government has finally 
produced from its sleeve a trump card which was secreted there 
for a long time--the national currency, the HRYVNYA. Waving it 
before the nose of the man in the street, the government uttered 
a tirade about the prompt stabilization of the economic 
situation in the country and the introduction of a new monetary 
unit which would be capable of real conversion. 
  It remains a rhetorical question whether this is possible 
given hyperinflation, a 13.3-percent drop in production, and 
other economic "joys." As Minister of the Economy R. Shpek 
hinted, at a minimum, equilibrium should be restored at the 
macrolevel and a stabilization fund of the new monetary unit 
should be established in order to introduce the hryvnya 
properly. According to data from experts, $2-3 billion will be 
needed to this end. Meanwhile, the National Bank of Ukraine does 
not have such funds, as V. Yushchenko, its chairman of the 
board, testifies. The 10 percent of foreign exchange sold to the 
state on a compulsory basis which is called upon to generate 
this fund will hardly be able to serve as even a feeble prop for 
the hryvnya. 
  However, this does not at all mean that the public release 
of 
the Ukrainian currency is far away. According to a report from 
Deputy Prime Minister V. Landyk, this will happen after New 
Year's day. As V. Yushchenko specified, "on one of the 
Thursdays." In all of this, as recently as a few weeks ago, it 
was planned to count on the cost of one hryvnya coming to 1,000 
karbovantsy. Now the hryvnya is valued at 10,000. This multiple 
will change as time goes by, and it will hardly change downward. 
For now, the economy of Ukraine continues to exist in the 
environment of a dual-rate policy. One of the rates will be 
established on the exchange where 4 to 7 percent of the 
foreign-exchange proceeds of Ukraine will be sold. The second, 
official exchange rate will be set a day later at a meeting of 
the tender committee consisting of the representatives of 
ministries and headed by V. Landyk. This committee will decide 
who to give or not to give the foreign exchange to, having 
compiled a list of enterprises and high-priority facilities that 
need it. At present, according to the committee's calculations, 
the exchange rate of the dollar comes to 12,600 karbovantsy 
whereas by the end of the year it will not be higher than 25,000 
karbovantsy. The chief of the committee observed: "Everything 
will depend on our work and on the issuance of inflationary 
karbovantsy; after all, our rate is no longer fixed but 
floating." 
  However, despite more favorable currency regulation, many 
enterprises are getting ready to go bankrupt before the 
introduction of the hryvnya. Their number has already been 
calculated by the Cabinet of Ministers. In the event of a sharp 
increase in unemployment, which is called the "period of 
plummeting," the Cabinet of Ministers confirmed a program of 
public works which calls for the use of funds from the budget 
(in order to have something with which to occupy the people who 
have lost their jobs). 
  However, this is not a mandatory stage on the path toward 
reforms. The streamlining of enterprises will be conducted 
which, in the opinion of the government, may solve their 
problems. 
  The rest of the salutary measures of the government fit 
within a program for urgent measures to overcome hyperinflation 
in Ukraine which has been adopted by the Cabinet of Ministers. 
According to the program, in the future our reforms will balance 
the full freedom of the market and administrative regulation, 
advancing along the path of "strictly disciplined market 
relations." 
  However, even if we succeed in avoiding a new cycle of 
inflation owing to these measures, they are hardly adequate to 
completely prepare the Ukrainian scene for the appearance of a 
new national currency. At a minimum, a certain sustenance is 
required to ensure the viability of this currency--a state loan 
and liberalization of foreign economic relations. While the 
National Bank of Ukraine, together with a group of specialists, 
is preparing to issue bonds, the Ministry of Foreign Economic 
Relations, in its turn, is trying to expand foreign trade, 
although these measures could hardly be called complete 
liberalization. While export duties are canceled, a system of 
quotas remains. Import restrictions are introduced. The 
"go-ahead" will mainly be given to raw materials imported to the 
country. 
  Be that as it may, in the opinion of experts Ukraine so far 
lacks appropriate funds for the introduction of the hryvnya. In 
turn, the government does not venture to seek assistance from 
international organizations--the International Monetary Fund and 
the World Bank. In the words of government representatives, "as 
a member of the fund, we may demand support from it. However, we 
will not ask." 
  This is a rational thought: In the opinion of D. Kaufman, 
the 
representative of the World Bank in Ukraine, the introduction of 
the hryvnya under current conditions makes no sense and is 
capable of bringing about not only its depreciation but also the 
complete economic collapse of Ukraine. Domestic experts foretell 
the same fate of the hryvnya. 
  However, we should hardly expect the government to give up 
its boldly planned hryvnya-step. As a deputy prime minister said 
on one occasion, "We will proceed to take measures so as to work 
in a market environment while simultaneously continuing our 
policy." We are left hoping for a delay. Otherwise, the unviable 
Ukrainian currency will be introduced with a move of the 
imperious baton on a not-so-remote Thursday. It will kick in 
then--when pigs fly. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61121 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94025" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> UKRAINE </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Bankers Appeal to Populace To Bolster Economy </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0450B Kiev NEZAVISIMOST in Russian 15 Dec 93 p 6 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0450B </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NEZAVISIMOST </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> ["Appeal by the Bankers of Kiev to the Ukrainian People"] </F>
  [Text] We, a group of bankers from Kiev, appeal to you in 
order to facilitate efforts to develop the Ukrainian economy, to 
reinforce our statehood, and mainly to defend our long-suffering 
people. 
  First of all, all of us should answer simple questions 
honestly. Why has Ukraine, one of the richest countries of 
Europe, ended up in a catastrophic economic situation, with a 
majority of its population turned into beggars? Why does the 
wage of a working person range between $55 and $90 at present in 
the Baltic republics of the former Soviet Union, whereas it is 
dozens of times less in our country? 
  A tremendous deficit of the state budget is the main cause 
of 
our misfortune. Unfortunately, our government has long been 
living beyond its means. 
  Some politicians and members of the government are now 
assuring the people that commercial banks are to blame for high 
prices, a shortage of goods, and the buildup of inflation. All 
of this is slander. 
  Commercial banks that have been established control only 
about 10 percent of all state finance. They have never carried 
out credit emissions; they mainly serve market structures. 
Moreover, it is precisely the established commercial banks that 
provided and still provide services to citizens that protect 
their savings in a hyperinflationary environment far better than 
the state. 
  They accuse the commercial banks of generating great 
profits, 
assuring us that the banks are "getting fat." This does not 
conform to the truth, either. The greatest profits have been 
derived through the circulation of the "free-of-charge" emission 
money which our banks do not have anything to do with directly. 
  We are warning you, citizens, that the current offensive 
against the established commercial bank is an offensive against 
private enterprises. It is the abandonment of the market-economy 
path which all of humanity is taking. Our people have been 
drenched in the blood of the revolution, and have survived 
famine and Stalin's dungeons. Do we really have to once again go 
through all the torture in order to ascertain that market-based 
regulation of the economy is the most effective, and that it is 
impossible without commercial banks? 
  Inflation is not a natural disaster; it is created by 
governments and the economic forces that stand behind them. In 
view of this, a government of social accord with a market 
orientation, which will be capable of containing inflation, is 
an urgent necessity. 
  The Supreme Soviet has been passing laws which have been 
mostly prepared by the government. However, our prime ministers 
have demanded additional extraordinary powers all along. As we 
see it, the reason has been that people who were not familiar 
with market-economy relations undertook to provide state 
leadership. They, rather than the commercial banks have led the 
people of Ukraine into the current catastrophic situation. 
  We understand that the people are tired, and pessimism 
prevails in our society. However, under the circumstances we 
call on you to support people with market-oriented thinking 
rather than demagogues who are promising you social equality for 
the n-th time. 
  Commercial banks have now been turned into a target for 
dubious economic experiments. As a result of this, the state 
loses enormous funds, and the life of the people worsens still 
more. Credit "ceilings," bans on credit extension, and other 
nonsensical ideas have put commercial banks and enterprises in a 
very difficult situation. It is precisely for this reason that 
store shelves have become barren, heat and light are in short 
supply, and transportation operates poorly. Economic problems 
are being solved in an administrative manner; a regulatory and 
legislative base for the development of entrepreneurship is 
lacking. However, we believe that reason, professionalism, and 
balance will ultimately prevail. We call on all citizens who are 
not indifferent to a future prosperous Ukraine to pool their 
efforts in order to create, rather than destroy the economy. 
  We are also addressing our colleagues with a proposal to 
hold 
a meeting of all Ukrainian bankers shortly in order to 
consolidate positions regarding the restoration of the credit 
and finance system. A group of bankers from Kiev has agreed to 
immediately begin the development of the drafts of key laws, and 
is prepared to take part in the development of a government 
program for overcoming the economic catastrophe. We consider it 
feasible to create the Kiev Banking Union which will have an 
opportunity to respond quickly and effectively to all changes in 
the life of the state and its capital city. 
  In the future, commercial banks will continue efforts to 
maintain and enhance the well-being of their depositors, proving 
by their deeds that commercial banks serve the good of Ukraine 
and each of its citizens. 
  On the eve of the New Year we wish you, fellow countrymen, 
happiness and accord! 
  [Signed] O. Assonov--the Yunivers Joint-Stock Investment 
Bank 
  S. Arzhevitin--the Azhio Joint-Stock Bank 
  V. Borisenko--the Liga Joint-Stock Bank 
  V. Burakova--the Interbank Joint-Stock Commercial Bank 
  S. Buryak--the Brokbiznesbank Commercial Bank 
  M. Vovk--the Demosbank Cooperative Bank 
  S. Vovchenko--the Business Cooperation Bank 
  I. Yevseyenko--the Commercial Pochta-Bank 
  V. Kaipetskiy--the Lanbank Joint-Stock Bank 
  V. Kvyat--the Geosantris Joint-Stock Commercial Bank 
  N. Kokareva--the Legbank Joint-Stock Commercial Bank 
  I. Lazepko--the Intellektbank 
  V. Lashkevich--the Kievdorbank Commercial Bank 
  Yu. Lyakh--the Ukrainian Credit Bank 
  L. Marchenko--the All-Ukrainian Joint-Stock Bank (Va-Bank) 
  L. Milevich--the Mebelprombank Commercial Bank 
  P. Miroshnikov--the Inko Joint-Stock Bank 
  R. Mosina--the Slavutich Joint-Stock Commercial Bank 
  O. Novikov--the Ukrainbank Joint-Stock Company 
  A. Palamarchuk--the Mriya Joint-Stock Commercial Bank 
  Ye. Patrushev--the Energobank Sectoral Commercial Bank 
  A. Skopenko--the Vidrodzhennya Ukrainian Bank 
  G. Stanilevich--the Universal Commercial Bank 
  A. Fedotov--the Edland Commercial Bank 
  M. Chernyuk--the Ekomedbank Ukrainian Bank 
  A. Shkolnik--the Antek Joint-Stock Bank 
  F. Shpig--the Aval Joint-Stock Commercial Bank 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61122 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94026" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> UKRAINE </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Decree on Additional Monetary Payments to Population in 
Connection With Price Increases </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0407A Kiev GOLOS UKRAINY in Russian 7 Dec 93 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0407A </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev GOLOS UKRAINY </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Decree No. 975, "On Additional Monetary Payments to the </F>
Population in Connection With the Increase in Retail Prices and 
Wage Rates," 2 December 1993, Kiev] 
  [Text] The Cabinet of Ministers of Ukraine decrees: 
  1. To establish monthly additional payments to the 
population, effective 1 December 1993, in the following amounts: 
  1) 63,000 karbovantsy: 
  a) to workers who are in work relationships with 
enterprises, 
institutions, and organizations, regardless of the forms of 
property (except for working pensioners), whose wages for the 
previous month, together with the additional monetary payments 
stipulated by subparagraph 1 of paragraph 1 of the present 
decree, do not exceed by 20 times the minimum wage established 
by the decree of the Supreme Council of Ukraine of 25 November 
1993. 
  The additional monetary payments are made at the main place 
of work at the expense of: 
  resources being directed at the payment of the basic wage 
above the estimated size of the consumption fund to workers of 
enterprises and self-supporting organizations; 
  resources of pertinent budgets--for workers of institutions 
and organizations that are maintained at the expense of 
resources of the budget; 
  b) to convicted persons who are engaged in work (except for 
those who are serving sentences in correctional labor colonies), 
and also persons who are in labor treatment clinics of the 
Ministry of Internal Affairs, on the condition of their 
fulfillment of output norms or established tasks. 
  The additional monetary payments are added to the personal 
account at the place a sentence is being served or the place of 
treatment at the expense of resources being directed at the 
payment of the basic wage above the calculated size of the 
consumption fund; 
  c) to persons who lost work in connection with changes in 
the 
organization of production and work, including the liquidation, 
reorganization, or re-profiling of an enterprise, institution, 
or organization, a reduction in the number or staff of workers, 
and for whom an average wage is maintained in accordance with 
the previous place of work for the period of job placement, but 
for not more than three months. 
  The additional monetary payments are made according to the 
previous place of work at the expense of resources of 
enterprises, institutions, and organizations directed at the 
payment of the basic wage above the calculated amount of the 
consumption fund. In the event of the liquidation of an 
enterprise, institution, or organization, payments are carried 
out by the liquidation commission at the expense of resources 
provided for these purposes; 
  d) to persons discharged from work in connection with the 
liquidation of an enterprise, institution, or organization who 
are on leave to take care of a child until it reaches three 
years of age. 
  The additional monetary payments are made by organs for the 
social protection of the population at the place of residence at 
the expense of resources of the Pension Fund, with the 
subsequent reimbursement of expenditures from local budgets; 
  e) to full-time doctoral and graduate students and clinical 
interns. 
  The additional monetary payments are made at the place of 
study at the expense of sources from which grant payments are 
conducted. 
  2) 44,000 karbovantsy: 
  a) to pensioners of all categories (except those on full 
state maintenance) whose pension scale for the previous month, 
together with the additional monetary payments provided under 
subparagraph 2 of paragraph 1 of this decree, does not exceed 10 
times the minimum pension established by the decree of the 
Supreme Council of Ukraine of 25 November 1993. 
  The additional monetary payments are made at the place where 
the pensions are received at the expense of resources from which 
the payment of pensions are conducted; 
  b) to the unemployed who receive unemployment benefits or 
grants for the period of professional training and retraining. 
  The additional monetary payments are made by job placement 
organs at the place of registration at the expense of resources 
of the State Fund for Employment Assistance for the Population; 
  c) to women from among those service personnel discharged 
from the Armed Forces, National Guard, Border Troops, Security 
Services, Civil Defense Troops, and other military formations in 
connection with pregnancy and childbirth. 
  The additional monetary payments are made by organs for the 
social protection of the population at the place of residence at 
the expense of the resources of the state budget; 
  d) to one of the unemployed able-bodied parents, or to a 
person taking the place of parents and who continuously looks 
after a invalid child until the age of 16 years; 
  3) 25,000 karbovantsy: 
  a) to persons having a right to receive allowances for each 
child up to 16 years of age (students--up to 18 years of age) in 
accordance with Chapter 7 of the Law of Ukraine "On State 
Subsidies to Families With Children." 
  The additional monetary payments are made at the place of 
work (study, service) of the mother, and in the event that the 
mother does not work (or is not a student or in the service)--at 
the place of work (study, service) of the father, and in the 
event of the absence of parents--at the place of work (study, 
service) of the persons who replace the parents; if the parents 
(or the persons who replace them) do not work (are not students, 
or in the service), at the place of their residence by organs 
for the social protection of the population at the expense of 
the local budgets; 
  b) to students of professional educational institutions 
(except those on full state maintenance), and full-time students 
of VUZ's [higher educational institutions]. 
  The additional monetary payments are made at the place of 
study at the expense of resources earmarked for the payment of 
grants. 
  2. The monthly additional monetary payments will be made at 
individual departments and will not be included in the official 
wages and wage rates. In December of this year, these payments 
will be made preliminarily before the 15th. 
  3. The Ministry of Finance will take into account the 
expenditures associated with additional monetary payments to the 
population in changes to the state budget in 1993. 
  4. To recommend to the National Bank jointly with the 
Ministry of Finance to resolve the question on granting the 
Pension Fund favorable credit to implement additional monetary 
payments to the population in connection with increased retail 
prices and wage rates. 
  5. The Ministry of Labor, the Ministry of Economy, and the 
Ministry of Finance will give explanations on questions of 
conducting additional monetary payments. 
  6. To declare as no longer valid Decree No. 674 of the 
Cabinet of Ministers of Ukraine of 30 August 1993 "On Additional 
Monetary Payments to the Population in Connection With the 
Increase in Retail Prices." 
  [Signed] Acting Prime Minister of Ukraine Ye. 
Zvyahilskyy 
  Minister of the Cabinet of Ministers of Ukraine I. 
Dotsenko 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61123 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94027" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> UKRAINE </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Decree on Increase in Subsidies to Unemployed Citizens </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0407B Kiev GOLOS UKRAINY in Russian 7 Dec 93 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0407B </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev GOLOS UKRAINY </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Decree No. 976 "On the Low Income Line and Increase in the </F>
Scales of Special Monetary Allowances for Disabled Citizens with 
Minimum Incomes," 2 December 1993, Kiev] 
  The Cabinet of Ministers of Ukraine decrees: 
  1. Effective 1 December 1993, to establish the low income 
line in the amount of 197,000 karbovantsy per capita. 
  To use this amount as a basis for determining the right of 
disabled citizens with minimum incomes to receive special 
monetary allowances for subsistence and the amount of this 
allowance. 
  2. Effective 1 December 1993, to establish the amount of the 
special monetary subsistence allowance in the sum of up to 
77,000 karbovantsy. 
  3. In connection with the establishment of additional 
monetary payments in conformity with Cabinet of Ministers of 
Ukraine Decree No. 975 of 2 December 1993 "On Additional 
Monetary Payments to the Population in Connection With the 
Increase in Retail Prices and Wages," the special monetary 
allowance for the payment of housing, municipal services, 
electric power, and the acquisition and supply of fuel 
stipulated in Cabinet of Ministers of Ukraine Decree No. 394 of 
2 December 1993 "On the Special Monetary Allowance to Citizens 
With Minimum Incomes" is not granted. 
  4. The Ministry of Social Protection of the Population, the 
Ministry of Labor, and the Ministry of Finance in a 10-day 
period shall make changes to the Statute on the Procedure for 
the Designation and Payment of a Special Monetary Allowance to 
Citizens With Minimum Incomes that result from this decree. 
  5. The Ministry of Labor, the Ministry of Economy, the 
Ministry of Statistics, the Ministry of Social Protection of the 
Population, and the Ministry of Finance on a monthly basis shall 
analyze the dynamics of the consumer price index, and in the 
event that it is necessary will submit proposals to the Cabinet 
of Ministers on a revision of the low income line and the 
special monetary allowance for disabled citizens with minimum 
incomes. 
  6. To declare no longer in effect Cabinet of Ministers of 
Ukraine Decree No. 675 of 30 August 1993 "On the Low Income Line 
and the Increase in the Amounts of the Special Monetary 
Allowance for Disabled Citizens With Minimum Incomes." 
  [Signed] Acting Prime Minister of Ukraine Ye. 
Zvyahilskyy 
  Minister of the Cabinet of Ministers of Ukraine I. 
Dotsenko 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61124 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94028" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> UKRAINE </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Decree on Measures in Connection With Increase in Minimum 
Wage Rate </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0407C Kiev GOLOS UKRAINY in Russian 7 Dec 93 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0407C </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev GOLOS UKRAINY </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Decree No. 974 "On Measures in Connection With the Increase </F>
in the Minimum Wage Rate," 2 December 1993, Kiev] 
  [Text] In connection with the establishment of a new 
minimum wage rate effective 1 December 1993, the Cabinet of 
Ministers decrees: 
  1. Effective 1 December 1993, to increase the wage rates and 
staff salaries of workers, servicemen, rank and file personnel, 
and command authorities stipulated by Cabinet of Ministers 
Decree No. 393 "On Increasing the Wages in State Enterprises, in 
Institutions, and in Organizations," 2 June 1993. 
  The indicated increase can be implemented: 
  in state enterprises, in institutions, and in organizations 
that are on a self-supporting basis, and also rental, based on 
state property, within the bounds of the consumer fund that is 
increased by comparison with 1990 by a factor of 1,500; 
  in enterprises and in organizations of activity that are 
fully or partially financed from the budget and in which the 
wage rates and staff salaries of the workers are established 
according to wage conditions in effect at self-supporting 
enterprises and organizations based on realistic capabilities, 
but not more than by a factor of 1,500 in comparison with those 
in effect in 1990. 
  2. To substitute the number "1,500" for the number "500" in 
the third, fourth, and sixth paragraphs of Item 4 of the statute 
on the regulation of consumer funds of enterprises, 
institutions, and organizations in 1993, which was approved by 
Cabinet of Ministers of Ukraine Decree No. 471 on 23 June 1993. 
  3. To establish that all types of state allowances, 
compensation, and grants are determined based on the minimum 
wage of 60,000 karbovantsy per month, increased by a factor of 
1.8. 
  4. Enterprises, institutions, and organizations: 
  will set payment amounts calculated in accordance with 
legislation in effect with the average wage (benefit in the 
event of a temporary disability, severance pay, leave, etc.), 
taking into account the new wage rates and staff salaries in the 
procedure established by Cabinet of Ministers of Ukraine Decree 
No. 140 "On Additional Measures in Connection With the Increase 
in Wages" 21 March 1992 (Collection of Statutes of Ukraine, 
1992, No. 3, p. 80); 
  conduct a recalculation of the amount of compensation for an 
injury a worker sustains as a consequence of damage to health in 
the execution of job duties, with a simultaneous increase in 
wage rates and salaries to the amount of their actual increase. 
  5. To establish an allowance from state social insurance for 
funerals in the amount of 600,000 karbovantsy. 
  In the event of the death of a pensioner, his family or the 
person conducting the funeral is paid an allowance for the 
funeral in the amount of two-months pension of the deceased, but 
not less than 600,000 karbovantsy. 
  6. To establish a monthly compensation payment in the amount 
of 20,000 karbovantsy to an unemployed able-bodied person who 
takes care of an invalid of the first group, or an old person 
who is 80 years of age. 
  7. The Ministry of Labor and the Ministry of Finance, in the 
event it is necessary, shall provide interpretations on the 
application of this decree. 
  8. To declare invalid: 
  Cabinet of Ministers of Ukraine Decree No. 672 "On Measures 
in Connection With the Increase in the Minimum Wage Rate" of 30 
August 1993; 
  Cabinet of Ministers of Ukraine Decree No. 672 "On the 
Increase in Wage Rates and Staff Salaries of Workers and the 
Determination of the Basic Consumer Fund of Enterprises, 
Institutions, and Organizations, Effective 1 September 1993," of 
30 August 1993. 
  9. This decree becomes effective 1 December 1993. 
  [Signed] Acting Prime Minister of Ukraine Ye. 
Zvyahilskyy 
  Minister of the Cabinet of Ministers of Ukraine I. 
Dotsenko 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61125 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94029" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WESTERN REGION </F>
<F P=101> BELARUS </F>
<H3> <TI>   National Bank Chairman Defends Policies </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0428A Minsk NARODNA HAZETA in Belarusian 3 Dec 93 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0428A </F>
<F P=104>  Minsk NARODNA HAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Belarusian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Doctor of Economic Sciences Stanislaw </F>
Bahdankevich, chairman of the board of the Republic of Belarus 
National Bank, under the "Continuing the Debate" rubric: "A Wish 
Alone Is Not Enough...."] 
  [Text] Criticism of the National Bank by economic managers 
is easy to understand: Enterprises are choking because of a 
shortage of working capital, with inflation having long gone 
over all reasonable limits. It is of little concern to a plant 
director or a kolkhoz chairman that each new credit to his 
economic unit extended at the expense of increasing the money 
supply strengthens that same inflationary pressure. They are 
forced to be more concerned about survival today than about the 
coming day. 
  However, as I see it, when scientists with doctoral degrees 
take the floor, as the esteemed V. Kulazhanko did in NARODNA 
HAZETA on 17 November, they should not approach this issue so 
superficially, or should at least approach it with greater 
responsibility. 
  A professor in the area of economics should know that the 
exchange rates of all monetary units are established in keeping 
with their "prices" on the currency market. As a rule, a 
currency exchange acts as such a market. Changes in demand and 
supply of each specific currency on the exchange immediately 
influence its exchange rate cost, which is registered by central 
banks. This is an elementary norm of a market economy, even as 
imperfect a market economy as ours. 
  In turn, demand and supply of currencies on the market 
depend 
on a number of factors, each of which is quite significant in 
its own right. 
  In this instance, the status of the balance of payments of a 
state on the whole and in regard to the principal partner 
countries separately, understandably depending on the volume of 
economic relations with them, ranks first. For Belarus, Russia 
is now the key economic partner; it accounts for about 
four-fifths of the total volume of trade. Trade with Western 
countries is mainly dollar-denominated. That is why the 
establishment of realistic exchange rates of the Belarusian 
ruble against the Russian ruble and the dollar is of paramount 
importance to the economy of the republic. 
  It is common knowledge that at present we buy considerably 
more from Russia than we sell to it. Arrears in payments for 
energy resources, oil and gas, appear particularly catastrophic. 
The implementation of a state-to-state agreement in keeping with 
which a large proportion of our export to Russia goes toward the 
delivery of energy resources--a peculiar barter between 
states--results in only a part of the "live" money participating 
in the general commodity trade; in this segment, the demand for 
Russian rubles exceeds their supply considerably. For example, 
at the 3 November trading session, when the exchange rate of the 
Russian ruble came to the mark of one to six Belarusian rubles, 
an almost 10-fold surplus of demand over supply was registered. 
A similar situation, although to a somewhat lesser degree, was 
noted at the subsequent trading sessions of the Interbank 
Currency Exchange. Perhaps Professor V. Kulazhanko will suggest 
where and from whom the money needed may be obtained in a 
civilized manner, through the use of market instruments? 
  At present, we are persistently suggesting to the government 
to give up state-to-state barter in order to ensure the 
availability of a greater money supply in real commodity trade 
with Russia and thus alleviate the lack of correspondence 
between the demand and supply of Russian and Belarusian rubles 
in the currency market, as well as to concentrate in the 
National Bank all foreign-exchange reserves, including the 
Russian ruble, in order to possess the necessary instruments to 
influence the exchange rate of the Belarusian ruble. 
  It is also important to understand that no matter how 
sizable 
the gold and currency reserves of central banks are, they are 
intended solely to neutralize the influence of transitory 
fluctuations in demand and supply of a particular currency. 
Artificially supporting the exchange rate at a high level with 
the help of reserves is only possible for a very limited period 
of time; it will not stabilize the exchange rate and will bring 
about the complete loss of its reserves by the state. We should 
add to this that the Interbank Currency Exchange is a sovereign 
joint-stock company in which the National Bank has only 9 
percent of the votes. 
  However, the main point is that, as the postwar experience 
of 
the world and also the current experience of Ukraine suggests, 
the establishment of the exchange rate on the basis of comparing 
domestic prices in the states in question, that is, 
administratively, may only sweep the problem under the rug, 
increase the outflow of foreign-exchange capital from the 
country, and transplant [currency] exchange operations onto the 
street. In Ukraine, the volumes of [currency] sales and exports 
grew steadily between April and August of this year, when the 
exchange rate of the karbovanets was determined by the results 
of trading on the currency exchange. After the introduction of a 
fixed exchange rate of the karbovanets, the volume of currency 
sales on the exchange fell by a factor of 15, and 
foreign-exchange proceeds from exports--by a factor of three. In 
October of this year, the market exchange rate already was lower 
than the fixed rate by a factor of six. Effective 2 November of 
this year, exchange trading was suspended by an edict of the 
president. 
  Therefore, the stabilization of the exchange rate of the 
Belarusian ruble against the Russian ruble depends primarily on 
reducing the deficits of the balances of trade and payments, 
which now go into the hundreds of millions of rubles, to the 
size of real external financing. The exchange rate of the 
Belarusian ruble is doomed to fall further in the absence of 
such a balance. In general terms, this calls for a substantial 
reduction in energy consumption, the implementation of a firm 
policy to reduce the energy and material effectiveness of 
production. The growing domestic prices for imports (taking into 
account the falling exchange rate of the Belarusian ruble) are 
becoming the instrument that ensures reduction in energy 
consumption. On the other hand, it is necessary to increase the 
export of products to the Russian Federation that the 
devaluation of the Belarusian ruble facilitates. Besides, for 
the period of transition Belarus badly needs credit support from 
the world community and the Russian Federation in order to cover 
the deficit of the balance of payments (and therefore stabilize 
the exchange rate of the Belarusian ruble). In the absence of 
external financing, the rate of decline in production may turn 
into a free fall. 
  The budget and monetary-credit policy within the republic is 
the second most important factor. In principle, a budget deficit 
amounting to 5 or 6 percent of the domestic national product 
appears to be a quite tolerable evil if this deficit is covered 
by attracting to the budget funds from the money market without 
increasing the total money supply. The trouble is that the 
deficit is being financed through the emission of credit, i.e., 
putting into circulation money to which no goods correspond. For 
as long as this practice continues, the Belarusian ruble is 
doomed to losing value in the form of both inflation and a 
decline in its exchange rate. 
  The monetary and credit policy that has been pursued this 
year ensures a reduction in the rate of growth of credit 
emission. In 1992, this rate exceeded 27 percent per month, 
whereas in the first half of 1993 it amounted to 17 percent, and 
in July through November it was less than 9 percent. For 1994, a 
still firmer policy is being considered. Calculations indicated 
that it is possible to ensure a rate of inflation below 10 
percent per month and the stabilization of the exchange rate of 
the Belarusian ruble if the growth of net assets of the National 
Bank is restricted to no more than a factor of two. 
  Attaining these indicators is very complicated. First of 
all, 
a mechanism should be created to cover at least one-third of the 
budget deficit by issuing and selling government securities. 
Also, it is necessary to create a mechanism of financial 
self-support for each economic entity that operates normally. 
The availability of working capital is the foundation of all 
production. An economy that does not have its own monetary funds 
that are adequate to repeat each new production cycle, that is, 
to cover the permanent irreducible balances of raw and other 
materials, unfinished products, and finished output, will 
continuously experience great financial difficulties. An 
analysis indicates that in the environment of inflation, the 
financial standing of many enterprises, sovkhozes, and kolkhozes 
is distorted. In reality, a number of economic units that are 
technically considered profitable are potentially bankrupt if 
the loss of internal working capital is taken into account. In 
such economic units, accounts payable, mainly short-term bank 
credit, cover between 50 and 100 percent of the minimum working 
assets. 
  This problem needs to be solved. It is impermissible to use 
short-term credit resources of banks, which boost inflation, to 
replace the working capital of economic entities. Short-term 
bank credit may and should be obtained only to accumulate 
temporary or seasonal reserves and expenditures. This norm 
should become law for our commercial banks that serve the 
economy. 
  Hence the conclusion: It is necessary to focus the attention 
of owners and managers of economic entities, and all organs of 
government and power on ways to ensure the preservation of 
proprietary working capital and its growth rather than on 
"shaking loose" credit at banks. Only through creating a 
mechanism for the self-financing of permanent irreducible 
reserves and costs at each enterprise is it possible to 
ameliorate finance and the economy, and to stabilize the 
Belarusian ruble. 
  Bank credit should be expensive, somewhat above the level of 
inflation. Term rates on bank deposits and holdings should be 
set no lower than the level of inflation. 
  There is no other way to ameliorate our economy and its 
financial and monetary-credit system. 
  The development of effective devices for overcoming the 
crisis can hardly be expected if we are afraid to acknowledge 
reality. Since July 1992, national currencies have been 
operating de facto in the noncash circulation of all states 
which previously belonged to the USSR. Since July 1993, 
following the introduction of new banknotes of the 1993 issue by 
the Central Bank of the Russian Federation, a fully sovereign 
national monetary system based on the noncash Belarusian ruble 
and the banknotes of the National Bank also emerged in Belarus. 
Now is the beginning of December; all types of payments in the 
territory of the republic are made solely in Belarusian rubles 
(settlement bills), but we are still debating whose currency we 
use: Russian or Belarusian. Arguments put forth by the opponents 
of acknowledging reality are simply not serious. Do assertions 
merit attention to the effect that it is necessary to postpone 
the recognition of Belarusian bills until a program is worked 
out that supports their stable operation, gold and currency 
reserves are formed, and the level of labor remunerations, 
retirement benefits, scholarships, prices, and so on is revised? 
  The genuine essence of the problem is found in the fact that 
the Belarusian ruble that really exists is a weak currency. Its 
depreciation has been caused by the economic crisis and the 
growth of the deficit in the balance of payments. Whether our 
parliament recognizes this ruble as parallel tender of not, the 
National Bank and the government should and will take a set of 
measures to increase the stability of precisely this functioning 
monetary unit. The recognition is necessary first of all in 
order to grasp that our budget, subsidy, credit, 
foreign-exchange, and other policies should proceed from the 
fact that our own monetary system and our own currency exist, 
which need attention, merchandise equivalents, and protection. 
  The recognition of the Belarusian ruble as the national 
currency for the period of transition would lead, for example, 
People's Deputy Prakapovich to grasp the fact that financing 
housing construction by means of credit emission, i.e., by 
putting into circulation money to which no goods correspond, 
financing that may destroy our economy, is one of the main 
causes of inflation, the depreciation of the Belarusian ruble, 
and a hidden inflationary tax on the entire population of the 
republic. The housing problem should be solved by way of 
increasing the proportion of the accumulation fund in the 
national income at the expense of reducing the consumption fund, 
at the expense of a strict economy and savings regimen for each 
developer, and at the expense of real credit resources which 
would be the equivalent of the temporarily free accumulation 
fund--but not through credit emission. 
  An attempt by some analysts, including the already mentioned 
Professor V. Kulazhanko, to tie the fall of the exchange rate of 
the Belarusian ruble to prices and real wages in Belarus and 
Russia is likewise surprising. Incidentally, why not in Germany 
or Japan? As has already been said, the monetary systems of 
Belarus and Russia have actually been separated for a long time 
and have functioned independently. 
  The economic crisis whose peak we are approaching is 
manifested primarily in the monetary and credit system; the 
crisis of the monetary and credit system is merely the result 
but not the cause of the acute economic crisis. The incorrect 
interpretation of cause and effect brings about an exaggeration 
of the role of monetary policy, banking, and credit in 
ameliorating the sick economy. During a period of transition 
from a monopolized, administrative economy which is based on 
state property and a large number of operating enterprises, no 
scientifically substantiated monetary policy is capable of 
effecting reconstruction in the national economy, of making 
structural changes, boosting production, ensuring privatization, 
the development of private business, and competition, and 
augmenting the merchandise equivalent of the monetary unit 
through the means of production, property, land, and securities. 
In the environment of belated reforms, an excessively strict 
monetary policy may only facilitate a precipitous fall in 
production and a drop in the standard of living of the populace, 
and bring about a social explosion. 
  At the same time, it is an axiom that it is not possible to 
ameliorate the economy on a market basis without resolving acute 
issues in the financial, budgetary, and monetary-credit systems 
and without first of all reducing the level of inflation to 5-8 
percent a month. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61126 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94030" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WESTERN REGION </F>
<F P=101> BELARUS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Government Economic Missteps Described </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0458A Moscow DELOVOY MIR in Russian 9 Dec 93 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0458A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow DELOVOY MIR </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by DELOVOY MIR staff correspondent Vladimir </F>
Sverkunov, under the "The Near Abroad" rubric: "Belarus: Without 
Money, Without Heat, Without Authority...."] 
  [Text] Empty store shelves; hours-long lines; prices 
rising almost weekly; money in freefall in relation to 
convertible currency and the Russian ruble--all of this has 
befallen the once well-to-do Belarus, which at one time had 
nearly the most favorable starting conditions to begin economic 
reforms. 
  The famous proverb "One waits for three years for the 
promise 
to be fulfilled" was not to come true: The country has not 
approached the market promised in 1990. The road of "evolution" 
proclaimed by the government in reality turned into running in 
place, contradictory in spirit, albeit "market-oriented" in 
letter; and laws adopted by the parliament--into another 
formality, which on top of that cannot compete with the numerous 
decrees, directives, and other administrative acts issued in 
great numbers by the Council of Ministers and its agencies. 
  Whichever sphere of the national economy we look at, it 
turns 
out that the leg has been raised for a decisive step, but never 
put down. Both the state sector and agriculture, as well as the 
monetary system and entrepreneurship, currently remain in this 
posture of balancing on one leg. 
  The problem that is most painful for Belarus is the supply 
of 
fuels and power. It would seem that a republic that does not 
have sufficient oil resources of its own should welcome its 
deliveries through any channels, especially considering that a 
market economy does not accept a monopoly in this sphere either. 
In reality, the government, instead of encouraging 
entrepreneurs, who could ensure that the republic has a 
plentiful supply of fuel and raw material for the chemical 
industry, has done everything to keep oil from getting into 
Belarus: Businessmen have been saddled with an enormous number 
of restrictions, the demand to sell raw materials to the state 
at laughable prices set by the latter, and killer taxes. All 
efforts have been applied at the same time to barter on a 
national scale: In accordance with the agreement on interrelated 
deliveries between Belarus and Russia, called "clearing" in 
government circles, enterprises were forced in a compulsory 
manner to surrender to the state fund a considerable part of 
their well-selling output--quite often at dumping prices. For 
instance, the state "buys" MAZ-5551 dump trucks from the 
BelavtoMAZ association at 11 million Belarusian rubles [R], 
while its production cost is R18 million. Deals of the same 
"profitability" are done with respect to refrigerators, 
television sets, tractors, footwear, and clothing. All of this 
for the sake of preserving a state monopoly on fuel and power: 
As long as it exists, these resources may be sold cheaply to 
those who will support the government's course. 
  That the clearing has not helped to maintain the supply of 
oil, and, on the contrary, has exacerbated the situation, is 
evidenced by the latest events. In October, under the pressure 
of the catastrophic situation with respect to fuel, the Council 
of Ministers made a concession to companies not owned by the 
state. It finally gave them the permission to trade in oil and 
petroleum products. And what happened? Fuel flowed like a river 
both from Russia and even from the Baltics at real 
prices--several times higher than those set by state officials. 
Private companies sell it straight from gasoline trucks, lease 
pumps at gas stations, and are agreeable to any terms of 
payment--and even in any currency. As to the fuel obtained 
through "clearing," it never materialized. Instead, Belarus' 
debt to Russia has reached almost $500 million. This order of 
things is envisaged to be maintained for the next year: A draft 
plan is ready, which envisages bringing state orders for leading 
enterprises to the level of almost 50 percent of their output. 
  Monopolistic methods also are used in the administration of 
agriculture. What kind of a market can we talk about when the 
state buys up everything produced in the agrarian sector at 
prices it sets itself and which not only do not keep up with 
inflation but often do not even cover expenses. Then later 
subsidies are issued (just enough so that the countryside should 
not die), which approach in size a quarter of the state budget, 
and preferential loans which consume up to 75 percent of the 
total amount of credit issued in the national economy. In these 
conditions the agricultural sector will never begin to trade 
and, having surrendered for peanuts the fruits of its labor, 
will remain forever a supplicant at the door of the "kind" state. 
  Entrepreneurs have to be smarter than this, among other 
reasons also because should they ever decide to ask for 
something from the state, which does everything to prevent the 
creation of a true free market, they will get in return an even 
greater worsening of economic conditions for their activities. 
In what other country does the tax on commercial activities 
reach 60 percent of income? And if the remaining 40 percent are 
intended to be paid out as salaries, there is tax trap waiting 
there as well: about 80 percent of various duties. As a result, 
out of every R100, private companies may realistically earn only 
R20. 
  Neither have the producers been shown any mercy. At a time 
when other republics of the former USSR have reduced the 
value-added tax rate, Belarus in real terms raised it this year 
by setting it at 25 percent and simultaneously introducing a 
3-percent--but applied to the entire amount of 
earnings--compulsory contribution to a mythical "fund for retail 
price regulation." Judging by the results of such "regulation," 
however, it is not enterprises that should pay the government, 
but the government that should pay a penalty to them for the 
collapse of prices. The tax on profit is also higher than 
anywhere else and reaches 30 percent. There also is another 
ineptly masked tax on profit--a payment for exceeding the 
nominal level of earnings, which is calculated at the same rate 
of 30 percent. More than 300 enterprises have been classified as 
monopolies (and really, why would a small republic have, for 
instance, several tractor or automotive plants?) for one single 
purpose: to regulate their profitability and prices by directive 
methods, to not let them operate in the market independently. 
  Thus has developed a purely Belarusian understanding of a 
market economy. Neither did it bypass the monetary and credit 
system. Funny clip-out pictures from a zoology textbook, which 
even the government officials now, following in the people's 
footsteps, call "rabbits," still represent who knows what. The 
Belarusian population, with the encouragement of the government, 
waits patiently for the "rabbits" to be exchanged for real 
money, which currently means Russian rubles. 
  It was in this crisis situation that the Supreme Soviet 
session opened in Minsk and the deputies demanded a change in 
the previously set schedule, insisting on dealing first with 
economic issues. 
  The heads of the parliament, the government, and the 
National 
Banks presented their reports. This, however, did not produce 
any clarity as to what to do next. In response to "let us have 
privatization" (over the past three years all of 2.68 percent of 
state property has been privatized), the prime minister rushed 
to assure everyone that by the end of next year 50 percent of 
enterprises will be transferred into private ownership. So what? 
The question is whether life-sustaining conditions will be 
created for these privately owned economic components, what is 
the prognosis for their future development, and whether they 
will be pushed around the same way that they were when they were 
still owned by the state. This, unfortunately, one can only 
guess. 
  Neither did it become any more clear with respect to the 
legality of circulation of "rabbits." Although the chairman of 
the board of the National Bank laid out good argumentation for 
the need to recognize Belarusian banknotes as national currency 
(without such a decision it is not possible to control to a full 
extent the monetary and credit emission, to establish a "real" 
exchange rate of the "rabbit" to foreign currencies, and to 
conduct full-fledged trade with other republics), the people's 
representatives postponed dealing with this problem until better 
(worse?) times. 
  One has to admit that power structures have turned out to be 
infected with the well-known Soviet-communist 
disease--dependency. "Now the landlord will come...." Until 
recently, Western Europe was seen as such a "landlord" and was 
firmly expected to provide aid. These illusions have evaporated; 
even small credits are obtained with great difficulties, and 
even that on the promise of reforms of the kind the Belarusian 
government has not seen in its worst nightmares. Now Council of 
Ministers representatives say openly at the parliament session 
that the government does not intend to dance to a foreign tune, 
no matter who plays it! 
  Where does such bravery come from? From a change of 
"landlord," that is where. One can even see it in the figures: 
The amount Belarus owes to Russia (about $500 million) already 
equals the amount of credit provided by other foreign countries. 
Meanwhile, winter is upon us; fuel will be needed, and the debt 
may well reach $1 billion. That is why Belarus does not 
recognize its own money as money. That is why the government, 
which has done nothing lately other than tighten "tax" screws, 
all of a sudden easily agrees to Russia's demand to 
substantially reduce three taxes simultaneously. And the 
parliament members, most of whom already have given this 
government a "no pass" mark, still do not raise the question of 
its resignation. 
  The Belarusian parliament has ratified three agreements: on 
the creation of the Economic Union; on the creation of new type 
of a ruble zone; and on combining the Russian and Belarusian 
monetary systems, in the hope that their implementation will 
help the republic to get out of the crisis. 
  Whatever may be, a necessary condition for unification with 
Russia is the existence in Belarus of a real, functioning 
authority that answers for its promises. So far, it is not there. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61127 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94031" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WESTERN REGION </F>
<F P=101> BELARUS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Call for Political Moderation, Compromise </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0514A Minsk ZNAMYA YUNOSTI in Russian 15 Dec 93 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0514A </F>
<F P=104>  Minsk ZNAMYA YUNOSTI </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Yuriy Voronezhstsev: "We Will Just Have To </F>
Choose Between Something Not Very Good and Something Very Bad: A 
Point of View"] 
  [Text] Perhaps 100 percentof our republic's citizens expect 
changes and are waiting for them to occur. A somewhat lesser 
number are convinced that these changes are impossible without 
replacing the parliament and the government. Each person views 
them in his own particular way; frequently various groups of 
people present completely opposite and mutually contradictory 
positions. But almost all of us hope for something better, 
especially in the event that those whom we like nowadays should 
come to power. 
  To be sure, our hopes for quick changes are hardly justified 
in any case. The process of the disintegration of the economy 
and the fundamental social structures has been going on for so 
long that "neither a genius nor a hero" will be able to rescue 
us from the present nightmare as rapidly as we would like. It 
will continue for another two or three years, even if a 
beginning is made on those reforms are carried out by persons 
who know how to implement them and who have support in the 
society. And are there any such persons here in our country? 
  Even if we were to assume what is virtually 
impossible--namely, that the elections to the Belarusian 
Parliament were held by the deadline promised by the present-day 
deputies of the Supreme Soviet--the picture that emerges is not 
completely rosy. Many serious analysts have pointed to the 
substantial probability of acquiring a parliament that is not 
much different from the Supreme Soviet which we have today with 
regard to its intellectural development, degree of competence, 
as well as the capacity for moving the reforms forward and 
providing stability within the society. Indeed, we have been 
pushed in the direction of this joyless conclusion by the 
surprising statements made by the leaders of the most 
influential political groups and factions now in the running for 
a significant number of seats in the new legislative organ. 
  They see as the principal causes of all our troubles the 
intrigues and machinations of the Russian special services, 
which "are exercising a free hand in Belarus," as well as the 
actions of the imperial-communist "Fifth Column," and the 
advocates of economic integration with that country which is 
traveling "down the path of a brutal liberal capitalism." The 
only thing to do is to break off from these foreign and domestic 
enemies, nationalize those enterprises which have been 
distributed and held hostage, separate ourselves from the 
Russian boors," and buy oil in Kuwait. Then--as a completely 
sovereign and independent republic--we would soon enter upon a 
kind of Baltic or Polish "prosperity." To be sure, before a 
sharper economic upswing could come to pass, it would be 
absolutely necessary to teach the Belarusian language to all our 
ministers, along with two or three other foreign languages. 
  Other leaders--during the time free from struggling against 
propaganda of the "cult of violence, the dollar, and sex"--are 
actively advocating a reanimation of socialism, which is 
presently at death's door, or what they have been saying for a 
long time: achieving an orientation of the state structures 
aimed at creating well-planned and regulated state-type 
commodity-and-monetary relations in the interests of enhancing 
the people's prosperity and cultural level. Loud calls are being 
heard for decisive actions to be taken for protecting and 
defending the "indigenous interests of the working people," the 
Soviets, for restoring the old USSR--of course, with the 
Communist Party at its head. The economic reforms leading to 
"capitalization" are to be excluded, and the growth of the 
people's prosperity would, evidently, be provided by purely 
ideological methods--although substantial revenues from tourist 
activity would be possible. Belarus--the last communist preserve 
on the territory of Europe--would be visited by people from all 
over the world in order to have a look at a unique country where 
entirely white people live under the "most democratic, 
collegial, and effective" Soviet-type regime. 
  There is also a "third force" in our republic--one which 
could neutralize the extreme political tendencies. But its ideas 
are not so popular or simple so as to enable them--as the 
Bolsheviks used to say--to win over the masses. And it is 
difficult to present this idea of liberalism with a populistic 
interpretation, especially under the conditions of the 
Soviet-type, leveling education accorded to the overwhelming 
majority of the members of our society. Furthermore, the mass 
media have already become divided over the two most powerful 
political factions and their variants--sometimes concealed 
behind the masks of "centrism." A strong side of those parties 
which can be provisionally relegated to the "true center" is 
their realistic approach to the problem of assigning priority to 
human rights over national and state rights. This is so because 
the majority of our republic's population regard implementation 
of the "human rights" principle as the "chief value" 
guaranteeing personal security and the stability of the society 
as a whole. 
  It is hardly likely that a majority in parliament will be 
gained by one of the parties or blocs which are striving toward 
this goal with participants who are very close in their 
ideologies and programs. The polarity of views on the basic 
problems of structuring the society and the state held by the 
future party factions in the parliament will--more than 
likely--cause the latter to be utterly inoperable. It will be 
difficult to get by without making compromises, and it is 
necessary to seek them out even today. It is clear that 
agreement between the advocates of the sacredness of private 
property and those fighters for the most just "social justice" 
is scarecely possible. But it is possible in another case. For 
example, in the program documents of that very same BNF 
[Belarusian People's Front], together with some completely 
normal and realistic provisions, there are also many on which 
agreement would be difficult to reach not only with the 
communist-internationalists, but also with persons unburdened by 
Marxist pathologies. But it would probably not be too difficult 
to find a compromise with the more moderate political forces on 
these same "revival" problems, if they were approached from a 
position of taking into account the interests of the majority 
now living in Belarus, rather than resurrecting historical 
justice or equity with regard to past generations. Because, 
after all, it is fully obvious that excessive radicalism--while 
understandable and justified under the conditions of an armed 
struggle against the colonialists for the nation's 
independence--is completely unacceptable at the stage of a 
society's quite civilized development, and even at a critical 
moment of this stage. It frightens quite a large number of 
persons, pushing them into joining "pink" or "red" 
parties--parties which have begun to trade upon the artificially 
inflated, so-called nationality issue. It is possible that 
mutual concessions can also be achieved along with an 
accomodation of views on other problems. 
  Without finding such common grounds--something on which 
political groups with various different program goals and 
ideologies could unite--the parliament would, of course, not get 
by. But this does not mean that replacing the Supreme Soviet 
with a parliament must be postponed "until later." Today we are 
compelled to choose between something not very good and 
something very bad. But tomorrow we could be left without even 
that kind of choice. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61128 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94032" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WESTERN REGION </F>
<F P=101> BELARUS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Development of Various Parties, Movements Reviewed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0481A Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA in Russian 18 Nov 93 
pp 2-3 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0481A </F>
<F P=104>  Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by the department of politics under the rubric </F>
"Press Digest. `Election-94'": "Parties Are Beginning To Define 
Themselves"] 
  [Text] Last week the first election bloc, the Alliance of 
the KhDNF [Christian-Democratic People's Front], took clear-cut 
shape. On 9 November it was registered by the central election 
commission. Leaders of the Alliance made programmatic statements 
in the weekly TARA. Iurie Rosca, chairman of the Executive 
Committee of the KhDNF Council: "The power satellite parties are 
competing with still greater diligence in grovelling before the 
three pillars of the Chisinau administration--Snegur, Lucinschi, 
and Sangheli--hoping to retain their cushy positions in the 
future.... Unlike the rest of the political parties and 
entities, which represent mere groupings of transient interests 
and have emerged solely with the intention of getting into the 
future parliament at any price, the KhDNF does not consider the 
forthcoming elections to be an objective unto itself, or, even 
less, the final point of its activities. To be sure, we would 
certainly like to convince as many voters as possible of the 
need to support our platform. For us the struggle did not begin 
today, nor will it be completed on 27 February 1994. To us, 
freedom is not a preelection slogan but a current demand: 
freedom for the political prisoners of Tiraspol; national 
freedom; freedom to assert human rights and to endow peasants, 
whom the communist regime has reduced to poverty, with land and 
farm equipment; freedom to engage in economic activities 
unhampered by artificial barriers thrown up by the old Bolshevik 
guard which has usurped all power in the state; conditions for 
providing normal wages for the population and retirement 
benefits that would ensure a comfortable existence for old 
people." 
  Sergiu Mocanu, another leader of the Alliance and chairman 
of 
the Presidium of the Council of the Volunteers Movement, 
analyzes those who fight against the statehood of Moldova. 
  "Recently, the idea has been propagated increasingly often 
that sociopolitical entities that belong to the 
national-liberation movement are fighting against the Republic 
of Moldova's statehood. The absurdity of this assertion, which 
is being persistently propagated by the president of the state 
and the power satellite parties, is obvious from the very 
beginning. 
  "We, participants in the combat for the integrity and 
independence of the Republic of Moldova, members of the 
Volunteers Movement, were not and cannot be against the state we 
have defended and for whose sake we paid a price in blood and 
the lives of our brethren who fell on the battlefield. We owe it 
to the blessed memory of their names to continue our struggle 
for the People and the Motherland. We are joining the election 
struggle because we are firmly convinced that only in this 
manner will we be able to rid ourselves and others of the need 
to fight for independence with weapons. In our actions we 
proceed from the principle that `the state constitutes the 
foundation for the exercise of the right of all peoples to 
decide their own destinies.' In other words, it is a means to an 
end, and not an end unto itself. We, those who come out for the 
unity of the People and the Motherland, are not the ones 
fighting against the state, but rather it is those who have 
turned the state into an instrument for exploiting our dignity 
for personal and clan interests." 
  Valeriu Babara, the third activist in the preelection bloc, 
general secretary of the executive bureau of the OKhDM 
[Organization of Christian-Democratic Youth], is a figure who is 
little known in politics. He outlined the tasks of the OKhDM in 
the newspaper TARA: 
  "Young people, who are referred to in official speeches with 
nauseating frequency but have almost always been ignored and 
abandoned, are the social group which has retained its purity 
and unity of ranks. In essence, they are the hope of the nation. 
Young people have earned indisputable credit in the 
national-liberation movement, in the defense of its 
accomplishments, in the anticommunist struggle. After the more 
than five years since the beginning of the national-liberation 
struggle, young people are coming to the conclusion that a 
serious threat to their future is looming, along with the future 
of the entire nation. Young people regard with anxiety the 
phenomena of a split within our society, and note the inability 
of our current leaders to find and use the only correct scenario 
for the quickest possible solution to the most serious problems 
we are facing. 
  "The structure I represent wants to bring youth into the 
political life of the Republic of Moldova, which is frequently 
smothered by egoistic caprices and interests. Only young people 
are free from the spiritual fetters of the obsolete communist 
system. Members of the nomenklatura who cling to power for dear 
life and claim to have some kind of `political experience' 
forget to specify that the experience they gained in the years 
of the old regime is unsuitable for the new reality. All of us 
experienced this `Red experiment' firsthand for more than 50 
years." 
  The time has come when Bolsheviks will be forced to step 
aside. It is not ruled out that by Bolsheviks, Valeriu Barbara 
means parties of a centrist and left-wing orientation which are 
also striving to win the elections. The weekly RESPUBLICA has 
published a report on a press conference given by the leaders of 
the Social Democrats. Oazu Nantoi, Victor Josu, and Sergiu 
Bernevec answered questions put by journalists. Victor Josu: 
  "We have decided not to make any projections on the results 
of the forthcoming elections. Naturally, for this reason we will 
not venture to assert with certainty, a priori, that we will 
receive more than one-half of the votes. The issue is being 
raised in a different manner--the Social-Democratic Party has 
set for itself the task of gaining no less than 50 percent of 
the votes of the electorate, plus one, in the elections. 
According to our observations, the political apathy which has 
prevailed in recent years has begun to abate sharply. The people 
are becoming interested in the party, in its program, and in its 
proposals. People from literally all rayons of Moldova come 
every day to our headquarters at 11 Cogelnicianu Street, invite 
us to meetings, enroll in our party, and offer us their 
assistance." 
  Oazu Nantoi: 
  "We are the first political party of a parliamentary type in 
Moldova. As early as three and a half years ago we perceived 
that our society needed a genuine multiparty system. We remain 
the only party which has its own doctrine--the doctrine of 
contemporary European Social Democrats. 
  "From the very beginning, even under pressure, our party has 
advocated the idea of statehood for the Republic of Moldova. As 
early as 1990 we maintained that Moldova is a citizens' state. 
We proposed the idea of popular privatization for certificates, 
whereas the government proposed privatization for money. In our 
opinion, this would have brought about the dangerous social 
stratification of our society into very rich and very poor. 
Undoubtedly, the voters have come to know us during these three 
years. 
  "We maintain that we have a rich land and a hard-working 
people. However, given the high density of the population and 
the European market, which is closed to competitors, Moldova 
will only survive if it complements efficient agriculture with 
equally efficient industry. As a mere agrarian republic we can 
only be an appendage of some other country. It is known that 
highly efficient agriculture employs a few percent of the 
population. We have a terrible imbalance here. Thoughtless 
implementation of high technology in rural areas creates the 
risk of making hundreds of thousands of people unemployed. 
  "We are facing two problems--to switch to a market mode what 
remains of socialist industry, and to create a genuine national 
economy. No major research of any consequence has yet been 
carried out in this area. If we have no high technology or 
electronic industry, our state will have no future. 
Unfortunately, things are bad now; enterprises are closing down. 
Despite all the hopes of the socialists, our working class is 
silently dying." 
  Experts of the ADPM [Agrarian-Democratic Party of Moldova] 
are also paying serious attention to economic issues. On the 
pages of the newspaper ZEMLYA I LYUDI, Aleksandr Muravskiy 
writes: 
  "As it evaluates the progress of reform in the agrarian 
sector, the ADPM supports the fundamental line of 
transformations aimed at developing a multisectoral agriculture. 
  "The ADPM believes that agrarian reform does not come down 
merely to the universal redistribution of land and the 
establishment of exclusively owner-operated farms, and that an 
economic system which combines in a rational manner small, 
medium-size, and large farms with various specialties and of 
various types and forms of ownership should be the main result 
of reforms. Transformations that will result in unprepared 
people being left alone to tackle their problems should not be 
implemented, like, for example, what has already happened to the 
Vatic sovkhoz in Orkheyskiy Rayon. The transformation of 
kolkhozes and sovkhozes should be accompanied by the appropriate 
development of a market infrastructure, including a system of 
credit associations, land banks, and cooperative and joint-stock 
enterprises which provide material and technical support to 
farmers and sell their products. We must not lose sight of the 
fact that accelerated privatization will bring about the release 
of a large number of employees from the sphere of agriculture, 
as, for example, happened in the former GDR, where in two years 
of reforms the number of agricultural employees has fallen by a 
factor of more than three. However, there it has been 
accompanied by tremendous financial infusions from West Germany 
in order to create new jobs. 
  "Aware of the fact that radical reforms that affect the 
fundamental basis of a society (ownership arrangements, social, 
moral, and ideological priorities, the place and role of a 
country in the international division of labor, and so on) are 
unavoidably accompanied by painful phenomena, the ADPM considers 
it necessary to make a number of proposals aimed at invigorating 
social policy. Measures aimed at stabilizing and subsequently 
increasing the level of employment of the population are the 
foremost in this package of proposals, because it is virtually 
impossible to ensure economic and social stability in the 
republic in an environment of growing unemployment. To this end 
it is necessary: 
  "--to invigorate, as much as possible, the activities of all 
state structures aimed at the development of small and 
medium-size businesses; 
  "--to provide incentives, by way of tax relief and credit 
preferences, to industrial enterprises establishing their 
branches, subsidiaries, and other structural subdivisions in 
rural areas; 
  "--to develop a streamlined system for using citizens who 
are 
temporarily out of work for public works to upgrade roads and 
localities and build facilities of social infrastructure; 
  "--to develop and adopt a special program for the export of 
labor; 
  "--to put in order the system for cadre retraining, taking 
into account structural changes underway in the economy of the 
republic." 
  The leadership of the Socialist Party takes an 
ostentatiously 
antiunionist position in its press organ, DREPTATE: "The idea of 
a national renaissance of the Moldovan and other peoples 
residing on the territory of the republic has been stolen, 
distorted, and financed [as published] by the destructive forces 
of unionist frontism, as have been the most radiant hopes for 
building a sovereign, independent, and democratic Moldovan 
state. Our noble thoughts and expectations were defiled by the 
maniacal ambitions of patriot-radicals (actually, the 
new-fangled national-communists of Ceausescu's ilk) who fancied 
themselves martyrs and heroes of the indigenous nation, the 
infallible messiahs of its deliverance. They, the ones afflicted 
with the virus of national superiority and pathological 
xenophobia, have destroyed numerous economic links between 
Moldova and other republics of the former Soviet Union, thus 
ushering in chaos in the economy, pushing it toward catastrophe, 
and opening up boundless opportunities for speculation, 
corruption, thievery, utilitarian attitudes, and the mafia to 
bloom. 
  "At present, these `chosen representatives' of the nation 
are 
trying again (yet again!) to undergo an ideological 
metamorphosis by creating all kinds of congresses and 
Christian-Labor-Democratic parties, forswearing odious frontism 
verbally but actually carrying on secret intrigues aimed at 
selling out the Moldovan people and their sovereign republic. 
  "Let us be vigilant! Let us guard ourselves--this time, in a 
manly and secure manner--against the demagogic froth of slogans 
steeped, just as before, in anticommunism, pseudodemocracy, 
nationalism, and inhumanity. They should not pass now! Let us 
not be misled by their moaning about, you see, `dark 
pro-imperial forces' which have gotten out of the trenches and 
allegedly pinned on them--who have `given back' to us the 
language, the alphabet, the tricolored flag, and the `Romanian, 
awaken!' anthem--the blame for inconceivable poverty, spiritual 
decay, and the incredible suffering of the people. They say that 
the `fifth red-and-brownshirt column,' a figment of their sick 
imagination, is to blame. 
  "The people have been silent too long! However, they have 
not 
slept a lethargic sleep. They have mustered their will and 
pondered their decisive word. We will hear this word--wise, 
unprejudiced, every kind [as published] of word--during the 
forthcoming early elections to the parliament and local organs 
of power." 
  A commentary is probably unnecessary. The reader will 
himself 
find the party and slogans that are to his liking. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61129 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94034" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WESTERN REGION </F>
<F P=101> MOLDOVA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Liberal Convention Issues Declaration of Goals </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0476A Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA in Russian 20 Nov 93 
p 2 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0476A </F>
<F P=104>  Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Declaration of program goals of the Liberal Convention of </F>
Moldova (abridged version)] 
  [Text] The election campaign, which is unfolding in 
the republic on a fundamentally new, multiparty basis, is 
stimulating political processes in society and the emergence of 
new political organizations and citizens associations. 
  The constituent conference of the Liberal Convention of 
Moldova, a social and political organization uniting in its 
ranks representatives of the intelligentsia, youth, business 
circles, and the industrial complex, was held on 11 November. 
The conference adopted the bylaws and formulated the program 
goals of this new movement. The Liberal Convention advocates the 
consolidation of all reform forces of society and the creation 
of real conditions for the extrication of Moldova from the 
socioeconomic crisis and the surmounting of the contradictions 
of the transitional period leading to a free economy and an 
open, democratic society. Not participating in the elections 
directly, the Convention will support political parties 
operating from liberal and progressive positions. Below we 
reproduce the text of the Declaration of the Liberal Convention 
of Moldova. 
  The collapse of the totalitarian system in Europe and the 
disintegration of the last empire have created conditions 
conducive to the people of Moldova's return to a civilized and 
democratic path of development. 
  We, the citizens of this country, are now faced with a 
vitally important task, the essence of which is the formulation 
and practical implementation of an efficient and viable 
model for the further evolution of society. 
  The experience of the dramatic existence under the 
conditions 
of self-assertion as a sovereign and independent state 
accumulated by the Republic of Moldova permits the conclusion 
that society's aspiration to self-organization has 
two paths--that of evolution based on the dynamism of 
social and political processes or the path of degradation, that 
is, conversion into a primitive system of the 
administrative-distributive type, in other words, totalitarian. 
  Parties formed in the majority of cases per the industrial 
principle or in corporate interests are predominant in the 
country's political life. The absence of a real confrontation of 
ideas and the confusion in ideologies are entailing confusion 
also in political actions and the conceptual approaches to a 
surmounting of the crisis and internal contradictions of the 
transitional period. 
  One more or less clear direction--the so-called "social 
market economy," which frequently directly echoes the trend 
toward a return to the administrative-command system--is being 
manifested in Moldova's sociopolitical reality. The main 
shortcoming of this direction is the attempt to preserve the 
absolute role of the state and the public sector in people's 
economic and social activity, enabling the oligarchy 
nomenklatura, incompetent and bankrupt under the new complex 
conditions, as a rule, to retain power. 
  The elaboration and creation in Moldova of a socioeconomic 
and political system capable of stimulating the efficiency 
and dynamism of the country's new evolutionary development 
may be realized on the basis of the creative application of the 
basic principles that ensure the efficiency and dynamic balance 
of democratic, industrially developed countries. 
  In this context, the ideas of liberalism could bring our 
society, deformed for so many years by the totalitarian regime, 
closer to the political, economic, and social culture of 
civilized countries. Being a copy of modern Western 
civilization, liberalism represents the core and 
essence of liberal democratic reforms. 
  On the threshold of the election of a new supreme 
legislative 
body of the country, a need for the consolidation of all forces 
advocating liberal democratic reforms in the united 
Liberal Convention of Moldova has arisen at the 
present time. The purpose of the Convention is 
effective support for political forces capable of embodying in 
practice real liberal doctrine and stimulating social 
development, creatively and consciously employing to this end 
the principles of liberalism as a philosophy of social being, 
spiritual condition, and sociopolitical practice. 
  The Liberal Convention of Moldova will operate in the name 
of 
realization of the following goals: 
<H5>  In the Political Sphere: </H5>
  The consolidation of the state independence, 
sovereignty, and territorial integrity of the Republic of 
Moldova--the objective conditions and constitutional framework 
necessary for securing the economic progress of the Moldovan 
people and the liberalization of political life and the economic 
activity of the country's citizens. 
  The creation and assurance of the normal activity of the 
civil society as a means of protection of the 
freedom of the individual by way of his being 
guaranteed basic rights and the introduction at all levels of 
state power of the principle of political 
representation. The subordination of political power to the 
civil society, which through the medium of its institutions 
makes it possible to avoid the negative manifestations of the 
totalitarian pretensions of the state. 
  The building of a truly law-based state--the 
defender of the basic rights and liberties of the citizen. The 
conversion of the interventionist state left over from the times 
of the totalitarian regime to a managerial authority and state 
administration. 
  The real separation of the branches of 
power to prevent any malfeasance and slide of power 
toward dictatorship and political voluntarism. 
  The adoption of a national constitution--the 
statute of power and the main voluntary agreement between the 
individual and the state. The refinement of current legislation 
for the creation of the legal conditions for the realization in 
day-to-day practice of the fundamental values of liberalism. 
  Support for the process of the Moldovans' national 
revival and the creation of the necessary conditions for 
preservation of the distinctiveness of the 
ethno-national minorities that reside in Moldova. 
  A solution of the Dniester conflict on the basis 
of preservation of the territorial integrity of the Republic of 
Moldova and a sober evaluation of current political realities, 
proceeding from the fundamental principles of international law 
and the European process. 
  The decentralization of state power, the 
delegation of managerial functions to the local authorities, 
their release from the tutelage of the central authorities, and 
the implementation to this end of administrative-territorial 
reform. 
  Assurance of control on the part of the civil society 
of the power and special structures of the state and a 
guarantee of the noninterference of the latter and also of the 
law enforcement authorities in political processes. 
  The integration of Moldova in the European 
Community on the basis of observance of the basic 
principles of freedom of the individual, human rights, the right 
of ownership, and the transition to a modern market economy. The 
preservation and continued development of mutually profitable 
relations with the new independent states within the framework 
of the CIS. 
  The creation of a climate of extensive cooperation among all 
political formations and nonparty associations of Moldova of a 
liberal persuasion and the creation of a liberal forum of 
Moldova. 
<H5>  In the Economic Sphere: </H5>
  The transition from a centralized economy to a 
market-type economy by way of the release and 
stimulation of private initiative in all spheres of people's 
activity and thanks to a rapid increase in the volume of the 
private sector in the economy. 
  The utmost support, primarily through the instrumentality of 
the state, for the creation of a liberal fund of the 
national economy. Support via the activity and resources of the 
fund for the private sector of the national economy. 
  Stimulation and support for private property, 
which will become the basis of a middle class and, 
simultaneously, the basis of the formation of real market 
relations and a democratic system based on the existence and 
activity of new subjects of economic relations and the defense 
of their interests by structures of representative power. 
  Support for the realization of economic liberalism via the 
creation of institutions and mechanisms of the market economy. 
The restructuring to this end of the financial and banking 
system, the creation of stock exchanges, a refinement of the 
fiscal system and tax policy, stabilization of the currency 
system, and realization of the convertibility of the national 
currency. 
  A rapid reduction in the economic role of the state, 
denationalization of state assets and 
demonopolization of the national economy by means of 
large-scale support for the new economic agents of the private 
sector and the creation of conditions conducive to the 
manifestation and development of competition. 
  Exercise by the state based on the rule of law of 
its principal functions--the creation of the legal and 
organizational framework of the action of the market 
economy, protection of private property and competition and the 
assurance of economic balance. 
  The assimilation of new markets for the sale of products 
outside of the country and also new sources of energy and raw 
material. Preservation of the traditional economic ties to the 
eastern markets and their mutually profitable use. 
  An increase in the efficiency of agriculture and 
productivity in this sector of the economy. Assurance of title 
to the land and the creation to this end of the economic 
conditions for realization of this right--the organization of a 
specialized banking system (credit agricultural banks), 
agricultural exchanges, and trading houses, which would support 
producers and investors. Assurance of the operation of various 
forms of ownership in the agrarian sector under the conditions 
of free competition and equal rights enshrined by law. 
  Encouragement of the development of Moldova's 
industry by means of an improvement of investment and 
credit policy in this sphere, support for new forms of ownership 
(stock companies, private enterprises, joint ventures with the 
participation of foreign capital, and so forth), the conquest of 
new markets for the sale of industrial products, and assurance 
of the permanent provision of industrial enterprises with raw 
material and energy resources. 
  A radical reduction in state regulation and participation in 
the sphere of trade and services, support for private 
initiative for the due saturation of the market with goods and 
services and the assured access of small-scale and medium-sized 
entrepreneurs to resources without any administrative 
restrictions. Protection of foreign capital and investments by 
the law and government guarantees. 
<H5>  In the Social Sphere: </H5>
  The combination in day-to-day practice of the 
principles of political and economic liberalism for 
the creation of a social environment in which the majority of 
people live freely, which is guaranteed by private 
property and control of the political authorities via the civil 
society. 
  The introduction in all spheres of activity of society of 
the 
principle of equality--equality before the law, 
equality of opportunities, and equality today and tomorrow. 
  The provision and improvement of a network of medical 
and social services and social insurance and 
support for private initiative aimed at providing for the needs 
of the entire population. 
  The reorganization and modernization of education 
and the stimulation primarily of its competence and 
quality. 
  The development of culture and access for all citizens to 
the 
cultural sphere and to forms of its manifestation. Support for 
the development of culture by material guarantees. 
  Support for the activity of free trade unions and 
constructive cooperation with them. 
  Assurance of the appropriate ecological conditions for 
people's normal life, primarily by way of preservation of the 
habitat and the environment. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61130 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94035" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WESTERN REGION </F>
<F P=101> MOLDOVA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Platform of Liberal Convention Reviewed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0476B Chisinau KISHINEVSKIYE NOVOSTI in Russian No 50, 
27 Nov 93 p 2 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0476B </F>
<F P=104>  Chisinau KISHINEVSKIYE NOVOSTI </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by T. Borisova: "The Issue of the Liberals' Purse"] </F>
  [Text] The first congress of a new social and 
political organization--the Liberal Convention of Moldova 
(LKM)--which is headed by N. Chirtoaca, adviser to the president 
of the Republic of Moldova, was held last Saturday, 20 November, 
in Chisinau. 
  The majority of the participants in the forum represented 
business circles of the republic. They were leaders of 
small-scale enterprises and cooperatives, stock companies and 
insurance companies, and commercial centers and funds. A 
telegram of greeting was sent the congress by entrepreneurs of 
the Left Bank. The Convention has thus first and foremost united 
those for whom neither the campaign against the market nor entry 
into the market presents insoluble questions. This is 
understandable, for the idea of liberalism contained in the 
designation of the Convention is based, as we all know, on the 
institution of private property and freedom of capitalist 
enterprise. It was proclaimed at the congress repeatedly, for 
that matter, that the organization is open to all who urge real 
reforms in Moldova. It was emphasized that liberalism has always 
been close to the Moldovan peasant. When, however, it was asked 
from the floor: "What about the working class?" the response 
was: "And workers in sympathy with liberal views should, of 
course, be in our ranks." 
  As far as the coming elections are concerned, the Convention 
identified its program maximum as follows: the creation of a 
liberal-reform bloc capable of elaborating a common approach to 
reforms in the republic. 
  "We intend," People's Deputy V. Dobria, an organizer of the 
Liberal Convention of Moldova, declared, "to support at the 
elections all parties and all individuals who have real reform 
programs. We have the intellectual and material forces for this." 
  So, employing the well-known metaphor, it may be said that 
one of the "moneybags" for bolstering the "body and spirit" of 
certain political forces in the election marathon has been 
filled. The candor with which this was stated is to be 
respected, I believe. To the question as to who specifically 
will, for all that, be receiving from that bag, V. Dobria 
observed that it would not, of course, be either the extreme 
left or the extreme right, since "both contain a direct threat 
to Moldova's independence." Not the friendliest attitude toward 
the Agrarian Democratic Party, "for an endeavor to preserve the 
kolkhozes at any price and for blockages in the way of 
privatization in the countryside" was expressed in passing. At 
the same time the right-wing social democrats and the Reform 
Party have already won the affections of the Liberal Convention. 
Concerning the liberals' direct participation in the elections, 
however, V. Dobria declared: 
  "We do not aspire to power, and we do not need positions. 
Our 
purpose is to help true professionals come to power. At the same 
time, you will see the names of members of the Convention on the 
slates of this party or the other that is participating in the 
elections. On which slates precisely it is hard to say, for not 
all parties have published their programs as yet." 
  Generally, both the congress and the news conference that 
followed were conducted under the sign of such symbols as 
"centrism," "private property," and "reforms." In the spirit of 
true liberalism. In the spirit of the present day. In fact, the 
entire organism of conventions seemed to me strikingly 
contemporary. By their uncomplicated attitude toward such a 
seemingly fundamental concept as the social base, for example. 
Remember--"and workers should be in our ranks." In some newborn 
parties, on the other hand, no social base is adumbrated at all. 
Never mind, do not worry, there should be an idea, and there 
will be a social base. 
  And how contemporary were all the liberal words on the 
subject of private property! No matter that it is not even 
mentioned among the vast majority of citizens. After all, the 
social democrats are just as ardently promising our rapid 
private-property formation in the process of privatization. 
Although it has long been calculated that even with a length of 
service of 30 years, a person is due four annual minimum 
wages--approximately half a million rubles, that is, coupons. 
  Also entirely in the spirit of the times, incidentally, is 
the fact that the head of the convention is none other than a 
presidential adviser. As you will recall, this path was trodden 
before him by another M. Snegur adviser, Stefan Gorda, now a 
leader of the Reform Party. Yes, as can be seen, it is with good 
reason that, in military terminology, the presidential host is 
forming an extended line. After all, practically all parties of 
the republic will be taking part in the early presidential 
elections, which, as can be seen, are not that far off. And, 
consequently, the head of state will be able to count on "his" 
bloc. 
  But I would call the most modern stroke of Saturday's 
undertaking the presentation of the convention. The smorgasbord 
was reminiscent of the preface of the "Book of Appetizing and 
Healthy Food" of the 1950's edition--a real treat! And how some 
newly baked and hardened politicians are treating themselves 
currently, lending an ear to the chink of coins in the liberal 
purse! 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61131 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94036" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WESTERN REGION </F>
<F P=101> MOLDOVA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Socialist Party, Unity Movement Issue Joint Appeal </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0479A Chisinau, KISHINEVSKIYE NOVOSTI in Russian No 50, 
27 Nov 93 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0479A </F>
<F P=104>  Chisinau, KISHINEVSKIYE NOVOSTI </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Preelection Appeal of the Forming Socialist Party Bloc of </F>
Moldova and the Unity Movement for Equality of Rights] 
  [Text] On entering the preelection campaign, we, 
representatives of the forming bloc, deem it necessary to 
proclaim the principles of our political position. In the course 
of the preelection campaign we will not deceive voters with 
fairy tales about "democratic capitalism," the myths about 
miracles of a market economy, radical reforms, or the 
wonder-working possibilities offered by "doctrines of European 
social-democracy" and triumphant entry into Europe through 
Romania. All this is beyond the field of real possibilities 
available in present-day Moldova, it is no more than just 
piquant imagination or simply political smoke and mirrors. 
  We appeal to the historical memory, historical experience, 
and historical wisdom of the people of Moldova who were placed 
by hostile political forces in a very difficult socioeconomic 
position, in a situation calling for selection of the forms and 
content of the future social order. 
  Society can function effectively only on a basis of common 
values. Their loss, eradication, or weakening always signals the 
downfall of statehood, destruction of society and its 
disintegration. That is why representatives of our bloc, having 
acquired the trust of voters, shall do everything possible in 
order to realize the main, triune task. 
<H5>  First </H5>
  Preserve and develop historically formed common values of 
our 
society--peace and harmony among nationalities, territorial 
integrity, fraternal cooperation between people of various 
nationalities, national, public ownership of land and natural 
resources, principal branches of industry and agricultural 
production, and wisely centralized management of the national 
economic complex, as well as mutual cooperation with all 
fraternal republics of the former USSR. 
  The Moldovan language is the most important common value and 
everything possible must be done for its voluntary assimilation 
by all citizens of Moldova. Bilingualism, particularly in the 
cities, with widespread utilization of the Russian language, 
which is spoken by virtually all persons living in Moldova, is 
no less of a common value. 
  The worker, the person engaged in socially useful labor in 
spheres of material and spiritual production and the very sphere 
of labor itself definitely remain a common value. Thoughtless 
and hasty reforms in that sphere on the basis of neocapitalist 
ideas would be a crime. 
  The history of Moldova, including its Soviet period, which 
is 
characterized by tumultuous historically unprecedented tempos of 
socioeconomic development and creation of industrial and 
agricultural complexes, development of its science, and 
educational and public health systems as well as culture, is and 
will continue to be an undiminished common value. 
<H5>  Second </H5>
  Restore and develop those common values that were forfeited 
in an unsubstantiated manner and primarily ones such as full 
universal employment with no unemployment which is so demeaning 
to human dignity, which now has not been known by entire 
generations of workers, guaranteed employment for all graduates 
of schools, trade schools, and secondary and higher educational 
establishments, mandatory and effective social protection of 
pensioners, children, young people, families with many children, 
and invalids, free education and medical services, legal 
protection, a state program of housing construction and 
provision of housing, representation of all social groups in 
legislative organs at all levels, public control of executive 
power, and election of judges in people's courts and people's 
assessors. 
  It is necessary to restore the youth policy which existed 
for 
many years, a system of public organizations for children and 
youth supported by the state and labor collectives, which posses 
exceptional historical experience in public education of the 
growing generation. 
  Unfortunately common values that were lost in many aspects 
include the most important one--that of equal rights. All 
citizens of the republic must enjoy an equal status in all 
vitally important situations, in all spheres of life regulated 
by law. 
  Representatives of our future bloc do not want restoration 
of 
features inherent in nomenclature totalitarianism. They will 
strive only for the restoration of social justice and will not 
permit rejection of a single one of the social achievements 
accumulated by workers over the years of struggle for their 
rights. 
<H5>  Third </H5>
  Promote in every possible way the creation of new common 
values affecting long-range development of society as well as 
consolidation of traditional and evolving forms of social 
interaction. This consists of a mixed economy with state control 
of its commanding summits in the implementation and interaction 
of state, municipal, collective, shareholder, leasing, private 
and other forms of ownership; their protection against 
manipulation by antisocial forces and the bureaucracy; free 
privatization of housing; creation of an ecologically 
comfortable living and production environment; a common search 
for a new meaning of life; ideological and political variety; 
priority of individual freedom without the nationalization of 
the spirit and a dictatorship of the majority; search for new 
forms of state building and collective responsibility for the 
future; creation of a social base for new forms of domestic 
socially significant entrepreneurship; establishment of a new 
level of economic and geopolitical consciousness of the people 
making the process of sovereignization of Moldova irreversible. 
  We invite all those who support the established political 
task to unify their efforts under a slogan expressing the 
quintessential basis of contemporary social values of our 
society: "Civil harmony, national equality, social justice." 
  [Signed]Republic Council of the Socialist Party of Moldova. 
  Executive Committee of the Unity Movement 
  Chisinau, 22 November 1993 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61132 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94037" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WESTERN REGION </F>
<F P=101> MOLDOVA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Association of Totalitarian Communist Regime Victims Issues 
Election Platform </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0479B Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA in Russian 30 Nov 93 
pp 1, 6 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0479B </F>
<F P=104>  Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Declaration of the Association of Totalitarian Communist </F>
Regime Victims] 
  [Text] A declaration adopted by participants of the Second 
Congress of the Association of Victims of the Totalitarian 
Communist Regime of Moldova was passed for distribution to the 
Moldova-Press Agency. It states: 
  The Second Congress of Victims of the Totalitarian Communist 
Regime of Moldova which took place on 20 November 1993 noted 
with profound concern the aggravation of the socioeconomic and 
political situation within the republic capable of leading to 
social explosions with severe consequences. 
  The steady and uncontrolled rise in prices for essential 
food 
items, complete devaluation of monetary savings of the 
population, non-indexation and delayed payment of wages, 
pensions, stipends, and grants, the growth of mafia-like groups 
and the blossoming of corruption led to a state where all of 
society was engulfed by a severe economic crisis and most of the 
population lacks any guarantees or certainty about what happens 
tomorrow. 
  Such economic chaos is a consequence of the blocking of 
democratic reforms in the economy by conservative forces, the 
inability of the current leadership to manage a sovereign and 
independent state, and the lack of an effective program for 
transition to a normal economy. 
  At a time when the population is growing poorer with every 
day, the number of ministries, departments, and governmental and 
parliamentary commissions is growing inordinately, naturally, 
along with the ranks of officials as hundreds of government and 
parliamentary delegations travel by air to all countries of the 
world while hundreds of delegations arrive in our country which 
requires the expenditure of huge sums of money without any 
practical benefit. The government finds money for the 
maintenance of excessively numerous structures as well as for 
the foreign trips and reception of delegations, but not for the 
indexation of wages, pensions, and stipends. 
  Privatization of state property is fiction. It is conducted 
within the narrow sphere of a corresponding department. The 
process of endowing peasants with land is being blocked and 
confiscated property and nationalized real estate is not being 
returned to victims of the totalitarian Communist regime. 
Moreover they are compelled to acquire above-norm living space 
at astronomical prices, including balcony areas, and apartments 
being privatized. 
  The president of the republic is not fulfilling his campaign 
promises regarding the conduct of democratic reforms, while a 
number of edicts of the head of state are being ignored by 
parliament and the government. 
  Unqualified affiliation with the Commonwealth of Independent 
States and the so-called economic union, carried out to the 
detriment of the economic and cultural integration with Romania 
and development of economic ties with western countries, will 
further aggravate the economic recession in the republic. 
  The policy being conducted by the current government in the 
field of taxation, excise taxes and licensing led to the 
bankruptcy of most of the producers and is stimulating the 
growth of speculation, crime, and mafia-like structures. 
  A number of errors by the government likewise led to a 
decline in culture, education, public health, and the lack of 
social protection for impoverished segments of the population. 
  Taking into account the socio-political and socioeconomic 
situation that developed in the republic, participants of the 
Second Congress of the Association of Victims of the 
Totalitarian Communist Regime of Moldova deem it necessary to 
raise the question concerning elaboration and conduct of a broad 
and concrete program of economic and socio-political reforms by 
the leadership of the republic, which would ensure the following: 
  1. Stimulation and development of the reform of the taxation 
policy and production enterprises regardless of forms of 
ownership. 
  2. Accelerated privatization of state property under strict 
government control. 
  3. Most effective functioning of all state structures in the 
development of small and medium-scale businesses. 
  4. Endowment of peasants with land, adoption of the law on 
private land ownership with the right of sale and purchase; 
transformation of kolkhozes into joint-stock companies, 
cooperatives, and farms with simultaneous development of a 
market infrastructure, including creation of credit societies, 
land banks, cooperatives and joint-stock companies in the 
material supply of farmers and individual farms as well as in 
the sale of their products. 
  5. Along with the restoration of economic ties with the 
eastern republics, full social and cultural integration with 
Romania through the signing of a fraternal treaty with it, 
coupled with development of economic ties with western countries 
through the attraction of investments in the development of 
industry and the agricultural sector. 
  6. Resolution of the Dniester region conflict along with 
differences with southern regions, withdrawal of the 14th Army, 
ensurance of the integrity of the republic with the aid of 
international organizations, unconditional release of Tiraspol 
political prisoners of the Ilashku group. 
  7. The swiftest conduct of territorial-administrative and 
judicial reforms and observance of human rights in all spheres. 
  8. Liquidation of the bureaucratic system through a 
wholesale 
decrease in the number of ministries, departments, and 
commissions, as well as in the size of their staffs. 
  9. Stimulation of the development of culture, science, 
public 
health, and education. 
  10. Social protection of the impoverished segments of the 
population--pensioners, invalids, elderly persons living alone, 
mothers with many children, employees and workers whose wages 
are below the minimum subsistence level through the indexation 
of wages, pensions, stipends, and grants and also through a 
cutback in irrational expenditures by state structures. 
  11. Restoration of the rights of all victims of the 
totalitarian Communist regime through the observance and 
amendment of the law on rehabilitation of political victims of 
the totalitarian Communist regime of 8 December 1992, to wit: 
  Return of property, real estate, and other confiscated or 
nationalized assets or award of compensation for victims or 
their descendants with the conclusion of an agreement for that 
purpose with Russia--the country which is obligated to provide 
compensation for all the material and moral harm caused victims 
of the totalitarian Communist regime. 
  Free privatization of all living space for families or heirs 
of those who suffered because of the totalitarian regime; 
  Recognition of the time spent by victims and members of 
their 
families registered in Russia and in other republics of the 
former USSR where they were forced to live after exile until 
their return to the republic as full active service in the 
computation of pensions and privatization of state property. 
  12. Indexation of monetary savings in savings banks at the 
expense of privatization of state property through the issuance 
of special bonds. 
  13. Restoration of history and national culture, the state 
language, national traditions, as well as ethnic development of 
the population of the republic. 
  Adopted at the Second Congress of Victims of the 
Totalitarian 
Communist Regime. 
  Chisinau, 20 November 1993 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61133 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94038" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WESTERN REGION </F>
<F P=101> MOLDOVA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Actions of Parties Outlined in Press Digest </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0482A Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA in Russian 24 Nov p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0482A </F>
<F P=104>  Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by the NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA political department </F>
under the rubric "Press Digest `Elections-94'": "All the Faces 
Are Familiar"] 
  [Text] The Reform Party "launched" two press publications 
all at once last week. The DNEVNOY EKSPRESS and OBSERVATORUL DE 
KISHINEU gave considerable attention to the party's program 
positions on their pages. This is what Anatol Salaru, the leader 
of the party, declared in an interview with DNEVNOY EKSPRESS: 
  "The aim of our party is the creation of political and 
juridical conditions for the development and expansion of a 
stratum of well-to-do, or even, according to our yardsticks, 
wealthy people--what in the West is called the middle class. The 
middle class, after all, is not just prosperous businessmen and 
owners of firms and plants, it is highly paid 
employees--teachers, engineers, doctors, and also workers who 
own stocks of enterprises and farm owners. This class is the 
foundation of consolidation and stability in society, and 
changes in financial and tax policy, legislation, etc., mostly 
affect it. 
  "Our aim also is to achieve equal rights for private 
property 
with respect to state property. 
  "We must change the existing order, but only in an 
evolutionary way, with the help of political, economic, and 
legal reforms, and reforms in education. We already have a 
program that is worked out for attracting foreign investors that 
went through expert analysis in Switzerland. We are counting on 
the support of private business, including in industry. We are 
against the policy of favorable credits, it is this that 
ratchets up the spiral of inflation." 
  The leaders of the recently created Liberal Convention of 
Moldova also are for radical economic reforms. Excerpts from the 
statements of the LKM [Liberal Convention of Moldova] are 
printed in the government newspaper GRAZHDANSKIY MIR: One more 
or less clear direction is appearing in the social-democratic 
reality of Moldova--the so-called "social market economy," which 
frequently has something directly in common with the tendency to 
return to the administrative-command system. The main deficiency 
of this direction lies in the attempt to preserve the absolute 
role of the state and the public sector in the economic and 
social activity of the people, permitting the nomenklatura 
oligarchy, which, as a rule, is incompetent and unsound, to 
preserve power under the new conditions. The Liberal Convention 
sets as its task the development and establishment of a 
social-economic and political system in Moldova that is capable 
of stimulating the EFFICIENCY and DYNAMISM of a new evolutionary 
development of the country that can be implemented on the basis 
of the creative application of basic principles that ensure the 
efficiency and dynamic balance of democratic and industrially 
developed countries... 
  At this moment in Moldova, on the threshold of the election 
of a new structure of the higher legislative organ of the 
country, the necessity has arisen to consolidate all forces that 
are for LIBERAL-ECONOMIC REFORMS in a united LIBERAL CONVENTION 
OF MOLDOVA. 
  An interview with Victor Puscas, the chairman of the 
Republican Party, is published in this issue of the newspaper. 
He gave this answer to a question on ways to get out of the 
crisis: "A rejection of extremism, no matter what form it takes; 
the creation of a civil society with all its attributes; the 
development of political pluralism, and at the same time putting 
both state and antistate ideologies outside the bounds of worker 
collectives... The development of the economy depends directly 
on political stability in society. Emergence from the crisis is 
possible, given an open economy, its decentralization, the 
development of all forms of property, first and foremost, 
private property. One of the reasons for today's crisis is the 
loss of state control over the economy and, most of all, over 
the products that are being produced, not even to speak of the 
loss of control over the process of privatization. 
  "I await the election programs of those political forces 
that 
are the 'fathers' of privatization. I wonder how these forces 
will explain the impasse in which we all find ourselves. Why did 
we not seriously begin privatization, although we should have 
completed it a long time ago? Why is privatization being 
implemented according to the principle of egalitarianism, and 
what are the consequences of this egalitarianism for all of us?" 
  Eugeniu Girla, a candidate for deputy from the KhDNF 
[Christian Democratic People's Front] electoral bloc, focuses 
his attention on economic questions. We quote from the weekly 
TARA: 
  "The structure of the national economy is characterized by 
an 
exaggerated share of the agro-industrial sector that does not 
correspond to the correlation between agriculture and industry 
and, simultaneously, by an unfavorable situation in the sphere 
of services. However, inasmuch as the transition to the market 
has already begun, we cannot delay the start of restructuring 
national income and the gross domestic product according to 
branches. The restructuring of the branches and sub-branches of 
the national economy, both from a quantitative and qualitative 
standpoint, can be conducted through the employment of a policy 
of priorities and support of some of them and the elimination or 
reduction of a shared part of others, in this way bringing the 
structure of the work force, the importance of the first, 
secondary, and tertiary sectors, and other macroeconomic 
criteria into a channel that is generally accepted by countries 
with a wealth of experience in a market economy. 
  "It will be necessary to carry out structural changes in the 
economy of the Republic of Moldova in consonance with the 
metamorphoses that are occurring in the economy of Romania: 
Joint efforts will reduce to a minimum losses associated with 
these processes by means of joint investments in all branches, 
in particular, industrial branches that require colossal sums 
that are almost inaccessible to each country by itself. At the 
same time, the Republic of Moldova in this way will have access 
to new sources of raw materials and energy, while participating 
in the development of the substantial energy potential of 
Romania and, with its help, breaking into third markets. The 
easing of the level of reprofiling, with a mutual expansion of 
sales market zones, will also lead to real economies." 
  Last week, communists made unexpected announcements about 
themselves. Vladimir Voronin, cochairman of the republic council 
of the Communist Party, shares his opinions on the forthcoming 
elections with readers of KISHINEVSKIYE NOVOSTI: 
  "First of all, I want to say that in my opinion the election 
of parliamentarians according to party lists is still another 
concession to certain forces. For to talk today about parties 
that have an adequate social basis in society is simply 
frivolous. Especially since a majority of them are small in 
numbers and, in fact, are "parties on asphalt," that is, parties 
that do not extend their influence farther than Chisinau and one 
or two other cities. 
  "Under these conditions, the Party of Communists of Moldova 
intends to help the voters to correctly orient themselves before 
the elections so that decent and competent people come to 
parliament." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61134 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94039" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WESTERN REGION </F>
<F P=101> MOLDOVA </F>
<H3> <TI>   People's Deputy on Socialist, Social Democratic Differences </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0482B Chisinau KISHINEVSKIYE NOVOSTI in Russian No 51, 4 
Dec 93 p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0482B </F>
<F P=104>  Chisinau KISHINEVSKIYE NOVOSTI </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by V. Morev, people's deputy of the Republic of </F>
Moldova and member of the Socialist Party: "Who Is the Leftist 
of Them All?..."] 
  [Text] Now, on the eve of the elections to parliament, it 
is becoming necessary to explain more and more frequently that 
the socialists and social-democrats in Moldova are not only not 
close in their views but are political opponents who differ in 
their basic ideological positions. 
  While the Socialist Party expresses the interests of wage 
labor, the Social-Democratic Party is a party of the national 
bourgeoisie. Up to the present time it has maintained the image 
of a "left-wing" people's party and even exploited the concept 
of "democracy" in its title, which means the "power of the 
people." But the fact that the SDPM [Social-Democratic Party of 
Moldova] also uses the term "social," well, after all, the 
national socialists also have it... Thus, the essence of parties 
is not in their names but in their fundamental ideological 
positions. First and foremost is the attitude toward property. 
Socialists understand the diversity of forms of property as an 
objective reality. But we are for a determinant role of people's 
property in the form of state and associated collective 
property. Only then is national income redistributed in the 
interests of the workers, and this means real social guarantees 
for the population, and there cannot be unemployment, inflation, 
and an increase in prices with a reduction in wages. People have 
access to housing, education, health services, etc., which makes 
it possible for them to live without fear of the future. There 
are also no reasons for massive corruption and crime. It is 
exactly under the supremacy of national property that it is 
possible to form the private sector of the economy on legal 
principles, with honest competition, and without the 
impoverishment of the working people. 
  The social-democrats, first and foremost, defend private 
property, under which the income of the people is redistributed 
in the interests of property owners, but not more than 10 
percent of the population can be the real owners of the means of 
production. I will not refute or confirm the opinion about the 
prerogative of the social-democrats in law-making and the 
conduct of privatization; i.e., the organization of the process 
of transformation of national property (state, kolkhoz, 
cooperative) into private property. Officially, everything went 
along the line of the state structure. Although V. Ciubotaru, 
while being one of the leaders of the SDPM, was the deputy 
general director of the State Privatization Department, and 
there are also members of this party in the department. But this 
is not the question. 
  While the Law on Privatization defines this process as 
national privatization, the practice went in an entirely 
different direction. The law makes it compulsory to guarantee 
the social protection of the population, but, in fact, it cuts 
itself out of participation in privatization by means of duties, 
fees, taxes, contracts, etc. A person frequently cannot even 
privatize his own apartment and, what is more, later maintain 
it, although he has already paid for its cost with his labor 
over dozens of years. 
  The rights of citizens are crudely violated in the receipt 
of 
an equal share of the ownership of state property that is 
subject to privatization. The first auctions revealed a 
deviation from the basic principles of privatization defined by 
law, including also the mandatory consideration of the work 
collective of the object being privatized. There is also a 
complete lack of reliable information about the progress of 
privatization. The law strictly prescribes that only citizens of 
the Republic of Moldova can participate in privatization, but, 
for some reason, the names of new owners are not publicized. 
  But perhaps it is necessary to seek answers to such 
questions 
from V.B. Ciesuev, who holds the position of general director of 
a state department: "The show will be directed by whoever really 
possesses the property. The market--is it not the best place for 
the application of unselfishness?" Well, this is just as frank 
as it is cynical. 
  The socialists are conducting an open political campaign 
against those who hurt the interests of the workers and violate 
their rights. At the initiative of the socialists, parliament 
decided that stocks acquired for BND [national property 
certificate] can later be sold only for national currency. We 
are for land and its wealth belonging only to the people and in 
no case to foreigners. We are for the ratification of interstate 
agreements and for Moldova's joining the economic union of the 
CIS. We are not for a return to the past, but for the 
improvement of society on socialist principles. We think that on 
27 February 1994 it is necessary to submit to a referendum the 
question of the political independence of the Republic of 
Moldova, and its joining the CIS and its economic union. The 
people, and not the parliament and not diminutive parties, 
should decide whether the state of the Republic of Moldova will 
or will not exist. 
  A very important factor that determines the essence of a 
party is its formulation of the type of authority that it 
defends. The socialists are for genuine sovereignty of the 
people; that is, for a referendum and for a national discussion 
on very important draft laws. The working people should not only 
nominate and elect deputies, but they themselves should also be 
represented with all of the powers in all branches at all levels 
of authority. The social-democrats assign primary importance to 
a professional parliament and to a bourgeois system of 
elections, where a working person is given the right to elect, 
but does not have a practical chance of becoming a deputy in 
parliament. After all, according to the new law on elections, 
the workers in Moldova are deprived even of the right to 
nominate candidates for deputy--only political organizations 
have this right, in a majority of cases small in membership and 
unknown to the people. This means that it is not the people who 
will nominate candidates, but the politicians--who will nominate 
themselves. 
  The positions of the Socialist Party and the 
Social-Democratic Party have also diverged with respect to the 
tragic events in Moscow at the beginning of 1993. In our 
republic, only the Socialist Party condemned the tyranny against 
the Supreme Soviet of Russia, which confirmed its legitimacy in 
a referendum in April 1993 on a par with the president of the 
Russian Federation. In those days in Moscow, not only were many 
unarmed people killed but democracy was executed there, opening 
the way to dictatorship of the right-wing reactionary forces. 
But the social-democrats openly supported these reactionary 
forces, showing that they are democrats only in words, for 
camouflage. 
  The party lists of candidates for deputy will also say a 
great deal. Oazu Nantoi, leader of the social-democrats, is now 
actively criticizing the democrat-frontists, but in the recent 
past he was cochairman of the People's Front of Moldova. Now Mr. 
Oazu has a new cover on his ideological banner... 
  The destiny of the people of Moldova will be decided on 27 
February 1994. On that day it will be possible to stop the 
policy of absurdity and put an end to the suffering of the 
people. According to the new law on elections, the elections are 
considered to be held if not less than 30 percent of the voters 
registered on the rolls take part in them. It is quite likely 
that if you do not come to vote, others will decide your destiny 
for you. Silence and inaction have already created trouble. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61135 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94040" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WESTERN REGION </F>
<F P=101> MOLDOVA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Goals of Moldovan Women's Association Explained </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0478A Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA in Russian 13 Nov 93 
p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0478A </F>
<F P=104>  Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Silvia Saca, deputy chairman of Moldovan </F>
Women's Association, by E. Albu: "Silvia Saca: `We Are Not a 
Charitable Organization'"] 
  [Text] I was heading for one room and ended up in 
another--that is, using my memory as a guide, I went down 
Sadovaya Street, looking for the old building where the former 
republic society for relations with foreign countries had been 
located, and learned that it was now the site of the American 
embassy.... People directed me around the corner, to the Dacnea 
Association for International Relations and the Moldovan Women's 
Association. It is a beautiful snow-white building resembling a 
triple-decker ship. It has spacious lobbies with upholstered 
armchairs, walls lined with elaborate oil paintings, posters, 
and etchings, bouquets of flowers in ceramic vases.... Sublime 
beauty, without a doubt, but what lies "within"? 
  In the reception area of the Moldovan Women's Association I 
was greeted by a young, attractive, and extremely friendly 
woman--Silvia Saca. 
  [Albu] Just what kind of entity is the Moldovan Women's 
Association, of which you are the deputy chairman? Does it stand 
for "aesthetic emancipation"? 
  [Saca] We are a sociopolitical organization, not a party. 
  [Albu] But why do you use the word "political"? 
  [Saca] We would like to take part in elections, but a social 
organization does not have the constitutional right to do this. 
There are only seven women in the Moldovan Parliament and one 
woman minister in the government. These figures are ridiculously 
low. 
  [Albu] What kind of relationship do you have with the 
Christian Democratic Women's League? 
  [Saca] Now it is good, but it was an exceptionally strained 
relationship in the past. 
  [Albu] With the possible exception of the Amazon warriors, 
women have always been against bloodshed. The image of the 
bare-breasted maiden with the flowing hair, carrying a banner 
through the rubble of the barricades, is ludicrous. It can only 
be seen in a Delacroix painting.... 
  [Saca] We are against bloodshed.... 
  [Albu] I was in the Dniester zone recently. The women of 
Bender, Tiraspol, and Dubasari whose sons are dead or disabled 
have announced their intention to promote peaceful consolidation 
and want to meet the women of Chisinau, Orhei, Stresen, and 
Belt.... Are the women of Chisinau willing and able to organize 
this kind of meeting today as a reproach to all of the 
"frontline combatants"? 
  [Saca] We are willing..., but relations between the two 
sides 
are still not encouraging, and the progression toward this kind 
of meeting will have to be gradual. 
  [Albu] President Mircea Snegur's message to the inhabitants 
of the Moldovan Left Bank includes this valid statement: "The 
main thing now is not to put all of the blame on one side and 
ascribe all virtues to the other. We will never be able to move 
from this kind of black-and-white position to a mutually 
acceptable peace agreement." It is true that this is an 
essential condition for the resolution of conflicts. Has your 
association made any attempts at this kind of convergence? 
  [Saca] Yes. Six women, active members of our association 
headed by L.E. Scalna, had a meeting with General Lebed. 
  [Albu] When?!! 
  [Saca] In August 1992, following the gruesome events. 
  [Albu] How did the meeting go? 
  [Saca] We managed to have an agreeable conversation without 
much effort. After all, the general has his own ideas about the 
honor of an officer. This time he was talking to women, however, 
and there was no need for arrogance. 
  [Albu] How did the conversation begin? 
  [Saca] At first we addressed him as Sir (Domnul) General. He 
bristled and turned somber and aloof: "I do not care for that." 
"Comrade" did not suit him either. "Then let us address you by 
your name and patronymic--Aleksandr Ivanovich." He relaxed right 
away. 
  [Albu] Then what happened? Did you discuss the "pacifist" 
Andreyeva? 
  [Saca] Yes, but we spent more time talking about the main 
thing. We said that the conflict seemed to have run its course, 
thank God, but the 14th Russian Army had furnished the "people" 
on both sides of the Dniester with huge quantities of weapons. 
  From the conversation with A. Lebed: 
  "What next? Just strike a match.... I guarantee that no more 
weapons will be plundered, squandered, or `distributed.'" 
  "Why did you change your mind about the Dniester 
government?" 
  "I cannot bear corruption...." 
  After our conversation, General Lebed gave up his seat as a 
deputy of the Dniester Republic (although many had known in 
advance that politics is no occupation for a general) because 
fighters from the Dniester had defended the White House in 
October this year, taking the side of A. Rutskoy and R. 
Khasbulatov after they had been outlawed by the presidential 
edict of B. Yeltsin. 
  From the conversation with A. Lebed: 
  "What kind of relationship do you have with the Moldovan 
leadership?" 
  "None." 
  "If you were invited to form a Moldovan National Army and 
were asked to take an oath of allegiance to Moldova, would you 
agree to do this?" 
  He almost turned green: "I would not betray my homeland." It 
was obvious that this was not a man who would go against his own 
convictions. After the conversation it was clear that the rift 
between "yours" and "ours" had to be repaired. 
  [Albu] There were so many disenfranchised families, disabled 
veterans, and refugees after the Dniester conflict. Did the 
Moldovan Women's Association come to their aid? 
  [Saca] Yes, we set up a social fund and opened a bank 
account. 
  [Albu] Where did you get the money? 
  [Saca] We asked enterprise managers for contributions and 
"squeezed" money out of every possible source. 
  [Albu] Was there a good response? 
  [Saca] Yes. The Zorile firm is a good example. The situation 
there is just the same as everywhere else today: It is not that 
good. Many things are in short supply or are lacking, but 
General Director V.V. Gervasev, who seemed so grim at first, 
nevertheless "came up with" 300 pairs of shoes.... It was such a 
strong and warmhearted response. There were other examples as 
well. 
  [Albu] What about private aid? 
  [Saca] With the money from the association fund, we were 
able 
to offer financial assistance to families who had lost their 
breadwinner and to disabled veterans of the bloody conflict, we 
paid for prosthetic appliances, and we sent victims--some of 
whom had lost arms and legs--to Romania for treatment.... 
  [Albu] Did the association also offer aid to the indigent? 
  [Saca] Rumors of our "generosity" apparently spread 
throughout Moldova. People came here and are still coming here 
from distant rural communities, incurring financial losses and 
travel expenses, but we are not a charitable organization. 
  [Albu] Then what is the purpose of the activities of the 
Moldovan Women's Association and your fund? 
  [Saca] We are collecting useful ideas, so that they can 
start 
"working" for the society. 
  [Albu] How? 
  [Saca] We were instrumental, for example, in the 
establishment of the "Businesswomen's Club." 
  [Albu] We have heard more than enough about businessmen, but 
who are these "businesswomen"? ...Are they "blue stockings"? 
  [Saca] They are women with professional expertise, primarily 
economic and organizational skills. Women who have succeeded in 
commerce and business, in firms and offices, will share their 
business experience with younger women. After all, many have a 
sincere wish to start their own businesses, to try their hand 
and test their skills in a chosen field, but the system of 
distribution did not give them the necessary experience or 
knowledge. 
  [Albu] In other words, as V. Rozanov said: "All property in 
Russia was `begged, borrowed, or stolen.'" There is little labor 
invested in this property, and that is why the tradition of 
ownership is weak and is not respected. 
  [Saca] That is exactly the situation today. People are 
confused by privatization and are ready to "beg" and allow 
themselves to accept a "gift." "Begging" is embarrassing at 
first, but it gets easier.... Later it becomes a habit. 
  Our conversation was interrupted by the arrival of a 
blind person from Bender and then of a mother carrying a 
baby. 
  [Albu] I suppose they come to you with their personal family 
problems? 
  [Saca] Of course. A woman recently came here. She was what 
we 
shamelessly refer to as a single mother. She was a qualified 
specialist in a construction field and asked us to help her get 
a shorter work day. "Call the boss," she asked us, "and give him 
a piece of your mind." I explained to her that we do not have 
"telephone prerogatives" of that kind. We can offer advice and 
suggestions, we can offer legal assistance, we can suggest how 
women might extricate themselves from difficult family 
situations and counsel them on the proper upbringing of a son or 
daughter. We are constantly dealing with complex situations of 
this kind, but many people, and not just women, are regrettably 
accustomed to getting something for nothing. 
  [Albu] How did you decide to resolve difficult interpersonal 
conflicts with the aid of the association? 
  [Saca] Here is one way. The Doina and Ion Aldea-Teodorovic 
Fund was set up at our "suggestion." We want to use this fund to 
help the artistic intelligentsia and people on pensions, to 
encourage the advancement of talented children, and to instill 
good taste, cultural sensitivity, and creativity in young 
people.... 
  [Albu] How are contacts established in these cases? 
  [Saca] Tatiana Pirkalab, one of our sponsors, visited the 
home of Doina's mother, Eugenia Marin, and informed her that her 
grandson Cristi, the son of Doina and Ion, was under the 
patronage of our association and fund. 
  [Albu] He is probably not the only beneficiary of the 
association sponsors' generous support.... 
  [Saca] A school for disabled boys and girls (only a few for 
now) was founded through the efforts of our "think tank" and our 
considerate patrons. Some will be trained as tailors, and others 
will learn English, translation, and typing. In short, we do 
have plans and ideas. 
  [Albu] In your efforts to build a new social relationship 
between different segments of the population in the republic and 
to establish contacts between the haves and have-nots, are you 
giving up some of the good old traditions? In public health 
care, for instance? 
  [Saca] No. We feel that the Soviet system of maternity 
health 
care was the best in the world. 
  [Albu] Is the Moldovan Women's Association threatened by the 
"governmental void"? 
  [Saca] We hope not.... 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61136 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94041" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WESTERN REGION </F>
<F P=101> MOLDOVA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Chairman Details Central Election Commission Activities </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0480A Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA in Russian 20 Nov 93 
p 2 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0480A </F>
<F P=104>  Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Nicolae Timofte by Ye. Podgornov; place and </F>
date not given: "As We Vote, So Shall We Live"] 
  [Text] An election is unfolding in Moldova. Parties, 
social and political movements, and blocs have begun the 
struggle for the electorate's vote. Election commissions, where 
the first meetings between the candidates for deputies' seats 
with the public are being held and visual material appealing for 
support for this candidate or the other is being displayed, are 
being manned locally. Things are getting busier for the Central 
Election Commission for elections to the republic's parliament 
by the day. 
  Our correspondent met with Mr. Nicolae Timofte, 
chairman of the Central Election Commission, and asked him to 
answer a number of questions. 
  [Podgornov] Mr. Chairman, tell us briefly about the 
particular features of the coming elections and how the makeup 
of your commission differs from previous ones. 
  [Timofte] The campaign itself has begun and will be 
conducted 
on the basis of the new Parliamentary Elections Act. The 
particular features of the elections are that they will be held 
on the basis of a multiparty system and under new conditions. A 
considerable amount of time has elapsed since the previous 
elections, and the socioeconomic situation has changed 
appreciably, as can be seen by everyone with the naked eye. 
  As you know, the Election Act had to be amended: It 
contemplated the campaign being conducted with a new 
territorial-administrative arrangement, but this matter has yet 
to be considered by parliament. For this reason, a single 
electoral district incorporating all of Moldova was formed. 
  The approach to the formation of the Central Election 
Commission was different also. According to the statute on the 
procedure of introduction of the Election Act, it included seven 
justices of the republic Supreme Court and representatives of 
parties, social and political movements, and blocs. The seven 
were elected by ballot at an open session of the Supreme Court. 
And then it elected from among its members a chairman. This is 
for me both a great display of trust and a great responsibility. 
  [Podgornov] How are relations between the justices and the 
representatives of the parties shaping up? 
  [Timofte] We are all members of one team. From the moment 
they become a part of the commission, the representatives of the 
parties must channel all their efforts toward fulfillment of the 
Parliamentary Election Act. They are called upon to be objective 
and to forget for the time being their own predilections. The 
justices, on the other hand, represent no parties or movements, 
we are depoliticized. All members of the commission together 
must adopt for the period of the campaign a dispassionate, 
neutral position. The Central Election Commission should and has 
already begun to exercise uniform application of the act 
throughout the territory of the district. 
  [Podgornov] What has the Central Election Commission done, 
in 
fact? 
  [Timofte] It has approved a plan of work for the whole 
campaign. We are now working on putting together various sets of 
instructions. We have approved the support groups of employees 
presented by the district soviet executive committees and city 
halls. These groups will maintain liaison with us and decide on 
operational matters. 
  A meeting of members of the commission and city and district 
leaders was held last week. Many organizational problems were 
studied. We shall be cooperating throughout the election period, 
and the first contact has now been made. Our commission has its 
own staff, manned by people who have taken part in similar 
campaigns earlier. And we have recommended that the leaders 
locally also enlist those who have experience, but lawyers, 
primarily. I feel that many have heeded our advice. 
  [Podgornov] And what is on the minds of the representatives 
of the local authorities? 
  [Timofte] Many matters, purely organizational, what is more. 
We have clarified the interpretation of certain concepts, 
conferred on the business of relations with the parties and the 
financing of various activities and the pay of the persons 
employed in this campaign, and so forth. We have had to respond 
quickly to everything, for we do not have that much time. I have 
already said that such elections are being held for the first 
time and that we are learning how to execute the new act as we 
go along. The meeting was useful for both sides. 
  Questions of the work of radio, television, and the 
newspapers on notification of the public and on all parties, 
movements, blocs, and independent candidates being accorded 
equal conditions on the basis of the Election Act were broached, 
for example. We should all keep an eye on compliance with the 
articles concerning the mass media. 
  The local authorities should also determine particular 
locations for the accommodation of visual campaign material. 
Equality must be assured here also. 
  And much work has to be done in respect to the financing of 
the campaign. We have to establish the upper limit of the 
election fund, which no one must exceed. The Central Election 
Commission and the Ministry of Finance will monitor this. 
  [Podgornov] But the parties, movements, and blocs, and the 
independent candidates, among whom, I assume, there will be many 
with tightly stuffed wallets, could use their resources for 
additional canvassing and propaganda of their platforms and 
programs. Who will monitor this? 
  [Timofte] I have already said that all this is entrusted to 
our commission and the Ministry of Finance. The work will be 
highly complex and scrupulous, but if malfeasance is revealed, 
the results of the elections could be called into question. In 
addition, everyone surely knows that it is not possible to use 
financial assistance from abroad. A procedure for the repayment 
of government loans has been specified also. If you have failed 
to muster the requisite number of votes, you will have to return 
the money in full. And this is spelled out in detail in the act, 
for that matter. 
  [Podgornov] And what if some people avail themselves of the 
services of private newspapers and radio? How is expenditure to 
be monitored there? After all, everything could be arranged 
verbally, and no one could prove a thing. 
  [Timofte] We will rely on the honesty of the candidates. But 
if it is discovered that money has been spent over and above the 
fixed amounts, the results of the ballot could be deemed null 
and void. In addition, this would be a scandal which would be 
remembered up to the next elections. It is hardly likely that 
anyone would want to undermine his reputation. 
  [Podgornov] How do things stand with the formation of 
election commissions locally? 
  [Timofte] We have begun and will continue to make contact 
with the local authorities within the framework of the act. We 
recommended at the seminar, incidentally, that the leaders make 
a careful study of it. Their main task is to help all candidates 
for deputy's seats to an equal extent. To single out no one 
specially or help any one person specifically more than another. 
Efforts obviously need to be made when organizing meetings of 
representatives of parties, movements, and blocs to ensure that 
not just one party or movement but several take part in the 
meeting. If some people need a meeting with the public only by 
themselves, they can organize this themselves within the limits 
permitted by act. This is their right. 
  [Podgornov] It may be assumed here that the activity of the 
electorate and its participation in the elections also will 
depend on the constructiveness of such meetings. What kind of 
guarantees of objectiveness of the actual ballot process and the 
counting of the vote are contemplated. It is no secret that 
during past elections quite aggressive canvassers, who would in 
two or three words make it understood what would await a person 
who voted against such-and-such a person, would frequently be 
sauntering through the polling station premises. What guarantees 
of the voters' voluntary expression will there be now? 
  [Timofte] The act specifies the actions of the law 
enforcement authorities on polling day. We and all those 
responsible for the voting will obviously have to adopt 
effective measures to put a stop to possible provocations, 
pressure on people, and so forth. 
  The participation of foreign observers and the press is 
planned at the elections themselves. It is contemplated inviting 
observers from Russia, Romania, Ukraine, the CSCE, and other 
countries and organizations. We want to impart to our elections 
glasnost in the broadest meaning of this word. 
  [Podgornov] And will elections be held on the Left Bank and 
in Gagauzia? 
  [Timofte] According to the act, they are to be held as in 
the 
rest of Moldova. This campaign will be a litmus test for the 
separatists, which should reveal or, more correctly, specify 
their political character. After all, the right to vote and run 
for election is guaranteed each citizen of Moldova. Let us see 
how it is realized in the Dniester region. We will see for 
ourselves together with the international community who is who. 
But I will not make predictions. I would like to hope for the 
best. We are a united country, and it would be desirable to 
confirm this unity. 
  [Podgornov] The campaign is only just beginning. All your 
work is still to come. But, obviously, the electorate should not 
be passive in this period either. What would you wish them at 
this time? 
  [Timofte] First, that people get to the heart of what is 
happening and probe the program of each party, movement, bloc, 
and independent candidate. May they vote from conviction, not 
compulsion. 
  Second, we all need to remember that we must elect the 
parliament we deserve. For as we vote, so shall we live. Let all 
voters ponder this. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61137 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94042" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WESTERN REGION </F>
<F P=101> MOLDOVA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Formation of Liberal Reformatory Alliance Announced </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0477A Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA in Russian 16 Nov 93 
p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0477A </F>
<F P=104>  Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Text] The formation of the Liberal-Reformatory Alliance as 
the first stage in the process of creating the Liberal Party of 
Moldova was announced at a press conference in Chisinau on 15 
November. 
  The initiating group, made up of members of the business 
community, scholars, and attorneys, acquainted representatives 
of the news media and accredited foreign journalists with the 
"Liberal Program of Action." It explains why the members of the 
initiating group united in the Liberal-Reformatory Alliance. 
  The future party will propose its own program, based on the 
liberal doctrine which was and is the basis of modern Western 
civilization and embodies the essence of the liberal democratic 
reforms. 
  Advocating the establishment of freedom in an atmosphere of 
law and order, the Liberal Alliance will strive to attain the 
goals of its program in the political, economic, and social 
spheres and will take action to strengthen the institutions of 
the civic society, to foster decentralized government, and to 
promote the encouragement, support, and legal protection of 
private ownership. 
  The development of economic liberalism presupposes 
denationalization through the privatization of state property 
and the demonopolization of production. 
  The initiators of the Liberal-Democratic Party want to 
create 
the kind of social environment in which the majority of people 
will live freely in an atmosphere of political and social 
stability. 
  The reporters had many questions, and these were answered at 
the press conference. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61138 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94043" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WESTERN REGION </F>
<F P=101> MOLDOVA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Economic Rebirth Party Announces Platform </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0477B Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA in Russian 25 Nov 93 
p 2 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0477B </F>
<F P=104>  Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Viktor Starik, personal correspondent (Belt): </F>
"Economic Rebirth Party"] 
  [Text] Members of the Moldovan Economic Rebirth Party 
(PEVM) attended a constituent assembly last Saturday in the Belt 
Municipal Palace of Culture. 
  The platform they approved says that this is a new political 
party, uniting all social strata of the republic population on 
the side of cardinal changes in the state-administrative economy 
and the establishment of a law-governed state. 
  Members of the initiating group, President Aleksandr 
Kisherin 
of Kisherin &amp; Co., an agroindustrial firm, Moldovan People's 
Deputy Anatoliy Konoplin, Moldovan Savings Bank branch manager 
Vladimir Chekin, KPP Director Aleksandr Sukhostavskiy, and other 
prominent administrators of enterprises in Belt, had this to say 
about the need for this new party in a political statement they 
issued during the preparations for the constituent assembly: 
  "Just yesterday we still expected the republic parliament 
and 
government to lead the economy out of crisis. We believed that 
the political confrontation would come to an end.... We 
anticipated the start of genuine, effective economic reform in 
Moldova. 
  "Today we can see that these hopes and other expectations 
were unjustified. The social and economic conditions of our life 
are particularly disturbing and are growing worse each day.... 
  "The reason, in our opinion, is that the politicians in 
power 
care more about their group interests and ambitions than about 
the actual standard of living. 
  "The PEVM intends to fight for the interests of the laboring 
public, for social justice in our society, and for the 
territorial integrity of Moldova. The new party advocates the 
restoration of ruined technical and intellectual potential and 
favors stronger ties with the republics of the former USSR, the 
developed capitalist countries, and the dissolved socialist 
camp." 
  The new political party which was founded in Belt has 
already 
been joined by more than 600 people and supports the development 
of collective and private businesses, entrepreneurship, and a 
flexible tax policy. 
  As speakers remarked at the constituent assembly, the PEVM 
cannot participate autonomously in the current parliamentary 
elections, but this does not mean that it will stay out of 
politics. Its members include many respected industrialists and 
entrepreneurs whose opinions are certain to influence the 
government and president of Moldova. 
  Many of Moldova's northern regions support the PEVM platform 
and the charter adopted at the constituent assembly and sent 
representatives to the gathering. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61139 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94044" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WESTERN REGION </F>
<F P=101> MOLDOVA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Department Head Updates Privatization Efforts </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0475A Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA in Russian 18 Nov 93 
p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0475A </F>
<F P=104>  Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with State Department Privatization Chairman </F>
Vissarion Cheshuyev, by Leonid Kazakov; place and date not 
given: "Could You Play a Nocturne?... Privatization: Step by 
Step"] 
  [Text] The first strike of the bookmaker [as 
published] hammer put a decisive end to a chain of tiresome 
discussions on the topic whether privatization in the Republic 
of Moldova is or is not to be. Long live the wonderful paradox: 
In the harsh struggle to guard the interests of the state, a 
decisive and inevitable step has been made in the direction of 
depriving this very state of its monopoly on property. Truly, 
you do not always pick things up where you once put them.... 
  The wine has been poured, wise men say, and has to be 
drunk. We have much more reason--and much less time to 
hesitate--to go through the next step than we had before we 
started. 
  For this very reason, our meetings with the head of the 
State Privatization Department became more frequent, and we are 
here again conversing in Vissarion Cheshuyev's office. 
  [Kazakov] Vissarion Borisovich, as they say, the process has 
gotten under way. And immediately one has to worry whether we 
would replace the monopoly of the state with the monopoly of 
clans. This is not an idle question: Figuratively speaking, 
faces familiar to all of us are beginning to appear in the back 
rooms of privatization, do you not find it so? 
  [Cheshuyev] I have heard of such concerns. I would not deny 
it--not all of them are groundless: Whoever is the real owner of 
the property will rule the ball. The marketplace is not the best 
environment for displaying altruism. At the same time, I am not 
inclined to exaggerate the danger of some or other political 
groups gaining a monopoly on the initiative. It is not so easy 
to do, especially here, where, as they say, each person is 
watched, especially if it is a prominent figure. 
  [Kazakov] Still, you will not deny that as soon as an 
opportunity comes along to accumulate the population's 
privatization money--let us call it this way--a concentration of 
ownership rights immediately takes place, and on the same scale, 
at that. This process, as any oscillatory phenomenon, is capable 
of becoming an avalanche. The experience of managerial science 
does not deny the fact that effective management of production 
manifests itself especially when property is concentrated among 
a limited number of owners. So here is the contradiction: On the 
one hand, the negative effect of a monopoly; on the other--the 
well-known problems of a child with seven nannies. What to do? 
  [Cheshuyev] I repeat once again: Let us not dramatize the 
situation. Both contentions have been supported by empirical 
evidence. The famous General Motors company, for instance, has 
almost million stockholders, but its manageability does not 
suffer a bit from it. A bitter fight may ensue, on the other 
hand, among two co-owners, even relatives, who sometimes run 
their economic ship aground by trying to take the controls from 
each other. I see a different danger here. Let us take the 
experience of Russian privatization. The number of enterprises 
privatized through conversion to joint-stock ownership is 
reaching the tens of thousands, but turnover of securities is 
extremely low. As a result, the pressure of the gigantic money 
supply on the consumer market is not easing at all, and goods 
are becoming increasingly scarce. As a consequence, the 
government is forced to regulate the state of the market with 
the same administrative measures. First and foremost by running 
the printing press overtime. The Government of Russia has 
allocated additionally more than 1 trillion rubles [R] for 
procurement of agricultural products. Where will this money come 
from if the printing press operates much more productively than 
a weaving loom or a metal-cutting lathe? One may assume.... 
  [Kazakov] The indexation of working capital in Romania is a 
phenomenon of the same order. 
  [Cheshuyev] Of course. Hence, the conclusion: One of the 
most 
important privatization tasks--creating an active securities 
market--has not been resolved. I am increasingly inclined to 
believe that at the first stage of privatization, at the very 
beginning of it, the effectiveness of investment funds, which 
concentrate considerable means in their hands, is not 
significant. It appears that preference should be given to trust 
companies, which will help the population to acquire registered 
stock for registered bonds. I emphasize--registered. This is the 
only way to create a real securities market. 
  [Kazakov] It would be good to demonstrate it on an example. 
  [Cheshuyev] Certainly. The average value of a BND [national 
wealth bond] is, let us say, 400,000 monetary units. For this 
money its owner may purchase 400 shares of stock at R1,000 each. 
Why keep them all under the mattress? A person will try to sell 
for profit if not one-half, then at least one-third of this 
stock. In my estimate, one out of every three of our citizens 
will make this decision. The result is a securities market, 
which will tie up huge amounts of money, thus relieving the 
pressure on the scarce consumer market. Commodity prices will 
stabilize. The economy will gain what it had been deprived of up 
till now--the economic motivation for labor. 
  [Kazakov] Are you not afraid that the securities market will 
soon become wild, as does everything here? 
  [Cheshuyev] I am, and therefore I believe that the state 
should quickly get its bearings. Buying and selling of stock 
should not become the prerogative of street trading. The 
organizational mechanism for a securities market was developed a 
long time ago. We do not need to invent anything. 
  [Kazakov] Let us go through it once more. For certain 
reasons, unlike the Russian version of privatization, we have 
made our BND registered. Will they not lose this quality once 
they are turned into stock? 
  [Cheshuyev] The task of the BND's is not to preserve forever 
the situation of the initial stage of privatization. Their task 
is to launch a market. They do not give a person the right of 
property per se--only the right to acquire it and dispose of it 
at his discretion. A BND, if you wish, is the starter of 
privatization. It helps to implant in a person's consciousness a 
qualitatively new notion of social justice as the equality of 
initial conditions rather than the equality of pieces of the pie 
handed out through the window of a state distributive agency. 
  [Kazakov] So we can put it this way: Distributing bonds to 
everyone in the country is a distribution of fishing rods, not 
the fish. Take it and fish in the places where you think the 
fish would take the bait best. Go fishing alone or in company 
with others. Create, invest, experiment! 
  [Cheshuyev] This is the only way. A sense of ownership--as 
all other senses, as a matter of fact--has to be nurtured and 
developed. There will be mistakes; losses are also inevitable. 
And there will be the development of a person as an individual 
capable of walking through life on his own, without grasping all 
the time for the handrail of state support. 
  [Kazakov] You mentioned that preference should be given to 
trust companies over investment funds. At the same time, it was 
you who did not allow trust companies to participate in the 
first auctions. Why? 
  [Cheshuyev] Only one reason: We did not have a statute on 
trust companies. Now it has been developed, and one hopes that 
it will be approved soon. Then--be my guest; convince your 
compatriots of your competency and integrity. Earn their trust. 
Offer programs, compete. Make money for yourself and for others. 
  [Kazakov] Privatization is being conducted on a national 
scale, but it involves quite specific objects, located on 
specific territory. Hence, a question: the place and the role of 
municipal organs in the privatization process. What do they get? 
And something else: A store is sold at an auction. To be 
precise: What is being sold is the former property of the 
Ministry of Trade--counters, scales, refrigerators, hangers, 
other equipment. As to the building itself, let alone the land 
underneath, they still will not become the property of new 
owners. One beautiful day the true landlord decides to put his 
property to a different use, and the new owners are left on the 
street with a pile of quite worn-out equipment. Or, a different 
version: Impose such lease terms that it will make more sense to 
just give your property away to the lessor. What to do? 
  [Cheshuyev] I have heard quite a lot about this problem. It 
is interpreted in two ways: To some, it seems that the 
municipality does not possess any property, and therefore city 
authorities find themselves on the sidelines of privatization. 
Others, on the contrary, are afraid of arbitrariness on their 
part and thus sow the seeds of doubt in the minds of potential 
owners. 
  Both positions are not quite correct. Municipal authorities 
are not at all devoid of rights. They are the owner of 
everything that is on the books of the municipal services 
system, as well as of all enterprises that provide life support 
for populated areas. The government decree envisages the 
transfer of this type of enterprise from the jurisdiction of the 
sectoral ministries to that of the local authorities. Frankly, I 
am not certain that the latter are ready to take upon themselves 
this load and to manage it rationally. They may end up creating 
their own sectoral ministries. And there is nothing frightening 
in this, in my opinion. As is known, one possesses only that 
scope of power one is capable of taking upon himself. 
  [Kazakov] What if he takes on too much? 
  [Cheshuyev] That is also possible, and that is why a law on 
municipal property is urgently needed--which we still do not 
have. This law should regulate the procedure of managing the 
property of regional authorities, its sale, leasing, and so on. 
The latter is especially important. Such procedure at the level 
of a law will rule out any doubts with respect to potential 
arbitrariness of the sort "today I lease it, and tomorrow I 
change my mind." We asked the municipal authorities to develop a 
statute on the procedures of privatization of municipal 
property. So far without any result, although I do not know of 
any party that has more at stake in this document than they do. 
  [Kazakov] This part is clear. Let us return to auctions. 
What 
considerations were you guided by in entrusting their conduct to 
some or other company? Who are those lucky guys? There are 
rumors of some clan or even personal interests.... And 
generally, why would your state department not take upon itself 
this "honorary" function? Why do you need middlemen? 
  [Cheshuyev] I have to point out that conducting auction 
sales 
is an undertaking that is both time-consuming and expensive. We 
do not have the money or the manpower for such specific work. 
  [Kazakov] Is it really that much hassle: a bookmaker [as 
published], champagne, music--nothing but a celebration. 
  [Cheshuyev] A ballerina's leap on the scene also looks 
effortless, but behind it is the exhausting, hard labor of a 
workhorse. The spectator does not see it, but this only makes it 
harder for the ballerina. Judge for yourself: Before a lot does 
up for sale, it has to be studied from all angles and a 
technical certificate issued for it. You have to know everything 
about it: the condition of the foundation, of the building 
itself, its communications, equipment, power system, and many, 
many other things. Mountains of documents have to be processed 
within a very short period of time. It is in essence a very 
complex expert evaluation. Do note: If the lot purchaser 
believes he has been cheated--for instance, if he discovers 
hidden defects--he has the right to sue us for compensation. We 
have to trust the experts very much in order not to make 
ourselves vulnerable to new owners. 
  [Kazakov] What does the experience of past auctions show? 
  [Cheshuyev] We commissioned their organization and conduct 
to 
Moldprivatinvest Joint-Stock Society, and here is why. Two units 
of this solid company undertook this task: the Industrialproekt 
design and construction institute and the Azimut-tsentr company. 
The former has highly skilled specialists and undertook 
professional development and preparation of all technical 
documentation, the intellectual potential of sorts; the latter 
undertook organization and financing for the entire action. 
Personally, I do not see how the state department could possibly 
carry out this grandiose task in practical terms. We have 
neither the specialists nor the money. A small item for 
reference: To prepare three lots for the auction took about R20 
million. All in all, there are about 40 enterprises. I doubt 
that I would find support in the Ministry of Finance had I asked 
for such amounts to prepare enterprises for the auction. I have 
to give Moldprivatinvest its due--they did their work superbly. 
As the saying goes, "Their example is a learning experience for 
others...." Everything was organized and carried out at the 
highest level of professionalism, rapidly and precisely. I have 
to admit that they set the plank so high at this first auction 
that subsequent organizers will have a hard time reaching for it. 
  [Kazakov] Is anybody already reaching for it? 
  [Cheshuyev] Yes, the next in line are the Gliya, Lara, and 
Moldova exchanges. We will gladly consider any proposals, but I 
have to warn: You may do it better than Moldprivatinvest, but 
not worse. 
  [Kazakov] Why then spread yourself thin? Let them conduct 
the 
auctions. Why not leave well enough alone?... 
  [Cheshuyev] I cannot. I am in principle against monopolies. 
An exclusive right to anything whatsoever begets exclusive 
interests, behavioral motives, and many other things. Everyone 
who goes into a business should have a chance. 
  [Kazakov] A rather slippery one, judging by what you say. 
You 
ask them to play a nocturne on the flute made of drain pipes, as 
Vladimir Vladimirovich [Mayakovskiy] used to say.... There 
probably is good profit from such a zeal--is there not? 
  [Cheshuyev] Not too good. The money they put into doing this 
work could be "turned around" with much greater 
effectiveness--which, I must tell you, they know how to do. No, 
they are not driven by profit. There are certain company 
interests that transcend mercenary motives. The company image, 
for instance; its rating. 
  [Kazakov] Let me ask you one more question. You said that in 
privatization you prefer trusts over other structures because 
they reflect most fully the interests of their principals, that 
is, the BND holders. Are there not other interests involved? 
  [Cheshuyev] There are other interests, too, and I have 
already mentioned them. Privatization through trust companies, 
in my opinion, will allow us to create a securities market in 
the shortest time possible, thus relieving the money supply 
pressure on the consumer market. I am not certain that there is 
a more effective way to stabilize the economic situation in the 
country. 
  Let us summarize the first results. 
  Legislative acts on privatization are far from 
perfect--there 
is no argument about that. There have been many comments on this 
topic, and there will be more. But what do we have today that is 
perfect? And do we have the right to expect laws passed in a 
hurry to be perfect? And can we afford not to hurry? 
  We have to admit that all these questions are rhetorical. It 
cannot be otherwise. 
  I personally like the position of the general director of 
the 
privatization department: In order to learn how to swim, you 
have to at least get into the water. You will take in a 
mouthful, sink perhaps, if you cannot avoid such a turn, but you 
will be learning how to swim. Let us not assume that a law is 
something cut in stone. The constitutions of most democratic 
countries contain many amendments--is this not evidence that 
they were not perfect originally? 
  First lots; first auctions; first joys and 
disappointments.... We will learn. And we will master it if we 
really want to. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61140 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94045" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WESTERN REGION </F>
<F P=101> MOLDOVA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Edict on Real Property Tax </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0473A Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA in Russian 23 Nov 93 p 
2 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0473A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> ["Edict of the President of the Republic of Moldova: On Tax </F>
on Real Property"] 
  [Text] In connection with the critical situation in the 
republic's economy and the need for the creation of a financial 
base for the local organs of administration and in accordance 
with the Law of the Republic of Moldova "On Principles of the 
Tax System," I resolve: 
  1. To introduce as of 1 January 1994 a tax on real property. 
  2. That the tax on real property shall be levied: 
  for enterprises and organizations--on the value of fixed 
production and nonproduction capital, except for transport 
facilities; 
  for individuals--on the value of the buildings and 
structures 
they own. 
  The payers of the tax on real property shall be legal 
entities, irrespective of the type of ownership and form of 
management, and also individuals owning, possessing, or enjoying 
real property on the territory of the republic. 
  3. To establish the annual rate of the tax on real property: 
  for enterprises and organizations, on the value: 
  of fixed production and nonproduction capital, except for 
housing not used in entrepreneurial activity, at 1 percent; 
  of housing, except for that used for entrepreneurial 
purposes, at 0.05 percent; 
  for individuals, on the value: 
  of buildings and structures used in entrepreneurial 
activity, 
at 1 percent; 
  of buildings and structures not used for entrepreneurial 
purposes (accommodations and such), at 0.05 percent. 
  4. That the following shall be exempt from the tax on real 
property: 
  real property managed and used by establishments and 
organizations funded from the state budget, except in the 
instances of its use for entrepreneurial purposes; 
  civil defense properties; 
  real property of religious organizations intended for 
religious ceremonies; 
  real property owned by senior citizens, the handicapped 
groups I and II, and other disabled citizens and not used for 
entrepreneurial activity in the absence of able-bodied family 
members residing together with them. 
  5. That taxpayers shall independently calculate the annual 
amount of tax in accordance with the established procedure of 
determination of the value of the taxable property and the rate 
of tax and shall pay it within the following timeframe: 
  enterprises and organizations--quarterly, no later than the 
20th of the month following the accounting quarter in the amount 
of one-fourth of the annual amount of tax; 
  individuals--in a lump sum on the basis of notice from the 
tax authority and within the timeframe established by the local 
government authorities. 
  6. That the tax payments on real property used in 
entrepreneurial activity shall be referred to expenditure on 
production (goods, jobs, services), and in respect to property 
not used in entrepreneurial activity the taxpayers shall pay the 
tax from their own sources. 
  7. That the tax payments specified by this edict shall be 
entered in the local budget. 
  8. That the rights, obligations, and responsibility of the 
subjects of taxation and the tax authorities shall be 
established in accordance with the Law "On Principles of the Tax 
System." 
  9. That the government shall within a two-month period 
determine the procedure of computation of the value of the 
taxable property and the conditions regulating this procedure. 
  10. That this edict shall take effect the day it is signed. 
  [Signed] Mircea Snegur, president of the Republic of Moldova 
  Chisinau, 8 November 1993 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61141 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94046" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WESTERN REGION </F>
<F P=101> MOLDOVA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Concerns of Ethnic Ukrainians Outlined </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0473B Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA in Russian 27 Nov 93 
p 2 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0473B </F>
<F P=104>  Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with M.N. Repchinskiy, deputy chairman of the </F>
Ukrainian Culture Society and chief editor of the newspaper 
PROSVITA, by Marina Bazhutina; place and date not given: 
"'People Can Decide for Themselves'"] 
  [Text] Ukrainians are second in our republic in terms 
of size of population. Questions of the coming elections cannot, 
naturally, avoid them and they disturb them no less than others. 
  It was in this connection that a correspondent of 
NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA met with Mikhail Nikolayevich Repchinskiy, 
deputy chairman of the Ukrainian Culture Society, chief editor 
of the newspaper PROSVITA and, naturally, citizen of the 
Republic of Moldova. 
  [Bazhutina] Mr. Repchinskiy, Moldova is preparing to elect a 
new parliament. Ukrainians, who constitute approximately 15 
percent of the republic's electorate, are thus of considerable 
interest to the parties laying claim to power. But you will 
agree that the rich palette of political programs, with at times 
barely discernible differences between them, creates a certain 
difficulty for the ordinary voter: for whom to show preference. 
So for whom will Ukrainians vote? 
  [Repchinskiy] The society, as a small part of the body of 
Ukrainians of Moldova, has never claimed to reflect the common 
opinion of all its fellow countrymen. At the same time, on the 
other hand, we are citizens, and each of us has personal 
political predilections and reference points, which in 
individual instances are focused ideologically: some cleave to 
communist, some to democratic convictions. I am citing 
polar-opposite views, let us say, here. 
  Imposing on Ukrainians in advance some one political scheme 
common to all is simply unintelligent, therefore, for there is a 
considerable danger here that one could lapse into the sin of 
provoking a split in the community. And there are already 
sufficient splits in Moldova. We operate differently. We are 
familiarizing ourselves with the political programs of the 
various parties and conferring with their leaders, particularly 
on problems concerning a guarantee of economic and political 
liberties and the rights of the national minorities. In a word, 
conclusions and some advice for Ukrainians will be drawn only on 
the basis of a thorough study of all the "contestants" for 
parliamentary seats. 
  At the same time meetings with representatives of Ukrainians 
of individual enterprises and organizations show that preference 
in this milieu is being shown to the forces that are not in 
power. And this is explicable: The parties that are represented 
in parliament today are wittingly or unwittingly evoking 
people's dissatisfaction on account of the policy that led to 
last year's fratricidal war and the ineffective solution of the 
economic, language, and a multitude of other questions. 
  [Bazhutina] So what do Ukrainians expect of the future 
members of parliament? 
  [Repchinskiy] The answer needs to be sought in the range of 
problems which affect people's vital interests. Language, as a 
means of communication, cannot, for example, be allowed to 
become a means of pressure, even less political blackmail. A 
person cannot be afraid of losing his job merely because of 
ignorance of the language. Not to mention the enormous 
intellectual losses that could occur if we fail to find an 
intelligent solution that does not impinge on Ukrainians. These 
losses, as deplorable practice has shown, are of a moral and 
political nature which is hard to restore.... 
  There is the ancient oriental saying: If you fall out, do so 
in such a way that you can make up tomorrow. How far our 
politicians have abided by this rule I leave you to judge. 
Different, fresh forces which sensitively catch the demands of 
the people and respond to them accordingly are needed today. 
  I shall use the following fact to illustrate this. There 
are, 
if I am not mistaken, approximately 40 Ukrainians in the present 
parliament. But with the very rare exception, Ukrainians 
themselves and their national and cultural problems have been of 
no interest to this group. Why is this? Because many of these 
deputies represented the interests not of Ukrainians but of 
yesterday's party-nomenklatura elite, which fed them and which 
they served faithful and true. It is not fortuitous that it is 
from there that charges against us of nationalism and 
"Bandera-ism" have most often been heard whenever we have raised 
the question of the development of Ukrainian culture in Moldova 
and the opening of our own national schools--a question, 
fortunately, their wishes notwithstanding, which has been 
supported by the president and the government. 
  As far as the political structures are concerned, only one 
party--the social democrats--has in recent years regularly 
maintained contacts with the Ukrainian Culture Society and 
adopted an understanding attitude toward Ukrainians' specific 
interests. All the others would like to see us either as a 
blindly credulous driven mass or some conglomerate blend of the 
non-Moldovan, so-called Russian-speaking population. 
  With regard for the current situation in the republic the 
social democrats, incidentally, were the first to speak about 
the need for guaranteed national representation in parliament. I 
agree that this is not the ideal solution either. Power should 
represent experience, knowledge, and intellectual potential 
multiplied by professionalism, regardless of the ethnic 
affiliation of its exponents. And someday, I believe, it will. 
But today's state of our democracy and the whole of society 
demands just such an approach. Disregarding this means 
disregarding the demands of reality itself. And it puts on the 
agenda such a question as Ukrainians being granted within the 
framework of national and cultural autonomy the rights of local 
government. This right should, incidentally, be guaranteed all. 
  Let the state deal with questions of defense and foreign 
policy and formulate the strategy of economic policy, but not 
distribute fuel by the liter and not indicate from Chisinau what 
to sow and when to harvest. People can decide for themselves not 
only these but also other problems which are beyond the capacity 
of the state. I, as one of millions of taxpayers, say, would 
like to know on what these funds are being spent and to 
administer some of them--at self-government level. 
  [Bazhutina] And the final question. How do you view the 
attempts to form an association of the "Russian-speaking" 
electorate? 
  [Repchinskiy] In the same way as I view any actual 
anti-Moldovan coalition. We have experience--and bitter, at 
that--of this. I believe that the fate of the state and its 
future need to be decided not by a counterpoise of the interests 
of different groups of the population but by comparing them and 
making them commensurate and, where possible, combining them. 
Ukrainians, like the Russians and Bulgarians, have their own, 
characteristic interests, and they can be resolved perfectly 
well without the creation of various "fronts," which would only 
cause doubts as to the sincerity of their creators' intentions. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61142 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94047" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WESTERN REGION </F>
<F P=101> MOLDOVA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Edict on Introduction of National Currency </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0472A Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA in Russian 27 Nov 93 
p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0472A </F>
<F P=104>  Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> ["Edict of the President of the Republic of Moldova on the </F>
Introduction of a National Currency in the Republic of Moldova," 
dated 24 November 1993] 
  [Text] With a view to ensuring the further implementation 
of economic reforms, the creation of [Moldova's] own monetary 
system, and in keeping with Article 113-7 of the Constitution of 
the Republic of Moldova, I decree: 
  1. A national currency, the leu (Moldovan), which equals 100 
bani, shall be introduced in the Republic of Moldova effective 
29 November 1993. 
  Currency put into circulation by the State Bank of the USSR 
and the Central Bank of the Russian Federation in 1961 through 
1992, with the nominal value of 1, 3, 5, 10, 25, 50, and 100 
rubles, coupons issued by the National Bank of Moldova, with the 
nominal value of 50, 200, 1,000, 5,000 and "5 lei" (equal to 
5,000 coupons), as well as metal coins minted by the USSR State 
Bank during the same period, shall be exchanged into lei in 
keeping with the present edict. 
  All cash and noncash monetary funds circulating in the 
Republic of Moldova, including deposits of the population, shall 
be exchanged until 1800 hours on 2 December, at the exchange 
rate whereby one leu equals 1,000 coupons (rubles). 
  Effective 1800 hours on 2 December 1993, the leu (Moldovan) 
shall be the sole legal tender in the territory of the Republic 
of Moldova. 
  2. The Monetary Reform Committee which has been established 
by edict of the president of the Republic of Moldova No. 243, 
dated 9 December 1992, shall: 
  set forth the mechanism for implementing the monetary 
reform; 
  envision procedures for defraying expenses associated with 
the conduct of the monetary reform; 
  continuously monitor the money supply and the financial 
situation of the state, as well as take measures to regulate 
them during the period of implementation of the monetary reform; 
  establish a procedure for exchanging coupons of the National 
Bank of Moldova (rubles) into lei (Moldovan); 
  resolve the issues of determining the value of negotiable 
instruments, public debt, securities, and interest in leu terms; 
  resolve the issue of changing the price scale; 
  envision measures to support, stabilize, and reinforce the 
national currency; 
  take other measures necessary to conduct the monetary 
reform. 
  3. Decrees of the Monetary Reform Committee shall be binding 
in the entire territory of the republic. 
  4. Organs of local self-government, banking establishments, 
and enterprises, regardless of the form of ownership, shall 
ensure strict compliance with the decrees of the Monetary Reform 
Committee. 
  5. The present edict shall take effect on the day of 
signing. 
  [Signed] Mircea Snegur, president of the Republic of Moldova 
  City of Chisinau, 24 November 1993 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61143 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94048" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WESTERN REGION </F>
<F P=101> MOLDOVA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Decree on Introduction of National Currency </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0472B Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA in Russian 27 Nov 93 
p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0472B </F>
<F P=104>  Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> ["Decree No. 1 of the Monetary Reform Committee on the </F>
Introduction of a National Currency in the Republic of Moldova"] 
  [Text] In keeping with the Law of the Republic of Moldova 
on Money, dated 15 December 1992, and Edicts of the President of 
Moldova No. 243, dated 9 December 1992, "On Establishing the 
Monetary Reform Committee," and No. 200, dated 24 November 1993, 
"On the Introduction of the National Currency in the Republic of 
Moldova," the Monetary Reform Committee 
  Resolves: 
  1. A national currency, the leu, shall be introduced into 
circulation in the Republic of Moldova at 1600 hours on 29 
November 1993. One leu equals 100 bani. 
  Currency put into circulation by the State Bank of the USSR 
and the Central Bank of the Russian Federation in 1961 through 
1992, with the nominal value of 1, 3, 5, 10, 25, 50, and 100 
rubles, coupons issued by the National Bank of Moldova, with the 
nominal value of 50, 200, 1,000, 5,000 and "5 lei" (equal to 
5,000 coupons), as well as metal coins minted by the USSR State 
Bank during the same period, shall be exchanged into lei in 
keeping with the present decree. 
  2. All cash and noncash monetary funds circulating in the 
Republic of Moldova, including deposits of the population, shall 
be exchanged until 1800 hours on 2 December, at the exchange 
rate whereby one leu equals 1,000 coupons (rubles). 
  3. Monetary credit obligations and other claims that are 
legally valid in the Republic of Moldova as of 29 November 1993 
shall be converted into lei until 2 December 1993, inclusive. 
Settlements on existing obligations and the satisfaction of 
other claims shall be effected from 16 December 1993 on. 
  4. Citizens (residents) of the Republic of Moldova may 
exchange cash once, into lei, at the exchange rate established 
in point 2 of the present decree during the period between 29 
November and 2 December 1993, inclusive. Cash in amounts of up 
to 70,000 coupons (rubles), inclusive, per individual shall be 
exchanged into lei at the relevant exchange centers; cash in 
excess of these amounts shall be deposited in special accounts 
at the banking establishments of the Republic of Moldova and may 
be received by depositors, in keeping with their wishes, 
beginning on 6 December 1993. If these funds are left dormant 
until 1 July 1994, income shall be paid to depositors for this 
period based on the average interest rate of commercial banks at 
the location of the opening the account. 
  The fact of effecting exchange shall be registered for the 
citizens of the Republic of Moldova in their passports, or 
documents in lieu of passports, by way of the entry "exchange 
performed" with a signature certified with the seal of the 
establishment performing the exchange. 
  For the legal entities of the Republic of Moldova, the 
exchange of coupons (rubles) into the national currency shall be 
performed in keeping with instructions from the National Bank of 
Moldova. 
  5. During the period of exchange, the parallel use of the 
currency being withdrawn and the national currency being put 
into circulation shall be allowed only for trade in foodstuffs 
at stores of the state and cooperative trade sectors, regardless 
of their departmental affiliation, and in paying for medicines 
and services of public transit. The rest of the goods shall be 
sold for lei. 
  Effective 1800 hours on 2 December 1993, the leu shall 
become 
the sole legal tender in the territory of the Republic of 
Moldova. 
  6. Cash shall be exchanged for employees (students of higher 
and secondary educational establishments, servicemen) at the 
place of main employment (study, service). 
  Nonworking retirees shall exchange the currency being 
withdrawn into the national currency at the branches of the 
Savings Bank of Moldova or branches of the Posta Moldovei state 
enterprise at the location of the receipt of retirement benefits 
(allowances). 
  Exchange shall be performed for nonresident foreign citizens 
and stateless persons by banking establishments upon the 
production of customs declarations and receipts for the exchange 
of currency. 
  Exchange shall be performed for other individuals who do not 
fall into the categories enumerated above by commissions of the 
organs of local self-government. 
  Procedures for the exchange shall be regulated by the 
Instruction of the National Bank Moldova on Procedures for the 
Exchange of Currency Being Withdrawn Into the National Currency 
of the Republic of Moldova for Residents and Nonresidents. 
  7. All state, cooperative, public, and other enterprises and 
establishments, regardless of the form of ownership, must 
document the presence of the currency being withdrawn in their 
cash stocks as of 29 November 1993, and turn the currency in to 
the bank establishments serving them to be credited to current 
or settlement accounts. 
  8. The exchange and conversion of monetary funds, in keeping 
with points 1 and 3 of the present decree, shall be effected by 
banks and other establishments that have been authorized by the 
National Bank of Moldova to perform relevant operations. 
Beginning on 26 November 1993 and for the duration of the period 
of exchange and conversion, said banks and other establishments 
may discontinue the conduct of all operations for clients, with 
the exception of exchange operations. 
  Offices of the Posta Moldovei state enterprise shall 
discontinue operations with coupons (rubles), with the exception 
of exchange operations, effective 26 November 1993. 
  9. Organs of local self-government, banking establishments, 
and enterprises, regardless of the form of ownership, shall 
ensure strict compliance with the present decree. 
  10. Organs of state power, law enforcement organs, the 
finance, tax, and customs services of the Republic of Moldova, 
as well as the National Bank of Moldova, shall ensure the 
monitoring of compliance with the present decree. 
  11. With a view to stabilizing monetary circulation and 
reinforcing the national currency, all enterprises, 
organizations, and establishments, regardless of the form of 
ownership, must strictly comply with the provisions of the Edict 
of the President of the republic of Moldova No. 105, dated 30 
April 1992, "On Urgent Measures To Normalize Cash Circulation in 
the Republic of Moldova," and Decree of the Republic of Moldova 
Government No. 764, dated 25 November 1992, "On the Confirmation 
of the Rules for Performing Cash Operations in the National 
Economy of the Republic of Moldova." 
  The Ministry of Justice, the Ministry of the Economy, and 
the 
Ministry of Finance, jointly with National Bank of Moldova, 
shall prepare, within two days, proposals for economic sanctions 
for a failure to comply with these provisions. 
  12. With a view to supporting the national currency, the 
free 
access of the leu and freely convertible currencies to the 
process of privatization, along with national assets 
certificates, shall be provided, subject to subsequent 
confirmation by the Parliament of the Republic of Moldova. 
  13. This present decree shall be enacted at 1600 hours on 29 
November 1993. 
  [Signed] Chairman of the Committee, Prime Minister of the 
Republic of Moldova Andrei Sangheli 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61144 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94049" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WESTERN REGION </F>
<F P=101> MOLDOVA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Decree on Price Conversions </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0472C Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA in Russian 27 Nov 93 
p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0472C </F>
<F P=104>  Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> ["Decree No. 2 of the Monetary Reform Committee on Changing </F>
the Scale of Prices"] 
  [Text] The Monetary Reform Committee resolves: 
  1. In conjunction with the introduction of a national 
currency, the balances of finished products, raw materials, 
merchandise-material, and other assets of enterprises and 
organizations with all forms of ownership shall be inventoried 
as of 29 November 1993, and their prices shall be converted at 
the rate of 1 leu = 1,000 coupons (rubles). 
  2. Enterprises and organizations with all forms of ownership 
shall be obligated to use rounding as follows in converting the 
sale prices of goods: The fractional component of less than 0.5 
bani shall be omitted, and that of 0.5 bani or more shall be 
rounded up to 1 ban. In the process, the unit of sale (the 
amount of goods sold) shall be changed in the case of goods 
whose prices after conversion become less than 0.5 bani, so as 
to arrive at a price in whole bani. 
  3. Differences due to conversion shall be attributed to the 
results of economic operations. 
  4. Enterprises of the Ministry of Information Science, 
Information, and Communications and the Ministry of Municipal 
Services and Housing shall be granted the right to provide 
communication and municipal services to clients at rates 
converted with accuracy of up to 0.1 bani. The amounts of 
payments for the services provided shall be rounded through 
procedures envisioned in the present decree. 
  5. Local self-government organs, law enforcement organs, and 
control organs shall be charged with monitoring compliance with 
the present decree, the correctness of recalculations, and 
adherence to a temporary price freeze. 
  [Signed] Chairman of the Committee, Prime Minister of the 
Republic of Moldova Andrei Sangheli 
  City of Chisinau, 24 November 1993 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61145 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94050" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> ARMENIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Karabakh Commander on Status of Military Forces </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0440A Yerevan AZG in Armenian 23 Nov 93 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0440A </F>
<F P=104>  Yerevan AZG </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Armenian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Samvel Babayan, commander of the armed </F>
forces of Nagorno-Karabakh Republic, by correspondent Maksim 
Hovhannisian] 
  [Excerpts] Samvel Babayan was born in Stepanakert in 1965. 
He is a graduate of the local School No. 7. He served in the 
Soviet army from 1983 through 1985. He has been an active 
participant in the Karabakh movement. He was imprisoned in 1991 
during the Safonov Polyanichko regime. After staying in prison 
for six months he was exchanged with Azerbaijan's deputy chief 
justice who was "kidnaped" by Samvel's comrades headed by his 
brother, Garo. Samvel is one of the organizers of Karabakh's 
first guerrilla squads. During the "Ring" operation his squad 
liberated the Dzamdzor village of the Hadrut region. He then 
participated in the liberation of Khojalu, Kharadakhlu and 
Shushi. Subsequent military operations were planned and 
implemented under his leadership. He is also a deputy in the 
Supreme Council of the Nagorno-Karabakh Republic [NKR]. He is 
married and has two children. Below is an interview with Samvel 
Babayan, commander of the NKR armed forces, by Maksim 
Hovhannisian, head of the NKR's information and press 
department. The interview was conducted last week just before 
the regrettable incident at Matakhis [involving an attack on the 
Russian envoy] for which the NKR State Defense Committee 
severely criticized the leadership of the defense forces. 
  [Hovhannisian] Let us begin this interview with the most 
important question: Do we or do we not have an army? 
  [Babayan] We do. Despite all of its flaws, today our 
republic 
has a regular army which is able to defend our borders against 
enemy incursions and ensure that people can work in peace. 
Furthermore, if it becomes necessary to strike at the enemy on 
its own territory to ensure the security of the people, our army 
is capable of accomplishing such tasks. 
  [Hovhannisian] How was the idea of creating a regular army 
born? 
  [Babayan] When we liberated Shushi and opened the Lachin 
corridor, we realized that we need to create a regular army in 
order to preserve our military gains over the long run. Many 
agreed with that idea but did not take any concrete steps. At 
this point certain mistakes were made. Then the painful period 
of failures began. First we lost Shahumyan, then most of the 
Martakert region. Many people lost faith in our forces. Despair 
became our greatest enemy. 
  In order to overcome this string of failures it was 
necessary 
to launch a decisive counterstrike against the enemy. That could 
only be done by a well-trained regular army, which we did not 
have. 
  At the beginning it was very difficult. Many of the 
guerrilla 
squads refused to obey general orders, and their forces operated 
in a haphazard manner. It was relatively easy to implement our 
plans in the Askeran region and the results were observed 
quickly. 
  The process of creating an army began to move forward in 
August of last year. Of course, it cannot be said that we have 
solved all the problems associated with the creation of an army. 
However, we have established a barracks regime in the army, 
except that a battle proposal by the general command is not 
considered a battle order. Also, orders are carried out in a 
qualified manner, although not always. That is related to the 
training of the army. Mechanisms of army life are being created 
and perfected with each battle. 
  [Hovhannisian] These days there is much talk in the press 
about the offensive operations of the NKR army. It is said that 
the army has a vested interest in such operations. 
  [Babayan] Yes, some newspapers have written that everyone 
wants peace except the army. That is not true. What the army is 
doing has only two objectives: to ensure the security of the 
population and the inviolability of our state borders and to 
force the enemy to recognize our national rights. All of our 
operations are coordinated with the NKR leadership. Let us take 
the demilitarization of the Kelbajar region. Without that 
operation it would be impossible to return the refugees from 
Martakert to their homes because there was always the danger 
that the enemy could strike from behind. There was a time when 
the panicked residents of Martakert were not only abandoning 
their homes but were also deserting the ranks. Now the situation 
is completely different. Today the borders of that region are 
defended only by the military units of that region. 
  Let us take another example. Why was it necessary to 
demilitarize the city of Agdam? First, it was necessary to stop 
the artillery attacks from Agdam on Askeran and Stepanakert. 
Second, it was necessary to force the enemy to sit at the 
negotiating table. As is known, the first official 
Azeri-Karabakh talks began after the fall of Agdam. However, 
Azerbaijan declined to continue that dialogue at the instigation 
of certain international forces. 
  [Hovhannisian] The world press and international 
organizations hastily condemned the advances of the NKR army. 
Despite those condemnations, we undertook military operations on 
the southern front. How can that be interpreted? Are we thumbing 
our noses at world opinion? Are we confronting international 
forces? Is not our posture defiant? 
  [Babayan] That is how it appears at first glance, but the 
actual state of affairs tells a completely different story. As 
you know, in 1991 the Azeris occupied 24 villages in Hadrut with 
their "Ring" operation. Second, they were shelling Martuni, 
Hadrut, Edillu and other Armenian population centers as well as 
the Lachin corridor continuously from Fizuli and Kubatlu. Third, 
we made it known to them that things will not end with Agdam and 
that they must reckon with the reality that has been created. It 
is these considerations that prompted the launching of military 
operations on the southwestern front. As a result, there were 
Azeri-Karabakh talks in Moscow sponsored by the Russian 
Federation. It is not a secret for anyone that NKR gained 
international recognition as a party to the conflict only after 
our military successes. People recognize might. I repeat: the 
NKR army wants peace, and, in my opinion, we must have a strong 
and battleworthy army so that peace will come quickly. 
  The Azeri side requested several times to extend the 
ceasefire. We agreed, although we know very well that they are 
using that time to regroup their forces. We are similarly 
preparing to greet the enemy appropriately. 
  [Hovhannisian] Let us return to the problems associated with 
the creation of an army. 
  [Babayan] The [NKR army] must be a battleworthy mobile 
entity 
equipped with modern weaponry; it must be ready to strike at the 
enemy at any point in the republic; and it must be able to 
defend our borders on land and in the air. I do not think that 
it is possible for NKR to survive without such an army. 
  [Hovhannisian] That is how it has turned out to be. Perhaps 
one of the peculiarities of the Karabakh movement is that our 
fedayeen [guerrilla] boys have risen to the highest ranks of the 
army. These boys are patriotic, brave and prepared to defend our 
land, but many of them have no military training. Some of them 
have not even served in the [Soviet] army. 
  [Babayan] That was the case at the beginning. Today we have 
in our army hundreds of senior professional officers who have 
received serious training in the Soviet army. As for the fact 
that many of the commanders are yesterday's fedayeen boys, those 
men have learned the art of war on the battlefield and passed 
muster by hard experience. We have young people who are formally 
trained and who want to serve their homeland in the ranks of the 
NKR army. They are the real future of our army. I would like to 
take this opportunity to appeal to all staff officers from 
Karabakh who serve in the armies of Russia and other countries: 
Brothers, return to Karabakh, and let us defend our homeland 
together. 
  [Hovhannisian] What has been the principal accomplishment in 
the creation of the army? 
  [Babayan] Today every soldier in our army takes a 
ceremonious 
oath, and the orders of the commanders are being executed 
without objections at all levels. We also managed to end the 
practice of serving in the army while staying home. Today we are 
strictly maintaining a barracks regime in our military. 
  I also consider an important accomplishment the creation of 
quite normal, technically satisfactory bases for different 
domains of military service. For example, we take pride in our 
tank repair facility where everything has been built on solid 
foundations. 
  Until recently our barracks were housed in buildings 
formerly 
occupied by schools and kindergartens. We have now built, with 
our own resources, barracks with basic facilities, training 
centers for different military units with their own firing 
ranges and other facilities. 
  [Hovhannisian] Doubts have been expressed in the foreign 
press that little Karabakh does not have the economic means to 
acquire such quantities of military equipment and that Armenia 
is helping us. 
  [Babayan] The first part of that statement is true. It is 
true that economically we are not that strong, especially in 
conditions of a blockade, to acquire as many weapons and as much 
ammunition as we have in our hands today. However, they are 
wrong about the sources of such acquisitions. We have captured 
80 percent, if not more, of our military means from the enemy. 
Various anectodes circulate among our soldiers about this 
subject. 
  [Hovhannisian] For example, about one-time-use aircraft and 
tanks provided to us by Ukraine and Turkey through Azerbaijan. 
  [Babayan] As for the question of what is our military 
leadership focusing its attention on at this time, we believe 
that, having been defeated on land, the enemy will try to attack 
by air. Now we are working in that direction, with some success. 
[passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61146 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94051" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> ARMENIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Army Chief of Staff Replaced </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0439A Yerevan AZG in Armenian 23 Oct 93 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0439A </F>
<F P=104>  Yerevan AZG </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Armenian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Text] Yesterday President Levon Ter Petrosian signed a 
decree releasing Norat Ter Grigoriants, first deputy minister of 
defense and chief of the general staff, from his 
responsibilities at his request and appointing Lt Gen Hrach 
Hmayaki Andreasian to replace him. Circles close to the 
president's staff maintained that this replacement does not 
imply any changes in military policy. The same sources also 
indicated that Norat Ter Grigoriants has not yet been offered a 
new position. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61147 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94052" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> ARMENIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Security of Georgian Rail, Energy Links Viewed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0439B Yerevan AZG in Armenian 23 Nov 93 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0439B </F>
<F P=104>  Yerevan AZG </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Armenian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Armen Baghdasarian: "Is the Railway Explosion </F>
First of a New Series?"] 
  [Text] As is known, the rail line entering Armenia was 
blown up in the Azeri-populated Marneuli region of Georgia early 
in the morning of 18 November. While Russian mass media reported 
that a 27-meter segment of the rail line was blown up, Armenian 
sources reported a 100-meter segment destroyed. It would not be 
correct to say that the explosion was unexpected, because it is 
easy to see that with the onset of the cold the gas pipeline and 
the railway entering Armenia from Georgia should become the 
favorite target of Azeri diversionists, given that the problem 
of guarding these lines of vital importance to the republic has 
not been solved. 
  On 18 November, the Armenian foreign ministry issued a 
statement in connection with the explosion saying: "This 
terrorist diversion operation was planned and executed by the 
authorities of the Republic of Azerbaijan. This criminal act 
against the Armenian Republic and its people, a new 
manifestation of the policy of state terrorism endorsed by 
Azerbaijan, is an attempt by the warmongering circles of that 
state to bring the Armenian nation to its knees and to force the 
Armenian authorities to abandon the principle of finding a just 
and civilized solution to the Karabakh problem by methods that 
are categorically rejected by the international community. 
Azerbaijan has once again confirmed that political elements who 
are bent on solving the current conflict by the force of arms 
still enjoy strong influence in governing circles." In this 
particular instance the railway was repaired relatively quickly, 
and train traffic from Georgia into Armenia has resumed. 
However, nobody would be especially surprised if the explosions 
continue. While the explosions had two targets last year, the 
gas and the railway line, this year they have a third target: 
the Caucasian electrical power transmission line through which 
the Sakenergo administration is obligated to supply Armenia with 
electricity from Russia at the rate of 100 megawatts. 
  It is nice to have trust, but it would not be bad if there 
were more substantial guarantees on issues that are of vital 
importance. Experience shows that such guarantees can only be 
had with the military control of communication routes. Once 
again we have to broach this issue because, despite various 
agreements, the gas pipeline and the rail line are generally not 
protected. Meanwhile, the situation in the republic is much 
worse than what it was last year despite the assurances given by 
the authorities. It turns out that the constantly-heard phrase 
"this is our last winter" also depends on the good will of our 
neighbors. Of course the Armenian gas repairmen have already 
rushed to the scene of the explosion. Of course, the prime 
ministers of Armenia and Georgia are having serious talks and 
will eventually remember the age-old friendship between our 
nations. However, those do not change anything and are not 
likely to change anything ever. 
  The situation in the Azeri-populated eastern regions of 
Georgia is extremely tense, and the explosion of the railway 
line is an excellent opportunity to send [Georgian] military 
forces to protect that segment of the railway. Armenian units 
could join those forces thus reducing Georgia's burden 
significantly. After all it is not that hard to protect a 
40-kilometer railway segment, and as they say: "If the mountain 
will not come to Mohammed... [Mohammed has to go to the 
mountain]." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61148 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94053" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> ARMENIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Activities of Military Training School Reported </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0439C Yerevan HAYASTANI HANRAPETUTYUN in Armenian 15 Oct 
93 p 4 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0439C </F>
<F P=104>  Yerevan HAYASTANI HANRAPETUTYUN </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Armenian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Text] Two years ago the special republic boarding school 
named after Field Marshal Hamazasp Babajanian, a former 
commander of armored and tank forces, was converted into a 
boarding school for military training by the decision of the 
Armenian government. On October 18, the school will hold a 
ceremony whereby 100 students who have passed their examinations 
will take their oath to serve their homeland selflessly. Vrezh 
Hovhannisian, the commandant of the [school] battalion, told the 
correspondent of NOYYAN TAPAN: "The students at the school have 
their own special military uniform. They specialize in military 
science and physical education. The young men are trained in 
judo, hand-to-hand combat, mountain climbing, swimming, light 
athletics and skiing. The specialization subjects are taught by 
officers and athletics instructors. Special attention is paid to 
the teaching of English and Russian. In the future it is planned 
to teach the languages of countries neighboring Armenia. The 
school admits those 14 to 16-year-old young men who possess the 
appropriate physical and mental capabilities." The director of 
the school has visited a U.S. military base where he observed 
first-hand the methods of training American professional 
soldiers. According to the commandant, some of the school's 
graduates have entered the school of the Karabakh liberation 
struggle and participated in numerous tough battles. The school 
has also signed agreements with Russian military training 
institutions, whereby the graduates of the school are able to 
continue their education at those institutions. The Armenian 
Ministry of Defense will pay for the expenses of such continued 
training. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61149 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94054" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> ARMENIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Central Bank Governor on New Currency Measures </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0439D Yerevan HAYASTANI HANRAPETUTYUN in Armenian 23 Nov 
93 p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0439D </F>
<F P=104>  Yerevan HAYASTANI HANRAPETUTYUN </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Armenian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with I. Isahakian, governor of the Bank of </F>
Armenia; date and place not specified] 
  [Excerpts] 
  [HAYASTANI HANRAPETUTYUN] Mr Isahakian, could you first say 
a 
few words about the situation preceding the decision of the 
State Commission on Money Circulation and the organizational 
measures that the central bank undertook? 
  [Isahakian] In earlier statements I mentioned a few times 
that, based on all classical examples and the experience of 
other nations, before putting a new national currency into 
circulation it is necessary to have an intermediate means of 
payment which will take upon itself the full weight of 
inflation. During that period, the government, the central bank 
and the entire public must take steps to prevent the decline of 
the economy and to stabilize it. Only after that can genuine 
monetary reform take place. 
  However, in recent weeks events unfolded very rapidly, as 
the 
president of the republic noted with justification. We were 
forced to replace the 1991-1992 issue 1,000, 5,000 and 
10,000-ruble notes with dram bills. Thus we were unable to 
implement the classical method--we could not have done it. I 
must say that we had only 1 to 1 and 1/2 weeks for 
organizational and preparatory work. During that time, the State 
Commission on Money Circulation and the working group associated 
with it performed important work. [passage omitted] 
  [HAYASTANI HANRAPETUTYUN] Mr Isahakian, although the 
Commission's decision is quite clearly drafted, some issues need 
to be made more comprehensible to our people. For example, if a 
citizen buys something and pays 10 dram, should that be 
interpreted as 10 dram or 2,000 rubles? 
  [Isahakian] It should be interpreted as 2,000 rubles. For 
example, if a citizen buys something that is worth 100 rubles 
and pays with a 10-dram bill, then the seller must return 1,900 
rubles. Similarly 25 dram is equivalent to 5,000 rubles, 50 dram 
to 10,000 rubles, 100 dram to 20,000 rubles, 200 dram to 40,000 
rubles and 500 dram to 100,000 rubles. 
  [HAYASTANI HANRAPETUTYUN] Will not the concurrent 
circulation 
of 1, 3, 5, 25, 100, 200 and 500-ruble bills with the Armenian 
notes create a certain confusion? 
  [Isahakian] Of course, there will be certain difficulties at 
the beginning. However, both the buyers and the sellers must be 
very careful. I think that they will get accustomed fairly 
quickly. This issue is also of immediate concern to the 
directors and accountants of enterprises and corporations. I 
must say that nothing has changed. If they had, say, 100,000 
rubles on their books, that should be counted the same way as 
before. In the future, when we make a full transition to a 
national currency and introduce notes and coins with lower 
denominations and in luma [presumably a subdivision of dram], 
then all accounting can be done in terms of dram. For the 
moment, ruble notes in lower denominations will perform the 
function of the notes I mentioned. 
  [HAYASTANI HANRAPETUTYUN] This means that this is the first 
stage of a full transition to a national currency. 
  [Isahakian] Yes, it is an intermediate stage. We will have 
entered the final stage when we introduce notes with lower 
denominations and coins. At this time we are embarking on a new 
era in the life of our republic. The government and the central 
bank must take all necessary steps to ensure the stability of 
our currency and to raise its exchange value. That is not 
dependent on the currency's name or looks. That depends on our 
economic base and productivity of our economy. We are all 
committed to strengthen the dram. That means encouraging 
exports, the production of goods that consumers demand and 
making imports manageable. It is also important that we cut the 
budget deficit by correct financial policies and that we build 
hard-currency reserves. Thus our financial situation and the 
stability of our currency depends on us. 
  [HAYASTANI HANRAPETUTYUN] Here is another issue that needs 
to 
be explained to the people: according to the Commission's 
decision, sums of more than 50,000 rubles will be deposited in a 
savings bank for six months with an interest rate of 48 percent 
per annum. Based on the experience of past years, the people are 
a little worried. To what extent is the repayment of those funds 
guaranteed? Can the people be certain that they will not lose 
their money? 
  [Isahakian] The people can rest assured that their deposits 
will be returned. I believe that the people trust the savings 
banks because the indexation of funds deposited in August has 
already inspired some confidence. Confidence in the savings 
banks increased especially among rural people who received their 
payment for their produce from the savings banks without any 
problems this year. If we could pay those sums in conditions of 
dependence on the Bank of Russia, we can be more certain making 
those payments on time now. 
  [HAYASTANI HANRAPETUTYUN] Can the people use those deposits 
to pay, for example, for certain services in noncash form? 
  [Isahakian] We are thinking about that issue. After 27 
November, when we will know how much money was changed and how 
much money was deposited, those issues will be examined and 
somehow resolved. 
  [HAYASTANI HANRAPETUTYUN] Now a technical question: Can 
those 
citizens of the republic who have not had the time to obtain an 
identity card or who have lost theirs exchange their rubles for 
dram? How about those who are away from the republic on business 
or who are away from their homes in hospitals or sanatoriums? 
  [Isahakian] First, if a person does not have an identity 
card 
he or she cannot exchange his or her money. This does not apply 
to military servicemen. 
  Those individuals who are outside the republic because of 
their work can apply to the appropriate exchange boards provided 
that they have the necessary documents. As for those citizens 
who are in hospitals or sanatoriums or away from their permanent 
homes in other parts of the republic, if they do not return to 
their permanent homes by the expiration of the deadline for 
exchanging their money, they can exchange their money by 
presenting their identity documents to the post office or 
savings bank at their location. The procedure is the same. The 
exchange is done only once and their identity documents are 
stamped as appropriate. 
  [HAYASTANI HANRAPETUTYUN] Would you like to say anything 
else 
to the people? 
  [Isahakian] Based on the experience of exchanging 50 and 
100-ruble notes in 1991, I would like to ask the people to be 
very careful, to remember where they have kept their ruble 
notes--excuse the expression, under pillows or inside cracks in 
walls (although I do not think that in conditions of rapid 
devaluation anybody would have kept large sums)--so that 
complications do not arise in the future. I would also like to 
remind them that there will be only one exchange and one chance 
to open a deposit account. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61150 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94055" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> ARMENIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Nagorno-Karabakh To Adopt New Armenian Currency </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0439E Yerevan YERKIR in Armenian 23 Nov 93 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0439E </F>
<F P=104>  Yerevan YERKIR </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Armenian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Karen Nersisian, head of the finance and </F>
credit department of the Council of Ministers of the 
Nagorno-Karabakh Republic, by HAYLUR correspondent Shushanik 
Abrahamian; date and place not specified] 
  [Text] The Armenians of Artsakh face the reality of 
changing their currency. Doubts about whether we will remain in 
the Russian ruble zone or whether we will adopt the Armenian 
dram have been finally settled. The Council of Ministers decided 
to put the Armenian dram into circulation in Stepanakert. 
  Karen Nersisian, head of the finance and credit department 
of 
the council of ministers of the Nagorno-Karabakh Republic, 
answered the question of HAYLUR correspondent Shushanik 
Abrahamian. 
  [HAYLUR] Mr Nersisian, a decision has already been made to 
put the Armenian dram into circulation in Stepanakert. 
  [Nersisian] The exchange of currency will take place in 
Stepanakert in the same way it will proceed in Armenia. 
  [HAYLUR] Have any preparatory steps been taken, because the 
people of Artsakh were in chaos in the preceding days? 
  [Nersisian] Yes, we have also created exchange boards. There 
is also a central board which is headed by Minister of Finance 
Spartak Tevosian. 
  All the money safes have been sealed so that there will be 
no 
circulation of the old currency. A special commission has been 
sent to customs inspection points so that there will be no flow 
of old currency from the outside. The corporations and 
enterprises of the republic have been given instructions to 
create their own appropriate boards. 
  [HAYLUR] You said that the exchange of currency will proceed 
in the same way as it will in Armenia, that is, 1 dram will be 
exchanged for 200 rubles. There are no collective farms in 
Armenia. How will the workers of collective farms [in Karabakh] 
be paid for their labor? 
  [Nersisian] There are many special cases which have been 
taken into account. Eventually everything will come out fine. 
  [HAYLUR] What about the case of people who are serving in 
the 
army or on the front? 
  [Nersisian] The army also has its exchange board which will 
take care of everything. 
  I think that everything in our republic will proceed 
smoothly 
without any unnecessary confusion. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61151 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94056" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> ARMENIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Turkish Government Ban on Armenian Language in Schools 
Decried </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0442A </F>
<F P=103> 944K0442A </F>
<F P=104></F>



<TEXT>
Article   Type:CSO 

  [Editorial Report] Istanbul JAMANAK and MARMARA in Armenian 
report on their front pages on 11 November that a year-old 
dispute between Armenian schools and the Turkish Ministry of 
Education ended with a final decision from the Ministry of 
Education (Decree No. 434 dated 23 September 1993) declaring 
that "all subjects, except Armenian language, will be taught in 
Turkish" in Armenian schools. The papers report that Armenian 
parents, upset with the latest decision, urged the Armenian 
Patriarchate in Istanbul to appeal the decision. 
  The two dailies publish on their front pages on 23 November 
the text of an appeal, in Turkish, by the boards of trustees of 
Armenian schools in Istanbul to the Ministry of Education. 
Copies of the appeal were sent to Turkey's president, the 
speaker of the Turkish parliament and the Turkish Ministry of 
Foreign Affairs. The appeal states that the right of private 
Armenian schools in Turkey to teach in Armenian stems from the 
Treaty of Lausanne which Turkey signed in 1923 with Allied 
Powers ending all hostilities. The appeal quotes the relevant 
articles of the treaty guaranteeing the right of the use of 
Armenian in private Armenian schools and adds that this right 
was codified by Law No. 625 on Private Educational Institutions 
and that it is also enshrined in the 1982 Constitution. The 
appeal concludes that, as a result, "the administrative measure 
dispatched to our schools by the Training and Education Council 
[of the Ministry of Education] has no legal or judicial basis." 
  The appeal adds: "We request respectfully that, in view of 
the reasons enumerated above, this administrative measure which 
has caused great distress to our schools, students, their 
parents and our community be reviewed and repealed." 
  A front-page editorial in MARMARA by the paper's publisher 
Robert Haddeciyan on 26 November says that the controversial 
decision by the Ministry of Education jeopardizes the mission of 
the Armenian schools in Turkey and notes that no Turkish 
government, even during the "darkest days for democracy," 
repressed the right of Armenian schools to teach in Armenian. 
The editorial says: "We do not wish to mention the Treaty of 
Lausanne here, because even if there was no Treaty of Lausanne, 
today's democratic Turkey would gladly permit our schools to use 
Armenian as their language of instruction without hindrance 
because this is what the doctrine of this era requires even in 
the case of groups which are not considered minorities. In any 
event Turkey did not wait for the democratic ideas of today to 
bloom to respect the principle of permitting Armenian 
instruction for 70 years. However, today, with an unexpected and 
astounding step and an approach that contravenes principles of 
the modern era, our schools have been instructed to stop 
teaching in Armenian, except for the Armenian language. It is 
very odd." 
  The editorial questions the motives for such a decision 
saying that the use of Armenian in Armenian schools has not in 
any way harmed Turkey or instilled disloyalty among Turkish 
citizens of Armenian ancestry. The editorial concludes: 
  "We would like to hope that the appeal of His Holiness the 
Patriarch to the Governor [of Istanbul] will have a favorable 
outcome, although we believe that the Governor's Office is not 
the correct authority to which such appeal should be addressed 
because the issue arises at the level of the Ministry of 
Education. However, if the said appeal does not produce the 
desired outcome, His Holiness the Patriarch must think about 
other appeals and measures." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61152 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94057" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> ARMENIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Claimant to Throne of Armenia Appears </TI></H3>
<H4>   Royal Heir Proclaimed </H4>
<F P=102> 944K0441A Yerevan AZG in Armenian 27 Oct 93 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0441A </F>
<F P=104>  Yerevan AZG </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Armenian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [Excerpts] The third session of the Court of Ancient 
Armenian Princes convened at the Armenia Hotel on 24 October. 
  At the session, attended by Grand Prince Roland-Hovsep I, an 
appeal was issued to all Armenian political parties, religious, 
political, cultural and public organizations and businessmen. 
The participants also endorsed the bylaws of the Court of 
Ancient Armenian Princes. The bylaws will soon be submitted to 
Armenia's Ministry of Justice, the Nagorno-Karabakh Republic and 
the Kingdom of Western Armenia [as published] for registration. 
  The session also endorsed the following resolution: "The 
Court of Ancient Armenian Princes recognizes fully and without 
qualification Roland-Hovsep I Vladislav-Anton-Paul von 
Bagratuni-Antonian-Antonyevich Poghos Anetsi (who lives in 
Budapest, Hungary) as the head of the Royal House of Bagratuni, 
prince of princes, king of kings, the legitimate heir of the 
royal throne. The members of the Court pledge to trust, to be 
loyal and to be subject to His Excellency and elect him, on an 
inheritance basis, as the head of the Court of the Ancient 
Armenian Princes." [passage omitted] 
  It was also decided at the session to recognize the 
Nagorno-Karabakh Republic as an independent and autonomous 
Armenian state. 
  The session also elected first deputies and deputies to the 
president of the court as well as the court's chief secretary 
and secretary. The session was attended by 42 Armenian princes 
and princesses, members of Armenian princely families dating 
back 3,000 to 4,000 years, such as the Artsruni, Mamikonian, 
Pahlavuni, Bagratuni, Voshtuni, Benkliants, Amatuni, Gnuni, 
Gntuni, Slkuni, Khorkhoruni, Urtsayts and Havnuni families. Also 
attending the meeting was Prince Norair Pahlavuni, the 
well-known Armenian reporter from Washington's "Liberty" radio 
station. The head of the Pahlavuni family was elected as one of 
the first deputies of the president of the court. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61153 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94058" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CAUCASUS </F>
<F P=101> ARMENIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Claimant to Throne of Armenia Appears </TI></H3>
<H4>   Editorial on Royal Claims </H4>
<F P=102> 944K0441A Paris HARATCH in Armenian 18 Nov 93 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0441A </F>
<F P=104>  Paris HARATCH </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Armenian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Arpi Totoyan: "The Savior of Western Armenia: </F>
Don Quixote II Bagratuni"] 
  [Excerpts] [Passage omitted] The 15 October issue of BANBER 
in the latest batch of papers from Armenia features a gem of a 
page for those who are not satisfied with important subjects. 
  BANBER bills itself as the "press organ of Armenia's 
Christian Democratic Union." It is a compact weekly in four 
pages and circulation of 5,000 edited by Khachatur Dadayan. 
[passage omitted] 
  The second page of the said issue features an "Appeal" which 
is designed to impress in the reader's mind the unique nature of 
the weekly for a long time. The "Appeal" is addressed to "all 
the Armenian political parties, ecclesiastical, political, 
cultural, scientific and public organizations and businessmen of 
the world." [passage omitted] 
  The "Appeal" is signed by "the grand prince of the Armenian 
kingdom, Roland I Bagratuni-Antonian-Anetsi, heir to the 
Armenian throne, king of kings, prince of princes, heir to the 
throne of the Kingdom of Western Armenia." The most visible 
participation of this person to the said "Appeal" seems to have 
been the drawing "Roland I" at the bottom of the page. We call 
it a "drawing" because the grand prince probably made his first 
attempt to write in the Armenian script by drawing the letters 
of his name possibly copying them from a signature given to 
him--as I would have done if I had to sign my name in Japanese. 
[passage omitted] 
  As for the contents of the "Appeal," it proclaims: "On 10 
February 1994 we will create the emigre coalition government of 
the Kingdom of Western Armenia and we will appoint the leaders 
of provinces, kingdoms and principalities." Roland I found bases 
for this step during his tour of Armenia and Karabakh, when it 
was revealed during his "meetings with the leaders of most of 
the political parties and organizations and representatives of 
cultural, scientific and economic circles" that "the ancestors 
of most Armenians are the victims of the 1915 genocide or have 
been deported from their homes, and the Armenian question awaits 
a solution to this day." [passage omitted] 
  Roland I's revelations are not limited to the fact that the 
Armenian question remains unresolved. He was greatly rejoiced 
when he "heard that Armenia won independence following the 
dissolution of the Soviet Union." Unfortunately that joy was not 
unmitigated because "the Armenian republic has not done anything 
so far to find a solution to the problem of the 1915 genocide 
through political and diplomatic means and to have western 
Armenia returned to the homeland." Fortunately, this descendant 
of the Bagratunis declares with a populism that does not befit a 
man who aspires to become monarch: "Considering the will of the 
Armenians of the entire world, we decided to participate 
actively in this matter." This is followed by the declaration of 
the formation of the emigre coalition government of the Kingdom 
of Armenia and details are provided. The declaration says that a 
constitution must be endorsed until 1995 by a "bicameral or 
tricameral National Assembly" whose "deputies and senators, 
numbering 250 to 350, will have been elected by the Armenian 
communities of the world." The declaration adds that "the 
Kingdom of Western Armenia must join the UN, NATO, the CIS and 
the European Union." [passage omitted] 
  Despite its generally comical appearance, the "Appeal" 
outlined above has a serious and disturbing aspect. The "ideas" 
expressed, in their distorted western Armenian edited and 
typeset by an eastern Armenian, betray the presence of a ladle 
sticking in from outside--a ladle that does not belong to the 
community that was dreamt by [19th century Catholicos] Khrimian. 
The effect of that ladle is to disturb and to create discord. 
The "Appeal" is also notable for its supportive attitude toward 
the "Kurdish people" and an "independent Kurdish state." The 
former is mentioned as a group that "is subjected to massive 
brutality by Turkey," and the latter is given the same weight as 
western Armenia: "This government must resolve the issue of 
independence peacefully, in conjunction with the issue of 
creating an independent Kurdish state." Can these propositions 
be explained by compassion or a sense of justice toward an 
oppressed people? There is also a question of timing: Why does 
such an appeal come at a time when the Turkish press does 
everything possible to gain credibility for its charges of 
collaboration between Armenians and Kurds? 
  The list of such questions can grow much longer, and they 
can 
only cause more concern. One of the most important of such 
questions, however, concerns the propriety and responsibility of 
the press. How can a newspaper that bills itself as the press 
organ of a political organization undertake such dangerous 
steps? [passage omitted] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61154 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94059" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Nechayev on Ways To Stabilize Economy </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944E0329A Moscow DELOVOY MIR in Russian No 253, 13-19 Dec 93 
p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0329A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow DELOVOY MIR </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Andrey Nechayev, by Vadim Mikhnevich; place </F>
and date not given: "`The State Must Work With Private 
Investors'"] 
  [Text] Even with the extremely limited budget 
resources, ways out of the crisis can be found, Andrey Nechayev, 
former minister of economics in the Yegor Gaydar cabinet and now 
president of the Russian Finance Corporation, working in contact 
with the Russian Government, believes. 
  [Mikhnevich] Andrey Alekseyevich, many people are explaining 
the reasons for the present crisis by the shift in priorities in 
the government's activity. Some are saying that we should have 
started with financial stabilization, others, with the 
structural reorganization of the economy, and yet others believe 
that we should generally have increased subsidies to industry 
and not have embarked on dangerous experiments. What do you, a 
person at the very epicenter of the struggle for reform of the 
economy, think? 
  [Nechayev] The latter assertion I do not consider serious in 
the least. By the time the Gaydar government had assumed office, 
the country had long been living beyond its means and was on the 
very threshold of a most severe financial crisis. As far as the 
first two are concerned, these are essentially two sides of the 
same coin. Gaydar understood this, but the government began with 
a policy of financial stabilization and liberalization of the 
economy bolstered by privatization. The release of enterprises 
from strict state tutelage combined with free pricing, taking 
account of real outlays, made it possible to distinguish both 
the viable enterprises and sectors and those that are either not 
in a position to survive at all or that could do so provided 
that production is reprofiled or reorganized. 
  The structural reorganization of the economy was to have 
been 
the aim of the second stage of the reforms. At this stage it was 
contemplated, on the basis of the limited possibilities of the 
budget, supporting viable industries and providing for the most 
painless possible winding down of the inefficient ones. But we 
did not reach the second stage. Under the severest pressure of 
the sectoral and regional lobbies expressing the interests of 
potential insolvent enterprises, the Supreme Soviet initially 
messed up the well-proportioned, interlinked program, tearing it 
apart bit by bit, and then, with its support, the Central Bank 
gave a boost to the inflation spiral, granting the enterprises 
large-scale, unsupported loans, essentially signifying the 
injection into the economy of an enormous supply of wholly 
unbacked money. The start of the structural reorganization was 
impeded by another step also--it was in fact blocked by the 
adoption of the Bankruptcy Act. 
  The stream of demagogy from high platforms did the economy a 
bad turn. The burst of inflation that followed immediately after 
hit most strongly at both the manufacturers and the public, 
inflaming the atmosphere even more and making ways out of the 
crisis more difficult. The ailment, which was driven inward, has 
once again come to the surface, but this time in a more serious 
form. I believe that there is no other solution to the crisis 
for the government today than to operate simultaneously in two 
directions--undertaking strict financial regulation and active 
structural reorganization. 
  [Mikhnevich] In other words, the present government is faced 
with doing what, formerly, Gaydar did not venture, when the 
situation was less explosive. A contradiction arises: strict 
financial regulation with a very meager budget will deprive the 
structural reorganization of the necessary investments. On what 
reserves can the government count in this situation? 
  [Nechayev] First, we need to create conditions that 
stimulate 
as much as possible all potential investors (banks, enterprises, 
commercial structures, the public) for the long-term investment 
of resources. It would be expedient for this, in particular, to 
exempt from taxes funds channeled into investment and permitting 
enterprises to pursue a flexible depreciation policy, and the 
commercial banks, to lower the rate of reserve holdings in the 
Central Bank, provided that the resources thus released are 
channeled into long-term credit. It is necessary also to devise 
as quickly as possible a package of documents regulating 
collateral relationships, mortgages included. 
  Thus, the task is to stimulate as much as possible, using 
limited government resources, the attraction of nongovernment 
funds. Of course, the state will always have obligations 
connected with defense capability, the environment, and 
development of the infrastructure and social programs. There is 
no escaping nonreturnable funding here, although these resources 
also could be spent more efficiently--via competitive bids, 
tenders, and the use of contract relations between state clients 
and contractors. 
  The resources, on the other hand, which are channeled into 
the support of industry and other sectors of the production 
sphere, which will ultimately produce direct returns, should be 
allocated mainly on a returnable basis. 
  [Mikhnevich] Have such tactics been discussed at the 
government level? 
  [Nechayev] Back in 1992 the Ministry of Economics of the 
Russian Federation had prepared a draft that proposed the 
abandonment if only of some nonreturnable budget investments, 
substituting for them commercial investment credit at a 
preferential rate of interest. They were to have been issued on 
a competitive basis to specific enterprises on the strength of 
particular projects, which had undergone comprehensive expert 
appraisal, with a relatively short cost-recovery term. Following 
completion of the project, the principal and interest would be 
returned to the creditor, that is, the state, and could once 
again be used for investments. There has in this way been an 
increase in the demands made on the efficiency of the projects 
and a broadening of the opportunities for future investments. 
  I have to say that even at that time there was no shortage 
of 
interesting proposals--the reforms emancipated initiative, and 
people understood that in realizing efficient projects good 
money could be earned in the future. 
  The government is now returning to this idea and developing 
it. A corporation's proposals were recently discussed by 
government and banking experts, and it was deemed expedient to 
differentiate between the use of budget resources for 
investments, initially allocating approximately 20-30 percent of 
the 21 trillion rubles [R] determined by the budget for capital 
investments for the granting of loans on a commercial basis, and 
also for the realization of another part of our proposals--the 
use of government resources for investments in share capital in 
combination with private investments. These tasks, specifically, 
will be tackled by the Russian Finance Corporation. 
  [Mikhnevich] Thus, if I have understood you correctly, we 
are 
talking about the appearance of fundamentally new investment and 
financial institutions under our conditions essentially pursuing 
government policy, but simultaneously acting the part of 
transactor operating independently. Is this, after all, a state 
organization or a private organization acting in the interests 
of the state? 
  [Nechayev] The status could change in the future, but we are 
at this time a state structure operating on the principles of 
financial autonomy and acting as the agent of the government, to 
which it entrusts the administration of a part of the budget 
resources. Such institutions operate successfully, for example, 
in the United States, Germany, and Italy. Budget support for the 
development of the most promising directions in scientific 
research and new technology and the stimulation of exports and 
private investments and other areas of vital importance for 
developing the economy and for maintaining high competitiveness 
on the world market are being realized with their help. The task 
with us is more modest as yet--attracting to the economy new 
investments and accelerating capital turnover. 
  [Mikhnevich] Have you already devised a mechanism? 
  [Nechayev] Of course, although, naturally, it will probably 
have to be refined with reference to the situation on the 
investments market. There are entirely specific areas in which, 
we believe, companies like the RFK [Russian Finance Corporation] 
should operate. Their functions are portfolio investments, 
allocating loans and putting together around these government 
resources nongovernment capital and concluding agreements with 
bankers and borrowers. It is nonsense when the Ministry of 
Finance concludes direct credit agreements with enterprises! 
  How will such companies operate? There is, for example, a 
large number of projects that their potential participants are 
not in a position to finance in full. There are, then, two 
options: either the government provides investment credit or 
participates directly in this project and acquires its share of 
the stock. If the project is realized and becomes profitable, 
the price of the shares rises. The government could at any 
moment sell them at a profit and allocate the money for new 
investments. All Western investment banks operate according to 
this format. 
  Acting on behalf and at the behest of the state, the RFK 
will 
attract primarily private investments. This format, roughly 
speaking, is as follows: the state invests R1 in a specific 
project and thereby declares its support for this project and 
its readiness to share the risk, but on the strength of this 
support commercial structures should invest, say, R3. Our 
estimates show that such interaction with commercial structures 
is perfectly possible, inasmuch as they have an interest even 
today in the profitable investment of their capital not only in 
trade or currency transactions. 
  There is also a number of other ideas, on which, owing to 
the 
lack of space, it is not worth dwelling on in detail at this 
time. 
  [Mikhnevich] Nonetheless, as experience shows, investors are 
attracted not so much by verbal as by actual guarantees, and in 
terms of the degree of investment risk, Russia is today superior 
only to countries that are at war. Can the government provide 
such guarantees? 
  [Nechayev] We also consider this matter extremely serious. 
Our viewpoint is such: we need an insurance or guarantee fund, 
not only ruble but foreign currency also, what is more, which 
would help attract foreign investors also. It is necessary, 
partially, to allocate budget monies for its creation. 
Management of the fund could be assumed by state structures of 
the RFK type. 
  We are also engaged in an active dialogue with OPIC 
[Overseas 
Private Investment Corp.]--the agency performing similar 
functions in the United States. Its guarantees are in fact 
guarantees of the U.S. Government, on the strength of which any 
Western bank instantly allocates credit. I hope that we will 
manage to obtain from OPIC resources both in the form of 
guarantees and in the form of direct credit. Without reciprocal 
guarantees on the part of the Russian Government. We hope that 
we can persuade American investment banks to invest their own 
capital in our projects in combination with resources granted by 
OPIC. If this happens, this will be a great success. 
  [Mikhnevich] Will your activity on the securities market be 
confined merely to stock transactions? 
  [Nechayev] We contemplate issuing on behalf of the 
corporation special ruble bonds at a relatively low rate of 
interest with compensation in the form of their owners being 
granted on the part of the corporation services pertaining to 
expert project evaluation, the attraction of capital, 
consulting, and so forth. It is also contemplated issuing 
foreign currency bonds, the price of which will change in 
accordance with the current price of the dollar at the 
prevailing interest rate in the West. It will thus be possible 
to accumulate additional resources for investments. 
  Further, at the behest of the Ministry of Finance, the 
corporation will conduct transactions with internal currency 
bonds. We are talking about bonds issued in exchange for the 
"frozen" currency accounts in the Vneshekonombank [Bank for 
Foreign Economic Activity]. We have enlisted a number of banks 
with whose participation we intend to make these bonds 
relatively liquid. We have also established contacts with 
Western investment institutions, which are prepared to purchase 
these bonds. Our quotations, that is, the prices that we are 
offering the enterprises when purchasing the bonds, are higher 
than those of our competitors. 
  Another direction which could be of interest to our 
enterprises is the allocation of currency loans with these bonds 
being used as collateral, proceeding from their market value. 
And, finally, the third direction--participation in 
risk-sharing. The foreign currency or part thereof paid to an 
enterprise will be placed on deposit in one of banks at a good 
rate of interest. In the event of an increase in the market 
price of the bonds, the profit will be shared with the 
enterprise. 
  The proposed ideas would be profitable for the holders of 
the 
bonds, I believe. They would not have to wait for many years for 
redemption of the bonds and would immediately obtain "live" 
money, which could be invested in business. The corporation and 
the banks take the risk. If the price of the bonds (thanks to 
the attraction of foreign purchasers included) rises, they will 
be the winners also. 
  [Mikhnevich] How do you intend to monitor the operation of 
the banks, considering their predilection for first turning over 
a time or two the money they have received and only then 
entering it into clients' accounts? 
  [Nechayev] We will, most likely, refuse to grant the banks 
credit and will do business directly with the borrower, opening 
a line of credit for him. The bank's function will be confined 
merely to servicing the movement of the money. 
  [Mikhnevich] If in the future the regions manage to defend 
their independence (the trend toward separatism is being 
manifested even now), will this be reflected in the activity and 
plans of the corporation? 
  [Nechayev] On the contrary, we believe that it is our 
regional branches, which the RFK is actively creating, which 
will bear the brunt of the burden, inasmuch as there is much 
that is seen more clearly at the local level. The majority of 
investment projects should be worked out and realized at the 
regional level with regard for local specifics. 
  [Mikhnevich] How do you see the future of structures like 
the 
RFK? 
  [Nechayev] Their appearance and development ensue directly 
from the logic of reform. Whether we like it or not, the 
development of market relations will force us to use in the 
investment space forms and methods accepted and well honed by 
world practice. Our corporation is today a pioneer to a large 
extent, but it is hardly destined to operate alone--others, 
which will compete with one another, owing to which the 
investment climate will only get better, will appear also. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61155 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94060" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Commodity Producers Discuss Plight of Russian Industry </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944E0339A Moscow RABOCHAYA TRIBUNA in Russian 29 Dec 93 pp 
1-2 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0339A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow RABOCHAYA TRIBUNA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Vitaliy Pyrkh, RABOCHAYA TRIBUNA staff </F>
correspondent in Krasnoyarsk: "On the Very Brink"] 
  [Text] On the very brink--this is where the economy 
of Russia has ended up in the year now ending. However, the 
second congress of commodity producers of the country, which was 
held in Krasnoyarsk, did more than just confirm it. Read the 
article on page 2. 
  It appeared that it would be difficult for delegates to the 
congress to avoid the temptation of getting embroiled in 
political battles there. The situation in the country has become 
too complicated, too "hot." However, the following appeal came 
in the very first words spoken by Yu. Skokov, chairman of the 
organizational committee for conducting the congress, which was 
attended by representatives from 41 regions of Russia and eight 
federation-wide delegations: Enough of finding out who is "Red" 
in the audience and in the country, and who is not quite "Red," 
and of finding out what should be demanded first of all from the 
powers that be. Russia has come to the point beyond which there 
may only lie a national catastrophe. The domestic production of 
commodities is the last stronghold, the last bastion of the 
state. 
  Before the congress, documents were handed out to the 
delegates, of which one deserves the closest attention. It is 
"The State of the Economy of Russia (Analysis and Projection)" 
prepared by the analysts of the Federation of Public 
Associations of Commodity Producers of the country. It differed 
greatly from government assessments which have been voiced 
recently. For example, the decline in production in the year now 
ending has exceeded the planned level by more than a factor of 
two, and has been only slightly smaller than that of last year. 
Investment in the production assets, which had been weakened to 
begin with, continued to decline. Millions of people live below 
the poverty line. Specialist-analysts estimate that this year 
alone, $12 billion-$15 billion have been taken out of the 
country both legally and illegally. A paradoxical situation 
occurs: on the one hand, the stabilization of exports has been 
registered, with imports falling by a factor of two; the 
positive balance of foreign trade may reach $23 billion. On the 
other hand, the foreign debt of Russia continues to grow: Russia 
is not in a position to discharge even the reduced debt payments 
(reduced by agreement with Western creditors). 
  Yu. Skokov built on this analysis in his report at the 
congress: "Against the background of steady cutbacks in 
production in virtually all sectors, zones have emerged in which 
the slump has become particularly threatening. For example, the 
reduction comes to about 50 percent in electrical engineering, 
instrument making, machine-tool production, and light industry. 
It is not reforms in the economy that are under way, but rather 
the destruction of national commodity production. However, the 
state and society must understand that by destroying the 
domestic commodity producer, they are destroying themselves." 
  Similar assessments, even more sharply worded than Skokov's, 
were voiced in presentations "from the field" made by the 
largest industrialists of the country: managers of the 
standard-bearing enterprises of the domestic machine building, 
metallurgy, and the mining industry.... 
  "I have rubbed shoulders with all reformers in Russia, up to 
the president of the country. I queried everywhere: Are we 
moving on the course that we want? However, all I heard in 
response was: There is no alternative to the program of reforms 
being implemented. To what program, who has seen it? Chubays 
came to us in Omsk, and also said: Is this not 
stabilization--credit is not being taken out at banks, there are 
no lines in stores, the exchange rate of the dollar is not 
changing.... However, the best stabilization is when everything 
is at the zero mark--both consumption and production. This only 
happens at a cemetery." (This is from a presentation by a 
representative of the Omsk delegation). 
  This is an excerpt from another presentation, that by a 
representative of commodity producers from Yekaterinburg, the 
native city of the Russian president: "We are being deliberately 
and very expertly destroyed. I recently met Gaydar in 
Cheboksary. He was surprised: How come, are you still in 
operation? I thought that you had shut down already.... They, 
the present-day reformers, indeed miscalculated: they did not 
take into account the survivability of the director community, 
its ability to resist the deindustrialization of the country. 
Could it be that the time has really come for us to `help' the 
government? For example, if the volume of production at an 
enterprise falls 50 percent, half the people are thrown out into 
the street. Let them appeal to the reformers then rather than to 
us, and complain about a drop in the standard of living and 
delays in the payment of wages...." 
  A. Volskiy, president of the Russian Union of Industrialists 
and Entrepreneurs, stressed in his presentation to the congress 
in particular: "The fact of fragmentation of the industrialists 
of the country, their splintering based on narrow corporate 
interests, deserves to be condemned. Here is Gaydar creating his 
association of private business which, for example, such 
domestic giants as the Uralmash also joined. Why? Who would not 
sell out for easy credit, for weighty sops from the boss? There 
is the notorious Shumeyko, organizing his so-called 
confederation of entrepreneurs of Russia, which nobody in the 
Russian `backwaters' has got the foggiest notion about. 
Apparently, it was also organized so that the branch of this 
confederation in the United States could be headed by people who 
are not strangers to Shumeyko--his daughter and son-in-law. 
Gentlemen reformers, are you not something else? Meanwhile, here 
we are wondering and wracking our brains over this issue: How 
come the confused Russian people voted for Zhirinovskiy? As 
always, we are looking for `scapegoats'--the press, television, 
the absence of funds.... Who were the people to vote for? One 
may have his hopes dashed, one may engage in wishful thinking, 
finally, one may believe in yet another vain dream. Nobody has 
ever succeeded in deceiving 100 million people all at 
once--ever!" 
  I sat in the overcrowded auditorium of the Palace of Culture 
of the metallurgical plant, in which the congress was held, and 
could not help thinking: Who needed this--the destruction and 
the virtual bringing to its knees of the domestic economy? Just 
the way it was seven and a half decades ago. At that time, 
Russia was also getting on its feet and growing stronger every 
year--there were Putilov's enterprises, Morozov's textile mills, 
and Tereshchenko's plants.... The Russian people have built all 
kinds of things, having received the desired sip of freedom! Was 
this not the foundation upon which it was possible to move ahead 
quickly, turning the country into a truly prosperous region? 
  I would be less than truthful if I maintained that the 
entire 
two days of the proceedings of the congress in Krasnoyarsk were 
devoted solely to the assessment and analysis of the situation 
that has emerged in domestic commodity production. A proposal 
was made in virtually each presentation at the congress: What 
should be done in order to save the economy from ultimate 
destruction, in order to save Russia? 
  Speaking at the congress, Arkadiy Volskiy responded to a 
question with another question: "What did Roosevelt begin with 
when he came to power? He immediately closed down all banks that 
existed in the country. Only one-third of them were reopened as 
long as two weeks later after auditing. Incidentally, they 
operate in the United States to this day." 
  In Volskiy's opinion, the industrialists of the country need 
their own political organization; the last election proved this. 
Russia should be led by people who have a vested interest in its 
prosperity. 
  However, there were other "points of view": For example, in 
the opinion of A. Stepanov, chief of the Teplovodokanal 
administration of the Vorkutaugol production association, the 
creation of such a party is an issue for the remote future. 
Right now they should immediately embark on utilizing the 
potential of deputies elected to the State Duma. To be sure, 
this will not be easy to do. 
  There were other opinions, which on certain points even 
mutually refuted one another. However, the delegates were 
unanimous on one point: a force capable of uniting all who are 
interested in the genuine rather than illusory rebirth of the 
Motherland should finally appear in Russia. The Federation of 
Public Associations of Commodity Producers of Russia, which was 
finally legally constituted in Krasnoyarsk, should become such a 
force. Yu. Skokov was elected its first chairman. Commodity 
producers have gotten the long-awaited opportunity, just as in 
all states of the world, not just to assess the processes under 
way in the country, but to influence the development of an 
economic policy and the determination of strategy and tactics of 
domestic commodity production. This will be facilitated by the 
revised statute of the federation and the Declaration of Rights 
of Russia's Commodity Producers, adopted at the congress, as 
well as the mood in which the delegates went home. A telegram 
addressed to the president and prime minister of the country, in 
which the delegates demanded the suspension of the effect of the 
Edict on the Taxation of Legal Entities on 1 January, became the 
first "harbinger" of collective actions. Otherwise, it will only 
be possible to refer to industrial production in Russia in the 
past tense. 
  After the congress, I asked the first chairman of the 
federation: Is he satisfied with membership in the federation 
being for now structured on an utterly voluntary basis? If one 
wants to, one belongs to the federation, and if not, there is no 
helping it.... For example, in Japan or Germany nobody will 
engage in business unless he joins the league of entrepreneurs. 
The law would not let them.... 
  Yuriy Vladimirovich responded: "We are already moving in 
this 
direction. We have invited the Chamber of Commerce and Industry 
of the Russian Federation to become one of the founders. In the 
already mentioned Germany, it is precisely a similar chamber 
that issues entrepreneur licenses. If we fail to revive the 
production of goods in the immediate future, nobody from abroad 
will help us. Who needs us over there? In our country people 
became rich not at all because they benefited Russia somehow, 
but rather as a result of redistributing the national, people's 
wealth in their favor. This is a typical Bolshevik technique: To 
take everything away and....appropriate it right away. Of 
course, it is easier to steal than to do something yourself. 
However, can something significant be created if you keep 
stealing from someone else shamelessly all the time?" 
  I agreed--of course, it cannot. And I thought that Russia 
did 
not get just the Federation of Public Associations of Commodity 
Producers during the two days of the congress in Krasnoyarsk, 
but possibly also a new national leader. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61156 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94061" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Zaveryukha Interviewed on Agriculture Problems, Reform 
Prospects </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0444A Moscow EKONOMIKA I ZHIZN in Russian No 49, Dec 93 
p 24 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0444A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow EKONOMIKA I ZHIZN </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with A. Kh. Zaveryukha, deputy chairman of the </F>
Government of the Russian Federation, by EKONOMIKA I ZHIZN 
correspondent N. Dudorov; place and date not given: "The 
Agrarian Reform in Russia"] 
  [Text] Our agriculture has never been in such a 
dismal state. Why is the acreage sown and the livestock herd 
being reduced, and the productivity of fields and farms going 
down? How did it happen that plant-growing and especially animal 
husbandry have become unprofitable for our countryside? What is 
the explanation as to why not only collective, but also peasant 
(private) farms have found themselves in such a difficult 
economic situation, and some of them have gone bankrupt? Our 
correspondent posed these and other questions to A.Kh. 
Zaveryukha, deputy chairman of the Government of the Russian 
Federation. 
  Aleksandr Kharlampievich Zaveryukha was born in 1940 in 
Novosergiyevskiy Rayon in Orenburg Oblast. His first job was 
that of a tractor driver. He graduated from the Orenburg 
Institute of Agriculture and is a candidate of economic science. 
He knows agricultural production inside out. Worked as a chief 
economist and a kolkhoz chairman. For many years held management 
positions in the Orenburg Oblast Party Committee and the 
agro-industrial committee. Was the head of the 
scientific-production association of the All-Russia Scientific 
Research Institute for Meat Cattle-Breeding. Was elected a 
people's deputy of the Russian Federation. He was appointed a 
deputy chairman of the Government of the Russian Federation in 
February of this year. 
  [Dudorov] Aleksandr Kharlampiyevich, in your opinion, what 
should be the main principles of the state economic policy with 
respect to the APK [agro-industrial complex]? How are they being 
implemented in practice? 
  [Zaveryukha] It is my firm conviction that the reform in the 
agro-industrial complex and its transition to the market must be 
based on fundamentally changing the totality of socioeconomic 
relations in this sector of production. Why is a market 
preferable to an administrative-distributive system? First and 
foremost because it gives the peasant an incentive constantly to 
strive to work more productively. He will show this concern 
about "his own" not only on an independent farm but also when 
participating on a voluntary basis in cooperative production. 
  That rural residents will be joining in various entities is 
also beyond any doubt, because one person or even a large family 
cannot compete with a cooperative, where responsibilities are 
clearly assigned among its members. That is, it uses all the 
advantages of division of labor among producers joined together. 
Hard-working people will not tolerate among them a sluggard or a 
drunkard and will simply "squeeze" him out, like a foreign body. 
  A question comes up: Why do we produce four or five times 
less output per rural worker as compared with a similar peasant 
or farmer in Europe--what is the problem? One of the main 
reasons for this situation, in my opinion, is the deviation from 
a normal correlation of prices for agricultural and industrial 
products for the countryside. This and other reasons have led to 
an impoverishment of the countryside; producing agricultural 
output has become unprofitable. The state has begun to support 
rural workers with money from time to time, but these were 
considerably lesser amounts than what was being withdrawn. That 
is why the sector has been deteriorating. 
  As a result, the only sovkhozes and kolkhozes that have 
survived have been those managed by the most capable and 
energetic administrators, who were able to create highly 
profitable production through comprehensive mechanization, 
introduction of modern crop-growing and cattle-breeding 
techniques, and rational organization of production processes. 
However, it has come to the point that even they are in need of 
state support lately. Because even the 200-300-percent profit on 
grain production will be eaten up by inflation if it runs at 400 
percent a year or more. Because agriculture is a seasonal 
sector; expenditures here run year round, while the output is 
produced once a year or at even greater intervals. Over this 
time much changes in the economy, and farms are left in the red. 
  The proof of that is the current financial situation of 
grain 
producers, to whom Roskhlebproduct owes almost 1 trillion rubles 
[R] for the grain it has procured from them. One of the most 
important conditions of forming a market in grain and products 
of its processing is for the state to give up its monopoly on 
sales of bread and bakery products, granting the right to sell 
them at market prices and compensating in a variety of ways the 
low-income part of the population, thus providing protection 
from rising prices. 
  The government has appraised the situation correctly and has 
issued to agriculture before the end of 1993 R1 trillion to pay 
its own debts; this step should contain somewhat the process of 
the impoverishment of the countryside. In order to stop this 
negative process, however, many times more infusion will be 
needed. 
  [Dudorov] What is the role of the public sector and other 
economic forms in solving the food problem? 
  [Zaveryukha] If we keep in mind the rather sad experience of 
the hasty decisions in the economic sphere, it will become clear 
that the current fundamental change of production relations in 
the countryside is something that will require not one and not 
five years. The recent fashionable slogan on paying the debt to 
the countryside simply did not work out because the government 
did not have the necessary means. And the result of a complete 
disintegration of the system of payments was that agriculture 
began literally to visibly collapse. 
  The first victims were weak kolkhozes and sovkhozes, which 
after their reorganization either merged with enterprises that 
were better off financially or separated into private farms. 
Betting on them, however--as many demand that we do--may pay off 
no earlier than in five to 10 years, since most kolkhoz members 
are not capable of engaging in independent production and are 
not knowledgeable about things that a farmer should know. 
Neither can we dismiss the fact that new farms now--the same as 
collective farms--are experiencing extreme economic hardship. To 
set things up, a farmer now needs to spend many millions, while 
the government is unable to allocate these means. 
  Therefore, the public sector practically retains a dominant 
role in agriculture. And collective farms, too--including 
kolkhozes and sovkhozes reorganized into different forms--need 
reliable protection from dishonest partners, both domestic (in 
terms of payment for products) and foreign. 
  [Dudorov] The land reform is currently being implemented on 
a 
broad scale in Russia. What do you personally think of the 
introduction of private ownership in land? 
  [Zaveryukha] The president of the Russian Federation's edict 
"On Regulating Land Relations and Development of Economic Reform 
in Russia" has caused a range of reactions in the countryside. 
It is revolutionary in substance, and many people have not yet 
appraised its subsequent effect on the entire process of 
transition to a market. Its opponents are concerned over point 4 
regarding private ownership in land; they maintain that people 
with money obtained in a dishonest manner will begin buying it 
up for speculative purposes or in order to create large land 
holdings. 
  Their concerns are not groundless; at the same time, 
however, 
the edict has only set the general direction, while the 
mechanism is being detailed in a package of legislative acts on 
the land reform, which is to be prepared by the government, 
after which these documents are to be adopted by the future 
Federal Assembly. The same kind of acts are being prepared with 
respect to economic activities on the purchased land. In the 
event that it is used not in accordance with the intended 
purpose, first the owner will be fined, and then the land may be 
confiscated. Documents are currently being developed on 
procedures of land plot buyouts, mortgages, taxation, and other 
operations involving land, as well as using agricultural land as 
a collateral. 
  [Dudorov] To what extent does the current infrastructure 
meet 
the needs of the APK market? 
  [Zaveryukha] The infrastructure needed to begin market 
relations in this economic sector is already in place. Its 
weakest link is the lack of a sufficient number of specialists 
who have knowledge of the methods of managing an enterprise in 
the new environment and the basics of marketing. Another 
difficulty is that many APK sectors are overly monopolized. Take 
for instance the aforementioned Roskhlebproduct corporation. We 
need to demonopolize such entities. 
  Private sector organizations also intensively build a market 
infrastructure. For instance, exchanges began to specialize in 
individual commodities, moving away from universality, and join 
into associations and unions. For instance, in the APK sphere 
there is an association of exchanges that already has been 
functioning for two years; it has prepared a program for the 
development of a market of grain futures in Russia. I think that 
the state should support such a constructive approach and 
influence grain price regulation in a certain way through 
commodity and financial interventions. Creating a market 
infrastructure on the existing basis is more promising, since 
reconstruction and modernization of it will cost less than 
starting from scratch. I recommend that all businessmen who wish 
to work with the APK in this direction contact the 
Agro-Industrial Chamber for Reconstruction and Development of 
the Russian Ministry of Agriculture, whose task is to coordinate 
the actions of all forces, regardless of form of ownership, in 
the direction of program implementation. 
  [Dudorov] What should be the economic relations in the 
future, and what should be the infrastructure of the APK market? 
  [Zaveryukha] Having studied the experience of market 
operations in the agrarian sector of the economy of many 
countries in the world, we found out that the system that is 
most suitable for Russia is the one used in the European Union, 
which regulates the agrarian market through state institutions. 
Their influence on the domestic agrarian market is exerted in 
the form of direct commodity or financial intervention. We, too, 
should find optimal transitional market mechanisms, which would 
allow the market to take off without leveling to the ground 
already functioning structures, to offer them better economic 
conditions. They should be as follows: 
  --selling agricultural products at market prices; 
  --price regulation should not interfere with the market 
nature of relations; 
  --state procurement prices (fixed) must be set after taking 
exchange mechanisms into account; 
  --the state builds up a reserve supply of agricultural 
products and foodstuffs in order to conduct a commodity 
intervention in the event of sharp increases in product prices. 
  It is also proposed to conduct state regulation in the 
market 
environment through a system of collaterals, which includes 
accepting the product as a collateral for a certain period of 
time with payment at guaranteed prices, and also works through 
preferential credits for commodity producers in certain sectors 
by compensating part of the expenditures on the production of 
grain products, and so on. 
  We also need to think about creating such financial 
institutions as mortgage and land banks, payment and clearing 
institutions, trust companies, and leasing firms. Their 
development is held back only by the lack of a legislative and 
normative base. We need to create organizational-economic forms 
for certain APK sectors. This approach is built into state 
programs "Soybean," "Grain," "Oil," and others. One of the 
possibilities in this direction is organizing 
industrial-financial holding companies with the participation of 
state institutions and ministries. But this is a separate large 
topic. 
  [Dudorov] How do you see the role of the mass media in the 
successful conduct of the agrarian reform, raising the level of 
the population's knowledge and literacy in matters of a market 
economy? 
  [Zaveryukha] The role of the press and other mass media in 
covering the APK problems is enormous. Unfortunately, quite 
often the press, radio, and television are not objective in 
their appraisal of a score of processes taking place in the 
countryside. Some authors maintain that we need to speed up the 
liquidation of large collective farms and create instead 5 
million peasant (private) farms, which will immediately feed the 
country. 
  Others, on the contrary, proclaim a lack of future for the 
latter, since they allegedly are less efficient than large 
enterprises. Such a diametrically opposite approach is 
groundless and only harms the reform in the APK. Sometimes we 
also see an incorrect appraisal of the current situation in the 
countryside. 
  The mass media must reflect the real picture in the agrarian 
sector, cover the experience accumulated in the regions and on 
farms, reveal shortcomings, and publish the professional advice 
of specialists and scientists on different aspects of the 
economics of the national agro-industrial complex. 
  I believe that the EKONOMIKA I ZHIZN newspaper, which, in my 
opinion, comprehensibly and quite objectively covers the course 
of economic reform in our country, could be of substantial help 
to the Russian agro-industrial complex in overcoming the 
difficulties that it is currently experiencing. And I think that 
top managers of the APK, farms, enterprises, and organizations, 
as well as new commercial structures, will gladly share on the 
pages of EKONOMIKA I ZHIZN their experiences, providing tips on 
the best approaches to the solution of some or other problems. 
Both sides will benefit. 
  [Box, p 24] 
<H5>  In the Mirror of Statistics </H5>
  Reregistration of kolkhozes and sovkhozes is 
practically complete. It has been implemented at 24,000 farms 
(93 percent). The collectives of 8,100 farms made a decision to 
retain the existing status of their enterprise. Joint-stock 
companies and partnerships of various kinds have become the 
prevalent form of economic activity in the countryside. As of 1 
October 1993, there were 11,300 such entities. 
  According to the data of the State Committee on 
Statistics, as of 1 November of this year there were 268,000 
private farms operating in Russia, covering a total area of 11.2 
million hectares (42 hectares per farm, on average). Over the 
past few months, the process of their creation has slowed down 
perceptibly. Over January-October, more than 9,000 farms ceased 
operations because of increased difficulties with material and 
technical supply, the worsened financial situation, and other 
reasons. 
  It should be noted particularly that the people's 
interest in having their own personal auxiliary plots has 
increased. The 18 million personal auxiliary plots, as well as 
those belonging to enterprises, organizations, and institutions, 
which are currently in operation in Russia, now produce 30 
percent of the gross agricultural product. Over the period under 
review, the herd of livestock and poultry on these farms has 
increased by 5-12 percent. 
  As compared to 1991, in 1992 agricultural output fell 
by 9 percent, while the national gross domestic product declined 
by 20 percent. It is expected that the gross agricultural 
product will decline by 5 percent in 1993. 
  The total yield of grain after processing is expected 
to be 100-102 million tonnes (over the past two years the 
average yield was 92 million tonnes). There has been more sugar 
beet produced (by 23.4 million tonnes) than in 1992. Production 
of sunflower seed, potatoes, and vegetables--counting the 
production of these crops on personal auxiliary plots, is 
expected to remain at the 1992 level (2.3 million, 38 million, 
and 10 million tonnes, respectively). 
  A certain trend toward stabilization may be seen in 
animal husbandry. Beginning with the second quarter of this 
year, the rate of decline in the production of most varieties of 
farm products has gone down. However, because of a continuous 
drop in the number of livestock and poultry over 10 months as a 
whole, selling livestock for slaughter has declined on farms by 
14 percent; the gross yield of milk has declined by 4 percent, 
and production of eggs by 7 percent. 
  The herd of livestock kept on the population's personal 
plots continues to increase. This only partially compensates, 
however, for the perceptible decline in the size of the herd at 
agricultural enterprises. The share of horned cattle in the 
hands of the population has increased from 23 percent to 26 
percent; of cows--from 30 percent to 34 percent; pigs--from 29 
percent to 33 percent; and of goats and sheep--from 32 percent 
to 38 percent. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61157 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94062" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Agriculture's Financial Problems Viewed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  PM3112152193 Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA in Russian 30 Dec 93 
First Edition p 2 </F>

<F P=103> PM3112152193 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Article by Candidate of Economic Sciences I. Kononov, </F>
leading scientific staffer at the All-Russia Scientific Research 
Institute of Agricultural Economics, and comment by Aleksandr 
Gavrilyuk: "Is the Bank No Comrade for the Peasant?"] 
  [Text] Our statistics are always late. That is why today 
we have not the year's balance for 1993 but only the 
agricultural enterprises' balance for the first half of the year. 
  The consolidated half-year balance of Russia's agricultural 
enterprises is a unique document making it possible to assess 
objectively the financial position of the country's agriculture. 
Over the first six months of work this year, agricultural farms 
and producers (not counting private farmers) earned over 567 
billion rubles [R] in profit, which is a little over eight times 
more than for the corresponding period last year. The profit 
obtained ensured a 48-percent profitability in agriculture. Is 
that enough? 
  According to the criteria of the "stagnation times," the 
optimum level of profitability was considered to be 40-45 
percent of the prime cost of the output sold. And that level 
was indeed close to the optimum since it ensured a quite rapid 
rate of expanded reproduction of the sector's material and 
technical base and ensured wages entirely comparable with wages 
in industry (on state farms it was 86-88 percent of industrial 
wages). When assessing the present profitability situation in 
agriculture we must bear in mind that it took shape largely 
under the influence of the extremely reduced remuneration of the 
labor of rural commodity producers. 
  In the first half of this year, as last year, the monthly 
wage in agriculture did not exceed 56 percent of the average 
wage of workers and employees in the Russian national economy. 
If wages in agriculture were the average for the national 
economy, then the sector's profitability would decline many 
times over for this reason alone. According to the figures for 
last year, this decline would have been only threefold. The low 
return has also affected effective demand. 
  Because of the reduction in agriculture's effective demand 
for 1992 alone compared with 1991, deliveries of mineral 
fertilizers to Russia's agro-industrial complex were nearly 
halved, deliveries of tractors and trucks fell by over one 
third, deliveries of grain combines fell 28 percent, and volumes 
of capital investments were cut back more in the agro-industrial 
complex than in other sectors. 
  Unfortunately, agriculture remains an unattractive sphere 
for 
private investors. And that is entirely natural. After all, 
the general rule has it that there is some point in investing in 
production only if you can obtain a bigger clear profit (after 
the deduction of tax) than by keeping the money in the bank. 
But even the Savings Ban of Russia, which pays the smallest 
rate of interest among other banks on short-term investments, 
pays 120 percent a year. 
  Many banks have paid shareholders dividends for 1993 which 
amount to 200-250 percent a year and even more. For that reason 
banks keep as far away as possible from agriculture, calling it 
a "black hole." 
  Russia's commercial structures mainly finance those projects 
whose profitability will in any circumstances be at least 
150-200 percent a year. Targets for investment as a rule are 
trade and large industrial enterprises which have completed 
privatization and possess a substantial export potential. 
  Consequently, for agriculture to be able, under stagflation 
conditions, to make capital investments in more or less 
tolerable volumes and to offer normal wages and finally become a 
sector of interest to private capital, its profitability should 
not lag substantially behind profitability in other spheres of 
the economy. For instance, in the United States the average 
return over many years from investment in farming for 1954-1992 
was considerably higher than from investment in state bonds and 
treasury promissory notes. 
  The half-year figures are also alarming in connection with 
the intensifying differentiation of farms. According to the 
results of work in the first six months, over 4,000 farms, or 
15.4 percent of their total number, became loss-making, and the 
average loss from one loss-making farm was about R10 million, 
while the profit from one profit-making farm was R27 million. 
  Last year 7.6 percent of the total number of farms completed 
the first six months with a loss. Of course, if you assess the 
situation from liberal market positions, there is nothing 
dangerous in agriculture's financial position. After all, the 
well-known "500 Days" program already made full allowance for 
the possible bankruptcy of up to 25 percent of farms possessing 
one third of agricultural land. Even now representatives of 
this concept view the possible mass bankruptcy of producers of 
agricultural output as an entirely acceptable market feature. 
  In this connection it is appropriate to recall the U.S. 
Administration's approach toward problems of its own 
agriculture. When in the mid-eighties U.S. farmers were gripped 
by a debts crisis and about 7 percent of farms were threatened 
with imminent bankruptcy, the federal government took steps to 
ease the farmers' debt burden. [Kononov ends] 
<H5>  In Place of Postscript </H5>
  Russia's agrarian sector has been unable to "achieve a 
breakthrough" and overcome the production slump in the outgoing 
agricultural year. In addition, losses when harvesting this 
year's harvest were in excess of 30 percent for many 
agricultural crops. The reasons? Primarily "because of the 
clumsiness of the country's banking system" and the imperfection 
of the taxation of rural commodity producers, specialists 
believe. 
  Debts to the peasants for the grain and oilseed delivered to 
state resources were R600 billion as of early December and were 
the same amount for stockraising output sold. In addition the 
agro-industrial complex has not received about R800 billion 
earmarked for it from the federal budget. 
  Existing taxation, in the opinion of agricultural leaders, 
does not encourage their work and is often a curbing factor. 
Thus, processing in the agricultural production sphere is 
subject to a 32-percent tax. 
  To all appearances the premise of recent years that the 
emergency formation of private farms would resolve all the 
countryside's problems, has not been justified. The 270,000 
private farms have provided only 8 percent of the total volume 
of agricultural production. And how could it be otherwise if 
the private farmers have been sent only 34 percent of the funds 
earmarked by the state to support this form of farming. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61158 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94063" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Academician Miloserdov Criticizes Government Agrarian Policy </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0494A Moscow SELSKAYA ZHIZN in Russian 21 Dec 93 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0494A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow SELSKAYA ZHIZN </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Vladimir Miloserdov, academician of the Russian </F>
Academy of Agricultural Sciences, director of the All-Russian 
Scientific Research Institute of Economics, Labor Organization, 
and Administration in Agriculture: "Who Will Stop the Rackets? 
The Agrarian Crisis Will Continue Unless the Government Attitude 
Toward Rural Areas Changes"] 
  [Text] Agrarian reforms have been under way for three years 
in Russia. It is now possible to sum up certain results and look 
to the future. But first--about their initial base. 
  It is known that the Russian Federation had exaggerated 
specialization of the national economy. By 1989 the branches of 
group A here (the military-industrial, fuel-energy, 
metallurgical, machine building, and chemical-timber complexes) 
accounted for more than 70 percent of the gross national 
product. Immense quantities of their output went to other 
republics and CEMA countries, and also to the West. The share of 
the agro-industrial complex was only 15.2 percent. For 
comparison: in the Baltic countries it exceeded 50 percent. And 
about two-thirds of what was produced was consumed locally. 
  The center did not devote the proper attention to Russian 
agriculture. Farms of Russia received less in capital 
investments, fertilizers, technical equipment, manufactured 
concentrated feeds, construction materials, and energy resources 
per 100 hectares of arable land. The capital availability for 
agriculture in Russia, for example, was 12 times less than in 
the Baltic region. The disparity was just as great in the levels 
of land reclamation (88.5 percent in Lithuania and 6.2 percent 
in the RSFSR), the provision of natural gas, and social 
structuring of the rural areas. For this reason there were more 
and more ghost towns that had lost their able-bodied population. 
The demographic crisis became irreversible in a number of 
regions. And the demand for food products in Russia was covered 
through three sources: its own production, deliveries from Union 
republics, and imports. The last two items provided for more 
than a third of all the consumption. 
  Such were the starting conditions for the agrarian reforms. 
It seems that because of these, the collapse of the Union and 
previous ties dealt an especially painful blow to the food 
supply for Russians. Well, one learns from one's mistakes. Of 
course it would be better to learn from others'. But since this 
is the way it has turned out.... 
  In other words, it is necessary to restructure the entire 
economy, assigning a larger role in it to the agro-industrial 
complex. But it seems that once again life has not taught us a 
thing. The share of the agro-industrial complex in the national 
economy not only is not growing, but is rapidly decreasing. And 
it is not difficult to guess the result: a rapid collapse of 
production. In terms of per capita consumption of meat and milk, 
we have dropped back to the 1965 level. The number of Russians 
is decreasing. In 1992 the natural attrition amounted to only 
200,000 people, while the preliminary estimate for this year was 
about 600,000. 
  And still today there is not even the smallest significant 
social group of the population that would be against the 
reforms. Debates about how to conduct them are another matter. 
Throughout the year, over 500 days, or according to the Stolypin 
method: "Leave me alone for 20 years and I will make Russia 
prosperous"? 
  During three years of reforms, about 170 million hectares of 
arable land have been turned over to the ownership of 
agricultural commodity producers. A multiple-system economy is 
being created. Hundreds of thousands of peasant farms have been 
registered. Millions of city dwellers have received garden plots 
and orchards, and land is being allotted for residential 
buildings. The system of administration is changing. There is no 
longer the previous dictatorship from the center. What to plant, 
what production structure to have, how to use profit--these 
things are being decided by the people themselves. This is good. 
  The only problem is that the rural areas are continuing to 
decline from day to day. And one cannot agree with those who 
justify this rapid collapse. They say that it is necessary to 
pay for the reforms. The experience of other countries does not 
confirm this. In China during 12 years of reforms, the gross 
agricultural output increased 2.2-fold, meat 
production--3.7-fold, fish production--2.8-fold, and sugar 
production--3.5-fold. These reforms were based not on 
ideological but on economic principles. The Chinese say: "The 
color of the cat makes no difference as long as it catches mice." 
  Instead of having a clear-cut concept of our own, we are 
inclined to borrow others' models. Hastiness in the development 
of legislative and normative documents and standard formulas for 
reform of all of the immense area of Russia without preliminary 
checking in various regions has led to mistakes and pro forma 
actions. 
  One of them was the attempt to solve the food problem solely 
through deep reformation and change in the forms of ownership 
and management. We must be realistic. This alone will not 
stabilize production or increase its effectiveness. Especially 
when deliveries of technical equipment, fertilizers, and 
construction materials to agriculture are being catastrophically 
reduced. When procurement prices for agricultural products are 
growing much more slowly than the prices of industrial products 
for rural areas. Because of the lack of equivalence in exchange, 
rural areas are failing to receive hundreds of billions of 
rubles. 
  With the destruction of the state procurement system, 
numerous middlemen and speculators attach themselves to rural 
commodity producers like barnacles on an old ship. Rural 
residents sell their goods for three to five times less than we 
buy them for in the stores. As we can see, it is by no means the 
agricultural workers who are to blame for the high retail prices. 
  Because of the impoverishment of the masses, even the 
significantly curtailed production remains largely unconsumed. 
In many regions of Russia, an immense quantity of butter, meat, 
grain, and potatoes has accumulated in the warehouses. At the 
same time, the state continues to buy them abroad at higher 
prices. 
  The government is ripping off the rural residents, forcing 
them to sell grain at prices set from above without paying for 
it. At the same time, peasants today have to pay in advance for 
every nail, while for products that are produced the prime 
minister is promising that by the new year a maximum of 80 
percent of the debt of more than 2 trillion will be paid. By 
that time the ruble will be worth even less. 
  In the past the peasantry took on the job of accelerated 
industrialization and restoration of the national economy 
destroyed by the war. Today an attempt is being made to make it 
responsible for emerging from the financial crisis. But even 
Adam Smith said that the country gives the city exactly the same 
amount as the city gives the country. High prices of industrial 
goods and high taxes have sharply reduced investment activity 
and have blocked structural changes in the agro-industrial 
complex which are necessary for the formation of a market. And 
this predetermines the long-term tendencies toward decline of 
production. 
  The already weak social sphere of the rural areas is being 
destroyed. But perhaps the most terrible thing is the 
degradation of the production and scientific-technical potential 
and the fertility of the soil. The gene pool of the animals, 
breeding work, and seed growing are being destroyed, and 
production construction has been reduced many times over. Fixed 
capital is aging, and the load per tractor and combine is 
increasing. Capacities and work force are engaged in repair of 
machines and equipment just as they are in agricultural machine 
building. A process of physical disintegration of productive 
forces has begun, and the demand for scientific and technical 
products is decreasing. 
  Nonetheless, the state refuses to grant subsidies to 
agriculture. Although in the West, even with a surplus of 
foodstuffs, the governments grant immense subsidies to the 
farmers. Incidentally, in developed countries, approximately 
half of the increase in production of food products comes 
through technical progress. 
  Government leaders justify their policy with respect to 
agriculture by saying that the state has no funds. Although it 
is known that the enterprises and citizens pay immense taxes. 
Prices, apartment rents, and the costs of other services have 
increased many times over. Energy resources, timber, and metal 
are being exported in considerable quantities to nearby and 
distant foreign countries. 
  There are many holes. They include the bloated state 
apparatus, which has occupied not only all republic buildings, 
but also the buildings of the former Union ministries and 
departments. Numerous bureaucrats of the state apparatus are 
receiving wages that are several times higher than those of 
world-renowned scientists. 
  Today a large proportion of the members of government, 
especially deputy prime ministers, are bending over 
backwards--they travel through foreign countries trying to scare 
up a billion and a half or two billion dollars in credit. At the 
same time, with the help of their own government, funds of 
Russian entrepreneurs amounting to more than $20 billion a year 
are sitting in Western banks. Creating an economic mechanism 
that would make it possible to motivate our entrepreneurs to 
invest this money in Russia's economy--this is what our 
government should be working on. 
  And another large financial source would be to demand 
repayment of debts from republics of the former Union. After the 
proclamation of sovereignty by the parliament of Russia in 1990, 
there was the hope that we would become the masters of our own 
wealth, that we would develop the economy on the basis of our 
own advantage and determine an efficient specialization. Then 
the peoples of the former Union would know who is who. Because 
relations among independent states should be arranged on an 
equivalent basis and their well-being should be made directly 
dependent on labor productivity and the generation of capital as 
the basis of social justice. After all, it is known that of all 
the republics of the former USSR, only Russia previously had a 
positive balance in interrepublic exchange, and in 1989 it was 
more than $50 billion. 
  Alas, Russia is continuing to supply its neighbors with 
energy sources, raw materials, and processed materials at 
extremely low prices. Because of the differences in prices 
(world and transfer) it annually loses $17 billion. 
  With this kind of state foreign economic policy, where are 
we 
supposed to get the money to repay our debts to rural workers? 
Here it is necessary to resort to deception or, rather, get 
involved in the state rackets with respect to our peasants. 
Because we are not used to paying them their due. At the end of 
the 1920's, Stalin spoke about tribute from the rural areas as a 
temporary measure. Today this is considered to be an ordinary 
phenomenon: the peasant can be patient a little longer for the 
sake of the reforms. He has already been patient for 75 years! 
  The agrarian crisis will continue unless the attitude toward 
it changes. 
  Do not neglect the disease, esteemed state leaders! 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61159 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94064" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Warnings of Land Degradation, Erosion </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0456A Moscow ZEMLYA I LYUDI in Russian No 46, 19 Nov 93 
p 5 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0456A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ZEMLYA I LYUDI </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by G. Vasilyev: "Agricultural Fields Under Threat </F>
of Depletion"] 
  [Text] One of the main objectives of conducting land 
reform in Russia is to stop the processes of land degradation. 
However, today these processes have even become accelerated. 
This is convincingly corroborated by data prepared by a 
Roskomzem [Russian Committee on Land] state (national) report 
concerning the condition and use of land in the Russian 
Federation. 
  It will be recalled that there are 222.3 million hectares of 
agricultural fields in Russia, including 132 million hectares of 
arable land, 62.5 million hectares of pastures, and 26.8 million 
hectares of hayfields. A substantial part is subject to various 
types of erosion, and tens of thousands of hectares are being 
destroyed by gullies. Almost all of the plowed land of the North 
Caucasus and the Volga region are eroded or threatened with 
erosion. This same situation has developed in the Chernozem area 
in Ukraine. Every fourth hectare of arable land in Western 
Siberia is eroded. 
  Because of water erosion alone about one-tenth of arable 
land 
has lost 30-60 percent of its fertility, and about one-fourth of 
the arable land--from 10 to 30 percent. Meanwhile, the volume of 
antierosion measures in 1991 compared with 1988 fell by a third. 
In 1992, 11,000 hectares of windbreaks were established on 
arable land, in 1985, 24,000 hectares. The volume of work on 
laying antierosion plantings in narrow gorges, gullies, sands, 
and other land unsuitable for cultivation decreased by one-third. 
  Annual humus losses on each hectare of arable land 
throughout 
Russia amounts to an average of 0.62 tonnes. They are especially 
high in regions situated in the steppe zone. Thus, in Samara, 
Chelyabinsk, and Orenburg Oblasts, Bashkortostan, and the 
Kabardino-Balkar Republic these losses amount to 0.8-1 tonne. It 
is calculated that to create a positive balance of humus in 
arable land it is necessary to introduce 1-1.2 billion tonnes of 
organic fertilizer annually. At the present time, only one-third 
of this amount is covered. 
  A reduction in work on soil liming also has a negative 
effect 
on soil fertility. While in 1986 42 million tonnes of lime was 
applied, only 26 million tonnes were applied in 1991. 
  More than one-fourth of the hayfields and 9 percent of the 
pastures are in a waterlogged condition. Also in this state are 
5.7 million hectares of arable land. 
  There has been a noticeable deterioration in recent years in 
the state of affairs in land reclamation. Operational repair 
work on functioning water management systems is far from being 
fully carried out. And this has a negative effect on their 
technical level and the output of improved sectors. More than 
half of the irrigated lands (about 3,500 hectares) need 
additional work on improving their qualitative condition. There 
is a need to redesign the drainage network over an area of more 
than 240,000 hectares. 
  The figures cited in the state report once again indicate 
that major capital investments on the part of the state are 
necessary to make up for the diminishing fertility of the land. 
Agricultural enterprises and peasant farms are not now able to 
cope with this difficult task under conditions of inflation and 
acute shortage of resources. Only substantial state support in 
combination with improvements in land and economic relations in 
the village will help them to increase crop harvests and 
strengthen the fodder base for livestock raising. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61160 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94065" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Criminal `Privatization' of Moscow Apartments on Rise </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944E0330A Moscow VEK in Russian No 49, 17-23 Dec 93 p 8 </F>
<F P=103> 944E0330A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow VEK </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Natalya Nikulina: "He Left Moscow. For His Own </F>
Funeral: Privatized Housing Has Become a Victim of Criminal 
Business"] 
  [Text] Since the beginning of the year, 1,299 persons have 
disappeared without a trace in Moscow--almost twice as many as 
last year. A considerable number of them were legal residents of 
Moscow, had privatized their housing, and were single. Putting 
their signature on the document formalizing a swap or sale of 
their apartment, these people effectively signed their own death 
sentence. 
  An unrealized tragedy was unfolding in front of my very 
eyes. 
Close to one another, in a row, some men and women sat across 
the desk from Viktor Kasyanenko, chief of the operational 
investigations department of the city of Moscow GUVD 
[Administration of Internal Affairs], and his staff. They were 
discussing some tangled routine story: a fictitious marriage, 
apartment privatization, official replacement of a primary 
tenant, a female hostage, the OMON [Special Purpose Militia 
Detachment], a complex three-step (or more) housing swap through 
a single broker, one of the "swappers" convicted three times for 
apartment burglary... Frankly, I understood little of what I 
heard. One thing was clear: as a result of this "swap," two 
families had been left without a place to live. As to the 
broker, having made profit on the deal and having sold other 
people's apartments at a premium, he had disappeared in the huge 
city. 
  "All right, that is it!" Kasyanenko summarized the hour-long 
conversation with the victims. "Leave a written explanation and 
go in peace. You have claims against one another--handle it 
through the court." 
  In truth, however, until recently people's courts did not 
even accept claims from victims in these matters, and they are 
only now shifting into gear. The city procuracy keeps a watchful 
eye on swindling associated with the housing privatization. 
Rayon procurators, on the other hand, try to avoid dealing with 
such matters. So it appears that apparently nobody is interested 
in this except for Kasyanenko and his colleagues, who are 
shoveling through the criminal consequences of the ill-conceived 
privatization of housing in Moscow. 
  This incident from the life of 38 Petrovka Street 
unfortunately is typical of the work of operational 
investigations department detectives and the 2d Criminal 
Investigations Administration of the GUVD; it is, however, far 
less dramatic than those they encounter on a daily basis. A hunt 
by criminals for owners of privatized housing in Moscow is in 
full swing. You can judge for yourself the "fat" in this new 
trade: a one-room apartment costs 20-30 million rubles [R]; a 
two-room one--R40-60 million; and a three-room one--about R100 
million. The crazy money blows the mind of those who had just 
recently made a "modest" living by theft, racketeering, and car 
theft. Selling other people's apartments turns out to be much 
more profitable, and criminals involved in this are willing to 
go to any length: swindling, extortion, and then, as a rule, 
criminal disappearance of the dwelling's owners. Apartment 
owners are threatened verbally; they are tortured and subjected 
to physical violence; they are force-fed alcohol (sometimes even 
technical grade) in enormous quantities. The criminals also use 
psychotropic substances that cause death. Most often the victims 
are single and elderly people, whom Moscow detectives already 
have included in a "high-risk group." There are currently almost 
9,000 of them in the capital, and almost all of them have 
privatized their apartments. Although, judging by all signs, any 
one of us may get caught in the privatization meat grinder. 
According to the department staff, not only the elderly but 
entire families that decide to swap or sell their housing 
disappear without a trace. We can also count among potential 
victims those who have surrendered residence permits for their 
privatized apartments and then disappeared without a trace. 
  Really, who would believe the "tale" that Vera Nikolayevna 
T-va, an orphan who has no family and in all her 72 years had 
never (!) left Moscow, suddenly decided to settle in a Tver area 
village, having first privatized her three-room apartment in the 
center of Moscow?! This "tale" was told to the department staff 
by new black-mustached owners of the spacious dwelling, against 
whom a criminal case has now been initiated. So far, however, 
grandma Vera has not been found either in Moscow or in the 
remote village. 
  Among the persons missing since 5 November was 50-year-old 
Muscovite M-ein. Her body was recently discovered in the woods 
in suburban Moscow. In the course of preliminary investigation 
it has been established that M-ein made the acquaintance of two 
men, who offered to buy her apartment. As soon as the woman 
signed the sale contract and handed over all the documents to 
the buyers, they got her into a car under some plausible pretext 
and while driving forcibly injected her with a psychotropic 
medication, from which the poor woman died. 
  Criminal proceedings have been initiated again V-a, an 
apartment swindler who bought up apartments in Moscow using fake 
documents. In addition, two persons have disappeared through the 
actions of the swindler. 
  Among the disappeared is a woman who used the services of 
the 
Stolitsa joint-stock society in swapping her apartment. There 
are hundreds, if not thousands, of such firms in Moscow. Their 
"will buy-sell-rent-swap" ads fill newspaper pages and cover all 
the poles and glass enclosures at bus stops around Moscow. They 
offer bait--one sweeter than the next--to irresponsible naive 
owners of super-expensive Moscow housing. One firm offers free 
privatization and expedited processing. Take note, absolutely 
"free"! And why such generosity all of a sudden? Another 
corporation quite seriously promises "comfort at the time of the 
deal and for the rest of your life." How long will that life be, 
however, for those who take advantage of such questionable 
offers? For instance, MUR [Moscow Criminal Investigations 
Department] officers detained the head and staff members of the 
Help Center. They killed, strangled, shot to death, and then 
burned people who entrusted them with their privatization 
documents. Over a short period of time these criminals 
dispatched to the other world many gullible Muscovites. 
  According to expert estimates, the entire territory of 
Moscow 
is divided into spheres of influence among criminal groups 
specializing in the apartment "business." Each such group has 
reconnaissance agents, paid informers, and shock-troopers--those 
who carry out "death sentences" and those who work only with 
documents (counterfeiting, fabrication of signatures, seals, 
texts, etc.). Drawn into the orbit of this horrible bloody 
"business" are employees of housing management offices, passport 
desks of housing offices and rayon departments of internal 
affairs, prefecture, civil registration office, and military 
draft office clerks, doctors issuing fake medical certificates, 
notaries who formalize privatization and issue power-of-attorney 
for apartment buying and selling, and militia personnel in 
territorial departments of internal affairs. In short, the 
stratum of middle-level office personnel, whose members we 
encounter on a regular basis. And from whom, by the way, one 
rarely gets on the first try "certification of a certificate." 
This should not be surprising: for a bribe, some office 
employees (and a considerable number of them, by the way) 
without properly checking privatization documents will register 
people in and out of the city without having them to appear in 
person. 
  So the rumors that circulated in Moscow in the summer--about 
alleged militia-housing office gangs killing single apartment 
owners--are being partially confirmed. Of course, the criminals 
do not walk around buildings carrying guns and axes. They do not 
need to do so. It is quite enough that these clerks have 
information about the tenants of their territorial unit, that 
is, each of us. As you may well see, such information costs a 
lot these days. More than someone's life even. In my presence, 
two passport clerks from a Moscow militia precinct and three 
employees of a housing office in the same territory were brought 
to 38 Petrovka. Criminal proceedings have been initiated against 
all of them on charges of falsifying privatization documents and 
"selling" information about owners of privatized housing. A 
militia major--a passport desk officer--has apparently been 
detained on the same charges. What do these people--and people 
like them overcome with greed--care that on the basis of this 
information a Kuntsevo-Solntsevo criminal group has tortured to 
death several people, having first obtained under torture their 
signatures attesting to selling their housing. Gypsy gangs also 
rage. They kidnap unfortunate apartment owners and take them to 
their encampments. Through torment and torture they extract 
signatures attesting to the sale of their housing. A notary 
present during this horror immediately certifies the document. 
After which the former owner disappears forever, while a new 
owner of the square footage moves into his apartment. 
  An out-of-town woman recently came to the operational 
investigations department; she said that she had not heard from 
her distant Moscow relative for quite a while. She finally came 
to Moscow herself, and discovered that completely different 
people lived in the apartment. The old man had allegedly moved, 
first having sold his dwelling. But where would the poor guy go, 
considering that he does not have any kin closer than the woman? 
The detectives sorted the situation out quite quickly. The old 
man fell for the bait in a newspaper ad: such and such company 
will rent an apartment for its employees; payment in hard 
currency guaranteed. They struck a deal; fed the old man some 
foreign food and even showered him with "greenbacks" at first. 
Then they talked him into signing a contract that he, the old 
man, would receive life-time maintenance in exchange for the 
apartment. Why do you need all this space, they said? Sell it to 
us, and in return we promise to keep you supplied with good food 
and when the time comes, will bury you with a ceremony. The old 
man happily agreed and signed all the papers in the presence of 
a notary. Now other people live in his apartment. And quite 
legally, as supported by the documents shown to the detectives. 
From these documents it follows that the apartment was sold to 
them by some brokerage firm which at this point has "liquidated 
itself." As to the old man, they heard that he had left Moscow. 
Where did he go, one wonders? To his own funeral perhaps? 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61161 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94066" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   MVD Said Suspicious of Moscow Police Support `Program' </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  PM2212145793 Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA in Russian 22 Dec 93 
First Edition p 3 </F>

<F P=103> PM2212145793 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Stanislav Yuryev article: "`Program' Against Racket, MVD </F>
Against `Program'?"] 
  [Text] Everyone fears a racket. Pragmatists submit to it 
and pay up the set tribute, realists draw up their defenses, and 
romantics wait for help from the state. Which of them are best 
protected? Moscow today is like a postwar Moscow: people blow 
up vehicles and apartments and cut down traffic inspectors and 
detectives with bursts of rifle fire. But the militia is worse 
equipped than the organized criminals, the engines of its 
vehicles are less powerful, and everything is painfully 
reminiscent of scenes in Govorukhin's unforgettable movie "The 
Meeting Place Cannot Be Changed," in which brave officers of the 
Moscow Criminal Investigation Department in a low-powered 
militia bus chase after the bandits' powerful truck. 
  Moscow's modern militia does not appear heroic against the 
background of this combat panorama. They know that they are 
backed by a sickly city budget and that the future holds for 
them the grim fate of being invalids if they are unlucky. You 
cannot speak of strength of spirit. 
  But some obstinate people have come along who are prepared 
to 
change the situation. They have organized a public organization 
-- "The Program of Social Protection for Professional Groups at 
Increased Risk" -- with the task of giving social and technical 
assistance to the Moscow Internal Affairs Main Administration 
Regional Administration for Organized Crime [RAOC]. "Program" 
was registered in May of this year and has already done some 
things: the lives and health of all the personnel of the 
service and its district departments have been insured for a sum 
equivalent to $10,000 per employee; payments of 20,000 rubles 
[R] are made for every underage child and R5,000 for medical 
supplies for family members; office equipment and an imported 
minibus have been handed over; and a two-room apartment has been 
purchased for measures to be taken to protect witnesses and 
victims. In addition, "Program" holds competitions in subunits 
for the best in the profession and pays the winners R200,000 
each. "Program" leader A.M. Kachur (a candidate of juridical 
sciences and a former militia colonel) maintains that it is 
capable of creating technical backup for the RAOC up to the 
standards of the German police, if not better. 
  In the social and historical aspects "Program" is based on 
the traditional Russian idea of self-management, whereby 
society's efforts are directed toward resolving a particular 
very important task. Kachur has persuaded a number of prominent 
financiers and entrepreneurs to participate in "Program." His 
reasoning was founded on a simple argument: They must have an 
interest in winning the fight against organized crime, and it is 
possible to achieve success by joining forces. 
  With "Program's" help the outflow of cadres from the RAOC 
has 
been entirely stopped in the space of six months. Kachur claims 
that the RAOC is today in a position to protect anyone who asks 
it for assistance. 
  Everything is splendid, you might think. Particularly as 
Moscow Mayor Yu. Luzhkov approved and supported "Program's" 
activity in his directive of 19 October this year, seeing that 
it had provided an opportunity to improve the situation in the 
capital. 
  But it has rightly been noted that Moscow is still not 
Russia. As though confirming the tenacity of the Russian 
tradition of officials' rejecting manifestations of 
self-management, the MVD [Ministry of Internal Affairs] Main 
Administration for Organized Crime unexpectedly regards 
"Program's" activity with great suspicion. Why? Many people 
see this as professional envy, but they also do not rule out 
more serious interests, which are now being attacked by the 
Moscow regional administration. 
  There really is some mystery concealed in the Ministry's 
rejection of "Program." We will not undertake to fathom it at 
once, but maybe we will be able to unfold this MVD secret before 
our readers in the very near future. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61162 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94067" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   DELOVOY MIR Economic Statistics, 8 December </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944E0319A Moscow DELOVOY MIR in Russian 8 Dec 93 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 944E0319A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow DELOVOY MIR </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Economic statistics report by Valeriy Galitskiy, Aris </F>
Zakharov, and Aleksandr Frenkel, Russian State Committee on 
Statistics: "....While Life Gets Increasingly Expensive"] 
  [Text] 
<H5>  Prices of Consumer Goods and Services </H5>
  The increase in prices of consumer goods and services the 
last week of November of this year amounted to 2.2 percent, 
including 2.0 percent for food products and 2.5 percent for 
nonfood products and paid services for the populace. 
  Weekly price change indices for consumer goods and services 
in November of this year are characterized by the following data: 


                2 Nov        9 Nov        16 Nov       23 Nov       30 Nov 

Rate of price   103.2        103.1        103.4        102.9        102.2 
growth for 
basic goods 
and services 

including: 

food products   103.0        102.8        103.4        103.1        102.0 


nonfood         102.2        103.7        103.3        102.5        102.5 
products 

paid services   108.9        102.7        103.7        103.6        102.5 
for the 
populace 


  Price increases over the month for 70 main food products 
amounted to 15.1 percent. By the end of the month, prices for 
meat and meat products, sugar, flour, bread, and bakery products 
had stabilized. At the same time, price increases during the 
last week of the month for eggs, cereals, macaroni products, and 
vegetables were maintained at the 4-6 percent level. 
  Potatoes, vegetables, and fruits increased in price by 5-8 
percent in city markets the final week of November. Prices for 
meat output remained virtually unchanged. 
  The increase in prices of nonfood products in November 
amounted to 15 percent. The cost of fuel for the populace and 
knitted wear increased by 2.5-2.8 percent, of footwear and 
cultural and domestic commodities--by 1.5-1.8 percent. Most 
noticeable at the end of the month was the increase in garment 
prices--by 3.3 percent. 
  The increase in prices of paid services for the populace 
this 
past month significantly surpassed the overall dynamics of 
consumer prices, amounting to 23.2 percent. Rates for dry 
cleaning and bathhouse services increased by 6-8 percent over 
the week. Rates for the remainder of services subject to regular 
monitoring remained virtually unchanged the past week. 
<H5>  Consumer Market Conditions </H5>
  According to selective sampling data in the stores of 
capitals of republics within the Russian Federation and okrug, 
kray, and oblast centers, the saturation observed in stores in 
November with respect to beef, sugar, butter, and sunflower oil 
increased by 3-11 percent. With respect to milk, this index 
decreased by 3 percent, eggs--by 10 percent. 
  As compared with the end of October of this year, the 
saturation level at food stores increased in 39 cities (of 83 
under observation), including by 3-17 percent in 36 cities and 
25-30 percent in four (Vologda, Ryazan, Yaroslavl). The level 
decreased in 32 cities, including by 3-8 percent in 20 cities, 
and by 12-31 percent in 12. Stores in 12 cities remained at 
their previous level of saturation with respect to food products. 
  Data (in percentages) characterizing the market situation 
with respect to basic food items as of 29 November of this year 
are as follows: 


               Proportion of the total number of cities under observation 
               where the product 

               could be       could be          was not        was not 
               purchased      purchased after   available      available for 
               freely         standing in       for sale       sale as of 1 
               without        line or upon                     November (for 
               standing in    presentation of                  reference) 
               line           coupons 

Beef           30             5                 65             67 

Cooked         83             -                 17             13 
sausage 

Milk           66             5                 29             26 

Butter         78             3                 19             8 

Eggs           65             2                 33             25 

Sunflower      43             5                 52             63 
oil 

Sugar          71             5                 24             31 


  The situation in the market of nonfood products in everyday 
demand is as follows: washing machine detergent was unavailable 
in the stores of 57 percent of cities, toilet soap in 47 
percent, toothpaste in 40 percent. Sales of toilet soap and 
toothpaste over the past week diminished by 5 and 15 percent, 
respectively. Sales of washing machine detergent rose by 17 
percent. In Bryansk, Kaluga, Elista, Groznyy, Novosibirsk, 
Tyumen, Abakan, and Yuzhno-Sakhalinsk, the saturation 
coefficient with respect to these items was 1.3-1.7, as opposed 
to 2.4 across Russia on the average. In Kyzyl, Magadan, Aginsk 
(Aginsk Autonomous Oblast), and Ust-Ordynsk (Ust-Ordynsk 
Autonomous Oblast), these products were entirely unavailable for 
sale. 
<H5>  Agriculture </H5>
  Formation of seed stocks is under way at agricultural 
enterprises. By the beginning of November, 10.0 million tonnes 
of spring grains and leguminous crops were on hand (96 percent 
of requirement). As was the case last year, the great shortage 
of soy seeds (63,000 tonnes, 50 percent) is making itself felt. 
Some 2.2 million tonnes of seed potatoes were laid in store--82 
percent of the necessary quantity. 


                   Seed on hand as of 1 November 1993    Reference data 

                   tonnes           percentage of the    seed on hand as of 
                                    requirement of       1 November 1992, 
                                    farms                percentage of 
                                                         requirement 

spring grains      10 million       96                   97 
(not including 
corn) 

including: 

wheat              2.95 million     98                   100.4 

buckwheat          111,000          81                   94 

millet             48,000           92                   90 

rice               52,000           77                   81 

legumes            825,000          84                   80 

Soy                63,000           50                   75 

potatoes           2.2 million      82                   91 


  A grouping of agricultural enterprises by degree of 
provision 
with seed shows that the proportion of farms experiencing 
shortages of seed for spring grains and leguminous crops 
increased from 26 percent last year to 33 percent this year, for 
seed potatoes--from 55 to 60 percent. One out of eight farms was 
supplied with spring grain seed at the level of 60 percent of 
requirement or less. Almost half the agricultural enterprises of 
the Russian Federation were at this level with respect to 
potatoes. 


Degree of      Seeds of spring grains and leguminous     Seed potatoes 
provision,     crops 
percentage 
of 
requirement 

               As of 1 November 1993      As of 1        As of 1 November 1993      As of 1 
                                          November                                  November 
                                          1992                                      1992 
                                          (reference)                               (reference) 

               Percentage    Seed         Percentage     Percentage    Seed         Percentage 
               of total      shortage,    of total       of total      shortage,    of total 
               number of     tonnes       number of      number of     tonnes       number of 
               farms                      farms          farms                      farms 

up to 20       5.8           214,000      5.7            33.7          271,000      30.2 

20.1-40        2.6           149,000      2.0            6.1           134,000      4.1 

40.1-60        4.5           228,000      3.2            7.2           128,000      6.1 

60.1-80        7.5           259,000      5.2            7.5           99,000       7.5 

80.1-99.9      12.4          147,000      9.5            5.7           33,000       7.0 

100 and        67.2          -            74.4           39.8          -            45.1 
greater 

Total          100           997,000      100            100           665,000      100 


  Only 37 percent of farms have the necessary quantity of seed 
for spring grain crops in Chita Oblast; approximately half in 
Penza, Samara, Saratov, Kurgan, Orenburg, and Novosibirsk 
Oblasts; 63-71 percent in Chelyabinsk and Omsk Oblasts, 
Stavropol and Altay Krays, and Bashkortostan. 
  A significant shortage of seed potatoes is being felt at 
farms of Russia's non-Chernozem Zone, where the level is 407,000 
tonnes (16 percent) short of the full requirement. Only 
one-fourth of the farms are fully provided with seed potatoes in 
Smolensk and Sverdlovsk Oblasts and in Bashkortostan; one-third 
in Pskov, Vladimir, and Moscow Oblasts, and in the republics of 
Mordvinia and Udmurtia; about 40 percent in Kaluga, Tula, and 
Nizhniy Novgorod Oblasts; 20 percent in Vologda and Perm Oblasts. 
<H3>  Preparedness of the National Economy for Operation Over the 
Winter Period </H3>
  This year the preparedness of the Russian Federation economy 
for operating under winter conditions, as has been the case the 
past two or three years, is observed against the background of 
diminished fuel production, reduced volumes of fuel deliveries, 
and a lag in the commissioning of energy facilities and housing 
and municipal services facilities. 
  At storehouses of mines and coalfields, 18.4 million tonnes 
of coal (8.1 million tonnes more than the norm) were stored as 
of 1 November. This is 36 percent greater than was the case 1 
November of last year. Some 433,000 tonnes of furnace fuel oil 
were on hand (48 percent less). Coal supplies on hand with 
consumers amounted to 44 million tonnes, furnace fuel oil--9.6 
million tonnes. These levels are 14 and 7 percent less, 
respectively, than as of 1 November 1992. Judging from the 
experience of prior years, these fuel levels are sufficient to 
operate enterprises and organizations for one and a half months. 
  Coal reserves at enterprises of the energy sector, 
metallurgy 
enterprises, storehouses of rayon (city) fuel sales centers, and 
housing and municipal services boiler facilities as of 22 
November this year are characterized by the following data: 


               Coal                                       Furnace fuel oil 

               tonnes        consumption    percentage    tonnes       consumption    percentage 
                             days           of 15 Nov                  days           of 15 Nov 
                                            93 level                                  93 level 

Total          26,727,000    34             94            3,481,000    29             84 
reserves 

including: 

at energy      21,850,000    42             93            2,849,000    25             82 
sector 
enterprises 

at             1,804,000     15             105           414,000      32             92 
metallurgy 
enterprises 

including      813,000       9              104 
for coking 

at housing     678,000       58             94            218,000      31             99.2 
and 
municipal 
services 
boiler 
facilities 

at             2,395,000     22             93 
storehouses 
of rayon 
(city) fuel 
sales 
centers 


  At the same time, coal at energy sector enterprises of the 
republics of Khakassia and Sakha (Yakutia) remained at the 
two-day operational level. Less than the one-week operational 
level was in store at housing and municipal services boiler 
facilities of Volgograd Oblast and the republics of 
Bashkortostan and Altay. About 40 percent of Russian Federation 
territories had sufficient coal to supply the populace and the 
social sphere for a period of less than 15 days, including a 
two-seven day level in Orel, Tula, Astrakhan, and Chelyabinsk 
Oblasts, the Republic of Mordvinia, and Altay Kray. 
<H5>  Wages </H5>
  The average wage of workers in October of this year amounted 
to R93,000 [rubles], a 10.5-fold increase over October of last 
year and a 15-percent increase over the level of September of 
this year. Consumer prices for goods and services increased 
12-fold and by 20 percent, respectively. 


                  January-October    October    January-October    October 
                  1993               1993       1993 increase as   1993 as 
                                     alone      compared with      compared 
                                                January-October    with 
                                                1992               September 
                                                                   1993, 
                                                                   percent 

Average wage of   46,900             93,000     10.2-fold          115 
workers, rubles 


including: 

industry          51,300             101,200    9.5-fold           116 

agriculture       27,600             52,700     10.1-fold          104 

construction      65,700             131,800    10.6-fold          113 

transportation    69,500             138,800    10.5-fold          114 

public health,    35,300             65,500     11.4-fold          104 
physical 
training, and 
social security 


public            32,500             59,200     11.5-fold          104 
education 

art and culture   27,800             50,700     11.4-fold          109 


science and       29,900             57,700     10.9-fold          115 
scientific 
services 

credit and        96,900             201,600    12.6-fold          126 
insurance 

apparatus of      55,500             105,400    12.4-fold          122 
governmental 
organs 


  The wages of workers in the gas industry came to R291,400 in 
October of this year, oil production workers--R264,200, coal 
industry workers--R213,100, and machine-building 
workers--R74,800. 
  For most regions in October, the increase in prices over 
September levels outpaced the increase in wages. A significant 
gap (10-19 percentage points) was observed in Arkhangelsk, 
Vladimir, Ryazan, Lipetsk, Volgograd, Penza, Saratov, Ulyanovsk, 
Orenburg, Kemerovo, Omsk, Tyumen, Irkutsk, Chita, Amur, and 
Kamchatka Oblasts, in the republics of Mordvinia, Kalmykia, 
Dagestan, Udmurtia, and Chuvashia, and in Altay Kray. 
  Preliminary estimates indicate that the average wage in the 
Russian Federation economy in November of this year will have 
constituted R105,000, an increase of 13 percent over October of 
this year, while prices for consumer goods and services rose 15 
percent. 
<H5>  Enterprise Indebtedness </H5>
  Credit indebtedness on the part of industrial and 
agricultural enterprises and construction and transportation 
organizations under observation as of 1 October amounted to R32 
trillion. Of this amount, R8.7 trillion, or 27 percent, 
constitutes delinquent indebtedness. The greatest proportion of 
delinquent indebtedness was seen in enterprises of the forestry, 
woodworking, and pulp and paper production industry (39 
percent), chemical and petrochemical industry (41 percent), 
microbiology (43 percent), coal (44 percent), and gas (52 
percent) industries. 
  The greatest portion (72 percent) of delinquent credit 
indebtedness comprises indebtedness to suppliers. The volume 
dynamics of delinquent indebtedness to suppliers by sector of 
industry and construction are characterized as follows (in 
rubles): 


                 As of 1 Aug 93              As of 1 Sep 93              As of 1 Oct 93 

                 Total       Including       Total       Including       Total       Including 
                             delinquent                  delinquent                  delinquent 
                             indebtedness                indebtedness                indebtedness 

Total in         8.527       3.368           10.184      4.066           14.092      5.209 
industry         trillion    trillion        trillion    trillion        trillion    trillion 

Including: 

electric power   519         152 billion     612         201 billion     1.092       264 billion 
                 billion                     billion                     trillion 

fuel industry    2.380       943 billion     2.966       1.293           4.028       1.587 
                 trillion                    trillion    trillion        trillion    trillion 

ferrous          789         334 billion     1.014       439 billion     1.447       657 billion 
metallurgy       billion                     trillion                    trillion 

nonferrous       679         255 billion     770         270 billion     955         297 billion 
metallurgy       billion                     billion                     billion 

chemical and     890         442 billion     1.098       569 billion     1.370       686 billion 
petrochemical    billion                     trillion                    trillion 
industry 

machine          1.298       504 billion     1.594       601 billion     2.150       805 billion 
building and     trillion                    trillion                    trillion 
metalworking 

forestry,        419         242 billion     356         165 billion     479         222 billion 
woodworking,     billion                     billion                     billion 
and pulp and 
paper industry 


building         185         90 billion      245         115 billion     338         130 billion 
materials        billion                     billion                     billion 
industry 

light industry   195         69 billion      225         84 billion      305         90 billion 
                 billion                     billion                     billion 

food industry    706         207 billion     739         175 billion     1.086       249 billion 
                 billion                     billion                     trillion 

construction     987         334 billion     1.125       429 billion     1.680       509 billion 
                 billion                     trillion                    trillion 


  The greatest increase in delinquent indebtedness to 
suppliers 
in October of this year was observed at enterprises of the 
glass, porcelain, ceramics, and pottery industry--by a factor of 
2.1; in ferrous metallurgy, the flour-grinding, cereals, and 
mixed fodders industry--by a factor of 1.5; in the food 
industry--by a factor of 1.4. At the same time, the growth rate 
did not exceed 12 percent for ferrous metallurgy, the building 
materials industry, and light industry. The proportion of 
industrial enterprises with delinquent indebtedness to suppliers 
as of 1 October of this year comprised 40.5 percent, as opposed 
to 45.9 percent as of 1 September of this year. 
  The significant volumes of delinquent credit indebtedness 
are 
related to the presence of debit indebtedness. 
  As of 1 October of this year, the entire amount of debit 
indebtedness amounted to R28.0 trillion, of which R10.1 
trillion, or 36 percent, was delinquent indebtedness. The 
greatest share of delinquent indebtedness is attributable to the 
indebtedness of purchasers--R8.9 trillion, or 88 percent. 
  The greatest proportion of delinquent debit indebtedness was 
observed in the oil refining, microbiology, forestry, 
woodworking, and pulp and paper industries (47 percent), in 
ferrous metallurgy (48 percent), and in the gas (52 percent) and 
coal (55 percent) industries. 
  Due to a lack of their own financial resources, enterprises 
are resorting to credits. The total volume of indebtedness with 
respect to bank credits for sectors under observation as of 1 
October of this year amounted to R6.5 trillion, including R3.0 
trillion, or 47 percent, attributable to nonstate enterprises. 
  The absence of regulation with respect to mutual accounts 
settlements between enterprises and with the budget exerts an 
influence on their financial stability. 
  The solvency of observed enterprises and organizations of 
industry and construction is characterized by the following data: 


                 Monetary assets, percentage of delinquent indebtedness 
                 to suppliers 

                 As of 1     As of 1   As of 1    As of 1       As of 1 
                 January     April     August     September     October 
                 1993        1993      1993       1993          1993 

Total            78.2        102.1     91.5       79.8          79.3 

including: 

industry         79.3        107.1     95.5       83.9          81.7 

construction     67.2        52.9      50.6       40.9          55.4 


  Credit investments in the Russian economy (not including 
credits of the Russian Federation Savings Bank) as of 1 November 
of this year, according to current operating data of the Central 
Bank of Russia, amounted to R19.6 trillion, an increase of 17 
percent over October (15 percent over September). Of the total 
volume of credit deposits, short-term loans comprise 96 percent. 
This represents a one-point percentage increase in their share 
as compared with the beginning of the year. The average term of 
offered credits is two to three months. Trading in 
"super-short-term" credits (from a few days to one month) in the 
credit and stock markets is becoming more prevalent. 
  The main source of resources for commercial banks has 
traditionally been attracted resources (over 90 percent), of 
which more than one-fourth are attributable to funds of 
enterprises and organizations (in settlement accounts, current 
accounts, other accounts), deposits, and investments; one-fifth 
are attributable to interbank credits. Centralized credits of 
the Bank of Russia comprise 84 percent of the latter. 
  The remainder of the indebtedness of commercial banks to the 
Central Bank of Russia with respect to centralized credits 
extended to enterprises and organizations in accordance with 
federal programs comprised R7.9 trillion as of 1 November of 
this year, an increase of 6 percent over October (2 percent over 
September). Their share of the total volume of credit deposits 
decreased from 44 percent as of 1 October of this year to 40 
percent as of 1 November. 
  Since 15 October of this year, the interest rate of the Bank 
of Russia for centralized loans was raised from 180 percent to 
210 percent. With an increase in the prime rate, interest rates 
for loans afforded by commercial banks to their clients have 
also increased. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61163 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94068" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Statistics on General Indebtedness for 1992-1993 </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944E0335A Moscow DELOVOY MIR in Russian No 241, 29 Nov-5 Dec 
93 pp 8, 9 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0335A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow DELOVOY MIR </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Andrey Illarionov, director of the Analysis and </F>
Planning Group of the Chairman of the Russian Federation Council 
of Ministers: "The Closer to the Market -- the Less the 
Suffering"] 
  [Text] According to the most recent data -- on 1 
October -- the volume of total indebtedness for products shipped 
is 16.5 trillion rubles [R]. There is no sense in talking about 
the entire amount of indebtedness, though, since it also 
includes the part of it which is related to the passage of 
payments. The problem worrying everyone is the outstanding debt 
in industry -- the main object of the non-payments. On 1 October 
it was R6.9 trillion. 
<H5>  Indebtedness in the Mirror of Statistics </H5>
  If we recall the "peak" of the non-payment crisis -- last 
summer -- it turns out that in absolute figures, the amount of 
the outstanding debt doubled: on 1 July 1992 it was R3.2 
trillion. During this 18-month period, however, prices rose over 
10-fold. Consequently, the outstanding debt, on a relative 
scale, not only did not increase, but even dropped. The 
indicators characterizing the relative proportion of 
non-payments in the national economy also indicate this trend. 
  The relative proportion of outstanding debt in the entire 
amount of indebtedness during last-year's non-payment crisis was 
61-62 percent, but after the introduction of pre-payments and 
carrying out reciprocal setoffs, it dropped to 49-46 percent, 
and in January 1993 it was 42 percent. It remained at this level 
until October of this year. 
  The next indicator makes understandable the way in which 
outstanding indebtedness relates to the entire industrial 
output. In August of last year the indebtedness exceeded the 
amount of goods produced by a factor of 2.6. In December of last 
year this indicator was 135-140 percent. It held at this level 
for the last 10-11 months: the figure for 1 October is 137.5 
percent. 
  A characteristic indicator is the relative proportion of 
outstanding debt to the gross domestic product. At the "peak" of 
non-payments it was 1.7 percent of the VVP [GDP]. In the autumn, 
after carrying out the reciprocal setoff, it was 86 percent of 
the GDP, in December -- 70 percent, in February 1993 -- 48 
percent and in March -- 32 percent. It stayed at this level for 
the entire remainder of the year: on 1 October the relative 
proportion of outstanding debt was 34 percent of the gross 
domestic product. 
  A year ago, the outstanding indebtedness exceeded the 
monetary funds in the enterprises' accounts by a factor of 2.6. 
In June of this year, the relative proportion of outstanding 
debt exceeded the enterprises' funds by a factor of 1.3. In 
October it rose slightly -- to a factor of 1.6. 
  In the meantime, when examining the dynamics of the growth 
of 
outstanding indebtedness, allowance should be made for the fact 
that the data on 1 October of this year is not totally 
comparable with the entire preceding series. Up until 1 October, 
the outstanding indebtedness was calculated in production cost 
prices. Beginning on 1 October, a new type of accountability was 
introduced, and non-payments were calculated in sale prices. 
Even a non-specialist knows that the sale price is higher than 
the production cost price, and specialists refine this to a 
difference of 20-30 percent. The latter indicators, therefore, 
overstated the relatively comparable series by at least 20 
percent. 
  We can therefore say precisely that no rise took place in 
the 
relative proportion of outstanding indebtedness in the national 
economy. Moreover, it was reduced in the relative indicators. 
This is demonstrated visually by the graphs: after the summer 
"peak" of 1992, the volumes of outstanding indebtedness emerged 
on an even plateau somewhere toward October and were at a stable 
level for a year, and for certain sectors even fell. 
  Let us sum up everything that has been said. There are 
non-payments in the economy. The problem, however, remained at 
approximately the same level of urgency throughout the year. 
There is therefore no objective basis for talking about the 
exacerbation of the problem of non-payments, and there is no 
payment crisis right now. 
<H5>  The Reasons for Non-Payments </H5>
  Since the beginning of the reform, in January of last year, 
the enterprises have been relieved of the obligatory ties, 
"designated" by the government, with each other, and with buyers 
and suppliers. On the one hand, this relieved them of 
"obligations" and disadvantageous partners, and made it possible 
for them to seek more advantageous ties. It is obvious, however, 
that such things cannot be done overnight, and the enterprises 
continued "from force of habit" to supply their output for the 
traditional buyers, without waiting for payment. The recipients 
of the goods either had no money in their accounts, or had 
money, but had lost interest in the goods supplied them. As a 
result, the gross heap of non-payments increased quite quickly. 
  The compulsory pre-payment for goods supplied, introduced by 
government resolution, should theoretically eliminate the 
payment problem as a phenomenon. In practice, however, 
pre-payment has only partially eased the urgency of the 
situation. What is happening now? The idea is that the 
enterprises should wait until the money arrives before they ship 
their products. In reality, however, they are, as before, not 
waiting for the pre-payment. Why? The certainty, to quite an 
extent encouraged by last year's reciprocal setoff, continues to 
exist among enterprise directors that sooner or later the 
government, the Central Bank of the Russian Federation, whoever 
you like, will pay them. This illusory hope is also fed by the 
fear of facing the truth: if they do not pay, this means that 
the shipment must be stopped, and consequently, production cut 
back or completely curtailed. In principle, in a normal economy, 
the normal producer will do just that. If he is not paid for the 
goods, why produce them? Our shipping of goods in exchange for 
"air" stems from the residues of the former mentality. 
<H5>  What Reciprocal Setoffs Are Leading To </H5>
  If we look at the experience of other countries with a 
transitional economy -- Poland, Hungary, the Czech Republic -- 
we observe a considerable amount of non-payment in them. It has 
been fluctuating at a level of 20-30 percent of the gross 
domestic product for many years. This problem is being gradually 
solved by privatization and by enterprises adopting true market 
behavior. The owner or boss is appearing who is beginning to 
follow a more efficient policy. This is, of course, possible 
only after a wave of bankruptcies, unemployment and changes in 
production structure. 
  In the last few years we have emerged at a non-payment level 
at which we will stay for several years. In no case should this 
phenomenon be combated by methods of reciprocal setoff, although 
this possibility is constantly discussed, and the Central Bank 
of the Russian Federation is coming forth as a zealous advocate 
of following it. 
  Just what did carrying out reciprocal setoff lead to last 
year. Immediately upon the payment of a credit balance, the 
Central Bank issued a relatively small number of loans, a fact 
of which it loves to remind us. Apart from the R150 billion of 
credit emission, however, a little over R1 trillion was issued 
to the accounts of the commercial banks, which was then 
transferred to the accounts of the enterprises. In the course of 
time, the loans were converted into a cash monetary mass, which 
rained down on our market in a month or two, and gave a colossal 
splash of inflation. 
  After all, after the January 1992 price shock, the 
correcting 
inflation was quite quickly reduced to 10 percent a month. The 
growth rates of foodstuffs in August of last year were the 
lowest in the entire history of the reform -- 6 percent a month. 
The restrictive monetary credit policy followed by the 
government gave every chance of reducing inflation to 2-3 
percent a month by the end of last year. In August the 
non-payment knot was untied, but at the price of 25-30-percent 
inflation last autumn. 
  There were, of course, other reasons -- the technical loans 
to the neighboring countries, the cash ruble banknotes, which 
were transferred in innumerable amounts to the states of the 
ruble zone. Carrying out reciprocal setoff, however, was one of 
the most powerful creditogenic and emissionogenic factors. We 
carried out one reciprocal setoff. Ukraine carried out four of 
them. Did they solve any non-payment problem? No. It is as 
urgent as it was, remains and, apparently, will remain. The 
enterprise directors, considering the last four reciprocal 
setoffs, naturally hope that they will not be dropped in the 
abyss for a fifth time. Reciprocal setoffs are not the least of 
the reasons that the growth rates of inflation in Ukraine 
exceeded 40 percent a month in 1993. In September they had 
65-percent inflation, and early October estimates fluctuate 
within a range of 70-80 percent. That is, Ukraine has entered a 
stage of hyperinflation, in which it is not the solution of the 
non-payment problem which is regarded as of paramount 
importance, but the survival of the nation. 
  If we follow this path, we will repeat Ukraine's experience. 
After all, we now have a real possibility of achieving a 
reduction in the inflation growth rates. We began the year with 
30-percent inflation, in which in some weeks the price growth 
rate reached 12 percent. The technical mark of hyperinflation 
was close at hand. From this dangerous level, thanks to the 
government's consistent and basically restrictive monetary 
policy (which did not please the overwhelming majority of the 
people who were getting money), we emerged, in the second week 
of November, at a level of 2.3 percent. (The results would have 
been even more impressive if it had not been for the monetary 
reform, which caused an inflation splash.) 
  If the reciprocal setoff between enterprises is carried out 
all the same, then all the government's efforts to "beat down" 
inflation and all the sacrifices that society has made in the 
last two years will again come to naught. 
  In addition, engaging in reciprocal setoffs for non-payment 
between enterprises is destroying the producers' adaptation to 
the changing market structure, and is depriving them of 
objective criteria. Credit emission is changing their 
guidelines, and is inclining them toward the paternalistic 
support of the state. 
<H5>  The Problem of Payments with the Neighboring Countries </H5>
  The nature of non-payment among producers who are now 
foreigners to each other is analogous to that of the domestic, 
the Russian. Why do the enterprises of the CIS countries 
continue to supply goods to Russia without waiting for payment 
from their partners? Because they hope that sooner or later 
their expenses will be paid. Why do Russian enterprises not 
introduce pre-payment for their goods and in general do not 
count on it? Apparently, because they do not need these goods. 
It is also obvious that the enterprises themselves should solve 
the problems between them. The states, having established the 
general rules, do not have the right to interfere in their 
affairs. The main thing is that the payments pass through the 
RKTs [accounting-clearing center] on time. Here, the Central 
Bank must be given its due -- it has made great efforts to 
accelerate the passage of the payments. 
  Making settlements among the enterprises of the neighboring 
countries is intensifying, but the Central Bank has not solved 
another problem -- the lack of a mechanism to determine the 
exchange rates of national currencies in relation to the Russian 
ruble. 
  The Central Bank quotes the Lithuanian, Latvian and Estonian 
national currencies through the dollar. The exchange rate of the 
Ukrainian karbovanets is established at stock exchange marts. 
For a number of currencies of the neighboring states, however, 
the quotations are either not introduced at all (they include 
the Georgian kupon, the Azerbaijan manat), or are introduced at 
an artificially fixed level -- these are the Belorussian, Uzbek 
and Kazakh currencies. 
  "Floating" quotations, and market determination of the 
exchange rate of the currencies of our neighboring countries are 
vitally necessary. Otherwise, we will continue to subsidize 
these states due to an overstated currency rate of exchange. 
<H5>  Non-Payments and Structural Reorganization </H5>
  If an enterprise director is absolutely certain that no 
reciprocal setoff for non-payments is in the offing, and that he 
will receive no help or indulgence from either the government or 
from the Central Bank, he will stop supplying his goods "for 
air." Then he will be obliged to change the enterprise's policy: 
to cut back or completely curtail the output of goods for which 
he is not paid, and begin to produce things which will be sure 
to be paid for with real money. The producer will adapt to the 
market normally, and this will above all be manifested in 
structural changes in the economy. It is in this that the real 
sense of all reforms lies. 
  Let us face the truth: structural reorganization is, of 
course, accompanied by a rise in unemployment. You must pay for 
everything. Including with unemployment, for this sort of 
employment structure -- a copy of the production structure -- 
does not answer the market needs. Even if we have a 20-percent 
unemployment level in our country, we must remember that this is 
only one-fifth of the population. When, however, we support 
industry which does not meet the demands of the market through 
credit emission, reciprocal setoffs and subsidies, we have 
inflation, and 100 percent of the population suffers from it. 
  Paradoxically, it is also reassuring that, under the 
conditions of an economic recession, the production of a number 
of goods, mainly durable goods -- irons, microwave ovens, 
freezers and television sets -- is increasing, and for some 
items -- by 20-30 percent. This is a colossal increase by any 
measuring standards. At the same time, the production of 
combines and tractors is being cut back. This means that 
structural changes are taking place in a sector such as machine 
building, which has been sluggish all these years. 
  Do you know which sector is feeling the burden of 
non-payments least of all? The food sector. This is 
understandable: food products are paid for immediately. The 
growth rates of this sector in the course of this year have been 
2-3 percent. This is the first sector to emerge from the 
recession. 
  A whole sector and sub-sector (production of household 
electrical appliances, which is "seated" in machine building) 
emerged from the crisis, after carrying out structural 
reorganization. Why them, precisely? Because they stand nearest 
of all to the consumer market and detect all the demand 
fluctuations more quickly. Other sectors, however, representing 
the demand for raw material and completing items, will also 
gradually emerge from the crisis. 
  Structural reorganization of the economy is a process which 
will last for more than just a year and even for more than just 
a decade. It is a real art to sense the demands of the market 
and attune to it. Products that have not been paid for are among 
the visible signs of production non-competitiveness. Carrying 
out reciprocal setoff for non-payments will therefore only 
distort the pulse of the market and deprive the producer of a 
market guideline, which is not all that easy to find. 
&lt;/graphic&gt; 

&lt;/graphic&gt; 

&lt;/graphic&gt; 

&lt;/graphic&gt; 

&lt;/graphic&gt; 

&lt;/graphic&gt; 


</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61164 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94069" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> BALTIC STATES </F>
<F P=101> ESTONIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Russian Community Head on Problems Facing Russian-Speakers </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0486A Moscow PRAVDA in Russian 15 Dec 93 p 5 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0486A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow PRAVDA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with civil rights advocate Aleksey Zybin by </F>
correspondent Lembit Annus; Tallinn; date not given: "Converse 
With a Duster, in Estonian. Instructions to Russian Cleaners"] 
  [Text] Tallinn--Aleksey Zybin is a communications engineer 
and hereditary citizen of the Republic of Estonia. He is well 
known with us as a prominent figure of the Russian civil rights 
movement. He was a member of the last Supreme Soviet of Estonia. 
Residents of Tallinn recently elected him to the city assembly, 
where he is head of the faction of deputies of the Russian Revel 
slate. He is interviewed by Lembit Annus, our own correspondent 
in the Republic of Estonia. 
  [Annus] Aleksey Alekseyevich, what brought about the need 
for 
the creation of the Russian community of Estonia? 
  [Zybin] The purpose of our organization was the preservation 
and development of Russian spirituality, cultural 
distinctiveness, and national-historical memory. It emerged as 
the Russian people's response to the challenge of the times. Our 
organization is the youngest in the republic, incidentally. Its 
"chronology" dates from 17 April of this year. At that time 500 
delegates of the Russian Assembly adopted in Tallinn a decision 
on the formation of a Russian community, elected its duma and 
approved a program and bylaws. But we are not a Russian 
political party, merely a civil rights organization of Russian 
people. Russians, the bulk of whom do not have Estonian 
citizenship, do not, according to the Constitution, have the 
right to form political parties. They availed themselves, 
therefore, of the opportunity to create a social and cultural 
organization. Unfortunately, the government has still not made 
up its mind to register our community, and the president, to 
invite its representatives to the roundtable discussing the 
problems of Russians in Estonia. 
  Of course, it would be flagrant deception to declare that 
the 
community unites in a single organization all 600,000 
non-Estonians. But no one can any longer deny the fact that it 
is the mass of Russians that constitutes the social base of our 
organization. And this means that the future in the republic is 
on the side of the community. 
  There is in Estonia today no other organization like ours, 
whose principal goal is the creation of an integral practicable 
and effective system of moral, spiritual, and material mutual 
assistance for all members of its community. It is perfectly 
explicable, therefore, that it is gaining ever-increasing 
support from Russians living in Estonia. 
  [Annus] You refer also, most likely, to the results of the 
October elections to the local government assemblies? 
  [Zybin] Quite right. Surely it is a success when 10 deputies 
were elected to the Tallinn City Assembly on the Russian Revel 
slate. This was possible because the community was able to get 
the better of those who had fervently urged a boycott of the 
local elections. On account of the boycott, not a single Russian 
deputy was elected to the city council in many constituencies at 
that time. And the Russians themselves were the losers because 
of this. For this reason the people supported us this time. 
Approximately 20,000 Tallinn residents voted at the elections 
this time for the Russian deputies of our slate. Mainly from the 
most unprotected strata of the population. And we ourselves are 
today the poorest faction of deputies in the Tallinn City 
Assembly. For example, the Russian community spent on the entire 
campaign only 3,300 Estonian krona. Six hundred krona went on a 
one-time lease of the Russian Cultural Center in Tallinn alone. 
Simple arithmetic shows that each of our deputy's mandates 
"costs" 330 krona. No other faction of deputies in the Tallinn 
City Assembly has such "cheap" seats, incidentally. I mention 
this not from pride but from pain. Poor Russian deputies will 
today have to defend their equally poor electorate. It is 
counting on us and firmly believes that we will be able if only 
in some respects to alleviate its life in our cruel times. 
  [Annus] Aleksey Alekseyevich, what is your attitude toward 
the assertion of Lennart Meri, president of Estonia, who in his 
recent interview with the journal DER SPIEGEL said that Estonia 
is treating "the minority better than Germany is treating the 
Turks"? 
  [Zybin] I do not know how Germany treats the Turks, but that 
there is everywhere in Estonia bad treatment of Russians I, as a 
Russian, have experienced for myself repeatedly. And the 
language, citizenship, and foreigners laws show this better than 
a thousand words. So various political statements in the press 
are one thing; the policy being pursued currently by the ruling 
national-radical forces is quite another. It is for this reason 
that the Russian community is endeavoring to help our people in 
today's Estonia. 
  [Annus] You have touched on the most painful problem of the 
life of Russians in Estonia today--the question of the official 
language. What do you think--do Russians need to know Estonian? 
  [Zybin] Everyone should unequivocally know Estonian. It is 
bad merely that Estonian is being pinned on Russians forcibly, 
with a stick. What is to be gained today, pray, from the whole 
of Narva today learning Estonian by rote? There is no one in 
everyday life to talk to in Estonian. I simply cannot understand 
either why knowledge of Estonian is now an obligatory 
requirement of a cleaner, even. What, will she converse in the 
official language with a duster? It is surely more important 
that the floor be washed clean. 
  Why does not Estonia take the Finnish route? Recognize as 
the 
official languages both Estonian and Russian. At least all the 
tension in our society would then be lifted. In other words, the 
Hippocratic precept: "Do no harm," should be introduced 
immediately in Estonian language policy. 
  [Annus] Imagine for a moment that you are president of 
Estonia. What would you do in your new capacity first and 
foremost? 
  [Zybin] I would first of all adopt all measures to achieve 
an 
end to the inter-nation hostility at the everyday level. To 
ensure that Estonians see in the Russians living in the republic 
the same kind of people as themselves. Not their enemies, who 
must necessarily be gotten rid of. 
  Second, I would make every effort and use all my 
presidential 
possibilities to ensure that Estonian industry once again begin 
to operate at full power and that the countryside be 
revitalized. I would necessarily erect legislative barriers in 
the way of the conversion of tiny Estonia into a dumping ground 
for unserviceable overseas products and all kinds of industrial 
trash. In other words, I would create for all Estonian landsmen 
normal conditions for earning some money for a decent human 
life. Without normal production, the state cannot exist. There 
can otherwise be no question of independence. 
  And, third, I would come to an arrangement with the 
president 
of Russia concerning the civilized admittance of the Russian 
people who have declared a desire to move to their primordial 
homeland. You cannot live your whole life nursing a grievance. 
No good will come of this, and civil peace and harmony in 
Estonia even less. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61165 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94070" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> BALTIC STATES </F>
<F P=101> ESTONIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Savisaar Recounts Five Past Years of Popular Front </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0386A Tallinn RAHVA HaaL in Estonian 23 Nov 93 
p </F>



<TEXT>
2; 24 Nov 93 p 2 
<F P=103> 944K0386A </F>
<F P=104>  Tallinn RAHVA HaaL </F>
 Language: <F P=105>Estonian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Edgar Savisaar: "Five Years of Estonia's </F>
People's Front"] 
<H5>  [23 Nov 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] 
  Estonia's People's Front wrapped up its activity on 
November 13, 1993. The five-year old popular movement had done 
its job. In connection with this, it would be appropriate to 
recall what the People's Front has accomplished. 
  Let's recall that in 1988 Estonia was faced with a situation 
where it needed to make itself visible to the world, and to let 
the world know that we existed. We knew that the world will take 
seriously only those who do exist, who have to be reckoned with, 
and those with whom one needs to enter a dialogue. 
  We had to create alternative structures, through which 
to mobilize the multitudes, reorient the awareness of the 
people, and select new leaders. This had to be done in such 
a democratic fashion that would not arouse protest against us 
elsewhere but, instead, earn us the support of world public 
opinion. We realized that supporting a popular movement that had 
already earned the support of world public opinion would be too 
difficult to avoid even by the pragmatic politicians of the West. 
  The goal was to bring Estonia into big-time 
politics. This could have been accomplished in only two 
ways: By expressing the will of the state or of the people. We 
did not have a state yet. Among the people, however, 1988 saw 
the unleashing of processes that the whole democratic world had 
to reckon with. One could say that we involved the world in 
Estonia's cause, by signaling that what was happening in Estonia 
was bound to have an impact on world politics. 
  This is how the People's Front was born, ushering in the era 
of movements in Estonia. It was a time of emphatic denial of 
what existed, and an absolute majority was in agreement on that. 
A situation emerged where everyone knew what they did not want 
for the present time. What they wanted for the future, however, 
and what kind of a positive program to follow, had not been 
sorted out between the different groupings. Only some vague and 
relatively general ideas existed. 
  The emergence of large popular movements was not only 
characteristic of Estonia, or the Baltic states, for that 
matter. The popular movements became the moving force that 
managed to break up the Soviet empire throughout the entire 
territory of the former Soviet Union and its socialist satellite 
states in Central Europe. Sociologists have recorded as many as 
70 oppositional mass movements over the former Soviet territory 
and Central Europe. 
  Estonia's People's Front had close ties with popular 
movements in Central Europe, although our delegation was not 
admitted to the German Democratic Republic, for example. That's 
how dangerous it thought to be. One could also recall the 
greeting received from the 'official' Popular Front of 
Czechoslovakia to the First Congress of Estonia's People's 
Front. It was very conservative, if not stagnationist. I think 
there were things at that time that the Czechs could have 
learned from Estonia's People's Front. We sent telegrams to 
Czechoslovakia demanding that Vaclav Havel be freed, we 
protested against the dictatorial regime in Romania, etc. 
  It should be admitted that the goals of popular movements 
taking place in Central Europe were, in a sense, more 
restricted, compared to those of Estonia. In East Germany, the 
goal of the popular movement was to demolish the Berlin Wall 
and, when that was done, disperse, without any clear formation. 
In Czechoslovakia, the Citizens' Forum set itself the task of 
getting rid of the Husak regime installed by Brezhnev. In 
Poland, the mission had a wider range, including the protection 
of economic interests, and basic spiritual values (derived from 
Catholicism) of the people. 
  By far the mightiest of Central European popular movements 
was Poland's Solidarity. This name was chosen very carefully, as 
the existing regime was based on lack of solidarity between 
people. People were separated from each other and made dependent 
on the state. There was no sense of rubbing elbows or, even if 
there was any, it was subordinated to loyalty toward the state. 
The Central European popular movements juxtaposed loyalty to 
solidarity. 
  All Central European movements where largely anti-Soviet 
(attempting not to copy the Soviet Union, demanding that Russian 
troops be removed etc.). They were ahead of us on economic and 
national issues. In the economic sector, this was due to the 
realization, after numerous attempts at restucturing the 
economy, that partial reforms were leading nowhere. 
  The nationality issue did not have a high priority for 
Central European movements, and that for two reasons. First, 
there was no threat to national identity in these countries. 
There was practically no immigration, only emigration. Secondly, 
nationality had been made a legitimate part of the 70-year old 
Communist regime in Poland, Romania and some other countries, 
even though this was not emphasized. 
  In contrast to the Central European countries, nationality 
was vital to us because, through it, we compensated for the lack 
of all other structures (our own state included). Besides, our 
old administration was clearly anti-nationalist and its goal was 
to suppress nationalism. This is why nationality became one of 
the key issues of our popular movements. 
  By now, the popular movements of Central Europe have run 
their course, their goals have been met. The Communist satellite 
states have become independent states, with a developed civilian 
society. I think one of the reasons why the popular movements 
fell apart there was that the classical Western-European system 
of parties took hold rapidly. Locally initiated and in many ways 
amorphous popular movements were no match to the professional 
party machinery imported from the West, often at high cost. The 
intellectual elite, sustaining the popular movements, burned out 
fast. 
  The popular movement was, after all, a movement for the 
intellectuals that was, at one point, joined by the people. It 
was this cerebral component that became both the strength and 
the weakness of the movement. Intellectuals, with their high 
self-esteem, have always been a poorly organized segment of a 
society, where everyone demands a right to one's individual 
conscience, and where there is no political guile, or arrogance. 
  A popular movement is organized out of a sense of mission, a 
party is formulated with the idea of seizing power. A movement 
is headed by the intellectual elite of the nation, the parties 
are headed by professional politicians, often backed by a 
power-hungry mediocrity. 
  The significance of People's Front, and the Baltic popular 
movements in general, was that they revealed the presence of 
massive opposition. A format was created that helped the 
opposition to organize and people to stick together, without 
running into direct conflict with the powers that be. It was 
essentially through the popular movement that opposition seeped 
into the society, itself striking a balance between legal and 
illegal. 
  Secondly, with the advent of People's Front, new, public 
ground was broken in the society for sprouting other movements, 
groupings and factions. Up to that point, the regime had been 
based largely on fear. Thanks to the popular movements, people 
lost their fear of authority. It was that overcoming of fear 
that made it possible to break the Communist monopoly on power, 
to organize the first democratic elections in 1990, where the 
candidates of People's Front received the greatest number of 
votes. 
  Thirdly, processes (IME [economic] project, disclosure of 
MRP 
[Molotov-Ribbentrop Pact] secret protocols, etc.) were 
initiated, without which the Baltic quest for independence would 
have remained incomprehensible, or seemed illegal, perhaps, even 
after the August coup of 1991. It was in this struggle that the 
general requirements for independence were met, forcing the 
Moscow regime to make some very clear choices after the August 
coup. 
  Fourth, an example was given, along with some help, for 
starting other mass movements elsewhere in the Soviet Union. I 
am sure that people in different parts of the empire still 
recall the myths circulating about the emissaries of People's 
Front, who were feared, and had to be warned against. The 
activity of the Baltic popular movements made life for central 
authorities even more difficult, and thus increased the pressure 
bearing on them. 
  Fifth, the popular movements in the Baltic countries served 
as a conduit of sorts between Moscow and Central Europe. 
Although this topic warrants a separate study, one can say with 
confidence that many new ideas and attitudes found their way 
across the Baltic countries. We had our share in helping the 
definitely democratic ideas of perestroyka get to Central 
Europe, and reform experiences from there to get back to Russia. 
We showed to the West that the Soviet Union was not the 
monolithic monster it seemed to be from far away. 
<H5>  [24 Nov 93 p 2] </H5>
  [Text] 
  The Fifth Congress of People's Front became the 
congress to end the movement. It generated a hankering for the 
unity and ideals of the past among one-time activists of 
People's Front, as they asked: Has the time really come? 
  The principal goal of People's Front has undoubtedly been 
achieved--Estonia is a free state. At the same time, we cannot 
really say that Estonia has a civilized society, and a political 
system consisting of strong, democratic parties. To the 
contrary, development toward a civilized society seems to be 
thwarted. The parties are getting weaker, not stronger. More and 
more political decisions are being made outside the control of 
the public. We do not have a normal political life yet. 
  In my opinion, the political development experienced so far, 
could be divided into three stages: The first of these was 
dominated by the politics of People's Front; the second by 
fictional party lines and simulation politics; and the third, 
which we are entering now, is ruled by unabashed money politics. 
This is the corporate period that signifies the lack of a public 
political life. 
  The task of developing a civilized society is far from 
completed but, then again, completing this process would be 
outside the ken of the People's Front. This is because 
social stratification in Estonia (differentiation of wealth 
etc.) is taking place faster than the development of a civilized 
society. The Estonian society is no longer a swarm of bees. Five 
years ago, we were together, indeed, and could sense the 
movement of each other's wings. Now, the society has separated 
itself, groups have formed whose interests collide or are at 
odds with each other, hence what we have here and now is 
no longer the era of People's Front. 
  A popular movement can be effective and successful only as 
long as no significant statification has occurred within the 
society, and as long as everybody is more or less poor, or 
making do on a modest scale. Once problems arise between owners 
and renters, employers and employees and other social groupings, 
the massive popular movements will no longer hold together. As 
more and more strength and energy is spent on settling internal 
conflicts, it will no longer be possible to maintain a 
coordinated policy. The policy of the popular movement becomes 
more vague and loses its attraction. 
  The present condition of our society is also not conducive 
to 
maintaining People's Front because people lack the two 
necessary resources for participating in politics: They no 
longer have the time or the money to spare. To that are 
added political alienation and general fatigue. 
  What next? It is not quite clear yet if our parties are an 
integral part of the universal structure of society, or merely a 
historical phenomenon we want to impose on our politics, in an 
effort to imitate the democratic countries. The parties of 
Western Europe were formed under circumstances that were 
different from what we have now. I think that in a society of 
mass consumption, the mentality of people is different, as are 
the ways in which the society is organized, and this is what 
makes a rapid process of forming classical parties unthinkable 
in Estonia. Right now, what we do is more of an imitation of 
political activity by means of parties, than the real thing. 
  For our future political development, I can see three 
options. The first of them would preserve the 
political ambiguity for a long time, leaving everything up in 
the air, which is very similar to what happened in the 1920's. 
It will be like one Liviko scandal after another, with no end in 
sight. 
  By the way, the current scandal of purchasing weapons from 
Israel is very similar to the affair of selling ships to Peru 
during the first Republic of Estonia. Back then, the ships were 
sold at an exceptionally low price. Now, the weapons were 
purchased at an exceptionally high price. One could presume that 
then, as now, someone pocketed the difference. By the year of 
1934, the earlier of these events had lead to a dictatorship of 
corporations under the leadership of 'Isamaaliit' [Fatherland 
Alliance]. 
  The second option would be to restructure the 
party system to match the emerging interest groups. By now, only 
three interest groups have organized themselves in our society: 
Lawful owners, farmers and, to some extent, pensioners. Yet to 
be organized are new owners, lease-holders, wage earners, 
renters and many other groups of people with common interests. 
The development of interest groups and their awareness is also 
hampered by the fact that there is no group solidarity. Those 
who make it, become haughty and separate themselves from others. 
It seems, however, that this is a passing phenomenon of 
property-based capitalism. 
  I am afraid that most of today's parties lack the internal 
strength to renew themselves or to join with other parties. The 
first to wither will be those who do not have a clear long-term 
orientation to understand on whose behalf, and for whose benefit 
they function. They will be replaced by new political forces, 
who have a clearly established policy and a long-term 
socio-political orientation. Estonia's political landscape will 
be covered fully by three or four major parties that will 
eventually dominate. 
  The third option covers factions that are not 
capable of developing into independent entities of political 
activity, and will rely on clans. The parties will be preserved 
in form only, while the actual decisions are made by the clan, 
who will command a sizeable portion of the society. To oppose 
that, sooner or later, a new democratic movement will 
emerge within Estonia's society. The way I see it, it will 
be neither leftist or rightist. It is more likely to be a 
general democratic movement, carried primarily by small property 
owners and less affluent groups who, because of lack of 
property, cannot have their say in the society otherwise. 
This would be a classic case of an anti-monopoly movement, 
demanding an effective anti-monopoly law, reorganization of 
banking, and funding to support private enterprise. 
  These are only some of the possibilities for political 
development. At any rate, ending the activity of People's Front, 
does not end political activity in Estonia. 
  I would like to thank all these thousands of 
people who, for the past five years, have been with People's 
Front and supported it who--in fact-- were the People's Front. 
To thank them for being the first to overcome fear in 1988. Only 
in retrospect does everything People's Front did back then seem 
so simple and so self-evident. But I am sure there were also 
those who preferred to hide in the bushes. But the bravest, the 
most enterprising and the most self-confident of them did join 
People's Front. 
  To be involved in People's Front often meant putting aside 
one's own personal affairs. The only ones capable of doing that 
were those who saw the potential, who were not only thinking of 
themselves, but those who also thought of the fate of their 
fellow members and the whole society. 
  I fully understand that many of them now feel that their job 
is done and that they are no longer needed. It is also a feeling 
of disappointment, in a way, because the subsequent course of 
events was always pictured a little differently than what we see 
now. But I think our job is far from being done. Five years ago, 
we had idealistic individuals joining the People's Front and 
these are the very same people who will now stand up to all 
kinds of clans and profiteers. 
  There is no reason to think that the experience of People's 
Front will not be needed in the future. To the contrary. Looking 
at the latest EMOR surveys, one can see that People's Front 
enjoyed the most stable base of supporters within the Estonian 
society. Those who chose People's Front a year ago remember 
that, and would probably choose People's Front again today. 
People's Front had the most cohesive membership in Estonia's 
society and, even if someone did drop out on occasion, new 
strength would come from somewhere else. 
  Completely new groupings are being formed. Recently, I got 
word from Parnu that an organization has been formed there 
for the protection of renters. Such things are encouraging and 
show that specific interest groups are beginning to make their 
mark. And thus, the politics trying to represent them, will also 
be more successful. 
  For the time being, the public does not yet know the 
individuals who will be heading the organizations for renters 
and rental agents, employers and employees, owners and 
lease-holders, and those dealing with consumer protection. The 
leaders who emerged during the 'singing revolution' are much 
better known. However, this situation is going to change very 
rapidly--new times and new problems will bring along new 
people to solve these problems. 
  The People's Front has run its course, and closing it down 
on 
November 13 was the most natural thing to do. Every party will 
come to an end, eventually. And the period of People's Front in 
Estonia was a party--the party of political liberation. 
Liberation is always a party in the souls of people! 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61166 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94071" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> BALTIC STATES </F>
<F P=101> ESTONIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Parek's Forced Resignation Traced to Crime Wave </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0424C Stockholm DAGENS NYHETER in Swedish 30 Nov 93 p 12 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0424C </F>
<F P=104>  Stockholm DAGENS NYHETER </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Swedish </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Mert Kubu: "Firefight in Central Tallinn"] </F>
  [Text] Estonian Interior Minister Lagle Parek was forced to 
resign Sunday [28 November] due to her lack of success in the 
fight against organized crime. 
  However the drop that made the cup run over was a firefight 
in central Tallinn during the middle of the day. 
  Mrs. Parek's special force, K Command, which consists of 
policemen who always appear in black masks, launched a 
formidable attack last week. On Friday at 1400 hours they lay in 
wait on Parnu Street, right next to a hospital. The aim was to 
seize Major Asso Kommer, chief of the notorious disbanded 
Estonian commando company. He came along the street accompanied 
by his three bodyguards. 
  When the police in the black masks stormed across the street 
they were met by shots from automatic weapons. Long salvos were 
fired by both sides and passersby had to fling themselves 
headlong to the ground, according to eyewitnesses. Two police 
officers were badly wounded. At first Kommer and his gang 
managed to escape. Later they were seized and mistreated during 
the arrest. It was a miracle that no innocent bystanders were 
killed or wounded, eyewitnesses say. 
  K Command's ambush was regarded as so foolhardy that Parek 
was forced to resign. Prime Minister Mart Laar is now also 
acting as interior minister until a new minister is appointed. 
  Parek was one of four candidates in last year's presidential 
election. She was also one of the last political prisoners in 
Estonia. In the past Parek urged Estonian citizens to obtain 
licenses for firearms and arm themselves. It is now a big 
problem in Estonia that many people are running around with 
firearms in their pockets, most of them illegal. 
  After some 50 car bombings this year alone and a great many 
corpses in the Mafia wars, citizens are now anxious and want the 
government to take strong steps. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61167 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94072" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> BALTIC STATES </F>
<F P=101> ESTONIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   '94 State Budget Gets Third Reading </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0515B Tallinn aRIPaEV in Estonian No 142, 15 
Dec </F>



<TEXT>
93 p 3 
<F P=103> 944K0515B </F>
<F P=104>  Tallinn aRIPaEV </F>
 Language: <F P=105>Estonian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Karmo Kaas: "Budget Approval Likely"] </F>
  [Text] 
  The bill of the 1994 State Budget Law should come up 
for its third reading at today's session of Riigikogu [Estonia's 
parliament], and is likely to be passed, according to Heido 
Vitsur, deputy chairman of the budget committee. 
  The total amount of the budget is roughly 5.8 billion 
kroons. 
Of the proceeds projected, 2.26 billion kroons are due from 
sales tax, and 2.1 billion kroons from income tax. Major 
allocations out of the state budget for the coming year are 1.16 
billion to the Ministry of Culture and Education, 994.4 million 
to the Social Services Ministry, 600.7 million to the Ministry 
of Transportation and Communications, and 558 million kroons to 
the Ministry of the Interior. The Credit Fund for Agriculture 
and Rural Development is allocated 81 million kroons in the 
budget bill. 
  Before the third reading of the budget bill, Vitsur said, 
the 
budget committee approved the proposed amendments increasing the 
allocation for salaries of cultural employees by 6 million 
kroons, and the allocation to finance educational employment by 
30 million kroons. Previously, these amounts had come out of 
local budgets. No decision was made on the total of additional 
social security funding for child support, but the amount for 
this is expected to range between 50 and 100 million kroons. In 
the future, the state budget will also have to cover social 
security payments to compensate for health damages. 
  Vitsur said that the budget bill is based on the new Income 
Tax Law, resulting in an increase in proceeds, compared to 
earlier estimates. Most of the increase in proceeds, however, is 
due to the overall increase in the volume of business. The new 
Income Tax Law also reduced the sponsorship deductions for 
enterprises. The previously allowed partial tax exemption to 
encourage investment was replaced by accelerated depreciation. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61168 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94073" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> BALTIC STATES </F>
<F P=101> ESTONIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Makers of Economic Policy Join Forces </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0516A Tallinn aRIPaEV in Estonian No 144, 20 
Dec </F>



<TEXT>
93 p 7 
<F P=103> 944K0516A </F>
<F P=104>  Tallinn aRIPaEV </F>
 Language: <F P=105>Estonian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Tomi Saluveer: "Estonia's Economic Policy Makers </F>
Unite"] 
  [Text] 
  The Economic Ministry accepted the proposal on 
enhancing the competitive ability of business ventures formed 
around the Chamber of Commerce and Industry, with specialists at 
the ministry expected to participate in the program. 
  "Cooperation between the domestic and national programs of 
developing economic policy has started to grow rapidly," said 
Karl Arusoo, economic advisor at the Chamber of Commerce and 
Industry. 
  While the Economic Ministry concentrates on charting the 
development of macro-economics, the goal of the program created 
at the Chamber of Commerce and Industry is to help with the 
development of business in a more limited context, Arusoo said. 
  Peeter Tohver, deputy chancellor at the Economic Ministry, 
said that the ministry's work group on economic policy 
cooperates with all groupings, institutions and organizations 
involved in this area. 
  The macro policy-makers at the Economic Ministry do not 
identify themselves as a specific grouping, institute or 
scientific body but try, on their own, to stimulate activity 
toward economic development. 
  "We want to see a social need emerge for developing economic 
policy," Tohver added. "The current program to enhance the 
ability to compete is quite extensive, indeed, but it is hard to 
determine just what it entails." 
  The proposal for enhancing the ability to compete is 
designed 
to solve problems for the clientele of the Estonian Chamber of 
Commerce and Industry, EVEA [Estonian Small Business 
Association], REEL [Alliance of State Enterprise Managers], and 
the Central Alliance of Industry. The proposal was signed by 17 
institutions. 
<H5>  State Support Necessary </H5>
  "Current research indicates that businesses do not perceive 
any governmental support to their activity," Arusoo said. "The 
program for enhancing the ability to compete is designed to help 
solve the problems of many of the businesses." 
  Todate, according to Arusoo, support systems have been 
created to implement the program. The plans of action, projected 
dates of completion and a listing of necessary resources for the 
program have also been submitted to the Economic Ministry 
recently. 
  The businesses, he added, are at this time concerned 
primarily with problems related to training, financing, credit 
and legislation. 
  The moving force behind the proposal for enhancing the 
ability to compete is a group of senior experts, representing 
expertise in production, privatization, industry, export, 
standards and design. The two supporting beams of the proposal 
are the development of a credit system for business enterprises, 
and the creation of a training system. 
  Up until now, Arusoo said, Estonia lacks a comprehensive 
system for economic education, the development of which should 
be started through business advice centers in the districts. 
  "Economic education should be a continuous process, not 
training by injection," he added. "Enhancing the ability to 
compete should start with changing the entrepreneurs' way of 
thinking and with training programs." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61169 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94074" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> BALTIC STATES </F>
<F P=101> ESTONIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Estonia Becomes Middleman For East-West Arms Trade </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0515A Tallinn aRIPaEV in Estonian No 143, 17 
Dec </F>



<TEXT>
93 pp 12-13 
<F P=103> 944K0515A </F>
<F P=104>  Tallinn aRIPaEV </F>
 Language: <F P=105>Estonian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "Estonia Is Go-Between For Weapons To </F>
Russian Mafia"] 
  [Text] 
  Estonia is about to find its niche in the world trade 
of weapons. If not daily, at least once a week another shipment 
of weapons from Europe or the United States arrives at the 
customs office. This is the official weapons trade, in addition 
to which there is also secret trading in weapons that is not 
visible to the state. 
  Reliable sources indicate that there is at least one secret 
weapons route going through Estonia, which provides the Russian 
Mafia with weapons. This is how the system works. 
  Some Estonian, on a business trip to the West, acquires a 
quantity of weapons from some weapons plant. These are usually 
purchased. Theft, especially in larger quantities, is not 
feasible. 
  The crossing of the state border(s) can be accomplished in a 
number of ways. These include the use of expertly forged 
documents, hiding the weapons among those covered by permits, 
declaring them under a different product heading, or paying off 
the customs and the border guard. 
  Once the weapons arrive in Estonia, they are turned over to 
a 
go-between, who knows only the person he is dealing with. 
Payment is made in advance and, most of the time, the buyer is 
also known, as orders for weapons are often placed in advance. 
Depending on the time of placing the order, delivery can take 
anywhere from one to three weeks. 
  The go-between will not hold on to the weapons for long, he 
will also not take them home without a compelling reason. The 
buyer is chosen carefully, he must be recommended by someone. On 
the average, the dealer makes 500 kroons on the sale of one 
weapon, with individual variations, of course. 
  Secret weapons are not cheaper than those sold in the 
stores. 
Instead, they are bound to be more expensive. Payment is in cash 
or U.S. dollars, Estonian buyers can also pay in kroons. To 
maintain secrecy, the transaction takes place in public. The 
seller calls the buyer, saying that he has something of interest 
to him, and arranges a meeting at a public place. The 
merchandise is wrapped up to look as shabby and as inconspicuous 
as possible. 
<H5>  Russian Weapons Going Back To Russia </H5>
  Along with Western weapons coming into Estonia, comes the 
production of Russian weapon factories, mostly TT's and Makarov 
pistols. The weapons have clearly been stolen because, in 
Russia, this kind of merchandise is expensive and hard to come 
by. Strangely enough, the weapons brought in to Estonia are so 
cheap, that they reach a realistic sales price only after 
changing hands a few times. These are the weapons preferred by 
the Russian Mafia, in whose hands they travel back to the 
country of their origin. 
  A smaller portion of weapons remains in Estonia. It is 
entirely possible to register them officially later, at a 
weapons store, for example, where they were 'left' on 
consignment. It is also possible to keep the unregistered weapon 
at home where, in case of getting caught, one can always say it 
belongs to some long-lost relative, dates back to wartime, or 
was found a long time ago. 
  Forging a permit is not that difficult either. To this day, 
permits are printed on a conservative yellowish cardboard, with 
no security features. As it stands, no forgery complaints have 
reached the permit and license department of the Bureau of Field 
Police. 
  The scope of underground weapons sales is suggested by one 
go-between who, during his year-and-a-half stay in the chain, 
said he handled the sale of some 500 weapons. He was selling 
mostly Russian weapons to the Russian Mafia, but he also bought 
and sold explosives, plastic bombs and chemical weapons. Among 
the weapons from the West, there were many Beretta and Smith 
&amp; 
Wesson copies, coming from Brazil and Germany. 
<H5>  No Point Engaging In Black Market </H5>
  Weapon dealers in Tallinn admit that there is no point 
engaging in illegal weapons sales, because weapons shipments 
crossing the border are checked out very carefully by customs 
and the police. Weapons shops are also checked frequently and 
without warning, according to inspector Sofia Trishkin of the 
Tallinn Field Police. "Both weapons and ammunition must be 
entered in the registry, where everything is kept by date, brand 
of weapon and quantity," Trishkin explained. "The book also has 
columns for sales, where the permit number of the buyer is 
entered, along with the expiration date, source document for 
identification, and address." Trishkin had not come across any 
deliberate shady dealings, all errors were made out of 
carelessness or ignorance. 
  The illegal weapons route, however, offers a number of 
options to the dealers. One of them is to bring the weapons to 
Estonia as goods in transit, and leave them here. The other 
option is to pay off customs. Customs in Latvia, for one, have 
supposedly shown signs of their willingness to accept bribes. 
  It has also been suggested that weapons are being brought in 
by police and defense forces, as they are checked less 
thoroughly in the customs than others. One version has it that 
Estonia's illegal weapons trade is emanates from the Russian 
army staying here. 
<H5>  Protection Police Is Aware </H5>
  Juri Pihl, director of Protection Police, thinks 
that the 
illegal trade in weapons is clearly traceable to the Russian 
army peronnel, trying to sell off weapons from the stockpile. 
"This year, we have recovered more than 50 pistols from them, 30 
to 40 kilograms of explosives, and 20 cases of cartridges," Pihl 
said. He said it is quite realistic for the weapons trade to 
also muscle its way in across the border. Theoretically, it 
would also be possible for the weapons to be smuggled in by 
police and the defense forces. 
  Even though searching for illegal weapons is not among the 
duties of Protection Police, they have confiscated weapons worth 
11 million kroons this year. The biggest cach&eacute; of secret 
weapons consisted of 2,500 TT's. Out of a total of 3,000, 500 
had already been sold. "I think we are dealing with several 
groupings here, but since Estonia's own weapons market is not 
that big, the weapons are routed either to the East or to the 
South, where local fighting continues," Pihl speculated. 
  The Protection Police has information on Russians buying 
weapons in Estonia, no violators have been caught. "There are 
also weapons shops in Russia that serve as a front, the whole 
weapons trade is quite well masked there," Pihl volunteered. 
"Besides, with the exception of Nagants [revolvers] and 
Makarovs, there is not much to be had. A high class criminal, 
however, prefers a better kind of a weapon, and these are the 
ones brought in from the Estonian side." 
<H5>  Customs Not Bothered By Weapons </H5>
  The State Customs Office could not name a single shipment of 
secret weapons discovered this year. "I don't think that 
smuggling weapons is a serious problem for Estonia, certainly 
not judging by the information available to the Customs Office," 
said Vello Valm, head of the Customs Office monitoring section. 
Over the last six months, Valm has become suspicious, and turned 
to the police twice, but since the subsequent steps are outside 
of the jurisdiction of Customs, he has no feedback on whether or 
not a complaint was filed. 
  Most misunderstandings have been on the level of 
insufficiently or improperly filled customs documents, which are 
usually resolved in favor of those bringing in the weapons. 
"When a shipment comes in, where all the documents are not in 
order, we naturally keep a close watch on it," said Valm and 
emphasized that weapons, including weapons in transit, are 
checked out with special thoroughness. 
  "It is possible, of course, that weapons in transit are not 
shipped out, documents forged, or weapons hidden behind other 
merchandise," he admitted, but added that Customs cannot, and is 
not supposed to search every corner and every piece of 
merchandise, customs relies on the random checking method. Also, 
he does not know of any case of a customs official having been 
caught for taking bribes for weapons. 
  Contemporary detection equipment makes it difficult to hide 
weapons when coming through custom checks at seaports and 
airports, it is much easier done for passengers traveling by 
train or car. Roughly a hundred illegal firearms, cold and 
chemical weapons have been confiscated this year, mostly from 
private individuals crossing the land border. 
  Hence, it would also take a private individual who, as a 
buyer of weapons, could scuttle a well-planned transaction for 
weapons. But, so far, nothing of the kind has happened. The 
buyers prefer to keep quiet and get armed. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61170 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94075" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> BALTIC STATES </F>
<F P=101> ESTONIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   One Hundred Companies To Be Privatized Through Public Sale 
of Shares </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0516B Tallinn aRIPaEV in Estonian No 141, 13 
Dec </F>



<TEXT>
93 p 5 
<F P=103> 944K0516B </F>
<F P=104>  Tallinn aRIPaEV </F>
 Language: <F P=105>Estonian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Tomi Saluveer: "Privatizers To Sell Shares Of </F>
Companies"] 
  [Text] 
  The Privatization Agency, in cooperation with different 
ministries, will start compiling a list of companies to be 
privatized through public sale of shares, said Vaino 
Sarnet, 
executive director of the Privatization Agency. 
  The listing is being compiled now, and a preliminary copy of 
it should be ready before the end of the year. "The list is made 
up of roughly 100 companies, spanning a wide range of economic 
sectors," Sarnet added. 
  The number of companies in the first listing depends on the 
preparation rate of privatization securities or shares of 
national capital, according to Riho Rasmann, a counsel at the 
Economic Ministry. 
  "Once the legislative basis reaches an adequate level next 
year, 100 to 150 companies could be listed," Rasmann said. 
<H5>  Advantages of Keeping the Company Intact </H5>
  Whenever a company is sold by means of shares, it is usually 
sold in its entirety, and structuring of the company as a whole 
will be up to the new owners, Rasmann said. The sale of 
companies in their divided form has caused a lot of confusion 
that has played havoc with planning the operations of the 
company. 
  "The selection should not include companies with known 
social 
or political problems," Rasmann said. Also excluded should be 
companies that are the sole employers in their particular 
regions." He added that companies on the verge of bankruptcy 
should also be left out. 
  Rasmann said that the list could also be compiled by making 
random choices. "According to the probability theory, the 
resulting listing would be made up of poor, good as well as 
average companies," he said. "People, however, will have more of 
a choice for making an investment." 
  Still unsettled, according to Sarnet, is the 'degree of 
freedom' applying to the sale of shares, which will determine if 
individuals can sell their national capital shares among their 
relatives only, or will they be given more leeway when it comes 
to selling. 
<H5>  Keeping Ordinary Citizens Informed </H5>
  Rasmann also suggested that more information should be made 
available to ordinary citizens, explaining how the national 
capital shares can be used, and letting them know that shares in 
privatized companies can be bought directly or through 
investment funds. 
  In principle, the public sale of shares will proceed 
according to the Privatization Law. For the time being, Sarnet 
said, the role of possible investment funds has not been spelled 
out yet. 
  According to Rasmann, the banking system, consulting firms 
and investment funds are all ready to participate in launching 
the system of securities. 
  "I know companies where people are trained specifically to 
do 
that, and will be ready to start, once the process is 
activated," Rasmann added. 
  He also said that in the Czech Republic, for example, 
investment funds are by now doing a brisk business buying and 
trading shares of different companies. The structure of owners 
changes constantly, as everyone tries to buy shares in companies 
they trust most. 
<H5>  State Will Not Make a Good Seller </H5>
  "Generally speaking, selling company shares is profitable to 
both the state and the company, but it also plays a very 
important role in speeding up the prizatization process, and 
making it more efficient," Rasmann said. "The state, by itself, 
however, will not make the best of sellers." 
  Sarnet said that although several issues about the public 
sale of shares are still being debated, all participants agree 
that the sale of shares should be launched without delay. 
"Disclosing the listing is an important element in triggering 
the process," he said. 
  In accordance with the privatization program, the 
Privatization Agency must complete the listing of companies to 
be sold through public sale of shares by January of next year. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61171 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94076" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> BALTIC STATES </F>
<F P=101> ESTONIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Swedish Companies Leaving Because of Crime Wave </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0424A Stockholm SVENSKA DAGBLADET in Swedish 29 Dec 93 p 
6 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0424A </F>
<F P=104>  Stockholm SVENSKA DAGBLADET </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Swedish </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Bjorn Hygstedt: "Threatened Businessman Flees </F>
Estonia"] 
  [Text] It took four years to get the boat factory outside 
Tallinn, Estonia, going. But it took a Swedish businessman only 
20 minutes to pack his bags and leave the country after threats 
from one of the city's Mafia-like organizations drove him to 
flight. 
  Molds and other equipment, computers, fax machines, and 
telephones worth 3 million kronor in all were left behind in the 
industrial plant. 
  "Four years of hard work and then everything has to end like 
this just because we happened to get in the way of extraneous 
interests," said a spokesman for the D-boats company in Taby. 
<H5>  Six Hundred Plastic Boats </H5>
  In 1990 D-boats formed the Fibertec joint venture company 
with the Majak fishery kolkhoz in Tallinn. Last year Fibertec 
produced around 600 plastic boats of various sizes, primarily 
for the Swedish market. 
  At first all went well. There was a good atmosphere at the 
factory--in spite of some language confusion and an unsettled 
political situation with increasingly vociferous Estonian 
demands for independence and liberation from the Soviet Union. 
  But after Estonia became a sovereign state, law and order 
was 
seriously undermined. Various crimes can be committed almost 
unchecked because of widespread corruption among customs agents 
and policemen. A fact that the highest police leadership now 
openly acknowledges. 
<H5>  Infiltration </H5>
  Swedish authorities and ministries have tried through many 
different channels to speed up and support the construction of a 
functioning society based on law with aid for institutional 
sovereignty. But neither white gloves, deterrents, nor the 
transfer of advanced information has helped; corruption has 
spread, and organized crime is infiltrating farther and farther 
into spheres of power. 
  According to Fibertec's former administrative chief, an 
Estonian, it began when one of Tallinn's metal gangs, which earn 
incredible sums from the export of primarily stolen scrap metal, 
wanted to acquire the Majak partner's attractive deep-water port 
in the Kopli district south of the center of the city. 
  One of the gang's members, a karate instructor, had a 
lifetime membership in the Majak kolkhoz. Using big bribes and 
explicit threats, the gang succeeded in getting the kolkhoz 
members to not only approve incorporating the kolkhoz but also 
elect the karate instructor as its managing director. 
  After that things moved quickly. All the chiefs of the 
former 
kolkhoz's satellite companies were kicked out, and soon it was 
the turn of Fibertec and D-boats. 
  "One day a tough gang came and said they were going to sell 
the industrial buildings and that we had to get out. Our 
production chief, Lars-Olof Berntsson, protested and said Majak 
could sell only its own share," someone in the D-boats 
management told SVENSKA DAGBLADET. 
<H5>  Warning From Enforcers </H5>
  A few weeks later the production chief was warned about the 
gang's enforcers and their methods by his own personnel. 
  "Berntsson was advised to return home immediately. He fled 
to 
the Swedish Embassy before leaving Estonia head over heels." 
  No one in the company dared get in touch with the Tallinn 
police, but a report was filed with the Swedish police. Several 
people have also been questioned closely about what happened. 
  "Here we sit and we were not able to take a single ore with 
us. We think it is irresponsible of the government and the 
Export Council not to warn Swedish businessmen who are 
considering investing in Estonia about the increasingly powerful 
crime gangs," said a company spokesman. 
  Staffan Sodersten, the Export Council's marketing chief, is 
well aware of the development not only in Estonia but also in 
Latvia, Lithuania, and Russia. 
  "It has clearly worsened just in the past year and it is 
shocking how fast it has happened. But we cannot very well 
advise people against doing business in Estonia, although we 
urge them to be extremely vigilant," Sodersten said. 
<H5>  Case Not Unique </H5>
  Threatened Swedish businessmen who are forced to flee from 
Russia and the Baltic states have become a dismal reality in the 
wake of poverty. 
  "Unfortunately the case in Tallinn is not unique. We have 
also acted via the Swedish Embassy in Moscow," said Christine 
von Sydow of the Foreign Ministry's trade section, who is 
responsible for the mixed commissions that administer the free 
trade agreements with Estonia, Latvia, and Lithuania. 
<H5>  Aid To Be Maintained </H5>
  Von Sydow said she would not advise Swedish businessmen 
against making investments in Estonia and the Baltic region 
either. 
  "But we communicate the anxiety we feel about the grave 
situation via many different channels. I do not believe in 
withholding aid as a `punishment,' but rather in intensifying 
support in order to hasten an improvement in the legal system." 
  Alar Streimann, trade counsellor at the Estonian Embassy in 
Stockholm, insists that there is no threat to Swedish firms in 
Estonia. 
  "If someone has problems they should report the matter to 
the 
police so it can be investigated. A corrupt police system? There 
is no proof of that, but the police are poorly equipped." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61172 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94077" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> BALTIC STATES </F>
<F P=101> ESTONIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Closure of Textile Plant Threatens Town's Survival </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0424B Stockholm DAGENS NYHETER in Swedish 30 Nov 93 p 12 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0424B </F>
<F P=104>  Stockholm DAGENS NYHETER </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Swedish </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Mert Kubu: "Can't Make It Through the Winter"] </F>
  [Text] Sindi, Estonia--Sindi in southern Estonia faces the 
threat of famine this winter. Therefore the town must be 
declared a disaster area. That demand comes from Liina Maaste, 
mayor of Sindi, the smallest municipality in Estonia. 
  The old textile factory, where all work has stopped, has 
been 
declared bankrupt. The people have no jobs, no money, no aid. 
  Families in Sindi have only meager children's benefits to 
live on. Even retirees, with their miserably small pensions, are 
better off. So far people are getting by. They have gathered 
mushrooms in the woods and tried to raise a few potatoes and 
other vegetables in small garden patches outside their houses. 
  "But without outside aid we will be unable to manage in the 
winter," Maaste told DAGENS NYHETER. 
  Thanks to a little aid from Sweden last winter they can 
still 
provide soup for retirees in Sindi's municipal soup kitchen. 
Here for one Estonian kroon (worth about 60 Swedish ore) old 
people get a bowl of soup, a little bread, and, on the day of 
our visit, two small pancakes. 
<H5>  One Employer </H5>
  The tragedy in Sindi is that the town of just 4,200 
inhabitants had only one employer, Kalevs textile factory with 
approximately 1,000 employees. The factory is 150 years old and 
has survived many difficult periods. But when the Soviet empire 
collapsed it was definitely all over for the Sindi factory too. 
  Before, during the wild days of planned economy, textiles 
from Sindi were sent to other Soviet republics. But now Russia 
is no longer paying for goods and no one in the West wants the 
inferior textiles from Sindi. 
  Of course company fatalities have also hit the Swedish mill 
community. But in Sweden there is a social safety net. That is 
not the case in the poor Baltic states. To get a monthly 
unemployment benefit of 180 Estonian kroon (a little over 100 
Swedish kronor), strict requirements must be met. In addition 
companies avoid paying this by sending employees home on 
"indefinite leaves" that can last several years. 
<H5>  Six Children </H5>
  Liina Maaste accompanied us on a visit to one of the typical 
unemployed families in Sindi. 
  The Peas, Arvo, 40, and Eve, 38, both worked at Sindi's 
textile plant. They have six children. A seventh is on the way. 
Four of the children live at home. The oldest son, 21 years old, 
is married and lives with his own family in his mother-in-law's 
house. An 18-year-old son lives in the country. The couple's 
only income is the children's benefit for four minor children, a 
total of 600 Estonian kroon a month. This corresponds to around 
375 Swedish kronor. The money has to cover food, rent, 
electricity, fuel, clothes for the children. It doesn't. 
Therefore most people do not bother to pay the rent, mayor Liina 
explained. 
  "If we hadn't got secondhand clothes, the children would 
have 
had to go naked," said Eve. 
  Eve and Arvo have helped farmers in the neighborhood harvest 
their potatoes. They were paid in the form of several sacks of 
potatoes. 
  "All our cupboards are full of pickled and dried mushrooms 
that we gathered," Eve told us. 
  "We will probably have a seventh son," said Arvo, but added: 
  "But now we must have no more children, we can't afford it." 
  What was the best time for the Pea family of Sindi 
financially? 
  "It was probably the last year of the Russian ruble when we 
both still had our jobs at the textile plant," Arvo said. 
  What will happen to Sindi? 
  "The Estonian Government in Tallinn must first declare us a 
disaster area and also provide financial assistance. We also 
need international aid," Maaste said. 
  She is worried that "the wolves will plunder" what is left 
of 
the old textile plant in Sindi, that the machinery will simply 
be sold and some of the old bosses will stuff the money into 
their own pockets. That is the way things often go in connection 
with "privatization" in postsocialist Estonia. 
  The old red directors of the state companies and kolkhoz and 
sovkhoz chairmen often finagle the biggest share into their own 
pockets. 
  There are many scandals. Rumors circulate, newspapers write 
about them without properly investigating what really happens 
later. The authorities intervene far too seldom or far too late. 
Just now, for example, a big furniture factory in Tallinn is in 
trouble. 
<H5>  Person With the Most Power </H5>
  Maaste herself is a child of the communist party apparatus. 
She does not deny it. Liina was the person with the most power 
in Sindi before, but then her title, translated into English, 
was chairman of the executive committee. 
  She worked for some years at the communist party 
headquarters 
in the neighboring town of Parnu and after independence she was 
appointed mayor of Sindi. 
  In order to get anybody to run for office in Sindi in the 
local elections that were recently held in Estonia Liina had to 
persuade the chief doctor, some self-employed businessmen, an 
electrician, and some business people to run with her on a 
15-person ticket. Just enough for a new assembly of delegates. 
They were elected, there was no alternative, and Liina kept her 
job as mayor. 
  She does not exactly get a fat paycheck as mayor: 1,340 
Estonian kroon or 837 Swedish kronor, only slightly more than 
the statistical average wage in Estonia. 
  What does she want? She wants the municipality to be able to 
take over part of the bankrupt factory so it can make its own 
effort to find someone who will lease the premises. Then money 
will be needed to repair and enlarge the sewage system. 
Otherwise everything will end up in Parnu Bay and further out in 
the Baltic Sea. The heating systems in houses with central 
heating have also broken down. The main street is in very poor 
shape and the children need money for school. 
  We inspected the small clinic, Sindi's few private 
businesses, and the town's pride, the old station building that 
has been converted into a library. The only relatively new 
building in all of Sindi. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61173 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94078" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> BALTIC STATES </F>
<F P=101> LATVIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   LDLP Chairman Analyzes Citizenship Drafts Proposed By 
Various Factions </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0408A Riga LATVIJAS JAUNATNE in Latvian 13, 24 Nov 93 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0408A </F>
<F P=104>  Riga LATVIJAS JAUNATNE </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Latvian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article in two installments by LDLP Chairman Juris Bojars: </F>
"Quality of Proposed Citizenship Laws"] 
<H5>  [13 Nov 93 p 11] </H5>
  [Text]Bad laws weaken good laws.(Montesquieu: "On the 
length of laws".) 
  In discussing the drafts of the citizenship law of the 
Republic of Latvia and other related documents in the Supreme 
Council, as a draft author and referee, I had to answer a 
variety of questions and proposals -- both sensible, and 
ridiculous. 
  This is how annexionist and racist citizenship acts were 
adopted during the fascist "Third Reich". According to these, 
non-Aryans could not obtain citizenship in the empire, and Jews 
and Gypsies were later annihilated. After the fall of this 
empire, the allies declared these fascist laws to be invalid, 
and in the American and Russian occupied zones, they were 
invalidated retrospectively -- up until the very point of 
enactment [.sup]1[/]. Thus, it is possible to adopt very 
strict citizenship laws, but only within defined, 
internationally accepted boundaries, which should be know. 
  At least those deputies in Latvia who have been elected for 
a 
second term will have learned as much as to know that Western 
governments and experts evaluate the level of democracy of a 
post-communist country, including Latvia, according to four or 
five major, i.e. constitutional, laws: the constitution, which 
must include a section on human rights, the election law, the 
citizenship law, and the law on the legal system. 
  The Satversme (constitution) is finally in effect. However, 
without the incorporation of the December 19, 1991 
constitutional law "The rights and obligations of humans and 
citizens", it remains on the same level as the pre-war "Weimar" 
type of constitution, without any regulation of human rights. 
Regarding the proposals by the "radicals" to revoke all laws 
passed by the Supreme Council or to immediately renew all 
pre-war laws, I can only respond that carrying out such 
proposals would create total legal chaos and anarchy in an 
already poor situation with respect to rights protection, when 
neither citizens nor the rights protecting institutions will 
know what the laws in effect are, and will be unable to function. 
  Furthermore, in such a case, all of the pre-war property 
denationalization and land reform laws that were passed by the 
Supreme Council will also be revoked. The pre-war owners just 
might start looking around the Saeima building for resolution 
proponents with pitchforks. It seems that the recently elected 
representatives to the Saeima from "Fatherland and Freedom" do 
not know that scores of new laws passed by the Supreme Council, 
such as the laws of "accounting procedures", "the return of 
property to religious organizations", our current law package on 
business activities, banks, author's rights, and others, were 
adopted and are in conformity with a whole string of 
international laws following strict recommendations by Western 
governments and experts. Included among such conventions, for 
instance, are the International Labor Organization Conventions, 
the Hague Convention on the Matter of Civil Process, as well as 
the 1949 Geneva Convention, which the self-same "Fatherland 
representatives" refer to so often. I would also recommend 
taking extreme caution when correcting the constitutional law 
"Rights and obligations of humans and citizens", because it has 
received high grades by the United Nations and the European 
Council. 
  According to the expertise of European Human Rights Court 
Judge J. de Meyer and European Human Rights Commission member, 
C. Rozakis, the December 10, 1991 constitutional law, "with 
respect to the determination and protection of rights and 
freedom, as provided by this document, is comparable in rights 
and freedom as guaranteed by constitutional documents of the 
majority of member nations in the European Parliament, and what 
is collectively guaranteed within the bounds of the European 
Council, as well as the European Human Rights Convention" [.sup]2[/] 
. 
  The repeal or correction, without careful consideration, of 
this law, which has received the highest evaluation by high 
ranking experts of European human rights institutions, could 
give the wrong impression in the United Nations and European 
Council of instability in the main political laws, especially at 
a time when we must become accepted into the European Council, 
and cause a new and unnecessary influx of international experts 
into Latvia. Naturally, the human rights law can and should be 
corrected, but only with very careful consideration, so that 
some of the norms would be more in line with the 1950 Rome Human 
Rights Convention and its appendices on the question of specific 
rights restrictions, as well as to determine the minimal rights 
standard, which can never be overstepped, not even under 
emergency or war conditions. It is also necessary to refine this 
law to totally eliminate the removal or restriction of a 
person's main constitutional rights, specifically political and 
due process, without a court decision, as occurs at present. In 
such a case, this law will be even more democratic than the 1950 
Rome Convention with all of its appendices. 
  In addition, there is no system to insure overall human 
rights, and political rights, in particular, in Latvia through 
the help of a state administrative institution, and especially 
the courts. Likewise, there is also no system to fight against 
organized crime and to provide people with personal safety. This 
is also a further verification of the words of Thomas Jefferson [.sup]3[/] 

, i.e. that "the longevity of a law is more 
important that its creation" [.sup]4[/]. 
  But these initiatives must be focused first on the reform of 
the legal system, the institution of which in Latvia, the same 
as with the 1950 Rome Convention in the participating nations, 
must give every person the possibility to address the courts 
with complaints about the violation of their human rights. In 
this respect, it is also necessary to create a special 
punishment system. The Satversme courts must be created and it 
must be determined what type of court would handle human rights 
matters. As per the Scandinavian model, so-called 
ombudsmen must also be provided [.sup]5[/], or a 
state-empowered human rights institution, which would 
investigate all complaints regarding human rights violations on 
the part of state employees or institutions and would be 
involved with the reinstatement of these rights within the 
context of the administrative process, or if the case should 
require, to introduce the matter to the courts. 
  Therefore, the human rights law must be incorporated as a 
permanent part of the Satversme, since the present-day 
constitutions of all European countries include a section on 
human rights, which is formulated on an overall principle level, 
so that it does not have to be constantly changed, and thus 
guarantees the stability of the constitution. The regulation of 
each specific right is being detailed in non-constitutional 
laws, such as for the freedom of the press, speech, 
demonstrations, awareness, etc. The constitutions of developed 
nations usually also include various basic principles of 
citizenship. We should do likewise. 
  If the Saeima deputies do not declare all Supreme Council 
laws to be ineffective, then we also cannot ignore the fact that 
the Republic of Latvia Citizenship Law was adopted at the first 
reading. The second reading was overturned at that time by the 
combined votes of the Latvian National Independence Movement 
(LNIM) and the Interfront deputies. The former felt 
that the law was overly liberal towards immigrants, the latter 
felt it was too restrictive. This law draft cannot be ignored 
also because, at that time, a great deal of attention was paid 
to its analysis by United Nations and well as European Council 
human rights experts, evaluating it to be more favorable than 
the October 15, 1991 Supreme Council resolution "On the renewal 
of Republic of Latvia citizenship rights and naturalization 
basic principles". 
  The United Nations Center for Human Rights Group Director I. 
Fall, in the report by experts, directed attention, not to the 
resolution, but to a detailed analysis of the citizenship law 
draft, finding that "after examining the Latvian citizenship law 
draft, the mission finds it to be suitable, recalling the 
overall recognized international rights principles on the 
question of granting citizenship, as reflected by the 
International Court decision in the Noteboma case. In accordance 
with the court decision, "each sovereign nation has the right 
through its legislative process to define laws on granting its 
citizenship, and on the naturalization process by which 
citizenship is conferred, as performed by the state institution, 
in according with legislation..."[.sup]6[/]. 
  Further, the report by experts finds: "Therefore, it cannot 
be stated that Latvia is violating international rights through 
the fact that it is defining how it grants 
citizenship"[.sup]7[/]. That is also the final evaluation of 
the citizenship law draft adopted at the first reading. At the 
same time, the report also criticizes various norms in the 
October 15, 1991 Supreme Council resolution. 
  And thus, the Saeima deputies would be acting intelligently 
if they would recognize the texts of the reports by experts of 
the United Nations Human Rights Center Director Ibrahim 
Fall[.sup]8[/], as well as of the European Human Rights Judge 
J. de Meyer and European Human Rights Commission member C. 
Rozakis[.sup]9[/]. 
  Every citizenship law, provided that it is prepared by 
qualified specialists, is technically similar, with the 
exception of various norms, whose goal is to accommodate it to 
the political and demographic situation of each specific nation. 
  The so-called immigrant nations of the new world, in their 
initial attempts to colonize "native" territories, created 
citizenship laws that would promote immigration and form 
"national melting pots". On the other hand, the nations of 
Europe, through their citizenship laws, attempted to maintain 
their national identities (homogeneousness). For instance, the 
Ministry of Internal Affairs of the Federal Republic of Germany, 
in its December 15, 1977 statute on naturalization guidelines, 
clearly and plainly stated that "the Federal Republic of Germany 
is in no manner a country of immigrants"[.sup]10[/]. 
  The entire discussion could be covered by these few 
paragraphs. But since the Saeima factions have decided to waste 
time and present five law drafts, then we may as well compare 
their good and bad points. Naturally, this complicate task 
should be started with the law draft submitted by the ruling 
coalition with "Latvian Way" as the flagman. And especially 
because the wayfarers party leader, Prime Minister 
Valdis Birkavs, in the October 27 interview, officially reminded 
everyone that this coalition's pre-election slogan was "the 
Latvian Way is the law and order way!" 
  We have all already started to notice what and who this 
order 
applies to. Naturally, political "chickens" are counted around 
election time. However, from the law drafts already 
published[.sup]12[/], we can already see that even though 
this ministry faction has the greatest number of lawyers, even 
some who have received their legal training abroad, the Latvian 
Way law draft is the weakest in terms of an abundance of ideas 
and norms. The wayfarers have not realized that it 
would be desirable to define in the law (as was done in the law 
draft adopted at the first reading) what Latvian citizenship is, 
since the qualified lawyers are unable to explain this in an 
understandable manner. 
  I do not know why the law draft developed by the working 
groups of wayfarers (who were the members?) did not 
contain any sections referring to the citizenship of children 
from mixed marriages, which are the most complicated and 
essential sections of any national citizenship law. It is not 
clear whether the Latvian Way believes that Latvians will not 
have any children in the future, or are attempting to prevent 
mixed marriages with foreigners. That could be done, because 
during the time of Stalin's rule, there was a period during 
which marriages between soviet citizens and foreigners were 
completely outlawed. And, in the USSR, up until the middle of 
1990, there was an unlawful practice by which marriages with 
foreigners were only possible by consent of the central 
committee. At one time, this author prepared the legal 
foundation on which such an idiotic practice at the end of the 
soviet era was repealed. The Latvian Way does not realize that 
adoption, whether a citizen adopts a foreigner, or a foreigner 
adopts a Latvian citizen, also has an effect on citizenship, 
which is why this matter should be regulated by the citizenship 
law. 
  In comparison with United States legislation, the Latvian 
Way 
lawmakers have defined the group of people who are denied 
naturalization very liberally. They have practically erased 
these same very few norms for possible denial by the condition: 
"if determined by a court ruling". This is not how it is done in 
the world. Citizenship by court proceedings (actually official 
ceremonies) is only obtained in the United States. Elsewhere, 
the immigration institutions, which do not even have documents 
available to them, but only compromising police investigative 
materials, can irrevocably deny naturalization, because it is 
almost impossible to demonstrate in court that, for example, "N" 
is an Italian maffia "godfather" or a member of the terrorist 
"red brigade". 
  The United States immigration and naturalization law section 
313 defining the group of persons for whom citizenship is denied 
is three pages long[.sup]13[/]. Germany considers as 
non-intragratable and therefore non-naturalizable, those persons 
who maintain contact with their emigrant 
organization[.sup]14[/]. The majority of nations will not 
naturalize persons who have no legal means of support. 
  I have always had an objection against the fact that ever 
since the republic of May 4 Supreme Council came to 
power, official state acts are no longer published, specifically 
--international treaties, which, following their ratification, 
become a component part of every state rights norm. During the 
soviet era, all USSR international treaties were properly 
published in Latvian. At present, almost no Latvian 
international treaty, despite my repeated protests to the 
Supreme Council, are not only not published, but are very often 
not even submitted to the deputies before the vote for 
ratification. Thus, for instance, prior to the vote for joining 
the International Monetary Fund, the text of the treaty was not 
presented, and the deputies were voting as if they were bidding 
in a poker game. Could the wayfarers explain how the 
Latvian state administrative and rights protection institutions 
will insure that our international treaties are fulfilled when 
they have no access to the texts of the treaties? In pre-war 
Latvia, the texts of our international treaties were published 
not only in Latvian and, for instance, Russian, if the treaty 
was with Russia, but also in English and French, because the 
texts in these languages were submitted for filing in the League 
of Nations. Now, the texts of our treaties -- according to the 
existing procedure --must be translated into English and sent to 
the United Nations for publication in the "United Nations Treaty 
Series". Is anyone doing this? 
  Regardless of all of the wayfarers promises about 
organizing the laws and legal system, there is no order in 
the publication of law and law drafts. Thus, for example, the 
publication of the Latvian Way citizenship law draft in the 
Diena supplement, without any sort of warning or 
explanation, gets carried away with paragraph 14, section 2. 
Along with this, according to the published text, everyone has 
the right to believe that the Latvian Way bill allows Russian 
Army Colonel Victors Alksnis to claim Latvian citizenship, but 
that thw renouncing of citizenship or its revocation is not 
possible -- as in czarist times. There is more in addition to 
the Latvian Way law draft circulated in the Saeima. And that is 
the mess in which we find the publication of the 
state acts and their bills! If the Latvian Way "while in power" 
cannot even bring about any order in the publication of its law 
drafts, then how will they be able to do it with more difficult 
matters? 
  The Latvian Way bill also contains some very strange 
phrases, 
as, for instance, in paragraph 12: "In granting citizenship 
under naturalization procedures, the number of years of 
residence in Latvia should be taken into consideration". How 
should it be taken into consideration, and what number of years, 
if in paragraph 10, a ten year criterion is already defined? 
Just as strange is the condition described in paragraph 14, 
section 2, that naturalization can be restricted in the case of 
a person who, "due to the committing of a serious crime, has 
been sentenced to removal of freedom for a period of not less 
than one year"... If this refers to a heavy crime, then a one 
year sentence is not typical. Only racketeers, when caught 
red-handed, sometimes receive a "suspended" sentence. 
  Also ridiculous is Latvian Way bill paragraph 23, which 
states that the only documents which can confirm citizenship are 
the Republic of Latvia citizen's passport and a "notification" 
issued by the Republic of Latvia diplomatic and consulate 
representatives. First of all -- why a "notification" instead of 
a citizenship certificate, as issued by other countries? Second, 
what confirms the citizenship of a child born in Latvia, 
especially one who has no parents in whose passports such 
information could be confirmed? Obviously, a child's citizenship 
must be confirmed either through a birth certificate, which 
would not be desirable, or a certificate of citizenship, which 
could be issued to the child as soon as his citizenship is 
determined. 
  In other words, the Latvian Way law draft leaves a poor and 
superficial impression as far as norms and concepts are 
concerned. It is also no surprise that each leading 
wayfarer is at least a minister at the same time as a 
deputy. Serving in two parliaments in three years, I am 
convinced that, in order to properly perform the duties of a 
deputy, it is necessary to work from early morning until far 
into the night, and then it is not possible to accomplish 
everything to personal satisfaction. If we want to establish a 
true democracy in Latvia, a seat as a deputy in the next Saeima 
must be maintained strictly apart from other state official 
positions, and according to the Swedish model, a replacement 
deputy must be instituted, while the deputy holds a ministry 
position. 
  The "Fatherland and Freedom" faction (henceforth, referred 
to 
as FF) has been more serious in developing its 
bill[.sup]15[/], although, and I hope they forgive me, 
because of the modest volume of the law draft submitted -- two 
pages-- I am unable to confirm an abundance of ideas or 
knowledge of the subject. Apparently, FF still maintains the 
dogma that whatever is inherited from pre-war Latvia is a 
priori good on its own. Wake up! Latvia is not Sleeping 
Beauty's fairytale castle. Seventy-four years have passed since 
the citizenship law was adopted. Such primitive citizenship laws 
are no longer used nor revised anywhere in the world. In England 
during this period of time, eight such laws have already been 
adopted. Don't pace around in place. 
  I cannot deny that FF, in its opinions, is attempting to act 
for the good of the Latvian people. Probably, some of their 
norms should not be spurned, and could be utilized in the final 
variation among the norms of a consolidated, detailed law. 
However, Latvian lawmakers should realize that the European 
Council is expecting as an entrance fee a legally qualitative, 
new, modern citizenship law. If FF is determined that, in this 
millennium, it will not allow the naturalization of any 
immigrant, this is not wise, neither in the eyes of the world, 
nor for practical reasons. 
  Don't think that I am for the indulgence of foreign (even 
Western) people. Quite the opposite. My motto is: "Whatever the 
foreign folks are saying, don't talk along with them!" We will 
be able to survive as a people, if we are smarter, more cleaver, 
or at least not as dumb as the surrounding major groups of 
people. Take an example from the Jews! A small group of people 
cannot punch a hole through the wall of a large group of people 
by using its forehead. It can get ahead through wisdom or 
wealth. And that is also all that has to be said about the FF 
bill. 
Footnotes 
  1. Mann F.A. The Present Validity of Nazi Nationality Laws. 
--The Law Quarterly Review, Vol. 89, 1973. Apr. P. 199. 
  2. J. de Meyer, C. Rozakis. Report on Human Rights in the 
Republic of Latvia. Strasbourg 20 January 1992. AANMEE. 43. 1406 
-- 20/1/92-1-E, p. 15. 
  3. Thomas Jefferson (1743-1826). One of the "Founding 
Fathers" of the United States of America, Author of the 
Declaration of Independence of the United States of America, 
1801-1809 President of the United States of America. 
  4. See Letter to the Abbe Arnod, 1789. 
  5. In Swedish -- empowered representative. This term, 
untranslated, as well as the institution itself, has been 
adopted by the United Nations and many other countries from the 
Scandinavians. 
  6. The deputies could familiarize themselves with the 
Noteboma matter, as well as with many other famous international 
precedents, through the United Nations monograph by this author 
in one of the working languages : "World State Citizenship", 
Riga, 1993. 
  7. Ibrahim Fall. Center for Human Rights. Allegations of 
Discriminatory Practices against Minorities in Latvia. Report on 
Fact-Finding Mission to Riga, Latvia, 27 to 30 October 1992, p. 
9. 
  8. Abbreviated experts opinion see -- Republic of Latvia 
Supreme Council and Council of Ministers publication. -- Diena 
1992. 18.12. pp 1-2. Full text of experts see: Ibrahim Fall. 
Center for Human Rights. Allegations of Discriminatory Practices 
against Minorities in Latvia. Report on a Fact-Finding Mission 
to Riga, Latvia, 27 to 30 October, 1992. 
  9. J. de Meyer, C. Rozakis. Report on Human Rights in the 
Republic of Latvia. Strasbourg 20 January 1992. AANMEE. 43. 1406 
-- 20/1/92-1-E. 
  10. Deutsche Auslanderrecht. Munchen, 1991, S. 157. 
  11. For more detail, see my monograph, chapter 3, sections 3 
and 4. 
  12. Here and further on, the law drafts submitted by the 
Latvian Way, Latvian National Independence Movement and "Equal 
Rights" are cited according to the "Diena" supplement 
publication -- "In the Saeima and Cabinet of Ministers", 1993, 
20.10.2, p.3. 
  13. Immigration and Nationality Act. House of 
Representatives, Washington, 1980, p. 14-17. 
  14. Committee of Experts on Multiple Nationality. European 
Committee on Legal Cooperation, Council of Europe. Strasbourg, 
1992. No. 6, p. 38. 
  15. Document submitted by "Fatherland and Freedom" with 
Saeima registration No. 420 was used. 
  (To be continued) 
  Juris Bojars Republic of Latvia Academy of Sciences Member, 
LDLP Chairman. 
<H5>  [24 Nov 93 p 10] </H5>
  [Text] (Continuation of article appearing on November 
13.) 
  Bad laws weaken good laws.(Montesquieu: "On the length 
of laws".) 
  The Democratic (Center) Party (D(C)P), with its name, the 
loudness of its propaganda, and large monetary resources from 
undeclared sources, attracts genuine interest. According to the 
party's last congress and new name, it turns out that it alone 
is standing up for democracy, and no one else. In addition, the 
punctuation of its name, with the parenthesis, is a warm 
reminder of the AC(b)P (All Union Communist (bolshevik) Party)... 
  Of course, according to the September 15 statement on 
citizenship by the party, renewal of the 1919 law is not 
acceptable, due to the above-mentioned reasons. I also cannot 
agree with the DP proposal that only Latvians and Livs be given 
"preference" in receiving citizenship. They should not only be 
given "preference", but an absolute right to automatically 
receive citizenship upon their return to the fatherland (if the 
specific repatriate is not affected by the regulations 
restricting these rights, as for example, participation in mass 
repression). In the same manner, the Jews have stated in 
paragraph 1 of the Israeli Constitution: "Every Jew has the 
right to immigrate to Israel and receive Israeli 
citizenship"[.sup]16[/]. 
  I should remind you that shortly before the election, I 
submitted a law draft to the Supreme Council on the absolute 
rights of Latvians to receive unconditional citizenship upon 
their return to the fatherland. That was adopted at the first 
reading. The Satversme bill was successfully blocked, although 
there was success in obtaining the vote, unique in the Supreme 
Council's experience, to send the bill to the United Nations and 
the European Council's human rights commission for an expert 
evaluation. From the United Nations, I. Fall sent a positive 
evaluation of the law draft, indicating that, according to 
international practice, this would be the widely used and 
accepted so-called positive discrimination. The 
Europeans replied that they would discuss these questions at 
their September seminar in Riga, and sent some people to attend, 
who have not written a word about citizenship. 
  The DP bill makes provisions for language "facilitation" 
(only) for "the hearing and visually impaired". But are they 
speech impaired, respectively, born that way, are have they lost 
the ability to speak because of a trauma? Naturally, the DP 
statement also contains some rational proposals. 
  The Latvian National Independence Movement (LNIM) 
bill is incomparably more detailed and refined than the one 
"churned out" by the wayfarers. Overall, it is based 
on the structures and norms of the first reading of the 
citizenship law, which suffered a long and hot fight, and 
includes specific terms and also a proper definition of Latvian 
citizenship. 
  Debatable could be norm 2.1., which has been adopted from 
the 
1919 citizenship law. With point c) being extended to all 
descendants, it could involve an unexpectedly wide circle of 
people related to those who left Latvia prior to World War One, 
including the descendants of the Czar's governor generals, 
secret police, beat patrolmen, imperial army officers. etc. 
Thus, it will be obviously acceptable to the Russian-speakers, 
and "Equal Rights" will vote for it. 
  Controversial is the LNIM bill's paragraph 10 on dual 
citizenship of emigrants, which has already been accepted in the 
first reading by the Supreme Council. As I have already said, it 
is not true that the refugees were "forced" into naturalization 
in their host countries. If this were true, then about 20 
thousand of them would not have been able to maintain only 
Latvian citizenship. Naturalization, naturally, has widened the 
political and social scope of Western Latvians and increased the 
career opportunities in their host countries. That is also the 
major, and quite understandably human reason. However, I am 
opposed to dual citizenship, as are various Saeima factions and 
Latvian parties. By allowing dual citizenship "in the West" and 
not in the East, we are making it possible to be sued not only 
by persons of Eastern origin, but even for "discrimination" of 
Latvians in Latvia. By accepting a one-sided "Western" dual 
citizenship, we have created a category of privileged Latvians, 
who can fully enjoy the political rights of citizens, but who do 
not have to perform any of the obligations of the local Latvian 
citizens. This category also enjoys an additional unanticipated 
advantage. Any Western Latvian, as pure as a white archangel, 
free of all dirt from the soviet occupation era, flies over to 
our valley of sorrows, calmly runs as a candidate in the Saeima 
and even presidential elections, and if he doesn't like 
something, then he forgets all his patriotism and goes back 
across the ocean "to the big salary or pension". He is quite 
possibly a very pleasant person, but we don't have any prior 
evidence of this! And overall, a system in which the Latvian 
people wake up one morning and have a president about whom they 
knew nothing yesterday, is not good for anything. Any sort of 
phenomenon involving privileges and "political 
voyagers" should be rejected. The merits earned by 
exile organizations in promoting the Latvian cause in the West 
are all recognized, but it should be resolved: either here or 
there. This should be the main point in selecting a candidate 
for a higher national position. After all, the local people were 
the ones who suffered under the occupation and repressions, and 
they also managed to hold on to the Latvian land with their 
flesh and bones. And the local people will always be the first 
to clean out the "stables of Augeus". 
  By allowing dual citizenship, we are hastily creating for 
ourselves a whole group of problems, the first of which are the 
so-called migrating politicians. To be quite honest, first of 
all, this category is mainly made up of pensioners; from this, 
certain conclusions about their energy reserves can be 
automatically assumed. Second, as demonstrated by Mr. Ritenis, 
they have difficulties coping with the local situation. Third, 
there are no high level specialists among them. All emigrants of 
Latvian origin who are high level specialists are either in 
Western universities or hold responsible positions in their host 
country. If I am wrong, then show me a professor who has 
returned to live in Latvia permanently, and I will gladly invite 
him to my institute to present lectures. 
  Naturally, because of our 30 to 50 times lower salaries and 
our enormous local problems, only the fools among them of 
working age would return to Latvia. The advisors who are coming 
here are either adventurers, or those who have failed in the job 
market of their host country. In the beginning, I was also 
occasionally taken in by them, but I no longer allow them to 
present lectures in the University of Latvia International 
Affairs Institute. A few enthusiasts do come along, but there 
are very few of them. For the most part, young Latvian wanderers 
come here to work either in Western national diplomatic or 
company agencies. And I heartily thank those Latvian professors 
who come here from time to time to share their expertise. 
  But now we have a whole string of Saeima deputies, who are 
serving as ministers at the same time, and hold dual 
citizenship. From a national and international legal standpoint, 
their status is quite controversial. For example, in the United 
States Immigration and Citizenship Law, section 101 on 
"Definitions", points (21) and (22), we read that the term 
"citizen" means "a person whose obligation is to maintain a 
permanent loyalty to the nation"[.sup]17[/]. Similar 
regulations are found in the legislation of all nations. And now 
answer the question of which nation are they loyal to and whose 
-- Latvia's or that other nation's -- interests are Latvia's 
deputies and ministers working for, those who have foreign 
citizenship crossbred with Latvian citizenship? 
  Furthermore, in connection with the United States 
Immigration 
and Citizenship Law section 349, even a citizen born in the 
United States, not only naturalized, will lose citizenship if: 
1)he is willingly naturalized by another nation; 2) swears 
loyalty to another nation; 3) joins the military service of 
another nation, if prior to doing so, he has not received 
permission from the United States Secretary of State or Defense 
Minister; (Latvia's Minister of Defense is a citizen of the 
United States). Further on in the American law, in the same 
section, point 4, there is a more restrictive norm: a citizen of 
the United States will lose his citizenship if he enters into 
the service of any foreign nation, even if he is or has obtained 
citizenship of this foreign nation. 
  If such a case, the American law does not allow any 
exceptions or permission by the state. Therefore, from the 
standpoint of the state and legal order that was promised by the 
Latvian Way, anyone may express an interest in whether or not 
the United States citizenship of the honorable Mr. Pavlovskis 
has been revoked, in accordance with section 349, points 3 and 
4, and if not, then what does the United States stand to gain, 
especially since the United States law does not provide for any 
exceptions? 
  International rights, through the International Court of 
Arbitration (The Hague) 1912 decision in the Canavero matter, 
gained the so-called active or effective citizenship concept. 
The court concluded that Canavero, who, according to birth by 
the blood relation principle (jus sanguinis), had received 
Italian citizenship, but according to the place of birth 
principle (jus soli) -- Peruvian citizenship, and was factually 
a citizen of Peru, because he was in reality taking advantage of 
these citizenship rights, being elected senator in Peru, and as 
this nation's Consul General in Holland[.sup]18[/]. Taking 
the above into consideration, anyone, who is not completely 
naive to matters that influence international politics, may 
start to ponder a major theoretical problem -- whether Mr. 
Pavlovskis, against whom I have no personal complaints, is 
providing us with defense that is needed specifically by Latvia; 
or is it needed by the Americans, or by the Americans when they 
join with the Russians, when we are not around? 
  Forgive the directness, but international politics is not 
some fool's game, and we know quite well from history how many 
times the major powers have joined in deciding the fate of the 
Baltics behind our backs. With the show of a reduction of 
Russian forces in the Baltics, there has been an immediate rush 
of active competition attempting to fill this void on all 
levels. Only a total fool could believe it was mere 
coincidence that there were candidates for presidents and 
ministers in the Baltics coming from the "West" (the former 
Minister of Defense of Estonia was Hain Rebass -- a Swedish 
citizen). Naturally, the still unresolved "KGB sack and deputies 
sitting in the sack" problem clearly shows that not just the 
truest Latvians, nor strictly Latvian citizenship can guarantee 
against national betrayal. Nevertheless, for the good of 
Latvia's security, it is necessary to carry out all necessary 
precautions to insure that national policies are created only 
and uniquely in our interests. Now, what kind of organization do 
we have, when two major national security structures in Latvia 
-- the Defense Ministry and Internal Affairs Ministry -- have 
people working alongside them who are receiving money from one 
major power, and yet others who receive money from another major 
power? 
  Finally, I would like to remind you that Latvia is a 
participant of the 1930 Hague Convention "On specific questions 
that affect the confliction of citizenship laws". This League of 
Nations document is now on file with the United Nations 
Secretary General. The 1930 Hague Convention denied dual 
citizenship and supported the principle, in accordance with 
which each nation determines its circle of citizens, and other 
nations must respect these rights[.sup]19[/]. It would be 
more correct to resolve the question of dual citizenship, if we 
were to allow it, through international treaties with each 
country. It would also be essential to incorporate into the 
election law a permanent residence census, similar to what is 
done in the United States. For example, 10 years for the right 
to be elected to the Saeima, but to run for President, it would 
be necessary to have received citizenship through birth here, 
and to have resided permanently in Latvia for the past five or 
ten years. The loyalty oath should also be instituted for Saeima 
deputies and ministers. 
  Up to paragraph 36, overall, the LNIM bill is in accordance 
with the former bill voted on at the first reading and would be 
acceptable. Nevertheless, I feel that: if the LNIM are such 
patriots, then the law must incorporate the principle on the 
absolute rights and citizenship of persons of Latvian and Liv 
origins (maintaining certain exclusionary conditions), because 
applying quotas to them is not sufficient. Likewise, quotas 
should not be applied to Estonians, Lithuanians and Poles, 
because, for example, many repressed Lithuanians, who were not 
allowed to return to Lithuania settled on the Latvian side of 
border with Lithuania and have lived there for all of the 
post-war years. These persons should also be eligible for the 
mentioned "positive discrimination" process, since they present 
no threats to the sovereignty of Latvia. 
  The bill of the "Harmony for Latvia" faction does not 
contain 
anything particularly progressive and new from that of the 
Supreme Council's first reading. The only thing they did was to 
introduce similar numbering for the earlier Central Committee 
and Council of Ministers decisions and many old norms have been 
unnecessarily crossed out, ones which the faction authors had 
not understood. 
  The "Equal Rights" faction bill contains some legally quite 
illiterate "pearls", which it would be worth mentioning. The 
preface to the bill starts off by outlining the goals of the 
bill written in a rather soviet propaganda style, "to establish 
harmony between the Latvian state and the 
inhabitants"(!), which is completely ridiculous from a legal 
point of view. First of all, the subjects of a citizenship law 
are "citizens", not "inhabitants", who include citizens as one 
part. Therefore, a citizenship law cannot establish "harmony" 
with "inhabitants", because it does not regulate questions of 
"harmony" among inhabitants (who would fall under the auspices 
of the "Harmony" faction, not "Equal Rights"), but questions 
about who is a citizen, how is citizenship obtained, lost, what 
is the citizenship of a child or adoptee, if there is a 
foreigner among the parents or adoptive parents. 
  Further, if this is not a typographical error in the 
newspaper, the equal righters made some horrible 
mistakes in the bill, referencing an entire group of 
international treaties, without capitalizing any of the names 
and even calling them by wrong names. In addition, they are 
attempting to base their concept on documents that have nothing 
to do with citizenship, as for example, the International Pact 
on Economic, Social, and Cultural Rights. It is declared in the 
draft that "no one in Latvia can be arbitrarily revoked of 
citizenship, nor arbitrarily denied the possibility to change 
citizenship". What does "arbitrarily" mean? If such a resolution 
is passed by the competent state institution (since no one else 
can revoke citizenship) according to the law, will this be 
"arbitrarily"? Moreover, "Equal Rights" is not correct also 
because Russia, according to its law, can basically revoke 
citizenship from any one of its citizens who resides in Latvia. 
I can't see that anyone here would attempt to prevent someone 
from changing their citizenship. 
  A legally absurd statement in the bill is that "the Republic 
of Latvia guarantees within its territory to each and every 
citizen, foreigner, stateless person (...) human rights, the 
rights of citizens, observance of freedom, as mentioned in the 
Satversme and in this law". 
  First of all, as I already stated, the purpose of a 
citizenship law in any country is to regulate only citizenship, 
not the rights of humans and citizens, which are regulated by a 
completely different law, and this is why all of the beautifully 
packaged norms on the rights of humans and citizens do not 
belong in the bill. Second, the Satversme, at this time, has no 
section on human and citizen rights, and thus referring to it is 
pointless. 
  Further in paragraph 4, the declaration of the "zero" 
variation, naturally, is not supported by any other faction, and 
therefore there is no reason to discuss it. 
  In paragraph 11, the norms referring to the status of 
foreigners belong in a law on foreigners, not in the Republic of 
Latvia citizenship law. Likewise, the idea of "Equal Rights" 
that citizenship cannot be revoked also seems unfounded. Even in 
such a democratic nation as Sweden, in accordance with their 
citizenship law, paragraph 7 [.sup]20[/], citizenship can be 
revoked. 
  The rest of the bill consists of the Supreme Council's first 
reading, and a crossbreeding the Russia's citizenship law norms, 
not all of which are absurd, but could be useful in Latvian 
legislation. 
  In ending, while I do not have a close friendship with 
either 
the LNIM nor "Equal Rights", I am forced to conclude that both 
of these factions have submitted the most detailed bills. The 
rest of the factions will not be convinced to vote for the 
latter's law draft. I am left to conclude that the closest to 
the long discussed and completed first reading of the Supreme 
Council citizenship law draft, which has gained acceptance by 
international experts, is the LNIM version, which should also be 
used as a basis for further work. 
  If only for a moment, the Saeima deputies should put aside 
their attitudes, already formed in the Supreme Council, whereby 
they are more concerned about drowning their opponents than 
about Latvian national interests, and then we could gain the 
possibilities to reach a legally correct, modern citizenship 
law, one which would guarantee the future of the Latvian people. 
  Juris Bojars Republic of Latvia Academy of Sciences Member, 
LDLP Chairman. 
Footnotes 
  16. Constitutions of the Countries of the World. Israel 
1988. 
New York, p. 79. 
  17. Immigration and Nationality Act. P. 11. 
  18. Weis, P. Nationality and Statelessness in International 
Law. Westport 1979, p. 170. 
  19. League of Nations, Geneva. Nr. C. 224, M.111, 1930, 
V.P.16. 
  20. Sverige Rikes Lag. Stockholm. 1982, s. B. 398. 
  Photo caption: Will the citizens really be unhitched? 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61174 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101></F>
<H3> <TI>     Former KGB Officer Describes Activities Abroad </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944F0230A Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA in Russian 11 Dec 93 p 6 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0230A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with V.N. Kozhemyakin by Pavel Koltsov; place and </F>
date not given: "The Intelligence Officer Who Returned to the 
Cold: He Does Not Promise To Swell the Ranks of the Righteous 
and Miracle-Workers"] 
  [Text] On 20 December 1990--Chekist Day--a 
minister-counselor of the Embassy of the USSR in Stockholm was 
summoned to the office of the chief of the Protocol Department 
of the Swedish Foreign Ministry. He was notified that Vladimir 
Kozhemyakin, third secretary of the embassy, had to leave the 
kingdom "for activity incompatible with his diplomatic status." 
That evening Lieutenant Colonel Kozhemyakin was returning to 31 
Jorvelsgaten Street, to the Soviet Embassy, from a routine 
operation ("a meeting in the city"), still unaware that his 
mission in Sweden was over. This had been preceded neither by a 
foulup in work nor negligence, even. The chance of an 
intelligence professional being deported from a country always 
increases if he is an active worker. An analysis of the Center 
showed that Kozhemyakin's deportation was also in fact a 
"preventive action" of the SEPO Swedish counterintelligence. 
When, that inclement day around Christmas, the five-deck ferry 
Ilich, sounding its horn in the fog, approached the 
Leningrad moorings, Lieutenant Colonel V.N. Kozhemyakin (a 
native of Moscow, born in 1956, career officer of the KGB First 
Main Administration, member of the CPSU, married with two sons, 
from a serviceman's family) was in a state in which, in everyday 
language, his heart was not where it should be. For he had after 
long soul-searching adopted the firm decision to quit 
intelligence without waiting for a new assignment. He had 
written in his report that he had serious reasons for leaving 
the profession and testing his mettle in another field. In 
February 1991 V.N. Kozhemyakin, political adviser, showed up in 
the administrative system of the Supreme Soviet of Russia. The 
operations officer had become a desk analyst. Today Vladimir 
Kozhemyakin stands at No. 11 on the electoral slate of the PRES 
(Party of Russian Unity and Accord) and is running for the State 
Duma in Moscow's Tsentralnyy District 202. 
  [Koltsov] You are a retired intelligence officer and 
fledgling politician. Do you feel yourself to be in the right 
place? 
  [Kozhemyakin] I would not say that I have become a real 
politician. I will say only that the world of politics is 
tougher than that of intelligence. 
  [Koltsov] When you handed in your discharge application, did 
the KGB turn its back on you? 
  [Kozhemyakin] Far from all my colleagues in the First Main 
Administration approved of my decision. But nor did anyone try 
to throw a wrench in the works. I have kept up friendly 
relations with many of my fellow employees. We hoist a glass on 
Chekist Day. 
  [Koltsov] The opinion has often been expressed that the KGB 
was called upon to defend the safe transformation of Soviet 
society ("perestroyka"), but failed to cope with this 
assignment. It is said that the KGB was inefficient, and 
reference is made to amateurish miscalculations in the 
performance of operations, in Vilnius, for example. What do you 
think about this? 
  [Kozhemyakin] Truly, the KGB, as the powerful custodian of 
state interests, not only the untroubled dominion of the 
nomenklatura, was required to make smooth the risk-fraught 
maneuver from totalitarianism to an open society. And many 
people in the committee understood this. But there were in the 
leadership people who were living in the past. And if the 
authorities had to oppose nationalism and centrifugal forces, 
they should not have done so as ineptly as in Vilnius in January 
1991, when, in addition, there was no one willing to assume 
responsibility for the mess. 
  [Koltsov] When television is now showing old American movies 
about Soviet agents operating in the West, where they are 
portrayed as half-wits and criminals, what are your feelings? It 
is doubtful whether even the intelligent "Dead Season" has been 
shown on American television. Or is this self-flagellation also 
part of the course of "repentance" following totalitarianism? 
  [Kozhemyakin] Even the penitent should show moderation. But 
on a broader plane I will answer with lines from our party 
program: "Russian culture cannot develop without extensive 
contacts with world culture, of which it is a part. But 
international terrorism in the sphere of culture supported by 
the mass media should be rebuffed at the level of official 
cultural policy. Limits on the permissible amount of television 
time used for showing foreign mass-culture programs should be 
established, at the 30 percent level." 
  [Koltsov] Many foreign intelligence people have become 
defectors. And on almost every occasion this has coincided with 
the recall home of an agent at the end of an assignment or 
mistakes in his work. Does this not point to a dual mentality, 
when a person secretly identifies with the value system against 
which he is working? Or is there a more prosaic explanation? 
  [Kozhemyakin] A traitor is a traitor. The not-unknown 
Gordiyevskiy, incidentally, was one of my first instructors in 
the First Main Administration. Intelligent, urbane.... But an 
alien soul--darkness. I believe that there were various motives 
behind his switch to the side of the enemy: self-interest, some 
scores with the authorities, unpleasantness at work, even. 
"Dostoyevskiyism" is not to be sought in such characters. In any 
event, in switching to the "other" side you give away your 
comrades and those who placed their trust in you. 
  [Koltsov] You are on the slate of the PRES, the party of new 
state absolutists. Someone said that the PRES had jumped like 
the devil out of the snuff box, having performed some political 
somersault. People who died for the sake of democracy, the 
sovereignties, and the overthrow of the "imperial" paradigms 
made a complete about-face, becoming state absolutists, 
federalists, and geopoliticians.... 
  [Kozhemyakin] I shall cite the eternal rightness of the 
well-known idea of self-determination in politics: Whoever in 
his youth was not a radical has no heart, whoever by his mature 
years has not become a conservative has no brain. The PRES 
appeared in the political arena not in connection with a 
particular occasion--the Duma elections. Had there not been 
elections tomorrow, this conservative and constructive current 
among democrats would have detached itself and presented a 
program of new federalism all the same. In my view, the PRES 
embodies a coming of age in Russian politics. 
  [Koltsov] If you had to confess, what sins in the field of 
intelligence and politics would you acknowledge? 
  [Kozhemyakin] Like all Soviet employees, I am guilty of the 
sin of padding. I would have recourse in my reports from 
Stockholm to the Center to the following subterfuge. By the 
method of analysis of information flows I would extract valuable 
and reliable information and attribute it to a specific 
"source," that is, a foreigner who was being cultivated. I am 
sure that this is a sin of all the world's intelligence 
services, for that matter. And I have not yet amassed any mortal 
sins in politics on account of the brevity of my length of 
service. 
  [Koltsov] The West is dismayed at how far the democrats in 
Moscow have gone in defending their policy against malcontents. 
In turn, there are hardly any people left here who ardently 
believe that the establishment of representative democracy in 
Russia is a sacred goal of the West. Does it not seem to you 
that we were all of a far more "pro-West" frame of mind in the 
so-called stagnation years than today, when Moscow and 
Washington are on intimate terms with one another? I refer not 
to politicians, but to the mood among the people.... 
  [Kozhemyakin] There is no denying it: I myself am less of a 
"pro-West" frame of mind than when I worked in Stockholm. We are 
certainly over the period of euphoria at the surmounting of the 
confrontation with the Western world. There is coming to be an 
understanding that both the fate and interests of each are 
unique, although there are many common nonmaterial values. 
Henceforward, I am not wrong here, I believe: If we are of a 
pro-Russia frame of mind, we will be more quickly understood. 
  [Koltsov] To what did the president refer, in your view, 
when 
he told Ryazanov that at the time of the events of 3-4 October 
the Ministry of Security occupied a position of noninterference 
and was "protecting itself"? 
  [Kozhemyakin] It would have been far worse and more 
dangerous 
had the Ministry of Security displayed undue zeal those days in 
October. Consequently, democratic instincts are taking hold in 
our society. It is a bad omen for a normal society when the 
special services acquire a taste for participation in domestic 
political opposition. 
  [Koltsov] All parliamentary candidates say that they will do 
good things for the electorate if they obtain a mandate. But to 
put the issue the other way about: What would you, as a deputy, 
not do under any circumstances? 
  [Kozhemyakin] I would not promise prosperity in one 
constituency by itself and I would not swear that the voucher is 
a particularly valuable piece of paper and that I would in 
parliament swell the ranks of the righteous and the 
miracle-workers. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61175 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> COMMONWEALTH AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101></F>
<H3> <TI>     CIS Economic Statistics for January-October 1993 </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944E0324A Moscow DELOVOY MIR in Russian No 247, 6-12 Dec 93 
p 18 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0324A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow DELOVOY MIR </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Report by the Statistics Committee of the Commonwealth of </F>
Independent States: "The Economy of the Commonwealth of 
Independent States in January-October 1993"] 
  [Text] Changes in values of main socioeconomic indicators 
of the Commonwealth countries over January-October of the 
current year as compared with the analogous period of last year 
are characterized by the following: 


                    January-October 1993 as a Percentage of January-October 1992 

                    Net           Total         Index of       Monetary      Monetary        Retail 
                    Material      Volume of     Wholesale      Income of     Expenditures    Turnover 
                    Product (in   Industrial    Prices of      the           of the          (in 
                    comparable    Production    Industrial     Population    Population on   comparable 
                    prices)       (in           Enterprises                  Goods and       prices) 
                                  comparable                                 Services 
                                  prices) 

Azerbaijan          85.9          89.1          1,173          965.1         557.8           52.2 

Armenia             72.8          62.0          827            855.9         458.2           57.9 

Belarus             90.0          87.1          1,808          1,233.7       1,123.4         94.7 

Kazakhstan          82.8          86.6          1,446          1,056         849.0           85.1 

Kyrgyzstan          85.6          73.5          900            686.3         547.6           78.8 

Moldova             93.9          106.7         1,054          845.8         747.2           73.8 

Russia              86.0          83.6          988            1,095.8       1,042.6         101.9 

Tajikistan          ...           75.6          1,096          ...           ...             69.4 

Turkmenistan        ...           112.9         1,656          1,654.8       1,166.2         107.3 

Uzbekistan          100.8         103.1         1,227          1,236.6       968.0           120.0 

Ukraine[.sup]1[/]    88            92            ...            ...           ...             78 

Total CIS           87.0          85.2          1,082          1,101.7       1,020.2         95.2 

[.sup]1[/] Here and elsewhere--data from estimated and bilateral information exchange 


  The volume of Commonwealth countries' exports to foreign 
countries outside of the territory of the former USSR over 10 
months amounted to $37.6 billion in current prices, which is 5 
percent less than over the same period last year. The volume of 
imports fell off by 47 percent in current prices and amounted to 
R19.8 billion. The positive foreign trade balance of the 
Commonwealth countries as a whole increased from $2.6 billion in 
January-October 1992 to $17.8 billion over the corresponding 
period of 1993. 
  The main foreign trade partners of almost all Commonwealth 
countries are the European Union countries, the United States, 
China, and Japan, which account for 60 percent of all 
export-import operations. 
  The most important commodities which form the bulk of the 
countries' exports (more than 80 percent of exports) remain 
mineral products (crude oil, products of oil refining, natural 
gas), machine building (electric machinery and means of 
transportation) and chemical industry (mineral or chemical 
fertilizer) products, nonprecious metals (nonferrous metals and 
items made of them), as well as textile and textile items 
(cotton fiber). Prevalent among imports are machine building 
products, products of plant origin, ready-to-use food products, 
and the chemical industry output; these commodity groups account 
for 70 percent of imports. 
  As of 1 November of this year, employment services of the 
Commonwealth countries had 1.5 unemployed persons looking for 
work registered with them. The number of job vacancies reported 
by enterprises to the employment service amounted to 800,000. 
The correlation between supply and demand in the labor market in 
the Commonwealth countries changed in October as compared with 
the beginning of the year as follows (in thousands of persons): 


              Total Number of Unemployed   Of That, Those Granted      Enterprises' Labor Needs 
                                           the Status of Unemployed    Reported to Employment 
                                                                       Services 

              January    October           January    October          January    October 

Azerbaijan    35.0       43.9              6.9        18.8             10.4       11.8 

Armenia       67.8       105.7             61.8       98.6             0.9        5.4 

Belarus       31.4       65.8              31.4       65.8             20.6       20.0 

Kazakhstan    ...        ...               35.6       39.1             43.4       56.5 

Kyrgyzstan    6.0        8.0               1.9        3.2              4.4        4.4 

Moldova       19.7       13.8              14.2       10.8             1.1        0.8 

Russia        1,028.8    994.2             628.0      728.4            301.1      453.0 

Tajikistan    31.0       108.4             8.6        18.0             1.0        18.9 

Uzbekistan    23.9       31.3              10.8       14.1             22.0       32.2 

Ukraine       143.7      128.8[.sup]1[/]    73.2       78.7[.sup]1[/]    126.6      184.4[.sup]1[/] 

[.sup]1[/] September 


  On the average in the Commonwealth, 70 percent of nonworking 
persons had the status of unemployed; of them, in Azerbaijan 73 
percent, Armenia--93 percent, Belarus--100 percent, 
Kyrgyzstan--40 percent, Moldova--78 percent, Russia--73 percent, 
Tajikistan--17 percent, and Uzbekistan--45 percent. 
  There were 3.7 nonworking persons per job vacancy in 
Azerbaijan as compared with 3.4 in January; in Armenia, 
respectively, 19.7 and 74.6; Belarus--3.3 and 1.5; 
Kyrgyzstan--1.8 and 1.3; Moldova--18.3 and 18.5; Russia--2.2 and 
3.4; Tajikistan--5.7 and 32.6; and Uzbekistan--1.0 and 1.1. 
  Of persons with the status of unemployed, 57 percent 
received 
unemployment benefits. 
<H5>  Industry </H5>
  As compared with the corresponding month of last year, the 
total volume of industrial production in the Commonwealth in 
October fell off by 13.9 percent in comparable prices. The 
average daily output in October declined as compared with 
October of last year by 11.8 percent; as compared with September 
of this year (eliminating seasonal fluctuations in production), 
it increased by 1 percent. 
  Overall, over January-October the total volume of industrial 
production was 14.8 percent lower than that over January-October 
of 1992, and the average daily output--13.9 percent lower (there 
were fewer working days this year than last). As compared with 
January-October of 1991, the industrial output declined by 30 
percent. 
  Production of consumer goods in sale prices on average in 
the 
Commonwealth declined by 9 percent as compared with 
January-October of last year. The output of foodstuffs declined 
by 11 percent, alcoholic beverages--by 2 percent, and nonfood 
items--by 9 percent, including light industry output by 14 
percent, and cultural and household goods by 6 percent. Food 
products account for 46 percent of the total volume of consumer 
goods production, nonfood items--48 percent, and alcoholic 
beverages--about 6 percent. 
  Changes in the production of consumer goods over 
January-October 1993 as compared with the level of the 
corresponding period of 1992 in the Commonwealth countries are 
characterized by the following data (in percents): 


                       Consumer    Including:               Of Them 
                       Goods 

                                   Foodstuffs    Nonfood    Light       Cultural, 
                                                 Items      Industry    Personal, 
                                                            Goods       and 
                                                                        Household 
                                                                        Items 

Azerbaijan             89          92            96         92          99 

Armenia                72          53            78         78          77 

Belarus                97          92            100.1      98          102 

Kazakhstan             88          85            92         93          91 

Kyrgyzstan             79          75            86         93          77 

Moldova                86          85            99.8       100.8       99 

Russia                 89          89            89         79          93 

Tajikistan             88          92            86         87          82 

Turkmenistan           105         103           108        114         81 

Uzbekistan             112         107           117        116         121 

Ukraine                80          78            81         77          84 
(January-September) 


  As compared with January-October 1991, the output of 
consumer 
goods on average in the Commonwealth declined by 25 percent, 
including in Russia--by 26 percent; in Kazakhstan, Tajikistan, 
and Moldova--by 32-35 percent; Kyrgyzstan--by 47 percent; and 
Armenia--by two-thirds. 
  The output of foodstuffs has declined. Industrial production 
of meat in Kazakhstan and Uzbekistan was lower than over 
January-October of 1992 by 8 percent; in Belarus and Russia--by 
16 percent; and in Moldova--by 37 percent. The output of whole 
milk products in Russia declined by 17 percent, Kazakhstan--by 
36 percent, and Kyrgyzstan--by 41 percent. The output of 
vegetable oil, commercial edible fish products, flour, macaroni 
items, and cereals has declined in most Commonwealth countries. 
  Production of the main varieties of light industry products 
has declined. On average in the Commonwealth as compared with 
January-October of last year, the output of all varieties of 
fabrics fell off by 26 percent, and footwear--by 25 percent. In 
Russia, the output of fabrics fell off by 32 percent; the output 
of footwear declined in Russia, Kazakhstan, and Kyrgyzstan by 
30-33 percent. 
  The output of certain categories of complex home appliances 
increased somewhat in a number of states. Production of 
television sets, refrigerators, and freezers in Russia increased 
by 11 percent as compared with the level of last year's 
January-October. The output of washing machines in Uzbekistan 
and Belarus increased by 14-15 percent, and in Moldova--by 26 
percent. Kazakhstan produced 17 percent more tape recorders, and 
Moldova--13 percent more refrigerators and freezers. At the same 
time, production of some categories of these items declined as 
compared with January-October 1992: The output of tape recorders 
in Russia declined by 16 percent and of radio receivers by 28 
percent; in Belarus, the output of tape recorders declined by 33 
percent and television sets--by 24 percent; and in Kazakhstan, 
that of washing machines by 24 percent. 
  Electric power generation in January-October across the 
Commonwealth declined by 6 percent as compared with the 
corresponding period of 1992, including in Armenia--by 31 
percent, in Belarus and Kyrgyzstan--by 10 percent, and in 
Turkmenistan--by 8 percent. 
  Coal production over 10 months declined in Russia by 10 
percent, and in Kazakhstan--by 11 percent, including that of 
coking coal--by 14 percent and 11 percent. Gas production in 
Russia was 4 percent below that of the corresponding period of 
last year, while this figure rose 4 percent in Uzbekistan and 18 
percent in Turkmenistan. As compared with January-October of 
1992, the output of oil in the Commonwealth has declined, 
including in Russia by 13 percent, in Kazakhstan by 10 percent, 
and in Turkmenistan by 14 percent. The decrease in production of 
oil led to reduced volumes being refined and reduced output of 
basic petroleum products. On the average across the 
Commonwealth, primary refining of oil decreased by 16 percent, 
the output of automotive gasoline by 15 percent, diesel fuel by 
16 percent, and furnace fuel oil by 14 percent. In Belarus the 
output of automotive gasoline declined by 33 percent, diesel 
fuel by 34 percent, and furnace fuel oil by 38 percent; in 
Turkmenistan, these indices were 23 percent, 31 percent, and 33 
percent, respectively. Production of the main categories of 
petroleum products in Uzbekistan increased as compared with last 
year's levels. 
  The output of finished rolled ferrous metals decreased by 7 
percent as compared with January-October of last year. The 
decline in the total volume of production in machine building 
has not been halted. Output of metal-cutting machine tools in 
Kazakhstan fell off by 25 percent, in Russia by 18 percent, and 
in Belarus by 14 percent; of drop forges by 19 percent, 55 
percent, and 68 percent, respectively. Production output of 
tractors in Russia declined by 25 percent, in Uzbekistan by 36 
percent, and in Kazakhstan by 59 percent. 
  The lag in production of chemical products continues. Output 
of mineral fertilizer declined over 10 months in Russia by 21 
percent, Belarus by 34 percent, and Kazakhstan by 68 percent. 
There was a 25-percent decline in production of chemical thread 
and fibers in Russia as compared with January-October of last 
year; the output of calcinated soda declined by 24 percent, and 
of caustic soda--by 22 percent. In Belarus the output of 
chemical thread and fibers declined by 22 percent, and of 
synthetic resins and plastics--by 23 percent. Production of 
construction materials has declined. For instance, the output of 
cement on the average across the Commonwealth--and in 
Russia--declined by 20 percent; in Kazakhstan and Kyrgyzstan--by 
35-39 percent; and in Tajikistan--by half. 
<H5>  Agriculture </H5>
  In a number of Commonwealth countries grain crops remained 
unharvested on a considerable area; part of the potato and 
vegetable crops also perished, which may be seen from the 
following data for the Commonwealth on the whole (in millions of 
hectares): 


                     Area Sown         Harvested          Unharvested Area, 
                     (Planted) With    (Threshed) as of   thousands of 
                     1993 Crops        1 November 1993    hectares 

Grain crops          93.2              89.1               3,756 
(without corn) 

Sunflower            4.4               3.6                762 

Sugar beet           2.9               2.8                156 
(industrial) 

Potatoes             1.3               1.2                118 

Vegetables           0.7               0.5                116 


  In Russia, more than 3 million hectares of grain crops 
remained unharvested (81 percent of the total unharvested grain 
crops area in the Commonwealth countries), as well as 621,000 
hectares of sunflower (81 percent), 66,000 hectares of sugar 
beet (42 percent), 78,000 hectares of potatoes (66 percent), and 
42,000 hectares of vegetables (36 percent). By 1 November, 
considerable acreage of grain crops and sunflowers remained 
unharvested in Kazakhstan--410,000 and 86,000 hectares, 
respectively; and in Ukraine--176,000 and 43,000 hectares. 
  Overall across the Commonwealth, the total yield of grain 
from the threshed area (in initial book weight) amounted to 
174.3 million tonnes (not counting corn), which is 12.6 million 
tonnes less (by 7 percent) than of the same date in 1992. The 
average yield of grain per hectare of threshed area amounted to 
19.6 quintals as compared with 20.2 quintals in 1992. 
  By the middle of November, 50.2 million tonnes of grain had 
been delivered to grain procurement facilities (99 percent of 
last year's level). As compared with 1992, grain procurement 
increased in all Commonwealth states except Kazakhstan and 
Armenia. In Russia, 26 million tonnes of grain had been procured 
(8 percent more than in 1992); in Ukraine--14 million tonnes (28 
percent) more; and in Belarus--1.7 million tonnes (4 percent) 
more. Grain procurement in Kazakhstan amounted to 6 million 
tonnes (49 percent of last year's level). 
  Below are data on procurement of other agricultural crops in 
the Commonwealth states as of 22 November (in millions of 
tonnes): 


                        1992            1993            1993 as a 
                                                        Percentage of 1992 

Sugar beet              39.0            39.0            99.9 
(industrial) 

Raw cotton (total)      6.01            6.33            105 

including fine-fiber    0.46            0.35            77 
variety 

Potatoes                4.2             2.8             66 

Vegetables              5.3             5.6             106 


  In the total volume of sugar beet procurement, root-crops 
purchased from Ukrainian farms account for 76 percent, and from 
Russian farms--19 percent. 
  Procurement of raw cotton from main cotton-growing regions 
is 
characterized by the following data (in thousands of tonnes): 


                        1992             1993             1993 as a 
                                                          Percentage of 1992 

Azerbaijan              335              282              84 

Tajikistan              300              498              166 

Turkmenistan            1,283            1,339            104 

Uzbekistan              4,042            4,175            103 


  In most Commonwealth states the winter crops sowing for the 
1994 harvest and fall plowing has decreased as compared with 
1992. By the beginning of November throughout the Commonwealth 
states winter crops at the farms were sown on the area of 28.3 
million hectares, which is 3.9 million hectares, or 12 percent 
less, than as of this date in 1992. Fall plowing has been 
completed on the area of 60.6 million hectares, which is less 
than last year by 7.2 million hectares, or 11 percent. 
  Winter crops sowing and fall plowing in the Commonwealth 
states as of 1 November are characterized by the following data 
(in thousands of hectares): 


                Winter Crops Sown                 Fall Plowing Completed 

                1992      1993      1993 as a     1992      1993      1993 as a 
                                    Percentage                        Percentage 
                                    of 1992                           of 1992 

Azerbaijan      449       425       95            ...       ...       ... 
(as of 25 
October) 

Belarus         1,344     1,206     90            1,811     1,427     79 

Kazakhstan      2,042     1,612     79            9,949     10,180    102 

Kyrgyzstan      246       208       85            139       79        57 

Moldova (as     317       335       105           450       275       61 
of 25 
October) 

Russia          19,031    15,093    79            44,396    38,909    88 

Tajikistan      47        25        53            16        10        62 
(as of 25 
October) 

Turkmenistan    270       373       138           240       70        29 

Uzbekistan      392       564       144           272       382       140 

Ukraine         8,000     8,500     105           10,500    9,200     87 


  The volume of output of animal husbandry products at 
agricultural enterprises of the Commonwealth states is 
declining. At the same time, as compared with last year, the 
rate of production decline slowed down somewhat. For instance, 
while over January-October of 1992 production of meat had fallen 
off by 22 percent as compared with the analogous period of the 
preceding year, that of milk--by 19 percent, and that of 
eggs--by 16 percent, over January-October of this year as 
compared with 1992 these indices measured at, respectively, 15 
percent, 8 percent, and 10 percent. 
  Overall over the elapsed 10 months in the Commonwealth as a 
whole, agricultural enterprises produced 9.8 million tonnes of 
meat (in live weight), 45.9 million tonnes of milk, and 33.8 
billion units of eggs. This is less than the volume produced 
over the analogous period of 1992: meat--by 1.8 million tonnes 
(by 15 percent); milk--by 4 million tonnes (by 8 percent); and 
eggs--by 3.9 billion units (by 10 percent). 
  The volume of animal husbandry products output at 
agricultural enterprises in the Commonwealth states over 
January-October has changed as follows (in thousands of tonnes): 


                       Meat (in Live     Milk                Eggs (million 
                       Weight)                               units) 

                       1992     1993     1992      1993      1992      1993 

Azerbaijan             64       44       200       144       223       101 

Armenia[.sup]1[/]       10       2        12        5         76        9 

Belarus                974      852      3,613     3,234     1,698     1,721 

Kazakhstan             837      800      2,277     2,213     1,680     1,513 
(January-September) 

Kyrgyzstan: all        310      296      818       772       501       336 
categories of farms 

including              107      82       321       253       270       132 
agricultural 
enterprises 

Moldova                150      108      627       441       378       211 

Russia                 6,293    5,436    29,076    27,071    26,002    24,095 

Tajikistan             40       30       170       107       218       97 

Turkmenistan           63       75       182       187       146       116 

Uzbekistan             202      187      807       809       815       669 

Ukraine                2,811    2,100    12,688    11,400    6,163     5,100 

[.sup]1[/] Without peasant (private) farms, which account for more than 90 
percent of the total volume of agricultural production 


  Overall in the Commonwealth in January-October of the 
current 
year, the state has purchased fewer products from all categories 
of farms than over the same period in 1992: livestock and 
poultry (in live weight)--by 1.8 million tonnes (by 17 percent); 
milk--by 3.4 million tonnes (by 8 percent); and eggs--by 1 
billion units (by 3 percent). 
<H5>  Construction </H5>
  In the 10 months of the current year, state enterprises and 
organizations across the Commonwealth completed the construction 
of about 20 million square meters of housing, which amounts to 
90 percent of that over the corresponding period of last year, 
as well as general education schools for 374,400 pupil 
accommodations (98 percent), preschool facilities for 59,400 
accommodations (66 percent), hospitals with 12,100 beds (128 
percent), and outpatient facilities for 31,500 visits per shift 
(91 percent). Completion of construction projects in the social 
sphere by state enterprises and organizations in the 
Commonwealth states in January-October 1993 is characterized by 
the following data: 


                       Residential    General           Preschool         Hospitals,    Outpatient 
                       Housing,       Education         Facilities,       Beds          Facilities, 
                       Thousand       Schools, Pupil    Accommodations                  Visits Per 
                       Square         Accommodations                                    Shift 
                       Meters of 
                       Total Area 

Azerbaijan             448.0          9,800             1,660             475           1,940 

Armenia                137.4          7,105             690               -             - 

Belarus                1,381.9        17,744            4,700             580           2,805 

Kazakhstan             1,657.3        14,451            4,170             387           1,000 

Kyrgyzstan             50.8           6,027             280               110           - 

Moldova                120.2          1,198             720               -             200 
(January-September) 

Russia                 10,763.6       148,766           22,256            5,446         15,819 

Tajikistan             106.2          8,714             560               724           280 

Turkmenistan           347.3          25,759            3,755             862           380 

Uzbekistan             708.1          73,875            8,655             2,238         5,112 

Ukraine                4,120.0        61,000            12,000            1,300         4,000 


<H5>  Transportation </H5>
  In January-October, 1.9408 billion tonnes of freight (102 
percent of the railroads' target volume) have been carried 
(accepted) by the public rail network in the Commonwealth 
countries. 
  As compared with January-October of last year, freight 
shipping volume fell off in all Commonwealth states. The volume 
of bituminous coal shipments by rail transport has declined: in 
Belarus by 31.4 percent, in Kazakhstan by 13.2 percent, in 
Moldova by 71.4 percent, in Russia by 12.6 percent, and in 
Uzbekistan by 28 percent; of coking coal: in Belarus by 5.9 
percent, in Kazakhstan by 31.6 percent, and in Russia by 16.4 
percent; of oil and petroleum products: in Belarus by 34.2 
percent, in Kazakhstan by 27.3 percent, in Moldova by 47.9 
percent, and in Russia by 10.3 percent; of iron and manganese 
ore: in Kazakhstan by 20.8 percent, and in Russia by 9.3 
percent; of ferrous metals: in Belarus by 20.3 percent, in 
Kazakhstan by 14.7 percent, in Russia by 8.4 percent, and in 
Uzbekistan by 4.4 percent; of ferrous scrap metal: in Belarus by 
20 percent, in Kazakhstan by 24.2 percent, in Moldova by 23.5 
percent, in Russia by 20.8 percent, and in Uzbekistan by 13.8 
percent; of chemical and mineral fertilizer: in Belarus by 29.9 
percent, in Kazakhstan by 47 percent, in Moldova by 83.7 
percent, in Russia by 24.3 percent, and in Uzbekistan by 10.1 
percent; of timber: in Belarus by 7.9 percent, in Kazakhstan by 
52.7 percent, and in Russia by 24.4 percent; of grain and 
milling products: in Belarus by 10.8 percent and in Moldova by 
42.8 percent. Shipping of grain and milling products increased 
1.4-fold on Kazakhstan railroads, and 1.2-fold on railroads in 
Russia and Uzbekistan. 
<H5>  Personal Monetary Income and Expenditures </H5>
  Personal monetary income and expenditures in the 
Commonwealth 
states in January-October totaled (in billion rubles): 


                Monetary Income        Monetary               Including                                     Increase in Monetary 
                                       Expenditures                                                         Savings 

                                                              Purchases of Goods     Compulsory Payments 
                                                              and Services           and Contributions 

                1992       1993        1992       1993        1992       1993        1992       1993       1992       1993 

Azerbaijan      56.3       542.9       41.3       242.3       37.2       207.3       4.1        35.0       15.0       300.6 

Armenia         22.0       188.4       14.3       68.9        13.0       59.6        1.3        9.3        7.7        119.5 

Belarus         251.1      3,097.2     220.6      2,564.2     199.9      2,246.1     20.7       318.1      30.5       533.0 

Kazakhstan      249.7      2,636.8     149.0      1,451.1     127.3      1,081.1     21.7       370.0      100.7      1,185.7 

Kyrgyzstan,     178.1      1,222.3     137.3      764.2       122.2      669.2       15.1       95.0       40.8       458.1 
million soms 

Moldova         49.0       414.9       41.3       314.2       37.0       276.5       4.3        37.7       7.7        100.7 

Russia          3,943.0    43,208.2    2,891.2    33,128.6    2,519.5    26,267.4    371.7      6,861.2    1,051.8    10,079.6 

Tajikistan      ...        ...         ...        ...         ...        ...         ...        ...        ...        ... 

Turkmenistan    45.6       755.8       22.8       274.1       19.6       229.0       3.2        45.1       22.8       481.7 

Uzbekistan      154.0      1,903.9     103.6      1,009.7     92.7       896.9       10.9       112.8      50.4       894.2 

Ukraine         ...        ...         ...        ...         ...        ...         ...        ...        ...        ... 


  Monetary income in October was 18 percent higher than over 
the preceding month, and in September--by 13.6 percent. The 
absolute value of average monthly nominal wages of working 
individuals (including financial assistance and social benefits) 
varied in September 1993 in the Commonwealth states between 
14,112 rubles [R] in Armenia and R90,323 in Russia. 


                Rubles                                         As a Percentage of the Corresponding Period    September     For 
                                                               of 1992                                        1993 as a     Reference: 
                                                                                                              Percentage    Minimum 
                                                                                                              of August     Wage in 
                                                                                                              1993          Effect in 
                                                                                                                            September 
                                                                                                                            1993 

                January-June    July-September    Including    January-June    July-September    September 
                                                  September 

Azerbaijan      12,947          22,600            25,343       1,227           764               731          116           5,000 

Armenia         5,189           12,355            14,112       608             786               808          118           4,200 

Belarus         25,160          64,493            74,925       906             1,203             1,159        122           9,000 

Kazakhstan      24,741          61,911            80,026       1,143           1,300             1,283        138           4,500 

Kyrgyzstan,     46.9            91.6              112.8        837             864               902          127           28 
soms 

Moldova         13,347          36,957            41,796       725             1,141             1,191        118           7,500 

Russia          31,742          75,067            90,323       987             1,110             1,134        125           7,740 

Tajikistan      7,652           16,348            17,628       686             844               761          109           4,000 

Turkmenistan    23,037          53,966            ...          1,467           1,559             ...          ...           9,600 

Uzbekistan      10,176          35,778            41,726       908             1,411             1,497        117           13,500 

Ukraine         31,094          131,801           223,350      ...             ...               ...          235           20,000 


  In many Commonwealth states the highest nominal wages were 
registered among employees of credit institutions: 1.5 to 2.3 
times higher than wages in industry, and almost four times 
higher than salaries in the sphere of culture and arts. 
  In some Commonwealth countries personal nominal monetary 
income grows faster than consumer prices for goods and services 
(calculated on the basis of changes in the value of family 
consumer "basket"): 


                January-September 1993 as a Percentage of January-September      Ratio of Price Increases in Relation to 
                1992, factor of                                                  Increases in 

                Consumer           Per         Wages     Pensions    Stipends    Monetary    Wages    Pensions    Stipends 
                Prices[.sup]*[/]    Capita      Per One                           Income 
                                   Monetary    Worker 
                                   Income 

Azerbaijan      ...                9.8         10.5      ...         7.2         ...         ...      ...         ... 

Armenia         ...                8.0         7.1       7.5         ...         ...         ...      ...         ... 

Belarus         11.3               11.6        10.5      9.8         7.9         1.0         1.1      1.2         1.4 

Kazakhstan      10.9               11.1        12.3      ...         5.4         1.0         0.9      ...         2.0 

Kyrgyzstan      12.9               7.4         8.5       7.7         8.1         1.7         1.5      1.7         1.6 

Moldova         13.1               8.1         9.4       6.0         5.7         1.6         1.4      2.2         2.3 

Russia          9.6                11.0        10.5      9.2         8.4         0.9         0.9      1.1         1.1 

Tajikistan      13.5               9.0         5.2       ...         ...         1.5         2.6      ...         ... 

Turkmenistan    11.2               17.0        15.2      11.5        10.5        0.7         0.7      1.0         1.1 

Uzbekistan      8.1                12.0        12.1      8.6         9.6         0.7         0.7      0.9         0.8 

Ukraine         ...                ...         ...       ...         ...         ...         ...      ...         ... 


  As compared with January-September of 1991, prices increases 
exceeded the growth of monetary income by approximately a factor 
of four in Moldova, Kyrgyzstan, and Tajikistan, by a factor of 
two in Russia, and by a factor of 1.4 in Kazakhstan. Only in 
Uzbekistan and Turkmenistan, where for a long time state 
regulation of prices for a number of basic necessities remained 
in effect, did the rate of consumer price increases and the 
population's monetary income remain approximately the same. 
<H5>  Prices </H5>
  On the average across the Commonwealth, wholesale prices of 
industrial enterprises in January-October were 10.8 times as 
high as those over the corresponding period of last year. As 
compared with September of this year, wholesale prices in 
October increased by 23 percent. 
  In October, prices for consumer goods continued to rise in 
all Commonwealth states. Their average level in retail trade 
rose by 35.5 percent as compared with September of this year, 
and was 25.2 times as high as that in October of last year. 
  The dynamics of retail prices in the Commonwealth states in 
January-October of 1993 are characterized by the following: 


                        January-October 1993   January-October 1993 as a 
                        as a Percentage of     Percentage of 
                        January-October 1992 


                                               December 1992   September 1993 


Azerbaijan              1,017                  311             111 

Armenia                 932                    765             148 

Belarus                 1,093                  1,266           147 

Kazakhstan              1,143                  925             136 

Kyrgyzstan              1,240                  811             128 

Moldova[.sup]1[/]        1,017                  1,438           140 

Russia                  1,034                  602             119 

Tajikistan              1,293                  2,275           122 

Turkmenistan            1,299                  1,212           126 

Uzbekistan              788                    422             128 

Ukraine                 3,004                  2,955           178 

Total CIS               1,521                  966             136 

[.sup]1[/] Consumer price index 


  In Armenia and Moldova prices for foodstuffs in retail trade 
rose in October as compared with September at a greater rate 
(1.5-fold) than prices for nonfood items (1.4-fold and 1.3-fold, 
respectively); in Azerbaijan prices for foodstuffs rose by 12 
percent, and for nonfood items by 10 percent. In Turkmenistan, 
Tajikistan, Russia, Uzbekistan, Kyrgyzstan, Kazakhstan, and 
Belarus prices for foodstuffs increased over this period 
1.1-1.4-fold, and for nonfood items--1.2-1.5-fold. 
  Prices rise faster in major industrial centers and capitals 
of the Commonwealth states. For instance, as registered on 2 
November, beef prices in Almaty stores rose 2.5-fold over just 
one month (as compared with 7 September), in Minsk--2.2-fold, 
Tashkent--twofold, and Novosibirsk--1.5-fold. Prices for butter 
increased 1.3-1.6-fold in Chisinau, Nizhniy Novgorod, Volgograd, 
Chelyabinsk, Yekaterinburg, and Novosibirsk, and 1.8-2.4-fold in 
Tashkent, Almaty, Bishkek, and Minsk; prices for vegetable oil 
increased 1.8-2.2-fold in Almaty, Bishkek, St. Petersburg, and 
Voronezh, 3.4-fold in Minsk, and fivefold in Chisinau. Prices 
for rye bread in Moscow went up 2.1-fold, Chelyabinsk--2.2-fold, 
and Novosibirsk--2.4-fold; and for wheat bread--1.9-2.5-fold in 
Kazan, Novosibirsk, Moscow, and Tashkent. 
  In Ashgabat the greatest rises in regulated prices for basic 
foodstuffs were registered with respect to sugar--almost 
ninefold--as well as for beef, vegetable oil, butter, and 
milk--by a factor of 10-12.5, and for wheat bread made of 
highest grade wheat flour--20-fold. 
  Seasonal price increases at city markets in October as 
compared with September amounted to 21-39 percent in Kyrgyzstan, 
Moldova, Armenia, and Uzbekistan; and 44-46 percent in Belarus 
and Kazakhstan; in Turkmenistan, prices at city markets almost 
doubled. On average on the territory of Russia prices at city 
markets rose by 17 percent. 
  Overall in January-October as compared with the same period 
of last year, prices for agricultural products at city markets 
in Azerbaijan, Moldova, Russia, and Kazakhstan increased by a 
factor of 11.3-13; in Belarus, Armenia, and Uzbekistan--by a 
factor of 13.4-13.7; in Kyrgyzstan--almost 20-fold; and in 
Ukraine--by a factor of 33.4. 
  Prices and fees for paid services to the population 
continued 
to rise in October; over the month they increased by 24 percent, 
and as compared with last year's October--21-fold. The greatest 
price increases were registered in Tajikistan (by 54.6 percent 
and 15.8-fold, respectively) and Belarus (by 50.3 percent and 
22.6-fold). Prices increased with respect to all categories of 
paid services. Prices went up the most with respect to services 
that represent basic necessities--municipal services, passenger 
transportation, consumer services, and preschool child care. 
  Increases in prices and fees for main categories of paid 
services are characterized by the following: 


                   January-September 1993 as a Percentage of January-September 1992 

                   Consumer    Passenger         Communications    Municipal    Preschool    Tourism and    Sanitariums, 
                   Services    Transportation                      Services     Child Care   Sightseeing    Resorts, and 
                                                                                                            Fitness 
                                                                                                            Facilities 

Azerbaijan         847         2,001             1,044             654          1,098        1,212          763 

Armenia            1,313       3,167             3,541             967          711          839            918 

Belarus            1,286       1,493             1,987             1,357        867          973            1,279 

Kazakhstan         1,523       1,868             710               1,469        2,168        1,694          1,439 

Kyrgyzstan         1,829       2,257             1,404             1,885        1,210        1,767          1,366 

Moldova            1,065       1,605             906               2,088        617          850            7,224 

Russia[.sup]*[/]    1,828       1,594             958               3,068        1,958        1,795          1,987 

Tajikistan         1,029       1,728             761               1,132        138          1,644          1,209 

Turkmenistan       1,740       1,540             1,394             374          673          2,527          1,923 

Uzbekistan         1,175       1,910             2,229             945          396          1,426          1,602 

Ukraine            ...         ...               ...               ...          ...          ...            ... 


  In October of this year as compared with the preceding month 
and October of last year, the greatest price rises occurred with 
respect to the cost of attending preschool child care facilities 
in Belarus--by 63.3 percent and 7.9-fold, respectively; 
Kazakhstan--by 31.2 percent and 27.8-fold; and in Russia--by 
28.3 percent and 16.7-fold. In other Commonwealth countries the 
cost of these services went up by 17 percent. 
  The greatest increase in the cost of staying in a sanitarium 
or resort in October as compared with September was registered 
in Azerbaijan (by 118.5 percent) and Kazakhstan (58.4 percent), 
and the smallest--in Uzbekistan (by 3.3 percent). Over 
January-October of this year as compared with the corresponding 
period of last year, the cost of these services increased 
68-fold in Moldova and by a factor of eight to 20 in other 
Commonwealth states. 
  The cost of passenger transportation in October as compared 
with September of the current year increased the most in 
Tajikistan (by 39.5 percent) and Kyrgyzstan (by 38.7 percent). 
Over January-October of this year as compared with the 
corresponding period of last year, the greatest rise in the cost 
of these services was registered in Armenia (30.5-fold) and 
Kyrgyzstan (25.8-fold), and the smallest--in Turkmenistan 
(15-fold). With respect to municipal services, prices went up in 
October as compared with September in Kyrgyzstan (by 177 
percent) and Belarus (by 161.4 percent). 
  Retail prices and fees for consumer goods and paid services 
for the population increased in October as compared with October 
of last year on the average 24.9-fold, and as compared with the 
preceding month of this year--by 34.6 percent. The greatest 
price increases occurred in Belarus (19.7-fold and by 47.6 
percent, respectively) and Tajikistan (18.5-fold and 24.3 
percent), and the smallest--in Uzbekistan (10.4-fold and 28.7 
percent) and Azerbaijan (10.8-fold and 16.8 percent). 
<H5>  Trade and Services </H5>
  Over the elapsed 10 months the volume of retail turnover 
(including public catering) in current prices across the 
Commonwealth increased 9.1-fold as compared with the same period 
of last year; its physical volume (in comparable prices) 
declined by 4.8 percent as compared with January-October of last 
year, and by 36.6 percent as compared with the same period of 
1991. In most Commonwealth states the cost of retail commodity 
turnover rose as a result of higher prices. 
  Some consumer goods are sold by individuals outside of 
officially registered trade. The volume of such sales in Russia, 
for instance, amounted to an estimated R1.9 trillion over 
January-October of this year, which comprises 7.6 percent of the 
total trade turnover in the republic. 
  The data on retail turnover in the Commonwealth states over 
January-October 1993 are shown below: 


                    Billion      January-October 1993 as a Percentage of 
                    Rubles, in 
                    Current 
                    Prices 

                                 January-October 1992        January-October 
                                                             1991 in 
                                                             Comparable Prices 


                                 in Current   in 
                                 Prices       Comparable 
                                              Prices 

Azerbaijan          159.9        531          52.2           20.7 

Armenia             55.2         540          57.9           15.8 

Belarus             2,015.2      1,129        94.7           75.3 

Kazakhstan          1,375.0      1,012        85.1           52.1 

Kyrgyzstan,         0.76         821          78.8           28.7 
billion soms 

Moldova             308.3        805          73.8           35.6 

Russia[.sup]1[/]     25,132.4     1,034        101.9          66.7 

Tajikistan          107.7        810          69.4           24.5 

Turkmenistan        278.1        1,394        107.3          70.7 

Uzbekistan          844.4        955          120.0          83.6 

Ukraine, billion    19,205.6     2,337        78             59.8 
karbovantsy 

[.sup]1[/] Including sales at outside of officially registered trade channels 


  In a number of territories in October there was a wave of 
panic buying of consumer goods; in particular, in Uzbekistan it 
was caused by the anticipated exchange of banknotes, and in 
Kazakhstan and Turkmenistan--by the announced transition to a 
national currency. 
  As of 1 November the value of current inventories of 
consumer 
goods in the retail trade network of the Commonwealth countries 
measured at about R8 trillion and could sustain trade for 44 
days (based on average daily turnover in October) as compared 
with 42 days as of the same date last year. Inventory levels in 
the trade sector fluctuated between 35-38 days in Armenia, 
Moldova, and Ukraine, and 43-46 days in Russia, Belarus, and 
Kazakhstan to 63-74 days in Uzbekistan, Tajikistan, and 
Turkmenistan, 86 days in Kyrgyzstan, and 104 days of trade in 
Azerbaijan. 
  The value of realized paid services in the Commonwealth as a 
whole amounted to R3.8 trillion and was higher than that in 
January-October of last year in current prices and rates by a 
factor of 10, while in comparable prices and rates it declined 
by one-quarter. 
  Conventions used: - phenomenon absent; ... -- no data 
(not submitted); [.sup]*[/] -- estimate, calculation. 
  If you are interested in the economic situation of the 
CIS member countries, you may get all the statistics needed from 
the CIS Statistical Committee by subscribing to its services. 
  The Statistics Committee of the Commonwealth of 
Independent States 
  Telephones for contact: (095) 207-42-37, 207-46-51, fax 
(095) 
207-45-92. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61176 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Nechayev on Ways To Stabilize Economy </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944E0329A Moscow DELOVOY MIR in Russian No 253, 13-19 Dec 93 
p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0329A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow DELOVOY MIR </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Andrey Nechayev, by Vadim Mikhnevich; place </F>
and date not given: "`The State Must Work With Private 
Investors'"] 
  [Text] Even with the extremely limited budget 
resources, ways out of the crisis can be found, Andrey Nechayev, 
former minister of economics in the Yegor Gaydar cabinet and now 
president of the Russian Finance Corporation, working in contact 
with the Russian Government, believes. 
  [Mikhnevich] Andrey Alekseyevich, many people are explaining 
the reasons for the present crisis by the shift in priorities in 
the government's activity. Some are saying that we should have 
started with financial stabilization, others, with the 
structural reorganization of the economy, and yet others believe 
that we should generally have increased subsidies to industry 
and not have embarked on dangerous experiments. What do you, a 
person at the very epicenter of the struggle for reform of the 
economy, think? 
  [Nechayev] The latter assertion I do not consider serious in 
the least. By the time the Gaydar government had assumed office, 
the country had long been living beyond its means and was on the 
very threshold of a most severe financial crisis. As far as the 
first two are concerned, these are essentially two sides of the 
same coin. Gaydar understood this, but the government began with 
a policy of financial stabilization and liberalization of the 
economy bolstered by privatization. The release of enterprises 
from strict state tutelage combined with free pricing, taking 
account of real outlays, made it possible to distinguish both 
the viable enterprises and sectors and those that are either not 
in a position to survive at all or that could do so provided 
that production is reprofiled or reorganized. 
  The structural reorganization of the economy was to have 
been 
the aim of the second stage of the reforms. At this stage it was 
contemplated, on the basis of the limited possibilities of the 
budget, supporting viable industries and providing for the most 
painless possible winding down of the inefficient ones. But we 
did not reach the second stage. Under the severest pressure of 
the sectoral and regional lobbies expressing the interests of 
potential insolvent enterprises, the Supreme Soviet initially 
messed up the well-proportioned, interlinked program, tearing it 
apart bit by bit, and then, with its support, the Central Bank 
gave a boost to the inflation spiral, granting the enterprises 
large-scale, unsupported loans, essentially signifying the 
injection into the economy of an enormous supply of wholly 
unbacked money. The start of the structural reorganization was 
impeded by another step also--it was in fact blocked by the 
adoption of the Bankruptcy Act. 
  The stream of demagogy from high platforms did the economy a 
bad turn. The burst of inflation that followed immediately after 
hit most strongly at both the manufacturers and the public, 
inflaming the atmosphere even more and making ways out of the 
crisis more difficult. The ailment, which was driven inward, has 
once again come to the surface, but this time in a more serious 
form. I believe that there is no other solution to the crisis 
for the government today than to operate simultaneously in two 
directions--undertaking strict financial regulation and active 
structural reorganization. 
  [Mikhnevich] In other words, the present government is faced 
with doing what, formerly, Gaydar did not venture, when the 
situation was less explosive. A contradiction arises: strict 
financial regulation with a very meager budget will deprive the 
structural reorganization of the necessary investments. On what 
reserves can the government count in this situation? 
  [Nechayev] First, we need to create conditions that 
stimulate 
as much as possible all potential investors (banks, enterprises, 
commercial structures, the public) for the long-term investment 
of resources. It would be expedient for this, in particular, to 
exempt from taxes funds channeled into investment and permitting 
enterprises to pursue a flexible depreciation policy, and the 
commercial banks, to lower the rate of reserve holdings in the 
Central Bank, provided that the resources thus released are 
channeled into long-term credit. It is necessary also to devise 
as quickly as possible a package of documents regulating 
collateral relationships, mortgages included. 
  Thus, the task is to stimulate as much as possible, using 
limited government resources, the attraction of nongovernment 
funds. Of course, the state will always have obligations 
connected with defense capability, the environment, and 
development of the infrastructure and social programs. There is 
no escaping nonreturnable funding here, although these resources 
also could be spent more efficiently--via competitive bids, 
tenders, and the use of contract relations between state clients 
and contractors. 
  The resources, on the other hand, which are channeled into 
the support of industry and other sectors of the production 
sphere, which will ultimately produce direct returns, should be 
allocated mainly on a returnable basis. 
  [Mikhnevich] Have such tactics been discussed at the 
government level? 
  [Nechayev] Back in 1992 the Ministry of Economics of the 
Russian Federation had prepared a draft that proposed the 
abandonment if only of some nonreturnable budget investments, 
substituting for them commercial investment credit at a 
preferential rate of interest. They were to have been issued on 
a competitive basis to specific enterprises on the strength of 
particular projects, which had undergone comprehensive expert 
appraisal, with a relatively short cost-recovery term. Following 
completion of the project, the principal and interest would be 
returned to the creditor, that is, the state, and could once 
again be used for investments. There has in this way been an 
increase in the demands made on the efficiency of the projects 
and a broadening of the opportunities for future investments. 
  I have to say that even at that time there was no shortage 
of 
interesting proposals--the reforms emancipated initiative, and 
people understood that in realizing efficient projects good 
money could be earned in the future. 
  The government is now returning to this idea and developing 
it. A corporation's proposals were recently discussed by 
government and banking experts, and it was deemed expedient to 
differentiate between the use of budget resources for 
investments, initially allocating approximately 20-30 percent of 
the 21 trillion rubles [R] determined by the budget for capital 
investments for the granting of loans on a commercial basis, and 
also for the realization of another part of our proposals--the 
use of government resources for investments in share capital in 
combination with private investments. These tasks, specifically, 
will be tackled by the Russian Finance Corporation. 
  [Mikhnevich] Thus, if I have understood you correctly, we 
are 
talking about the appearance of fundamentally new investment and 
financial institutions under our conditions essentially pursuing 
government policy, but simultaneously acting the part of 
transactor operating independently. Is this, after all, a state 
organization or a private organization acting in the interests 
of the state? 
  [Nechayev] The status could change in the future, but we are 
at this time a state structure operating on the principles of 
financial autonomy and acting as the agent of the government, to 
which it entrusts the administration of a part of the budget 
resources. Such institutions operate successfully, for example, 
in the United States, Germany, and Italy. Budget support for the 
development of the most promising directions in scientific 
research and new technology and the stimulation of exports and 
private investments and other areas of vital importance for 
developing the economy and for maintaining high competitiveness 
on the world market are being realized with their help. The task 
with us is more modest as yet--attracting to the economy new 
investments and accelerating capital turnover. 
  [Mikhnevich] Have you already devised a mechanism? 
  [Nechayev] Of course, although, naturally, it will probably 
have to be refined with reference to the situation on the 
investments market. There are entirely specific areas in which, 
we believe, companies like the RFK [Russian Finance Corporation] 
should operate. Their functions are portfolio investments, 
allocating loans and putting together around these government 
resources nongovernment capital and concluding agreements with 
bankers and borrowers. It is nonsense when the Ministry of 
Finance concludes direct credit agreements with enterprises! 
  How will such companies operate? There is, for example, a 
large number of projects that their potential participants are 
not in a position to finance in full. There are, then, two 
options: either the government provides investment credit or 
participates directly in this project and acquires its share of 
the stock. If the project is realized and becomes profitable, 
the price of the shares rises. The government could at any 
moment sell them at a profit and allocate the money for new 
investments. All Western investment banks operate according to 
this format. 
  Acting on behalf and at the behest of the state, the RFK 
will 
attract primarily private investments. This format, roughly 
speaking, is as follows: the state invests R1 in a specific 
project and thereby declares its support for this project and 
its readiness to share the risk, but on the strength of this 
support commercial structures should invest, say, R3. Our 
estimates show that such interaction with commercial structures 
is perfectly possible, inasmuch as they have an interest even 
today in the profitable investment of their capital not only in 
trade or currency transactions. 
  There is also a number of other ideas, on which, owing to 
the 
lack of space, it is not worth dwelling on in detail at this 
time. 
  [Mikhnevich] Nonetheless, as experience shows, investors are 
attracted not so much by verbal as by actual guarantees, and in 
terms of the degree of investment risk, Russia is today superior 
only to countries that are at war. Can the government provide 
such guarantees? 
  [Nechayev] We also consider this matter extremely serious. 
Our viewpoint is such: we need an insurance or guarantee fund, 
not only ruble but foreign currency also, what is more, which 
would help attract foreign investors also. It is necessary, 
partially, to allocate budget monies for its creation. 
Management of the fund could be assumed by state structures of 
the RFK type. 
  We are also engaged in an active dialogue with OPIC 
[Overseas 
Private Investment Corp.]--the agency performing similar 
functions in the United States. Its guarantees are in fact 
guarantees of the U.S. Government, on the strength of which any 
Western bank instantly allocates credit. I hope that we will 
manage to obtain from OPIC resources both in the form of 
guarantees and in the form of direct credit. Without reciprocal 
guarantees on the part of the Russian Government. We hope that 
we can persuade American investment banks to invest their own 
capital in our projects in combination with resources granted by 
OPIC. If this happens, this will be a great success. 
  [Mikhnevich] Will your activity on the securities market be 
confined merely to stock transactions? 
  [Nechayev] We contemplate issuing on behalf of the 
corporation special ruble bonds at a relatively low rate of 
interest with compensation in the form of their owners being 
granted on the part of the corporation services pertaining to 
expert project evaluation, the attraction of capital, 
consulting, and so forth. It is also contemplated issuing 
foreign currency bonds, the price of which will change in 
accordance with the current price of the dollar at the 
prevailing interest rate in the West. It will thus be possible 
to accumulate additional resources for investments. 
  Further, at the behest of the Ministry of Finance, the 
corporation will conduct transactions with internal currency 
bonds. We are talking about bonds issued in exchange for the 
"frozen" currency accounts in the Vneshekonombank [Bank for 
Foreign Economic Activity]. We have enlisted a number of banks 
with whose participation we intend to make these bonds 
relatively liquid. We have also established contacts with 
Western investment institutions, which are prepared to purchase 
these bonds. Our quotations, that is, the prices that we are 
offering the enterprises when purchasing the bonds, are higher 
than those of our competitors. 
  Another direction which could be of interest to our 
enterprises is the allocation of currency loans with these bonds 
being used as collateral, proceeding from their market value. 
And, finally, the third direction--participation in 
risk-sharing. The foreign currency or part thereof paid to an 
enterprise will be placed on deposit in one of banks at a good 
rate of interest. In the event of an increase in the market 
price of the bonds, the profit will be shared with the 
enterprise. 
  The proposed ideas would be profitable for the holders of 
the 
bonds, I believe. They would not have to wait for many years for 
redemption of the bonds and would immediately obtain "live" 
money, which could be invested in business. The corporation and 
the banks take the risk. If the price of the bonds (thanks to 
the attraction of foreign purchasers included) rises, they will 
be the winners also. 
  [Mikhnevich] How do you intend to monitor the operation of 
the banks, considering their predilection for first turning over 
a time or two the money they have received and only then 
entering it into clients' accounts? 
  [Nechayev] We will, most likely, refuse to grant the banks 
credit and will do business directly with the borrower, opening 
a line of credit for him. The bank's function will be confined 
merely to servicing the movement of the money. 
  [Mikhnevich] If in the future the regions manage to defend 
their independence (the trend toward separatism is being 
manifested even now), will this be reflected in the activity and 
plans of the corporation? 
  [Nechayev] On the contrary, we believe that it is our 
regional branches, which the RFK is actively creating, which 
will bear the brunt of the burden, inasmuch as there is much 
that is seen more clearly at the local level. The majority of 
investment projects should be worked out and realized at the 
regional level with regard for local specifics. 
  [Mikhnevich] How do you see the future of structures like 
the 
RFK? 
  [Nechayev] Their appearance and development ensue directly 
from the logic of reform. Whether we like it or not, the 
development of market relations will force us to use in the 
investment space forms and methods accepted and well honed by 
world practice. Our corporation is today a pioneer to a large 
extent, but it is hardly destined to operate alone--others, 
which will compete with one another, owing to which the 
investment climate will only get better, will appear also. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61177 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr002___94033" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-002 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   10 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WESTERN REGION </F>
<F P=101> MOLDOVA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Defense Minister's Report on Forces Restructuring Outlined </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0474A Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA in Russian 13 Nov 93 
p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0474A </F>
<F P=104>  Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Aleksandr Khavronin report: "Concepts and Prospects"] </F>
  [Text] The main attention at the first conference of 
ranking personnel of the Ministry of Defense on 1 November was 
paid to the concept of army organizational development. An 
extensive report was delivered by Defense Minister Pavel 
Creanga. 
  In his opinion, the chief merit of the concept devised in 
the 
fall of last year is that it systematized all measures for the 
accelerated creation of the armed forces. This document deals 
only with military matters proper. The remaining 
factors--preparation of the economy, creation of state reserves, 
strengthening of morale--will be the subject of other 
prescriptive enactments. Pavel Creanga believes that practice, 
operational-technical measures, and the experience of work among 
the troops confirm the topicality of the concept. The minister 
criticized the proposals which Nicolae Petrica, former chief of 
the main staff of the armed forces of the republic, sent to 
President Mircea Snegur. Why? Petrica believes that a decisive 
role under today's conditions should be assigned not so much the 
regular forces as large-scale trained reserves (140,000), that 
is, a kind of "working army." It was proposed to this end that 
the republic leadership create under the auspices of the 
Ministry of Defense a network of centers for the military 
training of the youth. And that the permanent staff of the armed 
forces consist of 6,500 men. 
  The defense minister explains why this is unacceptable: A 
threat to the republic's military security may be seen not in 
acts of aggression and wars of the nuclear powers and military 
blocs but in possible local conflicts, in which the Republic of 
Moldova would be forced to defend its independence and 
territorial integrity. Whence the conclusion that the armed 
forces should be such as to be able to quickly localize the 
center of tension, ensure defense of the borders, and cut short 
possible provocations and encroachments on independence. 
Consequently, the minister concludes, the troops should be 
professional and ready to fight, and the manning level of the 
reserve should not perform the predominant role. 
  Setting forth the concept of army organizational 
development, 
the defense minister highlighted the main tasks of the regular 
troops: to efficiently and rapidly confront any possible threat 
without additional mobilization measures. If necessary, to be 
capable of additional manning to the level of wartime; to ensure 
a high level of the training of the command and control bodies 
and the personnel; and also of a militarily trained reserve 
capable of performing operational assignments. The Ministry of 
Defense is oriented toward the European average ratio of the 
strength of the personnel and the population--0.6-0.8 percent 
(0.23 percent with us). The concept defines the main function of 
the armed forces as performance of the assignments of deterrence 
against military provocations and aggression. The draft concept, 
the speaker observed, should be modified in connection with the 
creation of the Civil Defense and Emergencies Department. 
  Defense Minister Pavel Creanga termed "absurd and harmful" 
General N. Petrica's proposals concerning the incorporation in 
Ministry of Defense formations of the carabinieri forces, whose 
assignments are totally different. Legislation prohibits the 
enlistment of carabinieri forces for assignments that are not 
within their province. 
  Pavel Creanga believes to be completely wrong Nicolae 
Petrica's opinion concerning alternative service because it has 
not been justified "from either the economic or moral 
viewpoints." The Ministry of Defense has devised proposals for 
the government which will help avoid wrongdoing in questions of 
the organization and performance of alternative service. 
  The concept embodies a new principle altogether. The 
numerical composition of the army and its structure cannot be 
constant from year to year, they must correspond to the 
military-political conditions in the region. Specialists have 
calculated that the optimum strength of the regular army is 
10,000. 
  Judging by the report, the intentions of the leadership of 
the Ministry of Defense are serious. But the practical 
implementation of the plans is being impeded by the absence of a 
proper legislative base. Let us hope that the new parliament 
will settle the arrears of its predecessor. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61178 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr003___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   12 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Yakovlev Views Election Results </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944F0247A Moscow OBSHCHAYA GAZETA in Russian No 22, 17 Dec 
93 p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 944F0247A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow OBSHCHAYA GAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Yegor Yakovlev, under the "Breakfast on the </F>
Grass" rubric: "Barbed Wire for Ourselves"] 
  [Text] What do I think about the words that sounded from 
the podium of the night rally in the Kremlin? "Russia, stop and 
think! You have lost your mind." I do not know about you, but I 
was deeply insulted by this statement. And although it came from 
a person who sometimes is considered nearly a forefather of our 
democracy, in my opinion he is no better than Zhirinovskiy. One 
set out to order Russia to lie down by his boot. The other also 
addresses her in the familiar form, and at the same time gives 
her a kick in the butt when she does something different than he 
would have wanted her to. 
  How wise were my people, who refused this time to give their 
support to those who, having found themselves in power, wanted 
to stay there in the manner of business as usual. The people 
have not forgotten unfulfilled promises. They have not forgiven 
mutual devouring. They did not hear from those in power in 
Russia how they intend to pull it out of the pit that they 
themselves had dug. In short, the people did not believe the 
electoral bloc where political cheats, the talentless, and the 
greedy freely mingled among unquestionably decent and respected 
people. 
  But why then, why have these wise people of mine have given 
their support to Zhirinovskiy? Well, because they have been 
very, very much treated like a doormat over the past two years. 
Now those who have been ardently arguing lately in favor of 
political expediency and the moral necessity of choosing between 
the lesser of two evils can congratulate themselves. This is the 
result. Evil in power is always more prominent than evil in 
opposition. 
  We had fun painting, and then cried when the count came in. 
The wave of fear of Zhirinovskiy's victory is rising higher and 
higher, hypnotizing and paralyzing. The democrats already are 
preparing to stock up on barbed wire for themselves. The 
newspapers, instead of congratulations on the New Year, 
congratulate us on a new monster. Everybody sees fascism walking 
across Russia behind every corner. 
  Come on! Calm down! Breathe through the nose. One has to be 
a 
good sport both in winning and in losing. 
  Yes, Zhirinovskiy's program is pro-fascist. There is no 
doubt 
about it. But neither is there any doubt that this program of 
imperial aspirations, propped by the palisade of shameless 
promises, cannot possibly be implemented in our time. 
  Of course, Zhirinovskiy's election triumph does not evoke 
anything other than sadness and painful contemplation. But are 
you so certain that the victory of Russia's Choice would have 
brought you what we have been deprived of for quite a while--a 
feeling of deep satisfaction? An absolute predominance of this 
bloc in the parliament would have meant that the executive 
branch, which now has freed itself from any checks and balances, 
would retain this indecent posture of free-for-all. Who will 
argue with it when a minister becomes a lawmaker, and a lawmaker 
a minister? 
  Many tears have also been shed on the subject of a split in 
democratic forces. It seems to me, though, that it would have 
been much worse had they come to the elections in a single 
formation. The latter would mean that all democrats, big and 
small, ignore the realities of life. Which has convinced us 
quite graphically that in the environment of festering crisis, 
only opposition forces can count on popular support. Had the 
democrats dared to take a more oppositionist stance, had they 
judged the events more critically, they would have gathered more 
votes. But had they all merged in one pro-government bloc, they 
would not have collected even those they have now. 
  So who needs to fan up these fears, this unstoppable funeral 
toll? I think it is not just the naive ones. 
  Some think that the more fear they pump into the public 
atmosphere, the sooner they will get back--no, not the votes, 
they have already gone to Zhirinovskiy--at least the benevolence 
of those who had rejected them at the elections. Others, having 
reached a sense of comfort when the executive branch prevailed 
everywhere and in everything, want to prolong this pleasure. 
That is why they are calling us to the barricades, seeing the 
latter as the most convenient place. Our foreign friends are 
also pumping up the fears. Of course, they absolutely need to: 
Otherwise, how can they explain their unquestioning support for 
everything that has been happening in Russia lately? 
  And what has been happening went precisely in accordance 
with 
the scenario that originated with the president and was 
supported by the ruling elite. Disbanding the parliament; 
elections that resembled roach races; and blindfolded approval 
of the Constitution. Except that the result turned out 
differently. Since all of this went according to a scenario, its 
authors and executors now have to make an effort to find 
interaction with those they have brought into the legislature. 
  Some people think that everything in life is prepaid. I 
think 
differently: One has to pay for everything. They assured us: We 
will violate the Constitution ever so slightly, disband the 
parliament somewhat, shoot at it a little bit, and then 
everything will be fine. It does not happen this way! You have 
to pay. It would not be too bad if only those who violated the 
Constitution and disbanded the parliament had to pick up the 
tab. Alas, most often it is all of us who have to pay. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61179 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr003___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   12 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   TRUD on Parliament's Work Preparations </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944E0348A Moscow TRUD in Russian 5 Jan 94 Night Edition pp 
1-2 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0348A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow TRUD </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Nikolay Kishkin: "What To Think About in the </F>
Duma: The First Post-Soviet Parliament Will Begin Its Work Next 
Week"] 
  [Text] The Central Electoral Commission of Russia has 
finally published the final results of the election. Behind us 
are the tension and confusion of the preelection weeks and the 
dissonance of the first, frequently excessively emotional 
postelection assessments. It is already possible to take a 
calmer look at what has happened and to think about what to 
expect from the new parliament and how its activity will be 
reflected in our life. 
  The first conclusion to be drawn from looking at the lists 
of 
elected deputies is perhaps simple: There were no winners in 
these elections. No single bloc and no single party received a 
majority in parliament or even an appreciable preponderance. The 
preelection predictions of almost all of them were two to five 
times greater than what they actually received. 
  Perhaps only Zhirinovskiy's LDPR [Liberal Democratic Party 
of 
Russia] (with all of its ambitions) was not counting on such an 
impressive number of votes. So the "Zhirinovskiy phenomenon" 
consists not in his victory (as it turned out, in terms of 
general results he did not have one) but in the unexpectedness 
of his success. Right after the fact, this success was explained 
by a multitude of factors, including extreme ones--from an 
affinity for neo-Nazi slogans on the part of a low-life and 
young "supermen" to mass "hypnosis" by the Kashpirovskiy method. 
But the essence probably consists in the fact that while there 
was no single reason for the success of the LDPR, finally what 
was decisive was the dissatisfaction of a considerable part of 
the population with the current situation and their standard of 
living. 
  Of course, questions immediately arise. Why did this voter 
give his vote to Zhirinovskiy and not, for example, to Travkin, 
who, with Govorukhin's help, was criticizing the government 
almost down to his last words, and, in spite of this, barely 
passed the 5 percent mark? Why did this voter not see the danger 
of the neo-Nazi slogans and recoil from their author? Why did he 
"buy" these promises which he knew could not be kept? And the 
answer is simple and obvious: Because several generations of our 
people have been educated in a belief in simple and clear 
solutions, and these are what Zhirinovskiy offered. After all, 
did we not believe at the beginning of almost any five-year plan 
that at the end of it there would be a burst of prosperity? Were 
there not many people who believed Nikita Sergeyevich when he 
said that communism would arrive in 20 years? So why not believe 
Vladimir Volfovich now? "Thanks to the party and the 
government"--this is not simply a slogan of "those" years; it is 
a level of belief in the idea that someone will give us 
something, it is the way of thinking of the masses of people. Of 
course, one can say that a certain part of the voters did not 
have enough political sophistication to figure all this out. 
Yes, one could say that, but it is wrong to blame the voters for 
this: For decades they had no political choice when they went to 
vote. And if now, without getting into the intricacies of 
politics, a person has made his choice at the level of a naive, 
everyday awareness, it is his choice, and now the politicians 
will have to deal with it. 
  The paradox of the recent elections consists in that while 
there are no winners, there are still losers. And, 
unfortunately, they are the reform blocs. If after counting on a 
majority in parliament they do not receive it, you cannot call 
it anything but a defeat. And now all parliamentary tactics will 
have to be arranged in a new way, based on existing realities. 
How will the breakdown of political forces in the Duma look and 
how will the blocs behave? 
  Let us stipulate at the outset that a final conclusion about 
the alignment of forces will not be possible until after there 
have been two or three votes on fundamental issues. In the first 
place, a considerable share of the deputies were elected as 
independents, they are not bound to any bloc, and therefore 
their propensities may be revealed only during the process of 
the parliament's work. In the second place, even those who ran 
under the banner of a specific bloc will certainly not 
necessarily vote on one question or another in line with this 
bloc's program. It is now possible to construct suppositions 
about the tactics of these blocs as a whole with a greater or 
lesser degree of probability. 
  Russia's Choice, according to initial estimates, will be the 
largest faction, including more than 100 deputies, which, 
however, is clearly not enough to confidently defend the course 
of reforms. Therefore this course can be maintained without 
special fluctuations only with cooperation with the Yavlinskiy, 
Shakhray, and Women of Russia blocs along with independent 
deputies. The leaders of the Russia's Choice bloc have already 
announced their readiness to interact in parliament "with all 
political forces." But even then a majority is not guaranteed. 
In search of this majority, the bloc will obviously be prepared 
to make partial concessions except for those that would mean a 
rejection of the reforms that have been started. And this 
presents a major difficulty, for even the blocs of Yavlinskiy 
and Shakhray, which are kindred in spirit, diverge from Gaydar's 
bloc fundamentally with respect to a number of economic 
problems, particularly concerning the speed of the reforms and 
social priorities. 
  An extremely impressive force is represented by the team of 
the Agrarian Party and the Communist Party of the Russian 
Federation, which together received more than 110. One can 
obviously argue about this, but I lump them together because, to 
be honest, I see no special differences in their political 
positions. Their orientation toward "socialist values" binds 
them firmly together in their voting. It is from this team 
(retaining reformist phraseology) that there may come proposals 
that essentially exacerbate inflation, such as price regulation, 
support for failing enterprises in the city and country--that 
is, the very proposals that could mean an end to the reforms and 
"Ukrainianization" of the Russian economy. The danger of such 
proposals is fairly great if one considers that on the surface 
they appear to be concern for the public good and can attract a 
certain part of the deputies. 
  Strange as it may be, with respect to a number of issues 
this 
team might be joined by the Democratic Party of Russia, which is 
headed by anticommunists Travkin and Govorukhin. Having assumed 
during the election campaign a tone that was not simply critical 
but abusive to the reformers, the government, and the president, 
these leaders sharply reduced the playing field. In general, 
judging from the election battles, the impression was created 
that Travkin's party is not going to parliament to work but to 
fight, unmask, and brand people. If this tone is assumed by the 
communists as well, nothing good awaits our parliament--we will 
simply get another copy of the Supreme Soviet and further 
heightening of the confrontation in society. 
  And what about Zhirinovskiy's party? I shall allow myself to 
make the suggestion that Vladimir Volfovich has kept all his 
ultranationalistic slogans that shocked Russia and the world "in 
reserve" and will not use them in parliament; he will save them 
for better times, hoping to gain all the power. He will quite 
probably regard the next two years as a campaign stretched over 
the time until the 1996 presidential elections. He will try to 
create for himself the image of the pike that lives in the lake 
to keep the small fish alert. From his standpoint it is a 
win-win situation. If things get better in the economy, he will 
take credit for it; he will say look: My party came to office 
and things were straightened out. If it becomes harder to 
live--again he has a ready explanation: You did not allow me to 
create a government and this is what you get. Although in his 
heart I think that the last thing Zhirinovskiy would like would 
be to end up in government: Because then he would have to be 
responsible for everything he promised. Incidentally, he is not 
being offered a position in the government, of course: That 
would be too much of a price to pay to see how a soap bubble 
filled with empty promises might burst... 
  Another scenario looks surprising but it is worth 
mentioning: 
The LDPR could end up as the least stable parliamentary 
formation. During the election campaign Zhirinovskiy made one 
tactical error: In response to the question of how the deputies 
of his party would vote in the Duma, he said: The way their 
leader tells them to. As long as Vladimir Volfovich was playing 
the role of a steamship and pulling several dozen completely 
unknown politicians into parliament, he was forgiven everything. 
But now, looking at the list of deputies of the LDPR, you would 
think that they would not be willing to play the role of extras 
while their leader is bucking for president. A split in the 
party has already been noted: Zhirinovskiy's former close ally 
and his candidate for vice president, A. Zavidiy, announced that 
he was going to break with the boss, stop financing him, and 
lead his people away from him. So the LDPR faction (and it 
includes about 70 people) with various votes could have the most 
unexpected versions of forming a bloc. 
  And so the new parliament will begin its work in a couple of 
days. What are our hopes and concerns in this connection? 
  We have but one hope, and it is that from the first days all 
the political forces will reject confrontation and political 
accusations against one another and will understand that this 
path has already been followed to the end and has led to nothing 
but trouble. It has led to bloodshed. Our hope is that the 
deputies have come to the Duma to work, and that means, above 
all, not to seek that which separates them but places where they 
come together, decisions that are mutually acceptable, even if 
they involve concessions. If they approach things reasonably 
they must understand that there simply is no other path. With 
the current alignment of forces not only no single faction but 
not even any conceivable combination of them can produce a 
majority. And this means that with any other approach the 
parliament might not be able to decide anything at all. 
  And we are alarmed by the still remaining possibility, 
albeit 
theoretical, of rejecting the course of reforms with a 
subsequent collapse of the entire economy. Parliament could 
adopt some antireform law, but it would be extremely difficult 
to do so: In the first place, any draft laws that in one way or 
another affect expenditures from the federal budget may be 
submitted only with a recommendation from the government. So any 
populist resolutions to increase expenditures without actually 
covering them will be practically impossible to pass. In the 
second place, any law adopted by the Duma will have to be 
monitored by the Council of the Federation, whose disapproval 
will have to be overcome not by a simple majority of Duma votes 
but by two-thirds. In the third place, the president, who even 
after the elections confirmed the unchanging course of the 
reforms, still has the right to a veto, which also can be 
overridden only by two-thirds. And proponents of reforms and 
those who support them do have a third of the votes in the Duma. 
True, further advancement of the reforms will require new laws 
that work in their direction which the deputies are quite 
capable of blocking. Proponents of reforms have only one way of 
preventing this: working constantly with the deputies, 
especially the centrist part of them, convincing them that they 
are right and, with all the difficulty of the situation, showing 
unwavering concern for the social direction of the reforms. 
  It is assumed that the Federal Assembly will begin its work 
with a joint session of the two chambers at which they will hear 
the message from the president. Then they will have to adopt 
their regulations, a draft of which has been drawn up by the 
commission on legislative proposals, and elect speakers and 
their deputies. We are no longer threatened by the return of a 
"chief of all deputies" like Khasbulatov. There will simply be 
no such position; each chamber will have its own chairman whose 
role will be to conduct the meetings and take charge of the 
daily routine. And he will have no power over the parliamentary 
committees. The speaker of the Duma, his two deputies (all three 
from different factions), and delegates from the factions and 
groups with voting power in proportion to their numbers will 
make up a Conference for purely organizational 
business--determining the agenda, convening extra sessions, 
sending draft laws to committees, etc. The Conference will make 
none of the decisions the Presidium of the Supreme Soviet 
essentially allowed itself. 
  The question of the speaker of the Duma has already been 
hotly discussed in the press, even in spite of this figure's 
obvious weakness as compared to the recent past. There are many 
in the running--each faction would like to see its own 
representative. Many well-known politicians would be willing to 
occupy this position: Even if the speaker has basically 
representative functions, they allow him to be constantly in 
view, which is of no small importance for politicians who are 
working out far-reaching plans. At various times interest in 
this post has been expressed by S. Shakhray and V. Zhirinovskiy; 
V. Lukin would not reject it; and Russia's Choice would not be 
against recommending S. Kovalev. It will not be possible, of 
course, to decide on a mutually acceptable candidacy at the 
session itself. This will be done through preliminary 
consultations, which are proceeding with difficulty so far. It 
seems that none of the influential factions will achieve 
success. It will be necessary to agree on some neutral figure 
who has not plainly announced his political sympathies. We will 
not guess--there is not long left to wait. 
  Now the main thing is to get ready for productive work so 
that parliamentarism in Russia will finally acquire features 
that are attractive to society and will actually become a real 
means of creating a new Russia. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61180 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr003___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   12 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Constitutional Democrats' Squabbles Viewed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944F0246A Moscow ROSSIYA in Russian No 51, 15-21 Dec 93 
(Signed to press 14 Dec 93) p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 944F0246A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ROSSIYA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Report by Nikolay Polyakov: "Constitutional Democrats of </F>
National Salvation"] 
  [Text] A few days ago in a conference hall of Rossiya 
hotel, a theatrical production with the intriguing title "The 
14th Congress of the Constitutional Democratic Party" 
(Astafyev's) took place. Unfortunately, we have to register the 
fact that the production went unnoticed by the theater-going 
public--no playbills, and the tickets were distributed only 
among those who have proven in deed their loyalty to the idea of 
"national salvation" in the National Salvation Front [FNS] 
version. About 30 such persons have indeed been found. The 
congress was preceded by a thorough purge of the party, 
conducted after the Central Electoral Commission had 
disqualified a considerable number of signatures collected with 
the help of the Communist Party, Baburin's ROS [Russian 
All-People's Union], Nevzorov's Ours movement, and other kindred 
organizations. The first step was the unmasking of the "gang of 
four," headed by Dmitriy Rogozin, which consisted of members of 
the Constitutional Democratic Party (the Party of the People's 
Freedom) Central Committee, who were expelled from the 
organization "for losing touch with the party." 
  A listless fight had been going on in the cadet 
[Constitutional Democratic Party] party for a year between the 
supporters of the National Salvation Front and its opponents, 
who considered cooperation with communists impossible in 
principle. The latter congregated in the Renewal Union and the 
Congress of Russian Communities. 
  The events of September-October 1993 sharply changed the 
situation. Having agreed to consider Boris Yeltsin's actions 
unconstitutional, the "Astafyevites" and "Rogozinites" disagreed 
on a main point: The way out of the crisis. And while the former 
continued to follow the line of irreconcilable opposition, the 
latter, having encountered the inability of the Supreme Soviet's 
leadership to offer a constructive alternative, bet their chips 
on the Federation Council and the tough position of the regions. 
The military action at Ostankino and the White House drew the 
line on this discussion. At a hastily convened plenum, Mikhail 
Astafyev was asked to brief his colleagues on his activities in 
the FNS leadership and to pay the bills by giving up the 
position of Central Committee chairman. 
  Mikhail Astafyev rejected the accusations directed at him, 
and characterized the activities of his opponents as "an attempt 
to split the party on the eve of the elections." 
  After numerous violations of procedural matters and 
manipulation of the votes of the absent Central Committee 
members, delegations of regional party organizations left the 
meeting hall in protest. As is known, however, a sacred place is 
never empty, and at the next get-together, about 20 people who 
have never been cadet party members gathered in the hall. Among 
them were persons of certain renown--Artem Artemov and Nikolay 
Andrianov, members of the FNS executive committee. To the 
question when these gentlemen had managed to join the cadet 
party, Mikhail Astafyev answered without blinking an eye that it 
had happened between the two "conferences." That figures. After 
the suspension of FNS' activities, its membership began 
converging in droves under the Constitutional Democratic Party's 
banners. Will Mr. Astafyev continue to claim now successorship 
to the party of P. Milyukov, P. Struve, and V. Nabokov? 
According to Aleksandr Solzhenitsyn, it was the cadet party that 
expressed the interests of liberal intelligentsia, thus clearing 
the way for the Bolsheviks by its radicalism. Future generations 
do have something to blame them for. But not to this extent. 
  A necessary afterword. 
  In January 1994 the supporters of constitutional democracy 
are convening for their next congress. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61181 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr003___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   12 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Sobchak on Russian Statehood, Presidential Plans </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944F0246B Moscow ROSSIYA in Russian No 51, 15-21 Dec 93 
(Signed to press 14 Dec 93) p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 944F0246B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ROSSIYA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> Interview with Mayor of St. Petersburg Anatoliy Sobchak, by </F>
Pavel Yablonskiy; place and date not given: "Anatoliy Sobchak: 
`It Is Not Easy To Bring Oneself To Become a Kamikaze'"] 
  [Text] In reply to the question who may become the 
next president of Russia, Gavriil Popov stayed away from 
personalities. He explained that it is much more important to 
define the set of qualities that a contender for this job must 
possess. Popov put at the top of this list experience of running 
an individual region. It is hard to argue with this. In the 
United States, too, in most cases the president is a politician 
who has sat in a governor's chair. How many such people do we 
have, with names familiar to most? Boris Nemtsov, Yuriy Luzhkov, 
Anatoliy Sobchak.... It is true that the image of the latter has 
faded somewhat since we saw him first at the USSR Congress of 
People's Deputies. But, as they say, it is not over yet. 
Society's moods are changeable.... 
  [Yablonskiy] Anatoliy Aleksandrovich, to what extent were 
you 
aware of the preparations for the president's Edict No. 1400 of 
21 September? 
  [Sobchak] I anticipated it, although the precise date was a 
surprise for me. I learned of this edict from television, just 
like everybody else. Such decisions had to be made sooner or 
later. Not long before this edict, the Supreme Soviet handed the 
president another set of amendments to the Constitution. For all 
practical purposes, they abolished the office of the president, 
and there was no doubt that the Congress would pass these 
amendments to the Constitution. This way, they would have dealt 
with the president without any impeachment. 
  [Yablonskiy] Have you ever advised the president to take 
this 
step? 
  [Sobchak] This issue has never been discussed directly. At 
the presidential council we always discuss the situation and 
propose some or other way to resolve it. Immediately after the 
Constitutional Conference, when three-quarters of its 
participants approved the draft Basic Law, I proposed 
immediately to move toward holding a referendum or to attempt to 
bring the question of approving the new Constitution at the 
Congress of People's Deputies, putting only this one issue on 
the agenda. Otherwise, the president himself would have to make 
a decision on calling for early elections. 
  [Yablonskiy] As a jurist, however, do you see here some 
things that are incorrect from the standpoint of law? 
  [Sobchak] During a period of transition, things that are 
incorrect from the standpoint of law happen all the time. In 
1991 the Congress practically unanimously voted to strip USSR 
people's deputies of their powers, although it had no power to 
make such a decision.... People's deputies voted not only for 
themselves, but sometimes for up to 10 people, which makes any 
decision ever passed by the parliament, or even the existence of 
this body, questionable. 
  We have a lot of things that are not legitimate. This is 
inevitable, because we live by a mixed law, 90 percent of which 
is still a holdover from the communist era. 
  [Yablonskiy] Were you against the disintegration of the 
Soviet Union? 
  [Sobchak] Yes. 
  [Yablonskiy] In your opinion, does Russia face the same 
problem now? 
  [Sobchak] The situation in the Soviet Union was different. 
Russia is not facing a problem of disintegration today. Here is 
why. All the former republics of the Soviet Union have had a 
taste of independence and now want to unite. They understand 
that even such a strong power as Ukraine cannot survive alone. 
  [Yablonskiy] But purely Russian regions now are talking 
about 
seceding from Russia. Are you not concerned that.... 
  [Sobchak] A trend is developing of disintegrating into 
individual fiefdoms? This process does present, of course, a 
certain danger. But if the federal government acts firmly and 
decisively, this will not happen. I think it would suffice 
simply to stop allocating money from the federal budget to any 
region, and it will immediately collapse financially. 
  [Yablonskiy] Anatoliy Aleksandrovich, what is Russia? What 
kind of country is it--neither a Soviet republic nor the 
sovereign RSFSR? 
  [Sobchak] I believe that Russia ceased to exist as a state 
in 
October 1917. And did not exist until October 1991; it had been 
completely integrated into the structures of the unitary Soviet 
Union, just like all the other republics. Such system existed 
only for administrative convenience, keeping track of CPSU 
members, and organizing party committees. Here are two examples 
that show that in essence the Russian state did not exist. In 
1922 the Politburo of the Russian Communist (Bolshevik) Party's 
Central Committee makes a decision to transfer to Ukraine 
Russian territories with centers in Kharkov, Odessa, Yuzovka 
(Donetsk), and Kherson. With this wording: "For the purpose of 
strengthening the proletarian stratum and influence in Ukraine, 
to make these Russian provinces part of Ukraine." The second 
decision: in 1954, under Khrushchev--on transferring the Crimea 
to Ukraine. Again, it is the party leadership that makes the 
decision--not other bodies, even though they exist for the sake 
of formality. What kind of state is it? There was no Russian 
state. This period is a black hole in its history. The Russian 
state was restored only in 1991.... 
  [Yablonskiy] But this time within the borders of some 
Russian 
SFSR [Soviet Federated Socialist Republic].... 
  [Sobchak] Yes, but on a different basis. I believe that 
today 
Russia cannot raise the issue of border revisions, because it 
will inevitably lead to a war. It is in the interests of Russia 
today to ensure normal development within the RSFSR's borders. I 
do not preclude the possibility, however, that in time many 
Russian territories that have been transferred to Ukraine, 
Kazakhstan, and Belarus will return to Russia. The historic 
trend in this respect is very clear. 
  [Yablonskiy] You had said that it is necessary to close the 
borders with the Baltics. One gets the impression, however, that 
you want to preserve this unstable equilibrium, with the Russian 
border seemingly being here, and at the same time not here.... 
So what do we do about the border? 
  [Sobchak] I believe that the border should be closed. We can 
use for this purpose the troops being withdrawn from the Baltics 
and Europe--deploy them along the border and shut off 
uncontrolled exports of material valuables from Russia. We need 
to establish normal customs ties and movement of goods between 
Russia and the countries of the former USSR. A considerable 
number of crimes here--between 60 and 80 percent--are committed 
by persons from the Caucasus region, most of whom are citizens 
of other countries. They come here, commit crimes, and then go 
back to their republics, and you cannot initiate criminal 
proceedings against them. This by itself is a good reason to 
close the borders. If we have economic agreements with our 
neighbors on the freedom of movement of goods, we have to put in 
place such customs and border controls that would check the 
legality of movement of people from one republic to another. 
  [Yablonskiy] Speaking of economic cooperation between 
countries of "a different caliber," can one say seriously that 
Russia has lost political influence after the disintegration of 
the COMECON and the USSR? 
  [Sobchak] It depends how you define "political influence." 
There is influence that is exerted purposefully, crudely, 
visibly.... Such crude influence is becoming a thing of the 
past. But there also is another kind. When people cooperate, 
communicate well, and know one another, it is a completely 
different kind of influence. One should not be afraid of it. And 
one should exert influence. For instance, the conflict in 
Yugoslavia could have been stopped had influential arbiters, 
with whom the country had traditional and very strong ties, been 
brought in in time. It was Yugoslavia's back luck that Russia, 
and others among its traditional friends, were at the time busy 
with their own affairs. 
  [Yablonskiy] Do you intend to run for president? 
  [Sobchak] I do not intend to answer that question until the 
presidential election campaign begins. When it is announced, I 
will make my decision. I do think that today being the president 
of Russia is a kamikaze job. And it is not easy to decide for 
yourself whether it is worth it to be a kamikaze. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61182 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr003___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   12 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Liberal Democratic Party Program, Charter </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944F0240A Moscow LDPR Press Release in Russian Dec 93 pp 4-15 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0240A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow LDPR Press Release </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Texts of Liberal Democratic Party of Russia "Program" and </F>
"Charter," received by FBIS 23 December 1993] 
  [Text] 
<H5>  PROGRAM OF THE LIBERAL DEMOCRATIC PARTY OF RUSSIA </H5>
<H5>  I. GENERAL PROVISIONS </H5>
  The purpose of the Liberal Democratic Party of Russia [LDPR] 
is to create in the country conditions for the unfettered 
practical expression of the creative abilities of the people 
populating the country and assiduous use of our country's 
natural resources. 
  The LDPR program is a program of our society's development 
in 
accordance with its needs without any outside interference. 
  A member of the LDPR is a person who does not separate his 
personal interests from those of the motherland; 
  --he is a creator, making a contribution to fulfillment of 
the motherland's priority goals, which are aimed at preserving 
peace and raising the living standard of the entire population 
of our vast country. 
  The LDPR's political activity is aimed at restoring by 
peaceful means and preserving the Russian state built over 
centuries; restoring and protecting the country's borders; 
ensuring inside the country peaceful cohabitation of all the 
peoples populating it--large and small--with the right to 
preserve traditions and customs, develop national culture, and 
exercise freedom of conscience. Russia is a motherland without 
any kind of discrimination. 
<H5>  II. DOMESTIC POLICY </H5>
  Domestic policy is implemented by the executive branch, 
headed by the president, on the basis of observing the law and 
freedom of entrepreneurial activities. 
  Strict observance of the law is the main guarantee of 
establishing and maintaining order, an immutable condition for 
building and functioning of a law-based state. 
  The internal system is based on the 
administrative-territorial principle: the basic unit is the 
province (oblast). There shall be no national state entities on 
the territory of Russia. 
  Legislation is enacted by the Parliament (State Duma), 
formed 
by holding elections on the territorial principle. The 
parliament adopts laws, adopts a Constitution, and amends it if 
necessary. 
  The entirety of executive power is vested in the head of 
state--the president, elected by citizens eligible to vote, 
through a secret ballot. The president appoints the prime 
minister, who forms the cabinet of ministers, which is approved 
by the president. The president has the right to disband the 
parliament, call for new elections, and veto laws. The president 
is answerable to the parliament in the event he commits 
anticonstitutional actions. 
  The judiciary is independent from the legislative and 
executive branches. All citizens are equal before law and enjoy 
equal rights. 
<H5>  III. THE ECONOMY </H5>
  The goal of the LDPR's economic policy is to create a life 
of 
dignity and well-being for every inhabitant of 
Russia--gradually, without "revolutionary leaps" or cataclysms. 
This is impossible to accomplish by "decrees from the top": This 
task can only be accomplished by uniting society and providing 
everyone the opportunity to work in peace and creatively, to 
support themselves and their family, while enjoying life. 
  Only a central power, and only with active and concerted 
help 
from the regions, can put in motion the production flywheels of 
such an immense country as Russia. Russia possesses the 
necessary resources--raw material, land, industrial, and human, 
including intellectual--to enable it to develop its own economy 
fast, without any prompting or enslaving credits from "outside." 
  It is necessary to ensure for everyone the opportunity to 
participate in production. Unprofitable enterprises and those 
producing output that is not in demand should be retargeted and 
provided with resources to produce goods in short supply and 
spare parts for our equipment. The population should not 
experience unemployment or live in fear of it. 
  Wages should be no lower than the sustenance minimum. Highly 
skilled specialists should get higher wages that correspond to 
the complexity, difficulty, and quality of their labor. 
  At the initial stage, privatization should only extend to 
small enterprises and the service sphere. Enterprises that are 
being privatized cannot be sold to outsiders--they must be 
transferred to the ownership of the collective. Only at a later 
stage should it be permitted to sell them on the open market. 
  Housing should be transferred free of charge to the 
ownership 
of the people living in it. Those on the waiting lists should be 
given an opportunity to purchase housing on credit with 
subsequent repayment of its cost to the state over 25-50 years, 
interest-free, beginning with the fourth year of occupancy. 
  At the initial stage, land remains the property of the 
state. 
Those wishing to do so may have land on a long-term lease (25-50 
years) without prepayment, with right to inherit, but with the 
mandatory condition that the land will lie fallow, and that the 
lessor with work it and produce agricultural output. 
  Profitable kolkhozes and sovkhozes are equated in their 
land-use rights to private lessors. All unused land should be 
returned to the state. 
  All kinds of speculative reselling must be stopped. 
  Well-organized production and uninterrupted material supply 
of industrial enterprises in the state sector with the resources 
necessary for production will allow for uninterrupted and 
profitable work. At the same time, state enterprises' output 
will be sold at fixed prices. Key economic sectors in industry, 
agriculture, and science needed to raise the level of production 
and quality of goods in other production sectors will be 
provided targeted financing out of tax revenue. 
  Providing agriculture with the needed equipment supplied by 
state enterprises, as well as fuel and power resources, state 
assistance in setting up local food-processing industry, and 
preferential rates for transportation of agricultural output 
will enable the products produced by the arduous effort of the 
rural population to be fully utilized. 
  Export of surplus resources with state assistance and under 
state control will increase the inflow of hard currency into the 
country. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61183 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr003___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   12 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Legislation on Use of Foreign Manpower </TI></H3>
<H4>   Edict </H4>
<F P=102> 944F0237A Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA in Russian 23 Dec 93 p 5 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0237A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> ["Edict of the President of the Russian Federation No. 2146, </F>
dated 16 December 1993, On the Recruitment and Use of Foreign 
Labor in the Russian Federation"] 
  [Text] With a view to implementing a state policy of the 
Russian Federation with regard to recruiting foreign labor and 
ensuring the priority right of citizens of the Russian 
Federation to fill vacant jobs, and in keeping with Edict of the 
President of the Russian Federation No. 1598, dated 7 October 
1993, "On Legal Regulation During the Period of Phased 
Constitutional Reform in the Russian Federation," I resolve: 
  1. To approve the appended Statute on the Recruitment and 
Use 
of Foreign Labor in the Russian Federation. 
  2. To establish that a fee amounting to the minimum monthly 
wage established by the legislation of the Russian Federation 
shall be collected from employers for the issuance of permits to 
recruit foreign labor for each recruited foreign employee. The 
funds collected shall be credited to the revenue side of the 
relevant budgets. 
  3. To establish that certificates of the right to labor 
activities shall be issued free of charge to foreign citizens 
hired by employers within the quota of the recruited foreign 
labor. 
  Fees in amounts established by the Federal Migration Service 
of Russia, jointly with the Ministry of Finance of the Russian 
Federation, which ensure the recovery of costs associated with 
the issuance of certificates, shall be collected from employers 
for the issuance of certificates of the right to labor 
activities to foreign citizens in cases in which the processing 
of permits is not required. 
  4. Employers shall be held accountable through procedures 
established by the legislation of the Russian Federation for 
recruiting foreign labor without the requisite permits. 
  Foreign citizens who have entered the Russian Federation 
with 
a view to engaging in professional activities and have been 
hired in violation of the Statute on the Recruitment and Use of 
Foreign Labor in the Russian Federation shall be subject to 
deportation from the Russian Federation by the organs of the 
Ministry of Internal Affairs of the Russian Federation at the 
expense of the employer. 
  5. Employers who, as of the moment of the issuance of the 
present edict, have labor arrangements with foreign citizens 
temporarily staying on the territory of the Russian Federation 
shall bring them into compliance with the Statute on the 
Recruitment and Use of Foreign Labor in the Russian Federation 
within three months. 
  6. The present edict shall be submitted to the Federal 
Assembly of the Russian Federation for consideration. 
  7. The present edict shall take effect at the moment of 
signing. 
  [Signed] President of the Russian Federation B. Yeltsin 
  Moscow, the Kremlin 
  16 December 1993 
  No. 2146 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61184 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr003___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   12 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Legislation on Use of Foreign Manpower </TI></H3>
<H4>   Statute </H4>
<F P=102> 944F0237B Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA in Russian 23 Dec 93 p 5 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0237B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> ["Statute on the Recruitment and Use of Foreign Labor in the </F>
Russian Federation," introduced by Edict of the Russian 
Federation President No. 2146, dated 16 December 1993] 
  [Text] 1. The present Statute shall set forth conditions 
and procedures for the issuance of permits to recruit foreign 
labor in the Russian Federation, as well as certificates of the 
right to labor activities on the territory of the Russian 
Federation to foreign citizens. 
  2. The issuance of permits to recruit foreign labor 
(henceforth referred to as permits) and the monitoring of their 
use shall be effected by the Federal Migration Service of Russia 
on the suggestions of the organs of executive power of republics 
belonging to the Russian Federation, krays, oblasts, the 
autonomous oblast, autonomous okrugs, and cities with federal 
status. 
  3. The permits shall establish quotas for the recruitment of 
a certain number of foreign citizens, as a whole and by 
professional groups, who are hired by employers to work on the 
territories of republics belonging to the Russian Federation, 
krays, oblasts, the autonomous oblast, autonomous okrugs, and 
cities with federal status. 
  4. The permits may be issued to Russian legal entities, 
enterprises with foreign investment operating on the territory 
of the Russian Federation, as well as particular Russian and 
foreign individuals and stateless persons who reside on the 
territory of the Russian Federation and use the labor of hired 
employees in their personal economic units (henceforth referred 
to as employers). In the process, the duration of professional 
activities of the recruited foreign citizens shall not exceed 
the duration of validity of the permit. 
  5. An employer shall submit the following to the Federal 
Migration Service of Russia in order to obtain a permit: 
  a petition; 
  a proposal (findings) by the relevant organs of executive 
power of a republic belonging to the Russian Federation, kray, 
oblast, autonomous oblast, autonomous okrug, or city with 
federal status, substantiating the feasibility of the 
recruitment and use of foreign labor by the employer; 
  a draft labor contract, or other documents, confirming a 
preliminary agreement with foreign citizens, or partners from 
abroad, concerning the intention and terms for the recruitment 
of foreign employees. In the process, the terms, wages, and 
occupational safety for foreign citizens, and their social 
welfare and insurance, shall be governed by the norms of the 
legislation of the Russian Federation, taking into account the 
specifics envisioned by state-to-state and 
government-to-government agreements of the Russian Federation 
with foreign countries. 
  Enterprises, offices, and organizations reporting to the 
Ministry of Defense of the Russian Federation shall also submit, 
in order to receive permits, statements of consent by the 
Ministry of Defense of the Russian Federation for the 
recruitment of foreign employees. 
  6. Proposals (findings) by organs of executive power of 
republics belonging to the Russian Federation, krays, oblasts, 
the autonomous oblast, autonomous okrugs, and cities with 
federal status, concerning the recruitment of foreign labor by 
employers shall be based on the principle of the priority right 
of Russian citizens to fill vacant jobs, and shall be prepared 
taking into account the availability of equivalent labor on the 
territory in question and the absence of an opportunity to 
redistribute labor resources from other regions of the country, 
the provision of equal terms and wages for foreign employees 
compared to the citizens of the Russian Federation, and the 
prevention of any unfavorable impact on the employment 
conditions for Russian citizens due to the hiring of foreign 
citizens. 
  7. Decisions to issue permits shall be made by the Federal 
Migration Service of Russia within 30 days of the filing of the 
documents envisioned in point 5 of the present statute by the 
employer. If an expert review is required in order to make a 
decision, the decision shall be made within 15 days after the 
receipt of expert findings, but no later than 45 days from the 
date of the filing of the documents indicated. 
  A substantiated denial of the issuance of a permit shall be 
forwarded, in writing, to the employer within five days after 
the decision to deny the issuance of a permit is made. 
  8. As a rule, permits shall be issued for a term of up to 
one 
year. Based on a substantiated request from an employer, the 
effect of a permit may be extended after it expires, but for no 
longer than one year. 
  When the validity of a permit is extended, a fee in the 
amount envisioned for the issuance of a permit shall be 
collected from the employer. 
  9. A permit shall not be transferred to other employers. 
Foreign employees recruited on the basis of the permit may not 
be transferred to work for another employer. 
  10. A permit shall indicate: the name of the organ issuing 
the permit, the name and address of the employer to whom the 
permit has been issued and information on its state 
registration, the territory on which the permit applies, the 
number and breakdown of the recruited employees by profession, 
their country of origin or regular residence, grounds for the 
issuance of the permit, its duration of validity, and other data 
in keeping with the format given in Appendix No. 1. 
  A permit shall be signed by the executive official empowered 
by the chief of the Federal Migration Service of Russia, and is 
certified with a seal. 
  11. Employers who have received permits to recruit foreign 
labor must, within one month, forward to the Federal Migration 
Service of Russia information on the signing of labor contracts 
with foreign employees on the basis of the permits. 
  12. In the event that an employer violates the conditions of 
the present statute indicated in the permit, as well as the 
legislation of the Russian Federation, as a result of which the 
rights of foreign employees are infringed upon, the Federal 
Migration Service may suspend the effect of the permit until the 
violations that have been allowed to occur are rectified, or 
give instructions to rectify them by a certain date. In the 
event of a failure to rectify the violations before the 
specified date, the permit may be revoked by a decision of the 
Federal Migration Service of Russia. 
  An employer may be deprived of the right to use a permit, 
without notice, for an action, or a failure to act, that results 
in the danger of death for people or injury to their health. 
  13. An issued permit shall cease to be valid, regardless of 
the expiration of the term for which it was issued, in the event 
that an employer discontinues his economic operations or 
implements measures to reduce the number or authorized 
complement of employees. 
  14. A foreign citizen who has entered the Russian Federation 
with a view to engaging in professional activities may work for 
hire on the territory of the Russian Federation only if he holds 
a certificate of the right to labor activities issued in his 
name on the basis of a permit received by the employer, in 
keeping with the format given in Appendix No. 2. 
  In cases envisaged by point 16 of the present statute, 
certificates of the right to labor activities in the territory 
of the Russian Federation shall be issued to foreign citizens 
without permits being processed. 
  15. Certificates of the right to labor activities shall be 
issued to foreign citizens working as hired labor for an 
employer within the limits of the number of recruited foreign 
labor established in a permit, as well as in the cases 
envisioned by point 16 of the present statute, by the 
territorial organs of the Federal Migration Service of Russia, 
in response to a petition in keeping with the format given in 
Appendix No. 3, provided that a foreign citizen agrees. 
  16. Foreign citizens from among highly skilled specialists 
shall be recruited on the basis of the certificate of the right 
to labor activities without permits being processed in the event 
of being hired by employers to work at enterprises with foreign 
investment operating on the territory of the Russian Federation 
in the positions of enterprise managers, their deputies, and 
chiefs of divisions (including separate divisions) of these 
enterprises. 
  17. The Federal Migration Service of Russia shall forward, 
to 
the relevant diplomatic missions and consular establishments of 
the Russian Federation abroad, information concerning the 
permits issued, which shall constitute grounds for the receipt, 
by foreign citizens, of the entry and exit visas with the right 
to be hired for work. 
  18. The compulsory procedures for the issuance of permits, 
as 
well as certificates of the right to labor activities, 
established by the present statute shall not apply to foreign 
citizens who, in keeping with the legislation of the Russian 
Federation: 
  have been officially recognized as refugees; 
  permanently reside on the territory of the Russian 
Federation; 
  have been granted asylum on the territory of the Russian 
Federation; 
  have filed petitions to be granted refugee status and have 
been issued temporary residence permits. 
  Nor shall the aforementioned procedures apply to foreign 
citizens: 
  science and cultural personalities working on the territory 
of the Russian Federation at establishments created in keeping 
with state-to-state agreements; 
  staff of diplomatic and consular establishments, as well as 
organizations enjoying diplomatic status and located on the 
territory of the Russian Federation; 
  religious personalities who engage in professional 
activities 
on the territory of the Russian Federation in officially 
registered religious organizations and societies; 
  crew members of Russian seagoing and river vessels; 
  students in production training during breaks within the 
framework of the curricula of Russian educational establishments 
of higher professional education; 
  correspondents and journalists accredited in the Russian 
Federation; 
  lecturers and instructors invited to offer lecture courses 
and do other work at Russian academies and educational 
establishments of higher professional education; 
  individuals for whom different job placement procedures are 
set forth in state-to-state and government-to-government 
agreements of the Russian Federation with foreign countries. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61185 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr003___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   12 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Legislation on Use of Foreign Manpower </TI></H3>
<H4>   Appendixes to Statute </H4>
<F P=102> 944F0237C Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA in Russian 23 Dec 93 p 5 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0237C </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Appendixes Nos. 1, 2, and 3 to the Statute on the </F>
Recruitment and Use of Foreign Labor in the Russian Federation 
introduced by edict of the president of the Russian Federation, 
dated 16 December 1993, No. 2,146 On the Recruitment and Use of 
Foreign Labor in the Russian Federation] 
  [Text] 
  Appendix No. 1 to the Statute on the Recruitment and 
Use of Foreign Labor in the Russian Federation 
  Federal Migration Service of Russia PERMIT to 
Recruit Foreign Labor 
  No. dated 
199 
  Employer 
  (for legal entities: name, address, 
  registration number, date of registration; 
  for individuals: first and last names, 
patronymic, 
  passport particulars, home address) 
  Territory in which the permit applies 

    Number of workers and specialists recruited 

    Jobs broken down by profession 


      Country of origin (regular residence) 
  Code 
  Grounds for the issuance of the permit 
  (proposal by territorial organ of executive 
power) 
  (name of foreign partner, contract) 
  Permit valid from (day, month, year) to 
(day, month, year) 
  Special conditions 


      Signature 
  Seal 

    Appendix No. 2 to the Statute on the Recruitment and 
Use of Foreign Labor in the Russian Federation 
  CERTIFICATE OF THE RIGHT TO LABOR ACTIVITY 
  In keeping with the Statute on the Recruitment and Use of 
Foreign Labor in the Russian Federation, citizen of 
  (country of origin) 
  Last and first names, patronymic 
  information on the national passport 
  shall be granted the right to work (extend work) for 
(with) 
  (name, address, number and date of registration 
for legal entities, or the last and first names, patronymic, 
passport particulars, and address for individuals) 

    for the period from (day, month, year) to 
(day, month, year) 

    Territory in which the permit applies 

    Certificate is valid for professional activities with the 
employer indicated as 

    (profession, position) 

    Issued by (name of the territorial organ of the 
Federal Migration Service of Russia) 
  Date 
  Signature 
  Seal 

    Appendix No. 3 to the Statute on the Recruitment and 
Use of Foreign Labor in the Russian Federation (name 
of the territorial organ of the Federal Migration 
Service of Russia) 
  PETITION TO ISSUE CERTIFICATE OF THE RIGHT TO LABOR 
ACTIVITY 
  Data on the foreign citizen 
  First and last names, patronymic 
  Citizenship 
  Address of permanent domicile 

    Date of birth 
  Sex (male, female) 
  Residence permit (yes, no) 
  (by whom issued and until when) 
  Grounds (number and date permit issued) 
  Certificate of the right to labor activities requested: 
  for the period from (day, month, year) to 
(day, month, year) 
  for (with) 
  (name, address, number and date of registration 
for 
  legal entities or the last and first 
names, patronymic, 
  passport particulars, and address for 
individuals) 
  Location of work (territory) 

    Type of work performed 

    Signature of employer 
  Signature of citizen 
  Date 
  Seal 
  Date 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-61186 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr003___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-003 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   12 January 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Foreign Intelligence Official on Activities, Doctrine </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944F0239A Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA in Russian 23 Dec 93 pp 
1, 6 </F>

<F P=103> 944F0239A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Vyacheslav Trubnikov, first deputy director </F>
of the Russian Foreign Intelligence Service, conducted by Andrey 
Poleshchuk: "Vyacheslav Trubnikov: `There Is No Great Difference 
Between a Journalist and an Intelligence Agent': The First 
Deputy Director of the Russian Foreign Intelligence Service Once 
Worked Under a Journalistic Cover"] 
  [Text] Vyacheslav Trubnikov was born on 25 April 1944 
in Irkutsk. However, he does not consider himself Siberian, 
because his family, which had been evacuated to Irkutsk, 
returned to Moscow six months after he was born. After 
graduating from high school Vyacheslav Trubnikov enrolled in the 
Institute of International Relations, upon graduation from which 
he entered an intelligence school. He regards himself as an 
"absolutely professional" intelligence officer: "I have no other 
specialty, no other profession. It is my full-time job, and one 
that I truly love. I feel that the choice I made has proven to 
be 100 percent correct. Despite the difficulties and demands of 
this profession. Despite the fact it leaves almost no time for 
family. It is a way of life." 
  V. Trubnikov's wife is also a graduate of the Moscow 
State Institute of International Relations. Unfortunately the 
Trubnikovs' oldest was killed in 1989. Their daughter is in the 
tenth grade. 
  Vyacheslav Trubnikov speaks English and Hindi. He spent 
15 years in South Asia, in India, Bangladesh, Nepal and 
Pakistan. He considers himself an Indophile to the core. In his 
free time, if his eyes do not hurt too much, he likes to read 
and watch movies. 
  In his opinion, interviewing an intelligence officer is 
a thankless task: "Your job is to get as much information as 
possible, and mine is to say as little as possible." 
  [Poleshchuk] The country has just gone through an election, 
and what happened, happened. Your service is not directly 
involved in domestic affairs. Nevertheless, one would assume 
that your officers stationed outside of Russia received 
instructions from the Center to keep up with the reaction "over 
there" to events here... 
  [Trubnikov] Of course. 
  [Poleshchuk] Could you give a summation of what people are 
saying about these events? Are there perhaps some nuances of 
which not everyone is aware? 
  [Trubnikov] At this point I would not venture to say that 
there is a stable, unambiguous opinion abroad about the things 
that have happened here. But the responses and statements that 
we are currently collecting tell us one thing: in the opinion of 
people abroad the democratic process is taking hold in Russia. 
These were genuinely free elections, according to outside 
observers; they were democratic and most likely expressed the 
will of the people in its most concentrated form, quite aside 
from the issue of what that will is. The outside world may or 
may not like the outcome of Russia's election, but the most 
important thing is that our democratic process is working. 
  That is what I can tell you at this time. I do not wish to 
go 
into any more details right now, because the assessments vary 
widely. We need to wait for the final results. 
  [Poleshchuk] Foreign intelligence, like other intelligence 
services, is there to protect the interests of the state... 
  [Trubnikov] National interests... 
  [Poleshchuk] ...national interests, regardless of current 
political factors. But is it really possible for your 
organization to remain "above the fray" at this time of 
intensive political struggle in Russia? Is political neutrality 
and non-participation in the parties and movements that exist in 
our country today mandatory for those who work for or want to 
work for the Foreign Intelligence Service? 
  [Trubnikov] It is rather difficult to answer that question. 
Why? Because it is impossible to live in a society and attempt 
to remain apart from it. Of course, each of us has his own 
political sympathies and antipathies. Living among real people, 
any intelligence officer is definitely going to have his own 
internal guideposts. Otherwise we would probably not go vote. 
But the intelligence service did vote. 
  [Poleshchuk] Am I correct to say that the leadership was not 
interested in who voted and how? 
  [Trubnikov] Not only was it not interested, that is not a 
determining factor in the work of an intelligence officer. There 
is one determining factor: patriotism. Regardless of one's own 
political sympathies or antipathies. An intelligence officer is 
a person who guards the state. The current state, no matter what 
kind it is. Therefore no one would think of inquiring who voted 
or how they voted. 
  [Poleshchuk] Fine, then here is a question -- one, I hope, 
that is purely out of the realm of fantasy -- but here it is: 
if, God forbid, the country began to slip back into the past, 
something that people fear so much, what position would 
intelligence take? 
  [Trubnikov] That is a hypothesis, and I am not very inclined 
to discuss hypothetical scenarios. My absolutely firm conviction 
is that a return to the past is impossible. The country has made 
its choice. No one wants to go back to the past. Nor does the 
intelligence service. 
  [Poleshchuk] Who receives information from you nowadays? 
  [Trubnikov] We have a very broad range of recipients and 
consumers. From the president on down to structures that work on 
our economy. But all of them are, of course, state structures. 
We do not provide information to the private sector. We base 
that on what is in my opinion a very important principle: we are 
living off the taxpayers' money. Taxpayers pay for the state. 
Therefore we work for the state. If some private structure wants 
to enjoy the fruits of intelligence efforts, then it should 
create its own intelligence service, maintain it and pay for it. 
  [Poleshchuk] Are there any cases of that happening? 
  [Trubnikov] Well, in any event in the West any more or less 
upstanding corporation has its own intelligence service. And 
similar structures are being created here. Structures whose job 
it is to protect the interests of a specific economic 
association, financial group, bank... Incidentally, there are 
former members of intelligence and counterintelligence agencies 
working for these. 
  [Poleshchuk] As you are aware, 20 December was Intelligence 
Officers' Day. This year state security celebrated its 73rd 
birthday -- not a major anniversary, but still a date... 
  [Trubnikov] That is definitely our holiday, because 73 years 
ago a foreign department was established as part of the 
All-Russian Cheka. 
  We are not the kind who forget where we come from. And we 
never intend to repudiate our own past. Fighting with 
monuments... That is paganism, and we are opposed to that. The 
Queen of England, for example, is not bothered by the monument 
to Cromwell. And for some reason France continues to celebrate 
the day the Bastille fell. Therefore we continue to remember our 
holidays and, of course, to celebrate them. 
  [Poleshchuk] Does your service have any awards, badges or 
certificates? 
  [Trubnikov] Yes, we do have what is, in my opinion, a fairly 
limited range of badges and incentive insignias. Currently our 
highest award is the badge "For Service in Intelligence." That 
is what we award our personnel for actual results. But I should 
note that intelligence officers are no strangers to state 
awards, either. In 1993 the intelligence service received, if 
not ten, then approximately ten state awards. For absolutely 
specific cases not connected with any dates or anniversaries. So 
the country does notice us. However, we do not proclaim it or 
make a big fuss about it, and we present the awards right here 
where you and I are sitting now. 
  [Poleshchuk] It has not been all that long since the Foreign 
Intelligence Service became a separate intelligence branch. Has 
the Russian intelligence service formulated a new doctrine yet? 
  [Trubnikov] That is an exceptionally complex question, and 
an 
exceptionally serious one. Intelligence doctrine cannot be in 
the forefront or be "ahead" of foreign policy doctrine or 
military doctrine. Therefore we are still formulating it in its 
final form, because only now do we have a security doctrine, a 
foreign policy doctrine and military doctrine. 
  I am not inclined to go into great detail about intelligence 
doctrine. You can well understand that in a situation when our 
country is at a crucial point, when it is going through a 
so-called "transition period," doctrine, whether intelligence 
doctrine or otherwise, cannot be firmly stated very far in 
advance. The situation in the country is changing too rapidly. 
Therefore I would put it this way: we have a document that 
formulates the basic principles of our operations during the 
transition period away from confrontation, which was typical of 
the cold war era, toward a doctrine of partnership. 
  [Poleshchuk] You said that intelligence doctrine lags 
somewhat behind other doctrines. We have a military doctrine and 
a foreign policy doctrine. However, as you are aware, attitudes 
toward them vary. To what degree do you have to accept as a 
given things developed by other ministries and agencies? 
  [Trubnikov] We accept everything that is law as a given. 
Intelligence cannot perceive anything that is legitimate in any 
other way. We are in the service of a legal government and a 
president who was elected by the people. For us legitimacy is 
the definitive concept. Regardless of our personal political 
leanings. Of course, we can express our thoughts on various 
aspects of our foreign policy, and we do so. In any event, the 
fact that the intelligence service has made two public reports 
is an indicator that we want to be heard. Both on the issue of 
the spread of weapons of mass destruction and on the issue of 
NATO expansion, and what that could mean to Russia. We express 
our point of view as we deem necessary. But that does not mean 
that we are casting doubts on various principles of military and 
foreign policy doctrine which have been unambiguously approved 
by a legitimate authority and are a guide for action. 
  [Poleshchuk] As you are aware, the first parliamentary 
inspection of Foreign Intelligence Service operations was 
conducted in the summer of 1993. What is your view of the 
outlook for parliamentary monitoring of the intelligence service? 
  [Trubnikov] The issue of parliamentary monitoring has 
remained on the agenda, thank God. That is an absolutely 
essential element in the life of today's intelligence service. 
For us it was a very serious psychological test, to have 
outsiders come into our "house." The intelligence community had 
a very mixed reaction to that. We hide from each other things 
that have suddenly become the subject of discussion and 
investigation by deputies in parliament. At the initial stage we 
had a problem getting used to it, but when we tallied up the 
results of what had been done, we concluded that the 
parliamentary commission's work enabled us to look at ourselves 
from the outside. For the first time in the history of our 
country's foreign intelligence service. When the KGB existed, 
the inspection administration oversaw our expenditure of funds, 
etc., but that was our own in-house inspection. This time we for 
the first time found ourselves the focus of attention by people 
in whom the people's confidence had been placed. I can say that 
on the whole the commission proved itself to be a very mature 
commission. There was not a single unnecessary question. Every 
intelligence officer had an opportunity to go to the commission 
in complete anonymity and say whatever he felt needed to be 
said. Our deputies were able to obtain exhaustive information 
regarding any violations or problems. But there were no such 
cases. I hope that the new members of parliament will establish 
similar commissions for defense and security, or a subcommittee 
on intelligence. 
  [Poleshchuk] Everyone knows that the Foreign Intelligence 
Service has made significant cuts in the number of its stations 
abroad. Is the optimization process over? And, in the same 
connection, what are your comments on a report by MOSKOVSKIY 
KOMSOMOLETS concerning impending deep personnel cuts in the 
intelligence service and serious structural changes in the 
Foreign Intelligence Service? 
  [Trubnikov] I want to say one thing. First of all, no 
dramatic events are occurring in the intelligence service. No 
dramatic cuts are occurring in the intelligence service. Nor 
will they. The normal process of retirement and resignation is 
occurring, just as in any other state structure. Only one 
station was closed in 1993. No targeted cutbacks have been 
carried out, nor will they. 
  As for changes within the intelligence service, they have 
occurred, are still occurring and will continue to occur. Some 
sections -- due to the fact that we are being given new 
assignments -- will be reinforced and assume leadership roles. 
Other sections may be cut back. 
  [Poleshchuk] The information you mention could in principle 
have appeared in any other popular newspaper. Would you 
characterize it as a classic leak? 
  [Trubnikov] Everyone has their source of information. If you 
believe that source, then by all means go ahead and report it. 
But I have become accustomed to repeating and I repeat once 
again: anything pertaining to intelligence, if you want to have 
authentic, reliable information, can come only from inside the 
intelligence service itself. And never in the form of a leak. 
Ideally this would mean a legitimately posed question and an 
exhaustive answer up to the limits to which intelligence regards 
it as essential to reveal itself. 
  [Poleshchuk] Often journalists, specifically those from our 
newspaper, are accused by the authorities of using so-called 
"dubious information sources" in our work. I would like to see 
the faces of members of the presidential press service or Mr. 
Shumeyko's staff if they -- purely hypothetically -- were to 
learn the names and the positions of those "dubious sources" 
that are providing us with exclusive information. But that is 
true, as a matter of fact... I agree that information about 
foreign intelligence, like information about any other 
intelligence service or any other agency, is best obtained from 
an official primary source. But, firstly, not everyone has as 
good a press service as you do. Secondly, an overwhelming 
majority of our officials were raised on hatred of cunning 
journalists and are unwilling to talk to us. Unless, of course, 
they get paid good money for it, or if they themselves have a 
vital need to do so. Incidentally, of late we have not had any 
particular need to seek out "sources." They come to us... And we 
know that they are fully competent and well-informed. What are 
we supposed to do: refuse to work with them? 
  [Trubnikov] I can say with absolutely certainty, as I myself 
once worked under a journalistic cover: there is no great 
difference between a journalist and an intelligence officer when 
it comes to getting information. Now, the means and methods that 
an intelligence officer can use and the degree to which a 
source's reliability are verified and the source studied are a 
different matter... In that regard an intelligence officer 
stands head and shoulders above a journalist. Because first 
there is the process of studying the source. When you do 
conclude that a source is reliable, then you can accept 
information from that source. Not the other way around. 
Intelligence obtains information and makes use of it through 
closed channels, without bringing it before the court of public 
opinion. Intelligence can make mistakes. But perhaps no one 
except the consumer will ever find out. A journalist's mistake 
will be public knowledge the next day. He takes a much bigger 
risk. I would put it this way: a normal journalist should use 
normal information sources. 
  [Poleshchuk] Good advice, but hard to follow in our 
business... Do you personally have enough time and energy to 
read newspapers, which, as you are aware, are one of the main 
sources of open intelligence information? 
  [Trubnikov] There is very little time left over for that. 
  [Poleshchuk] And what do you as a professional see there? 
  [Trubnikov] Unfortunately, the more I read the more 
disillusioned I become by the things I am reading. There is a 
great deal of one-day sensationalism, a great deal of half-baked 
information, information that does not even answer the questions 
of "why?" and "to what end?" People splash something across the 
page without the slightest notion whether they have done good or 
ill. 
  I do not envy my Western colleagues, because there is hardly 
any point in other countries' intelligence officers looking to 
our mass media for information. Much sensation and quite a lot 
of unreliable information. Much speculation. But an intelligence 
service is used to dealing with facts. And when the press so 
rarely provides actual facts it is very difficult for 
intelligence to work with it. More likely our press misleads 
them and keeps them busy with nonexistent problems. 
  [Poleshchuk] The Foreign Intelligence Service's operations 
are regulated by an appropriate law. Can you tell us whether 
that law currently takes into consideration all the nuances in 
the operations of such a sensitive organ as foreign 
intelligence? Will some passages in the law require revision or 
amendment? 
  [Trubnikov] I am glad that you asked that question. We are 
presently discovering that real life is much richer than one 
could possibly set forth in any regulating document. And it 
seems to me that foreign intelligence is already prepared to ask 
our legislators to reconsider some points. 
  [Poleshchuk] What, specifically? 
  [Trubnikov] Well, at least the degree to which the law on 
military service applies to foreign intelligence. For example, a 
person has achieved a certain title and position... He can 
easily be dismissed from the army, because younger replacements 
are following close on his heels. But how can we take a unique 
specialist, say one with unique language knowledge, and dismiss 
him simply because he has reached some maximum age?! Most likely 
the director of the Foreign Intelligence Service needs to be 
given some additional authority and the right to extend the 
intelligence service of a unique specialist for several years. 
There are also other things that intelligence could recommend as 
amendments or additions to the current law. 
  [Poleshchuk] I have heard that the Foreign Intelligence 
Service has established a new administration that will interact 
with intelligence services in foreign countries. Is it true that 
that administration maintains contacts with the stations of 
foreign intelligence services active in Russia? 
  [Trubnikov] Yes. 
  [Poleshchuk] Are these direct contacts? Does an agent come 
to 
you... 
  [Trubnikov] Yes. 
  [Poleshchuk] Has that ever been done before? 
  [Trubnikov] It is a recent phenomenon. Just like the fact 
that the heads of some of our stations abroad go to the heads of 
local intelligence services. And find things to talk about. The 
same thing happens here. 
  [Poleshchuk] To the man on the street that sounds 
incredible... 
  [Trubnikov] I understand how any interaction with another 
intelligence service might sound like treason to the man on the 
street. But we regard that interaction as one aspect of our 
intelligence efforts. We must get used to the fact that some 
things which were inconceivable only two or three years ago are 
now possible and are proving their worth. Therefore the 
operations of that administration are beneficial to intelligence. 
  [Poleshchuk] That is most likely one of the most sensitive 
administrations, if that is the right way to phrase it... 
  [Trubnikov] Definitely. Precisely that word "sensitive" is 
very appropriate here. 
  [Poleshchuk] I would have given a lot for the chance to 
attend a meeting like that and observe this game... 
  [Trubnikov] The thing is, there is very little about this 
that resembles a game. In this business either you say something 
or you say nothing. In contrast to diplomats, whose skill is 
being able to say a great deal and yet have said nothing. 
  [Poleshchuk] But how great the risk is! Suppose you say the 
wrong thing, or say too much... 
  [Trubnikov] Well, that's what common sense is for. And a 
clear understanding of who it is that is sitting across the 
table from you. In matters like this everything is based on 
mutuality. We are not about to bare our souls to a partner who 
is not giving us anything. 
  [Poleshchuk] You have established an economic security 
department. Why is it necessary, and with what issues does it 
deal? 
  [Trubnikov] For Russia today the issue of economic security 
is, of course, our #1 issue. The anything-goes situation that 
exists in our foreign economic relations, the raw materials that 
are leaking out, the capital that is fleeing the country -- all 
these things have prompted intelligence to address these issues. 
We make sure that our foreign partners are not pulling a fast 
one on us. Tempting offers and unique contracts are flooding in, 
but often we are dealing with con artists. It is foreign 
intelligence's job to let state structures know in time that 
these are not the people with whom they want to be dealing. 
  [Poleshchuk] The CIA structures its relations with other 
countries on the basis of a so-called "system of concentric 
circles." Countries with a place in the "inner circle" enjoy the 
greatest trust with regard to access to intelligence 
information. Those countries include, for example, England, 
Canada and Australia. The CIA reviews countries' positions in 
the various "circles" every three years. In your opinion, in 
which of those circles does Russia fall today? 
  [Trubnikov] That's the CIA's business, which circle they put 
us in. I am convinced that Russia is the kind of state that 
cannot be made to fit in any "circles." In any event, we have 
not attempted to make a place for ourselves in any of them. But 
it is absolutely clear that we would not be in the closest 
"circle." 
  [Poleshchuk] In late August 1993 IZVESTIYA, citing the 
Swedish newspaper SVENSKA DAGBLADET, quoted the head of Sweden's 
security police, who said that according to information in his 
possession Russia's foreign intelligence service long ago 
stopped trying to recruit new agents among Swedish military 
personnel or the personnel of state institutions and private 
companies. This give him reason to state that Russian foreign 
intelligence activity has dropped off in a way not seen since 
World War II... 
  [Trubnikov] Let that be on the conscience of the Swedes and 
their counterintelligence service. I think that any smart 
intelligence service should make its presence absolutely 
invisible. I am not inclined to attempt to dissuade anyone from 
believing anything. I can only tell you that nothing unusual is 
going on in the Foreign Intelligence Service's work with regard 
to any particular country. 
  [Poleshchuk] A strong response around the world greeted the 
Foreign Intelligence Service's open report entitled "The 
Prospect of NATO Expansion and Russia's Interests," which was 
made public in late November of this year... 
  [Trubnikov] In any event -- and I say this based on my own 
experience and conversations that I have had with our partners 
abroad, Europe included -- that report generated interest 
because it indicated to our partners in very concentrated form 
the necessity of reckoning with Russia's national interests. 
That was our main objective. 
  [Poleshchuk] Will you continue to publish a series of open 
Foreign Intelligence Service reports? 
  [Trubnikov] The series will definitely continue. At this 
time 
I am not prepared to announce the subject of our next report, 
but it is already begging to be published. Anyway, it could 
pertain to our economic interests. 
  [Poleshchuk] How soon might that be? 
  [Trubnikov] Everything depends on the degree of our 
readiness 
to express our opinion on a given issue. Information that can 
become public knowledge without damaging its source is a very 
tricky matter. We could express a very strong opinion on 
something tomorrow and thereby put our sources at risk. We are 
not going to do that. We are only going to express our opinions 
when our sources can be absolutely sure of their safety. 
  [Poleshchuk] How important is it to ensure a source's 
safety? 
  [Trubnikov] That is the most important issue in any 
intelligence service's operations. The reliability of secret 
communications and maintenance of the source's cover is the main 
thing that guides any source. If he sees that the intelligence 
service is not able to keep its secrets, then the source will 
quit. 
  [Poleshchuk] It is no secret that agent recruitment also 
involves dirty methods: blackmail, bribery, threats... 
  [Trubnikov] In the overall picture those methods comprise 
only a fairly narrow part of the spectrum of methods and means 
utilized by intelligence. Intelligence services prefer to work 
with people on an ideological basis. That makes for the most 
reliable, high-quality and long-term sources. As for sources 
recruited by dirty means, they comprise only a tiny fraction of 
the entire agent apparatus. 
  [Poleshchuk] Last year several Foreign Intelligence Service 
officers went over to the other side. The Foreign Intelligence 
Service openly acknowledged those cases. This year there has not 
been a single report of that nature. Does that mean that there 
were no incidents? 
  [Trubnikov] Yes, that is true. If you are talking about 
treason. 
  [Poleshchuk] That naturally pleases you... 
  [Trubnikov] That pleases us. But, on the other hand, that 
also alarms us. The traitors of 1992 were the end result of 
efforts directed against us by Western intelligence services 
over a long period of time. These were not people who just 
happened to leave. They were mainly agents. These were people 
who had been in our ranks and who were recruited a long time 
ago. Yet the time chosen to activate them was 1992. They 
believed that we were in a very difficult situation, that these 
betrayals would make us look bad, and that our intelligence 
service could be dealt with easily. Maybe even at the hands of 
legislators or the public. These were not incidents, they were a 
fully intentional plan to undermine Russian foreign 
intelligence. But we survived. 
  [Poleshchuk] You said that, on the one hand, you are pleased 
that there have been no incidents of treason by Foreign 
Intelligence Service personnel this year, yet that on the other 
hand you find that alarming. Why? 
  [Trubnikov] It is alarming in the sense that no one has 
halted their efforts against Russian intelligence. Therefore our 
own security is currently our top concern. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>
